25449336
List_of_University_of_Chicago_faculty
This list of University of Chicago faculty contains past and current instructors and administrators at the of Chicago.BusinessLiterature* A. de Armas -  W. Mellon Professor in Humanities and Professor of Spanish and Comparative Literature; also Chair of the Department of Romance Languages and Literatures.* Bellow (X. 1939) - Former Raymond W. and Martha Hilpert Gruner Distinguished Service Professor in the Committee on Social Thought and English. Winner of the Prize and the Prize in Literature.* Berlant - George M. Pullman Professor of English.* K. Bhabha - Former Professor of English.* Bloom - Author of Closing of the American Mind; former Professor in the Committee on Social Thought.* C. Booth - George M. Pullman Distinguished Service Professor Emeritus.* Burke -* Maxwell Coetzee - 2003 Prize laureate in Literature; Distinguished Professor in the Committee on Social Thought.* Bevington - Among the most eminent living scholars of the work of Shakespeare.* S. Eliot - Influential poet, dramatist and literary critic. Member of the University of Chicagos famed on Social Thought.* Ellison - Book Award winner for Invisible Man, one of the most important novels since World War II.* Gandhi - postcolonial theorist and British English professor* Graff (A.B. 1959) - Former Professor of English and Education.* Strand - Former Professor in the Committee on Social Thought. Prize winner.* Wilder - Professor (19301937). Winner of the Book Award, and the Medal of Freedom, and three-time winner of the Prize.*Maclean - Author of A River Runs Through It* School of literary criticism - Group of faculty members at the University of Chicago (R.S. Crane, Olson, Wayne Booth) who founded neo-Aristotelianism.(School of literary criticism)*B. Yehoshua (born 1936), Israeli novelist, essayist, and playwrightLaw School* Casper - Former Dean of the Law School and Provost at the University of Chicago. President Emeritus of Stanford University.* Coase - Professor Emeritus of Law. Nobel laureate in Economics. Co-founder of law and economics movement, arguably the most influential intellectual movement in legal scholarship in the second half of the 20th century.* Director - Played a central role in the development of the law and economics movement. Founded the Journal of Law and Economics, which he co-edited with Ronald Coase.* Richard Epstein - Currently the James Parker Hall Distinguished Service Professor of Law* Kagan - Former Professor and Dean of Harvard Law School and now a US Supreme Court Justice.* Kass -* Llewellyn - Major figure in the school of legal realism.* MacKinnon - American feminist.* W. McConnell - Federal judge on the US Court of Appeals for the Tenth Circuit. Leading constitutional originalist.* Obama - President of the United States of America.* Posner - Helped start law and economics movement.* Cooper Ramo -- First woman President, Bar Association.* Scalia - United States Supreme Court justice; Professor at the Law School (19771982).* David Strauss -* Sunstein -* Boyd White - Founder of Law and Literature movement.Oriental Institute* Biggs - Professor Emeritus of Assyriology* Brickman - Charles H. Swift Distinguished Service Professor Emeritus of Mesopotamian History* Civil - Professor Emeritus of Sumerology* Creason -Lecturer, Hebrew* Donner - Professor of Islamic History* Dorman - Professor Emeritus of Egyptology* Farber - Professor of Assyriology* Gibson - Professor of Archaeology* Goedegebuure - Assistant Professor of Hittitology* Golb - Ludwig Rosenberger Professor in Jewish History and Civilization* Gragg - Professor Emeritus of Eastern Languages* Hasselbach - Assistant Professor of Comparative Semitics* A. Hoffner, JR. - John A. Wilson Professor Emeritus of Hittitology* Johnson - Professor of Egyptology* Kaegi - Professor of Byzatine-Islamic Studies* Moeller - Assistant Professor, Egyptian Archaeology* Pardee - Professor of Northwest Semitic Philology* Richardson - Assistant Professor of History* Ritner - Professor of Egyptology* Roth - Professor of Assyriology; Editor, Assyrian Dictionary* Schloen - Associate Professor of Archaeology* Seri - Assistant Professor of Assyriology* Gil Stein - Director, Oriental Institute* Stolper - Professor of Assyriology and Empire. He is directing Persepolis Fortification Project. He is member of Institute of Iranian Studies, Oriental Society, Institute of Persian Studies, and School of Archaeology in Iraq. His primary concentration also includes Elamite political history, Babylonian political and social history, Akkadian historical and legal texts.* Van Den Hout - Professor of Hittitology; Editor, Hittite Dictionary* Wente - Professor Emeritus of Egyptology* Woods - Associate Professor of Sumerology* Aslihan Yener - Professor of Anatolian Archeology. She is specialized in Ancient Mining and Metal Technology and the Rise of Complex Industries. Director of the Amuq Valley Regional Projects in Antioch (Antakya, Turkey). She is researching Atchana (ancient Alalakh) the capital city of the Kingdom of Mukish (the Amuq) during the Hittite period (Late Bronze Age c. 2000-1200 B.C.) She has directed are Kestel tin mine, Goltepe and Tell Kurdu.Mathematics* Adrian Albert -* Babai - Known for work in computer science and discrete mathematics, especially for his work on proof systems. Prize winner.* A. Beilinson -* Ames Bliss -* Bolza -* Caffarelli - World leader in the field of partial differential equations.* Caldern - Cofounded the Chicago school of mathematical analysis. Winner of Memorial Prize, the Prize, and the Medal of Science.* Byron Coble -* Chern - One of the most influential figures in differential geometry. Famous for Chern classes. Medal of Science and Prize winner.* Eugene Dickson - First recipient of the Prize in algebra.* Drinfeld - Medal Winner.* Fefferman - Received full professorship at the University of Chicago at age 22, making him the youngest ever appointed in the United States. Medal Winner.* Ginzburg - Known for his works in geometric theory.* Glauberman -* Halmos - Noted mathematician and mathematical expositor.* Herstein -* Hrmander - Medal Winner.* Kaplansky -* L. Kelley -* Lang -* Lawvere - Known for his work in category theory, topos theory, and the philosophy of mathematics.* Mac Lane - Cofounder of category theory.* Peter May - Algebraic topologist.* H. Moore -* Lee Moore -* Bo Chu - Medal winner.* Okounkov - Former Dickson Instructor in Mathematics and the College. Medal winner.* Sally - Influential mathematics educator.* Segal -* Soare - Known for work in mathematical logic.* Smale - Medal and Prize winner.* Steenrod - Leading topologist.* Stone -* Weil - Known for seminal work in number theory and algebraic geometry. Leader of influential Bourbaki group. Medal and Prize winner.* Zelmanov - Medal Winner.* Zygmund - One of the most influential mathematicians in the field of analysis in the 20th century. Cofounder, with student Caldern, of the famed Chicago school of mathematical analysis.History* Robert Bartlett - Professor of Medieval History (19841992), and currently Wardlaw Professor of Mediaeval History, University of St. Andrews; Fellow of the Royal Historical Society and author of many books, including The Making of Europe: Conquest, Colonization, and Social Change (Princeton University Press, 1994).* Boorstin - Professor at the University of Chicago for 25 years; Prize winner (1974); Librarian of Congress.* Henry Breasted - Professor of Egyptology and Oriental History.* Cumings - Gustavus F. and Ann M. Swift Distinguished Service Professor in History and the College.* M. Donner - Professor of Near Eastern History. Guggenheim Fellow (2007).* Fitzpatrick - Bernadotte E. Schmitt Distinguished Service Professor of History; ground-breaking historian of modern Russian and Soviet history; mentor to several established and up-and-coming revisionist historians of the Soviet Union, constituting a Fitzpatrick School of Soviet History (http://src-h.slav.hokudai.ac.jp/publictn/acta/24/roundtable.pdf).* Kaegi - Professor of Byzantine and Late Roman history, co-founder of the Studies Conference and the editor of the journal Byzantinische Forschungen and Voting Member of Institute, Chicago. Political, Social, Military and Religious History; European Military Strategy; Byzantino-Islamic History. He is author of many books, including Byzantium and the Decline of Rome (Princeton, 1968) and Byzantine Military Unrest 471-843: An Interpretation. (Amsterdam: 1981).* Fleischer - Kanuni Suleyman Professor of Ottoman and Modern Turkish Studies. MacArthur Genius Fellow (1988).* Hope Franklin - Pioneering scholar of African-American history and civil rights leader; Professor of History from 1964, and Matthews Manly Distinguished Service Professor, 1969-82. President of the Historical Association (1979). Winner of the Medal of Freedom and the Prize.* A. Gutirrez - Preston & Sterling Morton Distinguished Service Professor of United States History; Director of the Center for the Study of Race, Politics and Culture; author of award-winning book When Jesus Came the Corn Mothers Went Away: Marriage, Sexuality and Power in New Mexico, 1500-1846  (Stanford:  Stanford University Press, 1991); Fellow (1983).(Fellow List of winners)* D. Harootunian - Max Palevsky Distinguished Professor Emeritus of Japanese History; groundbreaking scholar of Tokugawa history, Japanese modernism, and historical theory.* Iriye - Professor of History until 1989; now Charles Warren Professor Emeritus of American History at Harvard; leading diplomatic and international historian, specializing in U.S.-Japan relations during the twentieth century; Fellow (1974) and President of the Historical Association (1988).*G. S. Hodgson - Pioneer in Studies and global history, member of the on Social Thought.* Najita - Robert S. Ingersoll Distinguished Professor Emeritus of Japanese History; specialist in Tokugawa Japan and Japanese intellectual and political history; past president of the for Asian Studies (199394).* Hardy McNeill -* Rothfels - Professor of History (19461951).* E. Schmitt - Winner of the Prize.* Christine Stansell - Stein-Freiler Distinguished Service Professor in United States History and the College; Writer and reviewer for New Republic and Slate; author of City of Women.* Swerdlow - Winner of a Macarthur Fellowship.* Westfall Thompson - Professor of History (18951933), leading American historian of the European Middle Ages and early modern period; president of the Historical Association, 1941 (died in office).* Weintraub - Professor of History (19542004) and leading scholar of European cultural history and the history of autobiography.* John Woods - Professor of Iranian and Central Asian HistoryClassics* I. Allen - Associate Professor of Medieval Latin Historiography and Poetry. Latin literature of the Middle Ages and on Latin palaeography.* Ando - Professor of Roman Empire History. Imperial Ideology and Provincial Loyalty in the Roman Empire (2000). APAs Goodwin Award in 2003, and The Matter of the Gods (2008). He is the editor of Roman Religion (2003) and co-editor, with Jrg Rpke, of Religion and Law in Classical and Christian Rome (2006). Problems of law, administration and cultural change in the Roman empire.* Asmis - Professor of Roman Stoicism and Ciceros Political Philosophy and the editor of Classical Philology. Epicurus Scientific Method and articles on Plato, Philodemus, Lucretius, Epictetus, Seneca, and Marcus Aurelius. Greek and Roman philosophy and literary criticism.* Bartsch - Professor of Gender Issues in Antiquity and in Roman literature and culture. Quantrell Teaching Award and Faculty Award for Excellence in Graduate Teaching.* Bresson - Professor of Ancient Economy, the Hellenistic world, and the epigraphy of Rhodes and Asia Minor, and author of La cit marchande (Bordeaux 2000), Lconomie de la Grces des cits (2 volumes; Paris 2007-2008), and Recueil des inscriptions de la Pre rhodienne (Paris 1991), and editor of some five more, on matters of economics, civic life, writing and public power, and the history of the family.* Dik - Associate Professor of Greek, and author of Word Order in Ancient Greek and Word Order in Greek Tragic Dialogue, and articles on the functional grammar of Greek. Quantrell Teaching Award.* Faraone - Professor of Ancient Greek religion and poetry, and co-editor of Magika Hiera.* M. Hall -  Professor of Greek History, the Chair of Classics Department, author of Ethnic Identity in Greek Antiquity (Cambridge, 1997), APAs Goodwin Award. 2004 Gordon J. Laing Prize. He is focused on Greek history, historiography, and archaeology. Quantrell Teaching Award. Phyllis Fay Horton Distinguished Service.* Ralph Johnson - Professor Emeritus of Latin poetry and Greek/Latin rhetoric. The John Matthews Manly Distinguished Service.* Lowrie - Professor of Roman culture, literature, politics, and reception. Idea of security at Rome, the exemplum in stories about foundation and state violence during the collapse of the Roman Republic.* Martinez - Associate Professor of Ancient Greek papyrology, paleography and language, religion and magic. Papyrological research to the study of early Christianity. Hellenistic authors, and early Christian literature.* Mayer - Assistant Professor and author of Rome is Where the Emperor is: State Monuments in the Decentralised Roman Empire from Diocletian to Theodosius II (Mainz, 2001; in German). Political imagery of the Hellenistic and Roman Imperial periods, representational behavior of Roman elites under the Empire, and ancient urbanism.* Nooter - Assistant Professor of Greek tragedy and modern reception. Sophocles and poetic language, Athenian drama, archaic poetry and religious thought, literary theory and linguistics, and contemporary poetry and theater.* Payne - Associate Professor of Greek poetry, member of the Committee on Social Thought and member of the Universitys Poetry and Poetics program.* Nicholas Rudall - Professor Emeritus of Tragedy and the Ancient Theater, Aristophanes, and Propertius. He translated of Euripides Bacchae and The Iphigeneia Plays and Sophocles Electra and Antigone and directed many classical works at the Court Theatre, of which he is the founding director.* Peter White - Professor of Roman poetry, comedy and satire and Greaco-Roman historiography.and Associate Chair for Undergraduate Affairs, author of Promised Verse: Poets in the Society of Augustan Rome. APAs Goodwin Award. Quantrell Teaching Award.* Wray - Associate Professor of Hellenistic and Roman poetry, philosophy, Greek epic and tragedy; and Director of the Master of Arts Program in the Humanities; member of the Universitys Poetry and Poetics program; author of Catullus and the Poetics of Roman Manhood (Cambridge 2001). He focuses on ancient and modern relations between literature and philosophy; gender; theory and practice of literary translation; and the reception of Greco-Roman thought and literature, from Shakespeare and Corneille to Pound and Zukofsky.Philosophy* Arendt - Former Professor in the Committee on Social Thought.* Carnap - Professor of Philosophy. Leading member of the Vienna Circle.* Davidson - Professor of the Philosophy of Religion in the Divinity School; also in the Department of Philosophy, the Department of Comparative Literature, the Committee on Historical and Conceptual Studies of Science, and the College.* Donald Davidson - Professor of Philosophy (19761981).* Dewey - Former Professor of Philosophy.* Hartshorne - Former Professor of Philosophy.* Haugeland - David B. and Clara E. Stern Professor of Philosophy.* Lear - John U. Nef Distinguished Service Professor at the Committee on Social Thought and in the Department of Philosophy.* Marion - Professor of the Philosophy of Religion and Theology in the Divinity School; also in the Department of Philosophy and the Committee on Social Thought.* Herbert Mead - Former Professor of Philosophy.* Nussbaum - Ernst Freund Distinguished Service Professor of Law and Ethics in the Divinity School; also in the Law School, the Department of Philosophy, and the College.* Ricoeur - John Nuveen Professor Emeritus in the Divinity School (19711991).* Russell - Visiting Professor of Philosophy (19381939).* Strauss - Professor of Political Philosophy (19491967).* Johannes Tillich - Professor of Religion (1962).* Hayden Tufts - Former Professor of PhilosophyReligion* T. Antoun - Professor (1989); Professor Emeritus of Anthropology at University; stabbed to death by student in 2009* Doniger - Historian of Religions (1978 )* Eliade - Sewell Avery Distinguished Service Professor of the History of Religions (19581986), best known for his myth of the Eternal Return and his book The Sacred and the Profane: The Nature of Religion.* Kitagawa - Historian of Religions* Lincoln - Historian of Religions* Long - Historian of Religions* Tracy - Professor Emeritus of Theology (1970-); leading figure in theological hermeneutics and proponent of theological pluralism in works such as Plurality and Ambiguity (University of Chicago Press, 1986).* Wach - Historian of Religions (1944-55)* K. Wedemeyer - Historian of Religions (2003 )Science* Baber - Geographer and geologist* Buchsbaum - Invertebrate zoologist.* Carena - Particle physicist.* M. Carroll - Cosmologist.* Chrowder Chamberlin - Influential geologist. Developed planetesimal theory.* Chandrasekhar - 1983 Prize laureate in Physics.* Cole - Witness at the Scopes Monkey Trial* M. Davis - Professor of Astronomy and Geophysical Sciences. He studies the origins of the Solar System for which he working on building ion nanoprobe. Developed resonant ionization mass spectrometry.* Dimopoulos - Particle physicist.* Fermi - 1938 Prize laureate in Physics.* Franck - Nobel laureate.* Theodore Fujita -* Gell-Mann - 1969 Nobel Prize in Physics* Goeppert-Mayer - Developed model for nuclear shell structure at the University of Chicago, for which she received a Nobel in Physics in 1963.* Hartle - Theoretical physicist at the Fermi Institute.* Herzberg - 1971 Prize laureate in Chemistry.* Hubble -* J. Kleppa - Pioneer in High Temperature Thermochemistry; inventor of the Kleppa Calorimeter* W. Kolb - Cosmologist.* Lahn -* Lawrence - 1939 Prize laureate in Physics.* Lewontin - Pioneered use of molecular biology on questions of evolution and genetic variation.* Lykken - Particle physicist.* Abraham Michelson - First American Nobel laureate in the sciences. Known for the famed Michelson-Morley experiment, a cornerstone of Relativity Theory. Measured the speed of light.* Millikan - Nobel laureate in Physics. Known for his measurement of the charge of the electron and the photoelectric effect. Performed famed oil-drop experiment at the University of Chicagos Ryerson Laboratory, which has been designated a historic physics landmark by the American Physical Society.* Nambu - Winner of Sakurai Prize, Wolf Prize, Nobel Prize in Physics, and the National Medal of Science. Considered founder of string theory. Known for color charge in quantum chromodynamics and work on spontaneous symmetry breaking in particle physics.* Parker - Astrophysicist, known for his work on the wind.* Rice - Chemist. National Medal of Science winner.* B. Seibert - Biochemist, winner of the Medal and member of the Womens Hall of Fame.* Sigler - Former Professor. Worked out the structure of the RNA molecule responsible for the initiation of protein synthesis.(http://www2.mrc-lmb.cam.ac.uk/archive/P_Sigler.html Paul Sigler Obituary)* Spiropulu - Particle physicist.* Teller - Father of the hydrogen bomb.* S. Turner - Cosmologist.* Urey - Nobel Prize in Chemistry.* E.M. Wagner - Particle physicist.* Wilczek -* Wright - National Medal of Science winner. One of the founders of population genetics.Medicine and health policy* Siegler - Director of the MacLean Center for Clinical Medical Ethics* Pollack - Professor and chair of the Center for Health Administration StudiesSocial Sciences* Appadurai (A.M. 1973, Ph.D. 1976) - Former Professor of Anthropology.* Becker (A.M. 1953, Ph.D. 1955) - University Professor in Economics, Graduate School of Business, and Sociology.* Bogue (A.M., Ph.D.)- Current professor of sociology at the University of Chicago.* Chakrabarty - Lawrence A. Kimpton Distinguished Service Professor in History and South Asian Languages & Civilizations.* Coase - Clifton R. Musser Professor Emeritus of Economics, The Law School.* Knorr-Cetina - George Wells Beadle Distinguished Service Professor of Anthropology and Sociology.* Fasolt - Professor of Early Modern European History.* Fogel - Charles R. Walgreen Distinguished Service Professor of American Institutions.* Hope Franklin - John Matthews Manly Distinguished Service Professor Emeritus in History.* Friedman - Paul Snowden Russell Distinguished Service Professor Emeritus in Economics.* Gal - Mae & Sidney G. Metzl Distinguished Service Professor of Anthropology and Linguistics; a leading scholar in studies of Eastern Europe, linguistic anthropology, and gender.* Geertz - Professor of Anthropology (19601970).* Harris - Pioneering geographer at the University of Chicago in the first department of geography in the United States.* Hayek - Former Professor in the Committee on Social Thought.* Heckman - Winner of the Nobel Memorial Prize in Economics in 2000.* A. Kaplan - Professor of Political Science* Kohlberg (A.B. 1949, Ph.D. 1958) - Professor in the Committee on Human Development (19621968).* C. Krueger Socialist Vice-Presidential Candidate and Professor of Economics 1933? - ??* Lasswell - One of the most influential political scientists of the 20th century.* Levitt - Alvin H. Baum Professor in Economics.* Lilla - Professor in the Committee on Social Thought (19992007).* A. List economist, pioneer in the field of experimental economics* Lucas Jr. (A.B. 1959, Ph.D. 1964) - John Dewey Distinguished Service Professor in Economics.* Mearsheimer - R. Wendell Harrison Distinguished Service Professor of Political Science.* Edward Merriam - Founder of the behavioral approach to political science.* H. Miller - Robert R. McCormick Distinguished Service Professor Emeritus, Graduate School of Business.* Morgenthau - One of the most important International Relations theorists; his seminal book Politics Among Nations defined the International Relations field.* Pape (Ph.D. 1988) - Professor of Political Science.* E. Park - Professor of Sociology (19141936).* Radcliffe-Brown - Professor of Anthropology (19311937); developed theory of Structural Functionalism.* Redfield - Professor of Anthropology (19271958).* Sahlins - Charles F. Grey Distinguished Service Professor Emeritus of Anthropology.* Sapir - Creator of SapirWhorf hypothesis, Sapir is arguably the most influential figure in American Linguistics.* Sassen - Ralph Lewis Professor of Sociology (19982007).* M. Schneider - Professor of Anthropology (19601986).* Skocpol - Former Professor of Sociology (19811986). Now Dean of Graduate School of Arts and Sciences at Harvard.* Stigler - Charles R. Walgreen Distinguished Service Professor in Economics and Graduate School of Business.* I. Thomas (Ph.D. 1896) - Professor of Sociology (18961918).* Turner - Former Professor in the Committee on Social Thought.* Veblen - Professor of Political Economy (18921906).* Walt - Former Professor (19891999) and Deputy Dean of Social Sciences (19961999). Dean of Harvards John F. Kennedy School of Government after tenure at the University of Chicago.* Julius Wilson - Lucy Flower University Professor of Sociology (19721996).* Wohlstetter - Awarded Presidential Medal of Freedom. Influenced prominent neoconservatives, including Wolfowitz. Prominent theorist of the Cold War.* Thrasher - Notable sociologist and prominent member of the School of Sociology* Marion Young - Former Professor of Political ScienceArts and Entertainment* Ran - William H. Colvin Professor of Music, 1973present. Winner of the Prize. Student of Shapey.* Ebert (X. 1970) - Film critic and lecturer at Graham School. Winner of the Prize.* Shapey - Composer, Fellow in 1982.University Presidents:See also: The Presidents of the University of Chicago, University of Chicago Presidential Search CommitteeBoard of trustees* M. Alper (A.B. 1980, M.B.A. 1981) - President of the York City Economic Development Corporation.* G. Booth (M.B.A. 1971) - Chairman and CEO of Fund Advisors.* H. Bryan - Former Chairman and CEO of Sara Lee Corporation.* A. Cole (J.D. 1975) - Chairman of the Executive Committee and Partner of Austin LLP, the sixth-largest law firm in the world.* David Coolidge III - Vice Chairman of William Blair & Company, LLC.* Corzine (M.B.A. 1973) - Governor of Jersey.* S. Crown - President of Crown and Company.* Darrow (A.B. 1965) - Former Senior Vice President of the New York Times Company.* B. Davis, Jr. (M.B.A. 1967) - Chancellor of the of Georgia.* Dimon - President and COO of Chase & Co..* Donnelley - President of the Center for Humans and Nature. * J. Duchossois - CEO of Duchossois Industries.* S. Frank - President and CEO of Wheels, Inc.* W. Fuller - Former president of the Company* J. Gleacher (M.B.A. 1967) - Chairman of & Co.* J. Goldblatt (Lab 1954, X. 1958) - Partner of Winston & Strawn.* Louise Gorno (M.B.A. 1976) - Vice President and Global Account Director of Kearney.* C. Gould (M.B.A. 1978) - Founder and General Partner of Foundation Capital.* J. Grossman (A.B. 1973, A.M. 1974, Ph.D. 1975) - Chairman of Quantitative Financial Strategies, Inc. * W. Harris - Chairman of Harris Holdings, Inc.* M. Jacobs (A.B. 1980) - CEO of Lazard North America and Deputy Chairman and Managing Director of Lazard LLC.* Jarrett - Managing Director and Executive Vice President of the Company. * L. Katen (A.B. 1970, M.B.A. 1974) - Executive Vice President of Pfizer, Incorporated and President of Pfizer Global Pharmaceuticals.* J. Keller (M.B.A. 1968) - Chairman of DeVry Inc.* L. Kelly (M.B.A. 1964) - Managing Partner of KEL Enterprises, L.P.* M. Kilts, Jr. (M.B.A. 1974) - Chairman, President, and CEO of Gillette Company.* J. Klingensmith (A.B. 1975, M.B.A. 1976) - Executive Vice President of Inc.* L. Klowden (A.B. 1967) - President and CEO of Milken Institute.* Lansing (Lab 1962) - CEO of the Lansing Foundation.* John Martin (S.M. 1975, Ph.D. 1978) - President and CEO of Sciences.* E. Massey - President of College until 2007.* W. May (A.B. 1964, M.B.A. 1965) - President and COO of Triarc Companies, Inc.* W. McCarter, Jr. - President and CEO of the Museum.* Neubauer (M.B.A. 1965) - Chairman and CEO of Aramark.* Nicklin (A.B. 1975, J.D. 1977) - Partner of & Ellis.* B. Plotnick (A.B. 1963) - President of Paradigm Holdings Inc.* J. Pritzker (M.B.A. 1976, J.D. 1976) - Chairman and CEO of Corporation.* A. Ranney, Jr. (J.D. 1966) - President and CEO of Chicago Metropolis 2020.* W. Rogers, Jr. (Lab 1976) - Chairman and CEO of Ariel Capital Management.* M. Rosenfield (J.D. 1978) - President and CEO of Leaf Group LLC.* G. Rothmeier (M.B.A. 1972) - Chairman and CEO of Great Northern Capital.* P. Strubel - Vice Chairman of UNext, Inc.* D. Trott (A.B. 1981, M.B.A. 1982) - Vice Chairman of Sachs.* I. Wais, Jr. (A.B. 1963) - CEO of Marwais International L.L.C.* Paula Wolff (A.M. 1969, Ph.D. 1972) - Senior Executive of Chicago Metropolis 2020.* G. Yovovich (A.B. 1974, M.B.A. 1975) - President of Capital.* T.F. Yuen (A.B. 1975) - Deputy Chairman of PCCW Limited.* J. Zimmer - President of the of Chicago.Notes
25476354
Kurt_Salmon
Kurt Salmon is a global consulting firm specializing in the retail, goods and health care sectors.  The firm was among the first firms established in the United States and remains among only a small handful in continuous operation since being founded in the early 1930s. History  Formation The firm was officially founded as Kurt Salmon Associates (KSA) in 1935 by Kurt Salmon, a German immigrant from Cologne.  Salmon was professionally educated at Chemnitz Textile University and visited the United States in 1930 at the urging of his father to gain experience in the emerging of the United States.  Although he did not originally intend to stay in the United States, he was favorably impressed with the culture and decided to stay on.  After a series of engineering projects with two hosiery companies, he formed his own consulting firm to redesign manufacturing processes in the needle trade.  Although operated as a partnership, KSA was legally organized as a Delaware Corporation owned solely by the principals of the firm. Early years KSA expanded slowly over its first decade of operation.  In these early years, the company established an ethic of diligence and quality in client work.  Salmon himself was a stickler for details, and this would become a fundamental part of the firms cultural fabric.  One of the firms first hires was Karl Striegel, a  engineer who would become Salmons primary partner in building the business.  The two men worked closely together over the next 25 years as KSA expanded from a dozen to more than 200 professional staff.The balance of the 1940s and 1950s represented a period of steady growth for the firm.  KSA expanded across the United States and also into the United Kingdom, France and Germany.  Like his contemporary, Bower of McKinsey, Salmon was among the first to hire the brightest young graduates straight off campuses and then train them from scratch.  The firm added research and development support staff to assist in this task, and even directly operated a mill in Royden, Georgia, and circulating new staff there to accelerate their learning.  KSA consultants relocated to client job sites during this period, and the firm developed a strong internal culture of professionalism and collegiality to support their feeling of inclusion and satisfaction.  Kurt Salmon recognized the importance of such an internal environment and was personally instrumental in modeling the values and behaviors embedded in the firm to this day.  The firm was a founding member of the American Association of Management Consultants or AAMC, and Salmon served as an early Chairman of this organization.By the 1960s KSA was the undisputed consulting leader in improving manufacturing operations in the goods sector.  The firm had established the benchmark standard of excellence in quality and impact of client results and had evolved a supportive internal culture of collegiality.  Kurt Salmon personally set the tone for the culture and was instrumental in bringing both KSA and the industry sector the firm served up to new levels of professionalism and integrity.  Externally, Karl Striegel drove the commercial side of the business with clients and the overall results were outstanding.  Many senior colleagues still recall this period as among the Golden Years of KSA.The 1970s brought great changes to the firm.  The manufacturing basis of the soft goods sector had been steadily migrating out of the United States to lower labor cost location, both in South America and in the Asia-Pacific.  KSAs U.S.-based practice in the operations and manufacturing sectors increasingly lost relevance as this trend continued, and the firm shifted emphasis to retail, logistics and sourcing services to compensate, and also opened an office in Hong Kong.  The 70s proved a time of strategic exploration as the new leadership team of Stig Kry, CEO, and Jack Ulman, president, sought to diversify KSAs offering into new industry sectors.  Despite forays into the hospitality, mining, furniture and health care industries, the firm was unsuccessful at sustaining viable positions outside the soft goods sector.  Coupled with the disastrous recession of 197071, the firm contracted greatly in revenues and profitability.  Before the decade had ended both Salmon and Striegel, the founding generation owners and the first two chairmen of KSA, had retired, marking the end of an era. Recent years KSAs services and economics continued to change significantly over the course of the 1980s and into the early 1990s.  The new generation of owners led by David Cole, CEO,  and Barry Moore, president, redefined the firms strategy, organization and compensation.  While retail and consumer products remained the mainstay industry expertise of KSA, the firm was finally successful in a new industry sector with the acquisition of the Hamilton Associates health care boutique in 1986.  The firm additionally developed true advisory services in such areas as strategy to accompany the traditional implementation practices.  Firm economics were upgraded, and KSA embarked on a global expansion supported by the buoyant 1990s market for consulting services.  In particular, KSA expanded its offerings in systems planning and implementation, and developed expertise and alliances across a range of software such as SAP.While KSA had made the transition from a single-offering engineering specialist to a top line management advisory practice, the internal financing of the firm did not advance at a comparable pace.  The capital available from the Principals to finance global growth was limited and this resource base was further stressed by several costly expansion initiatives in the information technology implementation market.  To compound matters, the KSA board voted to revalue the book stock of the company in 1999 and established a new formula value, further stressing the internal financing capability of the principals.  Although the firm would continue to be privately owned under the new formula for several more years, it became clear the structure was not sustainable and the principals voted unanimously to sell KSAs equity to Consulting Group or MCG in 2007.  As part of the transaction the KSA Principals assumed a significant shareholding position in MCG, a traded company on the Stock Exchange.On 1 January 2011, KSA merged with Consulting, another consultancy of MCG, to form Kurt Salmon.(Management Consulting Group, 2011. Mcgplc.com. Retrieved on 8 September 2011.) Consultants Arnold Aronson, former CEO, Saks(Forbes.com, 2009. Forbes.com. Retrieved on 8 September 2011.)Jerry Black, SVP and Director, Aeon(Aeon appoints first foreign exec. Kyodo News. The Japan Times (25 January 2009). Retrieved on 8 September 2011.)Howard Cooley, former CEO, Jockey(Debt and Executive Turmoil Keep Danskin Hobbling. New York Times (16 August 1996). Retrieved on 8 September 2011.)Alan Dabbiere, Chairman and CEO, Wandering WiFi, founder and former CEO, Manhattan Associates(Wandering WiFi Names Alan Dabbiere Chairman; Former Founder and CEO of Manhattan Associates Joins Wireless Technology Provider and Leverages Financial Investment in Company. Business Wire. 16 January 2006. Retrieved on 8 September 2011.)Normand Gagnier, Director of Worldwide Manufacturing, Kimberly-ClarkAtiff Gill, COO and EVP, Metersbonwe(2009. Apparel Magazine. Retrieved on 8 September 2011.)Thomas Heckler, Vice Chancellor, University of Oregon Health Sciences CenterJames Hicks, former President, Polo for BoysDavid Hitt, former CEO, Methodist Hospital DallasJavier Iruegas, CEO, Valley Medical Center El PasoBradley Morrison, PhD, Associate Professor, MIT(Brandeis, 2009)Shaz Kahng, Global Business Director, NikePhilip Kowalczyk, President, Americas Region, The Body Shop, former COO, TalbotsSteven Nevill, EVP Merchandising Processes and Systems, FederatedPaul Raines, COO, GameStop, formerly EVP of US Stores, Home DepotRichard Sawyer, Former Executive Director, American Hospital in BeirutSteve Szilagyi, SVP Distribution, LowesDebra Wunner, Director, Global Product Marketing, Clinique Offices  Africa Casablanca, MoroccoTunis, Tunisia Americas Atlanta, founded in 1971IrvineMinneapolis, founded in 1947New YorkSan Francisco, founded in 1983San Bruno Asia Hong KongShanghaiTokyo, founded in 1994 Europe BrusselsLyon, FranceMarseille, FranceNantes, FranceParisDsseldorfRomeLeudelange, Luxembourg GenevaLondon, founded in 1956Manchester, United Kingdom References  External links * Kurt Salmon official website http://www.kurtsalmon.com/* Management Consulting Group official website http://www.mcgplc.com/
25488552
Jundee_Gold_Mine
The Jundee Gold Mine is an active mine in Australia, approximately 55 km north east of the town of Wiluna, owned by Newmont Mining.(Jundee, Western Australia Newmont website, accessed: 20 December 2009)HistoryThe Jundee mine was opened in 1995, originally as an open pit operation and, from 1997, also as an underground mine.(Originally, the mine was owned to 51% by Central Mines, which acquired the remaining 49% in early 1995 for US$89 million, alongside 30% of the Gold Mine.(Gold Mine Stakes Sold New York Times, published: 6 February 1995, accessed: 19 December 2009)In 1997, the Jundee mine was enlarged with the acquisition of the nearby Gold Mine, owned by the Mining Corporation NL.(Charles Bennett Bass - Director of Eagle Mining Corporation NL aquilaresources.com.au, accessed: 15 February 2010)Great Central Mines, with Jundee, Bronzewing and the Gold Mine, was taken over by Mining in June 2000 and Normandy, in turn, by the Mining Corporation in February 2002.()(View Project Owners: Jundee - Nimary accessed: 19 December 2009)The mine was operating as an open pit and underground mine until 2007, when the last open pit closed. Newmont plans to return to open pit mining in 2010 if drilling results are positive.(The Asia Pacific Region Newmont website, accessed: 20 December 2009) Currently, the mine is scheduled to close in 2013 but Newmont hopes to extend the mine life.(Beyond the mine Newmont website, published: 2009, accessed: 20 December 2009)In 2007, the mine employed 552 people, in 2008 528, of which 155 were permanent staff and the rest contractors.(Production* 1 Figures for January to June 2002. References  External links * Newmont website* Place Names Search Results - Jundee Australia website
25507452
Geography_of_Queensland
largest lake  Dam220 kmThe geography of Queensland, which is found in the north east portion of Australia, is varied. It includes tropical islands, sandy beaches, flat river plains that flood after monsoon rains, tracts of rough, elevated terrain, dry deserts, rich agricultural belts and densely populated urban areas.The total land mass of Queensland covers 22.5% of the Australian continent, an area of 1,730,648 square kilometers, making it the second largest state in the of Australia.() The total length of Queenslands mainland coastline is  with another  of island coastline.() The most unique geographical feature of the state is the Barrier Reef,( an important tourist drawcard.  The of Capricorn crosses the state with about half of Queenslands area located to the north of the line.BorderThe far western boundary with the Territory is aligned along the meridian east until Corner at the intersection of this meridian and the parallel south. It is here that Queensland borders Australia. The boundary follows this longitude until it reaches Corner where the border turns south reaching Corner on the parallel south, the most western part of the border with South Wales. The border follows this longitude towards the coast at about the meridian east before following the courses of a number of rivers, then across a number of mountain ranges until it reaches Point Danger. These rivers are the River, Severn River and Weir Rivers, all tributaries of the Barwon River itself a tributary of the River.() Southern border towns include Mungindi, Goondiwindi and Texas.RegionsThere are 9 major regions of Queensland.  These include East Queensland, Downs which includes the Belt, Queensland encompassing the Mackay and Fitzroy regions, South West Queensland containing the Maranoa, Central West, Bay-Burnett which includes the Burnett, Queensland, Country and North Queensland which includes the Tablelands. The Darling Downs and South East Queensland regions were the first to be settled. There are 15 bioregions found in Queensland, including York Peninsula, Country, Belt and Lands.Physical geographyIslandsFile:GreatBarrierReef-EO.JPG|thumb|The Great Barrier Reef, with the Islands in the north and Bay in the southFile:Fraser Island south from Indian Head.jpg|thumb|left|View south from Indian Head, Island, 2005Island, the largest sand island in the world lies off the coast of Queensland.(  There are half of the worlds perched or dune lakes on Fraser Island.() These rare lakes, which total 80 of this type worldwide, are formed in depressions between sand dunes and have no natural inflow or outflow.Island, Heron island, Keppel Island, Hamilton Island and the Islands are known for their tourist resorts. Island and Palm Island sustain large aboriginal communities. In the Torres Strait Island is the administrative and commercial centre of the Strait Islands. Island, a large, mountainous island offshore from Cardwell, is completely preserved within the national park. West Island is a coral cay that sustains important nesting grounds for sea birds and turtles.The islands of Bribie, Moreton, North Stradbroke and South Stradbroke are located in the south east corner of the state. North Stradbroke Island is the second largest sand island in the world.() As Bribie Island is connected by a bridge over the Passage it is the most developed island in the region.Bodies of waterFile:Burdekin Dam.jpg|thumb|Dam is Queenslands largest reservoir, 2007To the north west of Queensland is the of Carpentaria. North of York Peninsula is Strait with many Strait Islands, the most northerly of which is Island at the parallel south. To the east of Queensland lies the Sea, part of the Ocean. Major bays along the coast include Charlotte Bay, Bay north of Yeppoon, Bay between Fraser Island and the mainland, Trinity Bay off Cairns and Bay off Brisbane. The Sandy Strait is a passage extending south of Hervey Bay, between the mainland and Fraser Island. Beaches on the Gold Coast and the Sunshine Coast are long and sandy, attracting tourists including surfers.() Further north the waves are dampened by the barrier reefs.Queenslands largest dam is the Dam, followed by Awoonga. There is an absence of any large natural lakes in the state. There are a few natural lakes created by volcanic craters and coastal lagoons mainly in South East Queensland. The lakes in the arid and semi-arid regions of Queensland experience low, highly variable rates of rainfall together with very high evaporation rates.()RiversFile:Wallaman falls 01.jpg|thumb|Falls have the longest drop of any waterfall in Australia, 2007Queensland contains hundreds or rivers and many more smaller creeks. The discharge from these rivers, particularly in the tropical north of the state, accounts for 45% of the nations runoff.() Major coastal rivers include the Mitchell River, Fitzroy River, Mary River and River with the River being the longest at . Inland are the northern tributaries of the Murry River including the River, River and River. Rivers of the Eyre Basin include Creek with its two major tributaries Thomson River and the River as well as the River. The River contains the highest diversity of freshwater fish of all Australian rivers.()Falls in the north of the state is one of the most striking. During heavy rains the landscape is transformed into a gushing torrent.  Similarly Falls in the Coast Hinterland is most spectacular after strong downpours. Falls west of Ingham in North Queensland is Australias largest single drop waterfall.() Other notable waterfalls include Milla Falls, Falls and Falls.Some of Queenslands towns are located on relatively flat land on the banks of rivers. During severe floods, such as the 2010 Queensland floods, numerous towns are inundated as flood waters rise. Levees have alleviated some minor flooding but after prolonged periods of heavy rainfall the sheer volume of flood waters cannot be held back. Disruptions from flooding have become accepted in inland towns like Charleville and to a lesser degree in coastal towns such as Gympie.Mountains and rangesEastern Queensland is dominated by the Dividing Range in contrast to the low-relief of western areas. East of the Great Dividing Range is a narrow coastal strip, known as the north-east coast drainage division which contains most of the states population.  It is along this strip that the states most important agricultural product, cane, is grown in the fertile soils and moist climate.Other elevated areas include eastern parts of the Tableland, Atherton Tablelands, Central Highlands containing Gorge and the Granite Belt, Queenslands primary wine-producing region. The Mountains an isolated spur of the Great Divide are especially scenic and provide important habitat in a region that has suffered from excess land clearing. Closer to the coast is the Mountains, a series of volcanic plugs which were named by the explorer James Cook. Another natural wonder is the series of mountain ranges in South East Queensland known as the Rim.The highest mountains in the state are Bartle Frere at , Bellenden Ker at , Superbus at , at Barney  and Peak reaching  above sea level.ClimateThe coastal strip, east of the Great Dividing Range, has a moist, warm temperate climate. West of the range both the minimum temperatures and rainfall rates decrease while the days are hotter.() In the north of the state there is a monsoon season. Tropical cyclones cross the coast regularly, sometimes providing good rainfall inland.(Mount Bellenden Ker has recorded Australias highest annual rainfall,  and has Australias highest median annual rainfall of .() The highest daily rainfall total was 907.0 mm at Crohamhurst on 3 February 1893.( The highest temperature recorded in the state was 49.5C in Birdsville on 24 December 1972. The lowest temperature ever recorded in the state was -10.6C in Stanthorpe on 23 June 1961.()File:Desert de Simpson.jpg|thumb|left|Desert, 2007Much of western Queensland is arid, with some desert areas. The Stony Desert, Desert and the Desert are partially located in Queensland.() Drought has had a significant impact on Queensland rural communities, both socially and economically.Human geographyThe east coast of Australia, including what is now known as Queensland was first explored by Cook but for thousands of years before it was occupied by Australians. The capital of Queensland is Brisbane. Queensland uses the Australian Eastern Standard Time Zone, but does not adjust in summer for saving. Mining and agriculture, particularly sugar cane harvesting, are the states main industries.The Artesian Basin is an important water source for the state. Through the drilling of bores it has allowed a sheep and cattle industry to thrive in the arid Mitchell grass, Mulga and Spinifex plains in western and central regions.() Significant man-made features include the Fence, an extensive rail network and numerous highways.PopulationThe population of Queensland at the end of June 2009 was 4,406,800 ranking it as the third most populous state.(3101.0 - Australian Demographic Statistics, Jun 2009, Bureau of Statistics, 20 December 2009.) Most of Queenslands current population growth is driven by migration from Zealand.() By 2042 the population of Queensland is expected to reach 7 million people.( Queensland has Australias second largest aborigine population. However if growth rates continue, the population of indigenous Australians in Queensland will surpass New South Wales by the time of the next census.()Cities and townsQueenslands capital city, Brisbane is located in the most populous region South East Queensland. Also located here is the Gold Coast, Ipswich, Logan, Redcliffe City and Toowoomba the largest inland  city in Australia is located 120 km west of Brisbane on the Darling Downs as well as Warwick.Townsville is the largest city in the states north.  Other cities in the north of the state include Isa a mining town, Charters Towers, Mackay, the countrys biggest exporter of sugar and one of the largest coal exporters in the country and Cairns. In the central regions of the state are the cities of Rockhampton, Bundaberg, Gladstone with its economically important coal exporting port facilities, Maryborough and Bay. The largest ports in Queensland are the of Gladstone, followed by the of Brisbane and then the of Townsville.Some Queensland towns and settlements are known as aboriginal communities. Palm Island and Cherbourg are two of the more well-known examples.TransportRail networks extend along the eastern coast from the Gold Coast to Kuranda. Major branch lines extend inland to Longreach and Charleville and Mount Isa. The Pacific Highway links Brisbane and Sydney along the coast while the England links the cities inland.  The Highway connects Goondiwindi to the southern states via central New South Wales. The Highway, which travels along the coast from Brisbane to Townsville, has sections near Gympie which were described in a 2006 report as some of the worst national highway in Australia.()Protected areasQueensland contains significant areas of rainforest and other areas of biological diversity. Heritage Areas include the Barrier Reef, Tropics of Queensland and Rainforests of Australia. Queensland has 226 parks. The largest is Desert National Park in the remote south west of the state.() The most visited national parks in South East Queensland are National Park, National Park and National Park.  These parks are located near centres of major population and are the most accessible in the state. Lamington and other parks around the Rim such as Range National Park, are included in the World Heritage listed Gondwana Rainforests of Australia.Further afield is the National Park in Central Queensland containing rugged gorge country and some of Australias finest Aboriginal art. In the north of the state are National Park including Riversleigh, Gorge National Park and National Park where the Wet Tropics of Queensland meets the Great Barrier Reef. Some waterways are protected in three state marine parks. These are the Barrier Reef Marine Park, Sandy Marine Park and Bay Marine Park.()See also*of postcodes in Queensland*East Queensland Regional Plan*and territories of AustraliaReferences
25524212
Mather_Inn
 designated_other1_color  CornflowerBlueThe Mather Inn is a hotel in Michigan.  The inn served as housing for the cast of the classic 1959 movie of a Murder, and was where Ellington composed the movies score.(Anatomy of a Murder Ishpeming Walking Tour, Peter White Public Library, Marquette.)(John Monaghan, The movie that put Ishpeming on the map, Detroit Free Press, January 20, 2009)(Dennis McCann, Marquette, Michigan remembers Anatomy of a Murder, Milwaukee Journal-Sentinel, Nov. 7, 2008.) It was designated a Michigan State Historic Site in 1976( and listed on the Register of Historic Places in 1978.( History In 1875, Robert Nelson, the founder of Ishpeming, built a hotel in the city known as the Barnum House.(About the Mather Inn, retrieved 12/22/09)  Four years later, the Barnum House burned, and Nelson replaced it with another structure he called the Nelson House.(  The Nelson House stood until 1928, when it too burned.  The loss of Ishpemings finest hotel affected the Iron Company, which now had no place to house important guests.(Mather Inn from the state of Michigan, retrieved 12/22/09)  Realizing the benefit of having a first-class hotel, G. Mather, Cleveland-Cliffs president, financed the construction of the Mather Inn as a replacement.(  Mather hired Boston architect James H. Ritchie to design the building and turned to H. Manning, a longtime associate, to design the grounds.(  The hotel is considered to be an excellent example of the work of both men.(The Mather Inn opened in 1932, and served the community for decades.(  In 1959, it served as lodging for the cast of the classic movie of a Murder.(  In the mid-1980s, the Mather Inn Preservation Society was created to sustain it.( However, the inn fell on hard times, and in 1987 it was closed and sold.(The inn was vacant for many years, but in 2004 renovations to the building were started.(Johanna Boyle, Mather Inn renovation moving along, The Mining Journal, November 19, 2008 )  As of 2009, the inn is privately owned and is undergoing a renovation to turn it into luxury residences and office suites.((Johanna Boyle, Ishpeming stops work on Mather renovation, The Mining Journal, October 8, 2009) Description The Mather Inn is a four-story rectangular building, constructed of concrete and steel with a brick facing.(  The front facade is divided into three bays, with a two-story portico sheltering the entrance in the center bay.(  The varied fenestration on the front, including bay windows flanking the center entrance and dormers on the hipped roof, make the facade architecturally interesting.(The public areas of the interior are panelled in pine,( and include a sunken dining room and mens clubroom.(  There are forty-seven guest rooms, including three furnished apartments. On the exterior, the grounds contain uniform terraced gardens and a huge boulder rock garden.(  The inn is still substantially similar to its original state, having undergone few alterations.(References External links *The Mather Inn
25561044
200910_Plymouth_Argyle_F.C._season
The 200910 season was the 115th season in the history of Plymouth Argyle Football Club, their 85th in the League, and 41st in the second tier of the football league system. Their 21st place finish in the 200809 season meant it was their sixth successive season playing in the Championship. Their campaign ended disappointingly as they were relegated to League One with 11 wins, 8 draws, and 27 losses from 46 matches. The club exited both domestic cup competitions at the first stage, being eliminated by Newcastle United in the third round of the Cup and by Gillingham in the first round of the League Cup. The club changed managers in December due to a string of poor results as Sturrock was replaced by Mariner.The club began their league campaign with two draws, but defeat to Cardiff City marked the beginning of a seven game losing streak. Results improved in October and November before three more successive defeats saw Sturrock replaced by Mariner. Performances gradually improved and the club won both of their fixtures during the Christmas period, including a 41 win against Reading; their best of the season. The club signed Johnson in the winter transfer window from Birmingham City and made a number of signings on loan, including Cooper and Stockdale, in order to try and improve their league position. A succession of draws and narrow defeats followed in February, which prompted Mariner to make more signings.Argyle lost three of their next nine matches to give themselves a chance of avoiding relegation, but their win at Doncaster Rovers proved to be the last game that they would collect any points in. Defeats at home to Middlesbrough and away to Watford left the club on the brink of a return to Englands third tier, and that was confirmed in their next game. Newcastle United won 20 win at Park to secure the Championship title, and relegated the home side at the same time. The club finished 23rd in the league table after defeat to bottom club Peterborough United on the final day of the season, eight points adrift of safety. Mackie finished as the clubs top scorer with eight goals in all competitions, and captain Carl Fletcher was voted Player of the Year.BackgroundThe 200809 season was Sturrocks first full campaign in his second spell as the clubs manager.(Paul Sturrocks managerial career. Soccerbase. Retrieved 20 August 2010.) The club secured their status in the second tier of English football for a sixth season after finishing 21st in the league table, five points above Norwich City.(Argyle survival relieves Sturrock. BBC Sport. Retrieved 20 August 2010.)(English footballs slippery slope. BBC Sport. Retrieved 20 August 2010.) A number of players returned to their parent clubs at the end of the season after successful loan spells,(Sturrock predicts wage reductions . BBC Sport. Retrieved 20 August 2010.) including Cathcart, David Gray, Alan Judge and Paul Gallagher. Sturrock wanted to bring Gallagher back to the club on a permanent basis, but was eventually unsuccessful after admitting before the season finished that the transfer fee and wages were an issue.(Sturrock rules out Kuqi bid. Sky Sports. Retrieved 20 August 2010.) Three apprentices of the clubs youth system were offered professional contracts in May, including Irish youth international Mason.(Plymouth youngsters handed deals. BBC Sport. Retrieved 20 August 2010.) The clubs first signing of the summer was Carl Fletcher, who returned to Park permanently after signing on loan in February. Fletcher replaced Duguid as the team captain,(Sturrock puts faith in Fletcher. BBC Sport. Retrieved 20 August 2010.)(Crystal Palace 11 Argyle. Plymouth Argyle. Retrieved 20 August 2010.) and Larrieu was named club captain.(Larrieu named Argyle club captain. BBC Sport. Retrieved 20 August 2010.) Sir Roy Gardner was confirmed as the clubs new chairman in July, replacing Stapleton who remained on the new board as vice-chairman.(Former Manchester United chairman takes over at Plymouth Argyle. The Guardian. Retrieved 27 August 2010.) The club added to their squad that month with the permanent signings of Wright-Phillips, rnason and Johnson, while Easter and long-serving Frenchman Kouo-Doumb were among the players who left. Doumbe was released from his contract by mutual consent in August after five years with the club.(Dons clinch double deal. Sky Sports. Retrieved 20 August 2010.)ChampionshipAugustOctoberman wearing a football kit.|Carl Fletcher was appointed as team captain after signing for the club.Plymouth Argyle began their campaign at Park on 8 August against Crystal Palace, with Carl Fletcher captaining his new side against his former club.(Progress. Plymouth Argyle. Retrieved 19 July 2010.) An early goal from Hungarian international centre-back Timr put Argyle ahead but the home side responded in the second-half to give both teams a share of the points.(Crystal Palace 11 Plymouth. BBC Sport. Retrieved 19 July 2010.) Argyle faced Queens Park Rangers in their first home game of the season and an injury-time goal from Gorks salvaged a point after the visitors had taken the lead in the first-half.(Plymouth 11 QPR. BBC Sport. Retrieved 19 July 2010.) Gows first goal for the club in their next match against Cardiff City was merely a consolation, as a hat-trick from Chopra consigned Argyle to their first league defeat of the season.(Plymouth 13 Cardiff. BBC Sport. Retrieved 19 July 2010.) A stoppage time goal from Derby Countys Addison denied Argyle their third draw of the season after they had taken a first-half lead through Alan Judge,(Derby 21 Plymouth. BBC Sport. Retrieved 19 July 2010.) and a second 31 home defeat followed a week later, this time against Sheffield Wednesday.(Plymouth 13 Sheff Wed. BBC Sport. Retrieved 19 July 2010.) A first-half goal from Mackie gave Argyle hope of their first victory of new the season at Hawthorns against West Bromwich Albion, but the home side responded with three goals either side of half-time to claim a comfortable win.(West Brom 31 Plymouth. BBC Sport. Retrieved 19 July 2010.)The clubs poor run of form continued in their next home match against Watford, as they suffered their fifth straight defeat and slipped to the bottom of the league table.(Plymouth 01 Watford. BBC Sport. Retrieved 19 July 2010.) Another 31 defeat, against Newcastle United,(Newcastle 31 Plymouth. BBC Sport. Retrieved 19 July 2010.) was followed by a second successive 10 home defeat against Nottingham Forest,(Chris Gunter breaks duck to give Nottingham Forest victory at Plymouth. The Guardian. Retrieved 27 August 2010.) to leave Argyle with just two points from their first seven matches.(Plymouth 01 Nottingham Forest. BBC Sport. Retrieved 19 July 2010.) Paul Sturrock kept faith with the young defensive pairing of Chester and Shane Lowry for their next game against Peterborough United,(Youth vs Experience. Plymouth Argyle. Retrieved 19 July 2010.) and two second-half goals Mackie and Fallon secured Argyles first three points of the new season.(Peterborough 12 Plymouth. BBC Sport. Retrieved 19 July 2010.)  Its nice to get three points, but now we have to build on it, said Sturrock. Theres no point in us getting this result and then kicking ourselves in the teeth again. Argyle earned their first home win of the season four days later against Scunthorpe United. A penalty from Judge gave the hosts a 21 win after Fallons opening goal was cancelled out by Scunthorpe striker Hooper.(Plymouth 21 Scunthorpe. BBC Sport. Retrieved 19 July 2010.) Their upturn in results was halted by Blackpool, who won 20 at Road.(Blackpool 20 Plymouth. BBC Sport. Retrieved 19 July 2010.) The hosts opening goal was scored by Seip, a player on loan from Argyle.(Ipswich stuck in no-win situation after frustrating Swansea draw. The Guardian. Jason Tomas. Retrieved 27 August 2010.) He took part in the match following a request from former manager Holloway,(Loan arrangement. Plymouth Argyle. Retrieved 21 July 2010.) a decision which was criticised by supporters but defended by senior Argyle officials. I suppose it was bound to happen that Marcel would score the goal, but I dont think we should look on it as anything other than probably the cover should have been better, said executive director Keith Todd. We understood exactly what we are doing.(Dutch courage. Plymouth Argyle. Retrieved 19 July 2010.)An Argyle Hall of Famer returned to Park on 18 October 2009,(A hero to return. Plymouth Argyle. Retrieved 19 July 2010.) when former England international Mariner was appointed as the clubs new head coach. In football, there is not much sentiment. But, if sentiment is involved in this scenario, then they gave me my very first chance as a player so I grabbed it with both hands, said Mariner on the England Revolution website, the club he left to rejoin Argyle. Plymouth Argyle are in my blood. Obviously the teams youre associated with are the ones you look for every week, and when they came knocking on my door asking me to be employed there, I was delighted.(Mariner set for Plymouth return. BBC Sport. Retrieved 21 July 2010.) His first match in the dugout alongside Sturrock ended in disappointment as Argyle lost 31 to Bristol City at Ashton Gate.(Bristol City 31 Plymouth. BBC Sport. Retrieved 19 July 2010.) They faced Ipswich Town, another side struggling for form, at home in their next match and a first-half goal from Fletcher put Argyle ahead, but their hopes of claiming three points were dented when the visitors equalised through striker Stead, who capitalised on a poor back pass from Sawyer.(Plymouth 11 Ipswich. BBC Sport. Retrieved 19 July 2010.) Welshman Blake, on loan from Cardiff City, was shown a straight red card late in the game as it ended all square. Their final game of October took place on Halloween against Middlesbrough, in Strachans first game as their new manager.(Gordon Strachan fails to find right formula for tentative Middlesbrough. The Guardian. Jeremy Alexander. Retrieved 27 August 2010.) Argyle came away from the Stadium with all three points, in a game that saw Adam Johnson miss from the penalty spot, thanks to a second-half goal from Mackie to lift them to 22nd in the league table, within three points of Doncaster Rovers.(Middlesbrough 01 Plymouth. BBC Sport. Retrieved 19 July 2010.)NovemberFebruaryImage:Kri rnason.jpg|thumb|left|200px|altA man wearing a training kit.|rnason scored his first goal for the club against Reading in December.The club began November in the same fashion they ended the previous month  with a win. Judge and Fallon scored again to secure a 21 home victory against Doncaster Rovers, and pull Argyle clear of the relegation zone.(Plymouth 21 Doncaster. BBC Sport. Retrieved 21 July 2010.) They looked like earning a valuable point when they travelled to play Leicester City but were denied by a 94th minute goal from midfielder Andy King.(Leicester 10 Plymouth. BBC Sport. Retrieved 21 July 2010.) Another home defeat, this time to Sheffield United followed,(Plymouth 01 Sheff Utd. BBC Sport. Retrieved 21 July 2010.) which left Sturrock desperate to improve morale among his squad,(Fighting the vibe. Plymouth Argyle. Retrieved 21 July 2010.) but a third consecutive 10 defeat at Swansea City, during which Lowry was sent off,(Swansea 10 Plymouth. BBC Sport. Retrieved 21 July 2010.) signalled the end of Paul Sturrocks second spell as manager.(Paul Mariner replaces Paul Sturrock as Plymouth manager. The Guardian. Retrieved 27 August 2010.)(The highest accolades. Plymouth Argyle. Retrieved 21 July 2010.) Paul Mariner was placed in charge until further notice.(Head Mariner. Plymouth Argyle. Retrieved 21 July 2010.) Its a sad day, but obviously a happy day for me because Im getting my chance to be a manager in the league, said the former striker. Hes a great friend of mine. The bond that we have together is quite remarkable and we have a mutual respect for each other.(Mariner in for Sturrock at Argyle. BBC Sport. Retrieved 21 July 2010.) His first match was a 20 defeat at Preston North End,(McGoldrick fans Forest fire as Swans hopes take a dive. The Independent. Geoff Brown. Retrieved 27 August 2010.) but he took positives from the performance.(Preston 20 Plymouth. BBC Sport. Retrieved 21 July 2010.)(Rda for action. Plymouth Argyle. Retrieved 21 July 2010.)John Carver, right-hand man to former Barcelona manager Sir Bobby Robson at Newcastle United,(Enthusiasm. BBC Sport. Retrieved 21 July 2010.) arrived as the clubs new assistant manager on 17 December 2009,(Massive move forward. Plymouth Argyle. Retrieved 21 July 2010.) but the club suffered another 10 defeat at home, against Coventry City, two days later.(Plymouth 01 Coventry. BBC Sport. Retrieved 21 July 2010.) Argyle travelled to Cardiff on Day to play Cardiff City at their new stadium,(Gary Sawyer stuns Cardiff to lift Plymouths spirits. The Guardian. Jason Tomas. Retrieved 27 August 2010.) and came away with an important three points thanks to a late goal from Sawyer.(Cardiff 01 Plymouth. BBC Sport. Retrieved 21 July 2010.) They recorded their biggest win of the season two days later against Reading.(Plymouth 41 Reading. BBC Sport. Retrieved 21 July 2010.) A brace from Judge,(Cardiff squander four-goal lead. The Independent. Robin Scott-Elliot. Retrieved 27 August 2010.) and first goals of the season for rnason and Barnes secured a 41 win at Home Park and six points from their two games over the Christmas period.(A little spark. Plymouth Argyle. Retrieved 21 July 2010.) Argyle returned to league action after their FA Cup ties on 16 January, looking for another three points against Crystal Palace but an early goal from young striker Moses won the game for the visitors.(Plymouth 01 Crystal Palace. BBC Sport. Retrieved 21 July 2010.) Another must-win home game followed against Derby County and a fifth goal of the season from Jamie Mackie boosted their survival bid.(Plymouth 10 Derby. BBC Sport. Retrieved 21 July 2010.) A defeat to fellow strugglers Sheffield Wednesday,(Whats so special about Adam Johnson, Jermaine Beckford and Victor Moses?. The Guardian. Louise Taylor. Retrieved 27 August 2010.) coupled with other results going against them, left Argyle five points from safety,(Sheff Wed 21 Plymouth. BBC Sport. Retrieved 21 July 2010.) with a tough match to come against West Bromwich Albion a week later. A single goal from striker Simon Cox kept Albion in touch at the top of the table and left Argyle deep in relegation trouble again, six points from safety.(Plymouth 01 West Brom. BBC Sport. Retrieved 21 July 2010.)A stoppage time penalty from Long earned a crucial 21 win for Reading in Argyles next match,(Reading 21 Plymouth. BBC Sport. Retrieved 21 July 2010.) but they came from a goal behind to claim a 31 victory at Barnsley four days later,(Doncasters Billy Sharp blunts Nottingham Forests promotion drive. The Guardian. Jason Tomas. Retrieved 27 August 2010.) which included a 35 yard effort from former Barnsley player Fallon.(Barnsley 13 Plymouth. BBC Sport. Retrieved 21 July 2010.) Paul Mariner was full of praise for his team and singled out youngster Bolasie, who made his debut for the club. We played with intellect. We got the ball down, rather than panicking a little bit; we stroked it around; we retained position at vital times, he said.(Lips sealed. Plymouth Argyle. Retrieved 21 July 2010.) The introduction of Bolasie was a breath of fresh air. I think even the Barnsley fans would probably say they liked to see what he was doing. He brought a lot to the table for us.(Lala about Yala. Plymouth Argyle. Retrieved 21 July 2010.) A double-header of home matches were next on the agenda for Argyle, against Swansea City and Leicester City, and they both ended in 11 draws. New signing Johnson scored late on against Swansea,(Plymouth 11 Swansea. BBC Sport. Retrieved 21 July 2010.) and Noone scored his first goal of the season to earn a point against Leicester.(Plymouth 11 Leicester. BBC Sport. Retrieved 21 July 2010.) An end-to-end game at Lane against Sheffield United ended in a 43 defeat, which included a number of defensive mistakes.(Behind you. Plymouth Argyle. Retrieved 21 July 2010.) Argyle went 30 before finally sparking into life, scoring twice thanks to Bolasie and a first for young Irish striker Mason. A lapse in concentration from Stockdale, on loan from Fulham, gifted the hosts a fourth goal before a 20 yard volley from Mackie set up a frantic finale.(Sheff Utd 43 Plymouth. BBC Sport. Retrieved 21 July 2010.) In the aftermath, Paul Mariner heaped praise on Mason, describing him as an incredible talent.(Masons charm. Plymouth Argyle. Retrieved 21 July 2010.)MarchMayImage:Bradley Wright-Phillips.jpg|thumb|right|200px|altA man wearing a training kit.|Wright-Phillips returned from injury to score three important goals.Argyle salvaged a late point against Preston North End at the start of March, but remained in serious trouble at the bottom end of the table, seven points adrift of safety with 13 matches remaining.(Plymouth 11 Preston. BBC Sport. Retrieved 21 July 2010.) A 20 defeat followed at Queens Park Rangers,(QPR 20 Plymouth. BBC Sport. Retrieved 21 July 2010.) with Taarabt playing a part in both of the home sides goals.(Taarabt keeps Warnocks revival rolling. The Independent. Keith Archer. Retrieved 27 August 2010.) Draws at Home Park were proving to be an heel for Argyle, but they secured a creditable 11 draw at play-off chasing Coventry City, having taken the lead through a glancing header from rnason.(Coventry 11 Plymouth. BBC Sport. Retrieved 21 July 2010.) Three days later, a 20 yard strike from captain Fletcher earned Argyle their fifth home win of the season in a 32 thriller against Bristol City. They had taken a 20 lead through Chris Clark and an overhead kick from Wright-Phillips,(Daniel Bogdanovics double dents Nottingham Forests promotion drive. The Guardian. Retrieved 27 August 2010.) his first for the club. However, the visitors responded in the second-half with two goals from Maynard before former Welsh international Fletcher scored with seconds to spare.(Plymouth 32 Bristol City. BBC Sport. Retrieved 21 July 2010.) Argyle travelled to play Scunthorpe United looking to keep up the momentum, but threw away a lead to be defeated by a deflected effort from Woolford.(Scunthorpe 21 Plymouth. BBC Sport. Retrieved 21 July 2010.)They were on the road again three days later when they faced Ipswich Town at Road.(Ipswich 02 Plymouth. BBC Sport. Retrieved 21 July 2010.) Argyle came away with all three points courtesy of goals from Wright-Phillips and Mason on what was a special night for Paul Mariner.(Swansea stay in Championship play-off places despite loss at Blackpool. The Guardian. Retrieved 27 August 2010.) It was pretty special and I was a little choked up, he said. It was a special night. When I moved to the States 20 years ago, I didnt think it would come to fruition but it was a tremendous reception from the fans, and I cant thank them enough. Bringing Plymouth Argyle here in my present role was a special occasion.(A special night. Plymouth Argyle. Retrieved 21 July 2010.) Former manager Ian Holloway returned to Home Park for the first time since his departure in November 2007 in the clubs next game, and he left happy as Blackpool side claimed all three points after a 20 victory, with Adam at the heart of their attacking threat.(Plymouth 02 Blackpool. BBC Sport. Retrieved 21 July 2010.) Argyle played out an entertaining 00 draw at home with Barnsley three days later,(Seasons best boosts Cardiffs prospects. The Independent. Kieran Daley. Retrieved 27 August 2010.) but it did little to help in their battle against relegation, still five points away from safety.(Plymouth 00 Barnsley. BBC Sport. Retrieved 21 July 2010.) They produced another rousing away performance against Doncaster Rovers to earn a 21 win, coming from behind with second-half goals from Mason, and an injury time header from Wright-Phillips.(Doncaster 12 Plymouth. BBC Sport. Retrieved 21 July 2010.) In order to stay up, Argyle knew that they had to make the most of their remaining home games, but they went down 20 on 5 April to an efficient Middlesbrough side,(Peterborough United relegated from Championship after draw at Barnsley. The Independent. Retrieved 27 August 2010.) which left them four points adrift with four games left.(Plymouth 02 Middlesbrough. BBC Sport. Retrieved 21 July 2010.) A solitary goal from Watfords Helguson dealt Argyles survival hopes an almost fatal blow at Road,(Watford 10 Plymouth. BBC Sport. Retrieved 21 July 2010.) but vice-captain Duguid remained upbeat about their chances of defeating the league leaders in their next game. Well be upbeat, and well go for the win against Newcastle next Monday.(Massive missive. Plymouth Argyle. Retrieved 21 July 2010.)It was a night of contrasting emotions at Home Park.(Pilgrims arrive in unpromised land. BBC Sport. Retrieved 21 July 2010.)(Newcastle United win Championship title and send Plymouth Argyle down. The Guardian. Tim Herbert. Retrieved 27 August 2010.) A 20 win for the visitors confirmed Argyles relegation to League One and Newcastles promotion back to the League as champions at the first attempt.(Plymouth 02 Newcastle. BBC Sport. Retrieved 21 July 2010.) Hours after the match, the clubs board declared that it remained determined to steer it to the top flight of English football.(Argyle defiant despite relegation. BBC Sport. Retrieved 21 July 2010.) Paul Mariner reaffirmed his commitment to the club, vowing to put things right. I feel the pain of the supporters because this is the club that gave me my first start, he said. The reason I came here was because of the vision that the club can get into the Premiership. Now weve got another couple of hurdles before we do that but I firmly believe that we can do it.(Mariner wants to put things right. BBC Sport. Retrieved 21 July 2010.) Argyles penultimate game of the season took place at the Ground against Nottingham Forest, who had already qualified for the play-offs, and they secured a comfortable 30 victory against the relegated side.(Nottm Forest 30 Plymouth. BBC Sport. Retrieved 21 July 2010.) The club signed off their campaign with another home defeat against Peterborough United on 2 May.(Plymouth 12 Peterborough. BBC Sport. Retrieved 21 July 2010.) Argyle took the lead in the first-half from a fine individual goal from Wright-Phillips but conceded two goals after the break to Mackail-Smith. Four days later, the club announced that they would be searching for a new manager, with Paul Mariner reverting to his original role as head coach.(Club statement. Plymouth Argyle. Retrieved 21 July 2010.) He said: I am disappointed that we could not produce the results we wanted last season. I am a realist and understand why and how the board came to the conclusion they have done. I am committed to this club and want only to help it regain Championship status as soon as possible and build on that.(Plymouth to look for new manager. BBC Sport. Retrieved 21 July 2010.) Work on a new state-of-the-art Fibrelastic pitch at Home Park began the following week.(Pitch perfect. Plymouth Argyle. Retrieved 21 July 2010.)Resultsstack       yesstack       yesstack       yesstack       yesstack       yesstack       yesstack       yesstack       yesstack       yesstack       yesstack       yesstack       yesstack       yesstack       yesstack       yesstack       yesstack       yesstack       yesstack       yesstack       yesstack       yesstack       yesstack       yesstack       yesstack       yesstack       yesstack       yesstack       yesstack       yesstack       yesstack       yesstack       yesstack       yesstack       yesstack       yesstack       yesstack       yesstack       yesstack       yesstack       yesstack       yesstack       yesstack       yesstack       yesresult      LColours: Green  Plymouth Argyle win; Yellow  draw; Red  opponents win.StatisticsStandingsPld  Matches played; W  Matches won; D  Matches drawn; L  Matches lost; GF  Goals for; GA  Goals against; GD  Goal difference; Pts  PointsResults summaryPld  Matches played; W  Matches won; D  Matches drawn; L  Matches lost; GF  Goals for; GA  Goals against; GD  Goal differenceResults by roundFA CupSummaryThe third round draw for the FA Cup paired Argyle with Newcastle United, which left assistant manager John Carver with mixed emotions.(Mixed emotions. Plymouth Argyle. Retrieved 18 July 2010.) Neither side could break the deadlock in a competitive contest at Park.(Plymouth 00 Newcastle. BBC Sport. Retrieved 18 July 2010.) Argyle striker Fallon forced a good save from Krul before the visitors had chances of their own, the majority of which went to Pancrate. Newcastle looked likely to win the game late on but were denied by goalkeeper Larrieu, who tipped a looping volley from Butt over the crossbar.(Plymouth earn replay as Newcastle ring the changes. The Guardian. Retrieved 27 August 2010.) The match saw the return of Barker to the Argyle defence after a lengthy spell on the sidelines because of injury, and manager Mariner was full of praise for his performance. For him to come and do what he did against such a high powered, attacking team as Newcastle and playing 90 plus minutes was pretty remarkable. Hes a very strong character and very experienced.(Quite remarkable. Plymouth Argyle. Retrieved 18 July 2010.) The replay at James Park was Argyles next match due to the wintry weather,(Getting on with it. Plymouth Argyle. Retrieved 21 July 2010.)(QPR game off. Plymouth Argyle. Retrieved 21 July 2010.) and they were on the wrong end of a 30 scoreline. Newcastle striker Lvenkrands gave the home side a two goal lead at half-time and completed his hat-trick after 72 minutes.(Newcastle 30 Plymouth. BBC Sport. Retrieved 18 July 2010.)(Peter Lovenkrands scores hat-trick as Newcastle beat Plymouth. The Guardian. Louise Taylor. Retrieved 27 August 2010.) His timing of his runs is pretty special and for the first goal, his finish was fantastic, said Mariner. The match on Tyneside was to be the last in an Argyle shirt for Sheridan who returned to Celtic in Scotland the next day when his loan spell with the club finished, having made 13 appearances, scoring no goals.(Blaze of glory. Plymouth Argyle. Retrieved 18 July 2010.)Resultsresult      LColours: Green  Plymouth Argyle win; Yellow  draw; Red  opponents win.League CupSummaryHaving been drawn to face Gillingham in the first round of the League Cup, the clubs manager, Sturrock, planned to make a couple of changes to the team that faced Crystal Palace on the opening day of the new season, with youngster Mason included in the squad.(Minor tweaks. Plymouth Argyle. Retrieved 18 July 2010.) Two first-half goals were enough to take the hosts into the second round. Jackson put Gillingham ahead after 42 minutes and Barcham scored a second just before the half-time break. Argyle reduced the deficit four minutes into the second-half when Summerfield from a free kick, but they couldnt find an equaliser.(Derby County sent tumbling as Rotherham have their day. The Guardian. James Callow. Retrieved 27 August 2010.) The visitors should have forced extra time but Mackie spurned a chance when he pulled his shot wide with only the goalkeeper to beat. The defeat extended Sturrocks unfortunate run in the League Cup as a manager, having won just once in nine attempts. I must have the worst record of all managers in cup competitions, its unbelievable, he said. One or two of my defenders didnt defend properly tonight. Its not proper to name people but there were some glaring attempts to clear the ball and thats where we had problems.(Gillingham 21 Plymouth. BBC Sport. Retrieved 18 July 2010.)Resultsresult      LColours: Green  Plymouth Argyle win; Yellow  draw; Red  opponents win.Pre-seasonSummaryPre-season for Plymouth Argyle began on 1 July 2009 when the team squad returned to Harpers Park.(First day gallery. Plymouth Argyle. Retrieved 16 July 2010.) A week of intense training followed,(Pre-season schedule. Plymouth Argyle. Retrieved 16 July 2010.) before the clubs first match of the new season took place on 13 July 2009 against Cornish side Truro City. In a match which featured trialist rnason,(Diamond mining. Plymouth Argyle. Retrieved 16 July 2010.) Argyle scored a goal in each half to earn a comfortable win.(Truro 02 Argyle. Plymouth Argyle. Retrieved 16 July 2010.) A youthful Argyle team headed across the city of Plymouth the next day to take on Plymouth Parkway. The visitors fell behind to an early goal but responded with three of their own in an entertaining friendly, including a brace from of Ireland youth international Mason.(Parkway 13 Argyle. Plymouth Argyle. Retrieved 16 July 2010.) The first team were in action again the next day, against Torquay United. The visitors went behind twice but looked like leaving Plainmoor with a win until Torquay converted a penalty in the 90th minute.(Torquay 33 Argyle. Plymouth Argyle. Retrieved 16 July 2010.) The squad then departed for a tour of Scotland, and stopped off in the north of England on the way in order to play a friendly against Skelmersdale United on 18 July 2009.(And theyre off. Plymouth Argyle. Retrieved 16 July 2010.) Argyle came away with a 20 win after scoring a goal in each half.(Skelmersdale 02 Argyle. Plymouth Argyle. Retrieved 16 July 2010.) A picturesque setting greeted the squad as they took to the field against Livingston on 20 July 2009. An 81st minute penalty from Summerfield wasnt enough to save Argyle from their first defeat of the season.Hungarian international Szlesi joined the squad in training ahead of their next match against Romanian champions Unirea Urziceni.(New face. Plymouth Argyle. Retrieved 16 July 2010.) They came from behind to record a 21 win in a feisty encounter, with Steve MacLean scoring the decisive goal.(Unirea 12 Argyle. Plymouth Argyle. Retrieved 16 July 2010.) Argyle returned to England to play against Morecambe on 25 July 2009, and included a triallist called Johnson in their defence, who appeared in the match under a pseudonym. Two second half goals ensured that they left Christie Park with a win.(Morecambe 02 Argyle. Plymouth Argyle. Retrieved 16 July 2010.) The clubs only pre-season friendly to take place at Park was against Scottish club Heart of Midlothian on 29 July 2009. Neither side could break the deadlock in a dour 00 draw.(Argyle 00 Hearts. Plymouth Argyle. Retrieved 16 July 2010.) Swindon Town were the opposition for Argyles penultimate friendly. A goal from Seip after 57 minutes set the visitors on their way to a 20 victory at manager Sturrocks old club.(Swindon 02 Argyle. Plymouth Argyle. Retrieved 16 July 2010.) Argyles final pre-season match took place on 3 August 2009 against Tiverton Town. A young team containing only two senior professionals, Folly and Walton,(Team for Tiverton. Plymouth Argyle. Retrieved 16 July 2010.) secured a 10 win at Ladysmead.(Tiverton 01 Argyle. Plymouth Argyle. Retrieved 16 July 2010.)Resultsstack       yesstack       yesstack       yesstack       yesstack       yesstack       yesstack       yesstack       yesresult      WColours: Green  Plymouth Argyle win; Yellow  draw; Red  opponents win.SquadPlayersStatisticsDisciplineAwardsTransfersPermanentInOutLoan signingsInOutSee also*of Plymouth Argyle F.C. seasonsReferencesExternal links*Plymouth Argyle F.C. official website*Plymouth Argyle F.C. archivezh:20092010
25575365
Colin_Humphreys
 footnotes                  Professor Sir Colin John Humphreys, CBE (born 24 May 1941) is a British physicist. He is the former Goldsmiths Professor of Materials Science and current Director of Research at University, Professor of Experimental Physics at the Institution in London and a Fellow of College, Cambridge. He was President of the of Materials, Minerals and Mining in 2002 and 2003. His research interests include all aspects of microscopy and analysis, semiconductors (particularly nitride), ultra-high temperature aerospace materials and superconductors.(University of Cambridge, Colin Humphreys)Humphreys also studies the Bible when not pursuing his day-job as a scientist.()HonoursHumphreys was awarded a CBE in 2003 for services to science as a researcher and communicator.()  He was knighted in the Birthday Honours.()Biblical study and publicationsIn 2011 Humphreys claimed in his book The Mystery of the Last Supper that the Supper took place on Wednesday (Wednesday), not as traditionally thought Thursday (Thursday), and the apparent timing discrepancies (Nisan 15 or 14) between the gospels of Matthew, Mark, and Luke versus John are rooted in the use of different calendars by the writers, the former group using an older Jewish calendar and the latter a lunar calendar.() The Last Supper being on Wednesday would allow more time for interrogation and presentation to Pilate prior to the cruxification than given in the traditional view. Humphreys proposed the actual date for the Last Supper to be 1 April 33.Other activitiesHumphreys is a member of the Templeton Foundation.( and a member of the Advisory Council for the for Science and Engineering.()Books* The Miracles of Exodus: a Scientist Reveals the Extraordinary Natural Causes Underlying the Biblical Miracles (Harper Collins, 2003).* The Mystery of the Last Supper: Reconstructing the Final Days of Jesus. (Cambridge University Press, 2011) ISBN 052173200XReferenceszh:
25592501
2010_in_Australia
See also: in Australia, other events of 2010, in AustraliaIncumbents*Monarch  Queen Elizabeth II*Governor-General  Bryce*Prime Minister  Rudd (until 24 June), then GillardPremiers and Chief Ministers*of New South Wales  Keneally*of South Australia  Rann*of Queensland  Bligh*of Tasmania  Bartlett*of Western Australia  Barnett*of Victoria  Brumby (until 2 December), then Baillieu*Minister of the Australian Capital Territory  Stanhope*Minister of the Northern Territory  Paul Henderson*Chief Minister of Norfolk Island  Nobbs (until 24 March), then BuffettGovernors and Administrators*of New South Wales  Bashir*of South Australia  Scarce*of Queensland  Wensley*of Tasmania  Underwood*of Western Australia  Michael*of Victoria  de Kretser*of the Northern Territory  Pauling*Administrator of Norfolk Island  WalshEventsWhole year2010 is the year of Women in Local Government  and the year of the Girl Guide  to coincide with the 100th year of the Girl Guides.January*2 January  The fatal stabbing of a young Indian man, Nitin Garg, in the Melbourne suburb of West Footscray generates deep anger in India, following other incidents of violence against Indian students in Australia.(Indian anger over Footscray crime on humanity, Broadcasting Corporation, 4 January 2010.)* 7 January  The Queensland Government activates disaster relief funding for communities in central and southwest Queensland isolated by floods.()February*3 February  Following extensive public criticism, the South Australian Attorney-General Atkinson announces that controversial new electoral legislation will be repealed after the South Australian state election to be held on 20 March 2010. The new legislation requires anyone responding online to a political report during an election period to provide their full name and postcode, with the information to be retained by the publisher for six months.()*13 February  A by-election is held for the Victorian state electorate of Altona. Despite a double digit swing to the Liberal Party, the safe seat is retained by the Labor Party candidate, Jill Hennessy.()*19 February  MacKillop is declared by Benedict XVI to be a saint of the Roman Catholic Church, the first Australian so declared. A formal canonisation will take place in October 2010.()March*12 March  A record rainfall for a single day, since 22 December 1956, with over 100mm of rain fall across 1.7 per cent of Australian territory on 1 March, and over 1.9 per cent of the country the following day.()*120 March  Major floods hit southern Queensland and north western New South Wales, with Charleville, Roma and St George severely affected,() resulting with significant damage to properties, roads and rail lines.*6 March  Severe thunderstorms and hail hit Melbourne and central Victoria, causing flash flooding and widespread property damage.()*911 March  Official visit to Australia of of Indonesia Bambang Yudhoyono. During the visit he is appointed an Honorary Companion of the of Australia (AC) and addresses the Parliament, the first Indonesian head of state to do so.()*17 March  The remains of Special Air Service members Lieutenant Kenneth Hudson and Private Robert Moncrieff are found in Kalimantan. The Australian soldiers disappeared on 21 March 1966 whilst on patrol during the confrontation.()*17 March  The population of Heron and Elliot Islands is evacuated to the mainland, in expectation of the approaching tropical Cyclone Ului.()*20 March  State elections are held in South Australia and Tasmania.(SA to move into official election mode, The Sydney Morning Herald, 10 February 2010.)(Tasmania election set for 20 March, The Sydney Morning Herald, 12 February 2010.)*21 March  The category 3 severe tropical Cyclone Ului crosses the Queensland coast near Beach, causing moderate damage.(Cyclone batters Queensland coast, NineMSN, 21 March 2009.)*22 March  A storm featuring torrential rain and large hailstones caused flash flooding, structural damage and loss of power to 150,000 houses in Perth.()*24 March  South Australian Liberal leader Redmond concedes defeat following the 2010 state election.(Larkin, Steve: SA Liberal leader Isobel Redmond concedes election defeat, Herald Sun, 24 March 2010.)*25 March  The Bureau of Statistics announces that the of Australia now exceeds 22 million.()*29 March  100 boats have arrived since November 2007 bringing 4,386 asylum-seekers and at least 225 crew members to Australia. The 100th boat, with 41 passengers and 3 crew on board, was intercepted in the vicinity of Island.()(http://www.theaustralian.com.au/politics/rudd-government-marks-100th-asylum-seeker-boat/story-e6frgczf-1225847045425)*31 March   The Queensland Government, the Coast City council and Commonwealth Games Association officially launch the Gold Coasts bid to host the Commonwealth Games.()April*3 April  MV Shen Neng 1, a Chinese carrier, runs aground off Keppel Island spilling fuel oil in the Barrier Reef Marine Park.(The Great Barrier Reef scandal, Guardian, 6 April 2010.)*8 April  The of Tasmania commissions Bartlett to form a minority Labor government with the conditional support of the Greens, following the parliament result of the 2010 state election.(Labors door open on Greens deal, ABC News, 9 April 2010.)*12 April  The Minister for Education, Gillard, announces a taskforce has been established to investigate allegations of rorting in the Governments $16b the Education Revolution program aimed at upgrading facilities at Australian schools.()*14 April  Wellington MP introduces the Daylight Saving for South East Queensland Referendum Bill 2010 into Parliament which calls for a referendum to be held at the next State election on introduction of saving time for East Queensland.*20 April  A Richter magnitude 5.0 earthquake damages buildings in Kalgoorlie-Boulder in Australia, injuring two.*27 April  Prime Minister Kevin Rudd announces the deferral of the introduction of the proposed Pollution Reduction Scheme until after the end of the current commitment period of the Kyoto Protocol (which ends in 2012), citing a lack of bipartisan support for the proposal and slower progress than expected in terms of global action on climate change.()May*2 May  The Rudd Government announces it will tax the above-normal profitsknown as super profitsof the mining industry to fund a superannuation rise and a company tax cut.*15 May  16-year-old sailor Watson completes a solo voyage around the world.(http://www.abc.net.au/news/stories/2010/05/03/2888507.htm)June*3 June  The township of Lennox Head on the North Coast of South Wales is affected by a tornado, which destroys at least 40 properties.*19 June  A by-election is held for the New South Wales state electorate of Penrith. The by-election was won by the Liberal Party candidate Ayres with a record swing of 25.7% in two party preferred terms. The by-election was triggered by the resignation of Paluzzano after an admission that she lied to the Independent Commission Against Corruption and her subsequent expulsion from the Australian Labor Party.(http://www.abc.net.au/elections/nsw/2010/penrith/result.htm)()*24 June  Following a leadership spill, Gillard replaces Rudd as leader of the Federal Labor Party and hence Minister of Australia. Gillard is the 27th Prime Minister and the first female appointed to that role.(Gillard takes power in bloodless coup, ABC News, 24 June 2010.)*26 June  The bodies of eleven people, including six board members of the Australian mining company Sundance Resources who were killed in a plane that crashed in West Africa, are recovered.*29 June  Patel is found guilty on three counts of manslaughter and one count of grievous bodily harm for his actions as Director of Surgery at Base Hospital between 2003 and 2005.()*29 June  The Victorian government officially proclaims the creation of four new National Parks, based around the River Red Gum forests in the states northNational Park, National Park, Goulburn River National Park and National Park.()July*2 July  Prime Minister Gillard announces major changes to the Federal Governments proposed Resource Super Profits Tax, now known as the Resource Rent Tax, including a reduction in the headline rate to 30%.()*19 July  250 Australian and British WWI soldiers are laid to rest in a new (Pheasant Wood) Military Cemetery in Fromelles, France. This is the first full cemetery that the War Graves Commission has constructed in more than 50 years.()*31 July  A tornado hits the town of South Australia.(Wicked tornado rips through Penola, ABC News, 1 August 2010.)August*6 August  The Court of Australia rules in the case & Anor v Electoral Commissioner & Anor that certain provisions of the Commonwealth Electoral Act 1918 are invalid, specifically those introduced in the Electoral and Referendum Amendment (Electoral Integrity and Other Measures) Act 2006, which close the roll on the day the writ for a federal election is issued. An estimated 100,000 enrolments were being reconsidered by the Electoral Commission, and would be contacted to inform them they would be eligible to vote in the 2010 election.(High Court upholds GetUp! case, ABC News, 6 August 2010.)*21 August  The 2010 federal election is held.(Rodgers, Emma: Game on for winter election, ABC News, 17 July 2010.) The result is a parliament, with Labor and the Coalition winning 72 seats each. The balance of power is held by four independent MPs (Katter, Oakeshott, Wilkie and Windsor), one Green (Bandt) and a member of the WA Nationals (Crook).(Liddy, Matthew: Australias hung Parliament explained, Australian Broadcasting Corporation, 23 August 2010.)September*4 September  Widespread flooding across Victoria leads to the evacuation of hundreds of people and millions of dollars of property damage.*7 September  Seventeen days after the 2010 federal election, the three independent MPs holding the balance of power announce their decisions. Katter announces he supports the Coalition. Several hours later, Windsor and Oakeshott announce they will support Julia Gillards Labor government, allowing Gillard to inform the Governor-General that she is able to form a government.(Curtis, Lyndal: Independents split, but two support Labor, PM (ABC Local Radio), 7 September 2010.)October*8 October  The Basin Authority releases the Guide to the Murray-Darling Basin Plan. The plan proposes to cut water entitlements in the basin by up to 40% and return 4000 GL of water to the river system.()*17 October  MacKillop is canonised by the Benedict XVI, making her Australias first Roman Catholic saint (Saint Mary of the Cross).(Mary MacKillop officially declared a saint, ABC News, 17 October 2010.)November*27 November  A state election is held in Victoria. The Liberal/National coalition led by Baillieu wins a two-seat majority.December*15 December  A boat carrying up to 80 seekers crashes into a cliff face on Island, killing at least 30.(Police identifying Christmas Island dead, The Sydney Morning Herald, 20 December 2010.)*16&ndash;20 December - The River in Western Australia was affected by major flooding, inundating houses in Carnarvon.()*December 2010 - January 2011  Around 200,000 people in 22 cities and towns across Queensland are affected by floods, most wide-spread flooding disaster in Queensland history.()Arts*26 March  Leach wins the Prize for portraiture for his painting of musical comedian Minchin.(Leach stares down Archibald competition, ABC News, 26 March 2010.)Literature*22 June  Temple wins the Franklin Award for his crime novel Truth.(Temple wins Miles Franklin award, ABC News, 22 June 2010.)Science and technology*13 June  The Japanese space probe Hayabusa lands in the Prohibited Area in Australia, after returning to Earth with samples from the asteroid Itokawa.(Smith, Tanalee: Scientists retrieve capsule, seeking asteroid dust, Press, 15 June 2010.)Film*11 December  The Australian Film Institute Awards are presented. The film Animal Kingdom wins ten awards (including three industry awards presented the night before).(Dunks, Glenn: The Animal Kingdom Show, Encore, 13 December 2010.)TelevisionSport*12  28 February  Australia sends a team of 40 competitors to the 2010 Winter Olympics in Vancouver, Canada. Two Australians win gold medals, Bright in the Womens halfpipe and Lassila in the Womens aerials.()*14 February  FC defeats Victory 2-0 in the final match of the home-and-away season of the A-League, securing the club its second A-League premiership and a spot in the AFC Champions League.()*13 March  Australia defeats Germany 2-1 in the final of the Mens Hockey World Cup at Chand National Stadium, in New Delhi, India. This is Australias second World Cup title.*20 March  FC defeats Victory in the A-League Grand Final at Etihad Stadium to add the A-League Championship to their Premiership. Sydney FC wins 42 on penalties, after the match is tied at 11 after extra time.()*21 March  Victoria win their 28th Sheffield Shield title, defeating Queensland by 457 runs at the Cricket Ground.()*21  24 March  The UCI Track Cycling World Championships are held in Copenhagen, Denmark. Australia tops the medal table, winning 6 gold medals, 2 silver and 2 bronze.*28 March  British driver Button wins the Australian Grand Prix for McLaren, his second successive victory in the race. He finishing 12 seconds ahead of Polish driver Kubica.*22 April  The Storm are stripped of their 2007 and 2009 Rugby League premierships and 20062008 premierships, fined a record $1.689 million, deducted all eight premiership points for the 2010 season and barred from receiving premiership points for the rest of the season after systematic breaches of the NRL cap were discovered.()*4 May  Neil Robertson defeats Scotlands Dott 18-13 to win the World Snooker Championship.()*16 May  Australia wins the ICC Womens World Twenty20 defeating New Zealand by 3 runs in the final at Bridgetown, Barbados. In the corresponding mens event, Australia finish runners-up, losing the final to England by 7 wickets.()()*30 May  The Australian team wins the AFC Womens Asian Cup, defeating North Korea 5-4 on penalties after the two teams were level on 1-1 after extra time.()*10 June  Federation Australia withdraws Australias bid to host the 2018 FIFA World Cup, but continues to bid for the 2022 event.()*12 June  Tahu withdraws from the New South Wales team for the second match of the State of Origin series after assistant coach Johns made racially disparaging comments about Queensland player Inglis.()*23 June  Despite defeating Serbia 2-1 in their final match in Group D, Australia did not progress past the group stages of the FIFA World Cupfinishing third in their group behind Ghana on goal difference.*5 August  Heart FC plays its first match in the A-League. It is defeated 01 by Central Coast Mariners at Park.*20 September  Carlton player Judd wins his second Medal.(Judd storms to second Brownlow, ABC News (Australia), 21 September 2010.)*25 September  The AFL Grand Final is a draw between Collingwood and St Kilda.(Wilson, Caroline: Its still neck and neck after 44 years, The Age, 25 September 2010.)*2 October  Collingwood wins the replay of the AFL Grand Final, defeating St Kilda 16.12 (108) to 7.10 (52).*10 October  Lowndes and Skaife win the Supercheap Auto Bathurst 1000 ahead of Triple Eight Race Engineering Holden team mates Whincup and Steve Owen.(http://www.natsoft.com.au/cgi-bin/results.cgi?10/10/2010.MOUN.R11) It was Lowndes fifth victory at Bathurst and Skaifes sixth, and the first team 12 finish since 1984.*17 October - Corse rider Stoner took a popular home crowd victory in the Australian motorcycle Grand Prix, finishing eight seconds ahead of Spanish rider Lorenzo for the Motor Racing team.*1 November  Surfer Gilmore wins the ASP World Tour, her fourth world championship.()*2 November  French horse Americain, ridden by Moss, wins the 150th Melbourne Cup.*2 December  Australias bid to host the FIFA World Cup is unsuccessful, with Qatar selected as the location for the 2022 event.*2629 December  England win the fourth Test and retain Ashes.*28 December  Oats XI takes line honours for the fifth time in the Sydney to Hobart Yacht Race, although a protest is unsuccessfully raised over the yachts failure to report its position by radio as it entered Bass Strait at Green Cape.(Wild Oats XI facing protest, ABC News, 28 December 2010.)Deaths* 8 January  Maughan, 76, stage, film and television actor.* 10 January  Bill Patterson, 86, racing driver and businessman.* 12 January  Colbung, 78, Aboriginal elder* 18 January  Burke, 84, rugby union player* 22 January  Wilson, 88, cricketer* 25 January  Bayonas, 66, writer and producer* 27 January  Hanlon, 92, racehorse trainer* 2 February  Shkolnikova, 83, violinist* 3 February  John McCallum, 91, actor and television producer* 13 February  Emerson, 79, cartoonist* 13 February  Jock Ferguson, 64, union leader and politician* 15 February  Ian Gray, 46, soccer player* 18 February  Hunter, 55, singer* 21 February  Robert Woodward, 86, architect and fountain designer* 26 February  Tom Bass, 93, sculptor* 28 February  Law, 97, scientist and explorer* 9 March  Cox, 80, cyclist* 20 March  Dixon, 81, Aboriginal activist* 24 March  Hamence, 94, cricketer, member of The Invincibles* 26 March  Pantaleo, 53, restaurateur (La Porchetta)* 2 April  Lady Sonia McMahon, 77, socialite and wife of William McMahon* 13 April  Kilgariff, 86, Northern Territory politician* 15 April  Sir Edward Woodward, 81, judge* 18 April  Viewed, 6, racehorse, winner of the Melbourne Cup* 18 April  William Yates, 88, politician* 19 April  Carl Williams, 39, murderer* 21 April  Sir Laurence Muir, 85, businessman and philanthropist* 23 April  Georgia Lee, 89, jazz and blues singer* 23 April  Peter Porter, 81, poet* 29 April  Humphreys, 80, rugby league administrator* 2 May  Andrew McFarlane, 33, motocross racer* 2 May  Nicoll, 66, journalist and broadcaster, Wednesday fires commentator* 3 May  McIntosh, 87, Australian rules footballer* 10 May  Jeff Shaw, 60, New South Wales Attorney-General and Supreme Court judge* 13 May  Provan, 73, rugby league footballer* 18 May  Day, 86, politician* 21 May  Cruickshank, 73, politician* 25 May  Hickinbotham, 84, Australian rules footballer and businessman* 30 May  Dame Pat Evison, 86, television actress* 2 June  Schildberger, 72, journalist* 7 June  Xenides, 54, television personality*18 June  John Whitelaw, 89, soldier*20 June  Talbot, 59, businessman*28 June  Peter Bowers, 80, journalist*4 July   Howard, 104, explorer*7 July   Brian OShaughnessy, 84, philosopher*9 July  Anderson, 93, writer*14 July  Mackerras, 84, conductor*19 July  Cleary, 92, novelist*19 July  David Warren, 85, inventor of the flight data recorder*26 July  Sir Brian Bell, 82, businessman in Papua New Guinea*27 July  Alan Gilbert, 65, historian and education administrator*30 July  Roy Smith, New South Wales politician*2 August  Castles, 75, statistician, economist and public servant*4 August  Kennan, 64, lawyer and politician, Premier of Victoria (19901992)*4 August  Latta, 63, surfer and surfboard shaper*5 August  Napier, 62, politician, Premier of Tasmania (19961998)*6 August  Jeff McLean, 63, rugby union footballer*13 September  Gus Williams, 73, musician*23 September  Malcolm Douglas, 69, bushman and documentary maker*10 October  Dame Joan Sutherland, 83, opera singer (died in Switzerland)*17 October  Wriedt, 83, politician*21 October  Sir Leslie Froggatt, 90, businessman*4 November  Freud, 51, musician (Models)*14 November  Sykes, 67, Aboriginal rights activist*22 November  Fenner, 95, scientist*26 November  Parry, 77, businessman*6 December  Hetherington, 89, cartoonist and creator of Mr. Squiggle*7 December  Mercurio, 82, actor*8 December  John James, 76, Australian rules footballer*13 December  Dibble, 87, television presenter*14 December  Park, 93, author*15 December  Stan Pops Heal, 90, Australian rules footballer*16 December  Hope, 83, Tasmanian politician*25 December  Gavin Brown, 68, academic*25 December  Rioli, 53, Australian rules footballer*See also* in Australian literature* in Australian televisionReferencesen Australie
25616142
Peace_River_Formation_(Florida)
 map_caption    The Peace River Formation is a Oligocene to Miocene formation in the west-central Florida peninsula.AgePeriod: NeogeneEpoch: Miocene to Pliocenestage: Arikareean through Hemphillian ~23.034.9 mya, calculates to a period of LocationThe Peace River Formation appears as an outcropping or is beneath a thin overburden from Hillsborough County to Charlotte County on the southern part of the Platform. extending into the Okeechobee Basin. It is widespread in Florida and part of the intermediate confining aquifer system.LithographyThe formation is composed of sands, clays and carbonates which are interbedded. The sands are light gray to olive gray and poorly consolidated. They are clay-like with some dolostone with a very fine to medium grained phosphate component. Carbonates are usually light gray to yellowish dolostone found in outcroppings. The dolostones are soft to hard with variably sandy, clay-like, phosphate components with opaline chert often found. The phosphate content is enough to warrant mining.(USGS: Hawthorn Group, Peace River Formation, Bone Valley Member)(USGS: Geologic units in Hillsborough county, Florida)Three sequences of sediment deposition were defined in 1998. Five lithofacies were identified in 2000 (upper part of the formation).(Reese R.S., and Cunningham, K.J., 2000 (in press), Hydrogeology of the gray limestone aquifer in southern Florida: U.S. Geological Survey Water-Resources Investigations Report 99-4213.)*Diatomaceous mudstone.*Terrigenous mudstone.*Clay-rich quartz sand.*sand.*Pelecypod-rich quartz sand or sandstone.Fossils*Mollusks occur as reworked casts, molds, and limited original shell material.*Silicified corals*Vertebrates*WoodMembersThe Bone Valley Member is a subunit of the Peace River Formation (originally the Bone Valley Formation) and occurs in a limited area on the southern part of the Platform in Hillsborough, Polk County, and Hardee County. (Webb & Crissinger). It is consistently clastic with sand-sized grains and larger grains of phosphate in a mixture of sand, silt and clay. The consolidation is poor and colors range from white, light brown and yellowish gray to olive gray and blue green.(Florida Geologic Survey: Lithostratigraphic Units, Matson, G. C., Clapp, F. G. and Sanford, S., 1909, Geologic and topographic map of Florida; Contributing geologists: Matson, G. C., and Clapp, F. G., A preliminary report on the geology of Florida: Florida Geological Survey Second Annual Report, p. 23-173)Fossils*Mollusks*Vertebrate fossils*Sharks teeth*Silicified corals and wood.See also*County, Florida paleontological sites*County, Florida paleontological sites*County, Florida paleontological sites*County, Florida paleontological sitesReferences*Finch, J., Geological essay on the Tertiary formation in America: American Journal of Science, v. 7, p. 31-43, 1823.Further reading*Berkenkotter, Richard D,  Application of statistical analysis in evaluating bedded deposits of variable thicknessFlorida phosphate data (United States. Bureau of Mines. Report of investigations, U.S. Dept. of the Interior, Bureau of Mines (1964)
25648867
Wheal_Coates
Wheal Coates is a former tin mine situated on the north coast of Cornwall, England, on the cliff tops between Porthtowan and St Agnes. It is preserved and maintained by the National Trust.Wheal is Cornish for mine. The site was worked for centuries but the surviving buildings date from the 1870s when deep underground mining began at the site and were stabilised and preserved in 1986.There are three engine houses that formerly housed engines. Towanroath Pumping Engine House (1872) was used to pump water from the adjacent 600 ft Towanroath shaft. Whim Engine House was added in 1880 to crush ore for processing. A calciner dating from 19101913 roasted the tin to remove impurities such as arsenic.In 1881 138 people were employed at the site to mine a seam of tin just below sea level but this and a subsequent period of operation from 1911-1913 were not very successful because tin production was sporadic.External links* Wheal Coates at cornish-mining.org
25656689
2010_in_aviation
dn32040sThis is a list of aviation-related events from 2010:EventsJanuary;1 JanuaryAmerican airline Airlines is merged into Air Lines.;2 January* Boeing 727-231F 9Q-CAA of Congolese airline Africaine dAviation was substantially damaged when it departed the side of the runway at Airport, Kinshasha.() The aircraft was later reported as damaged beyond repair.()* In Slovakia, a package containing the explosive RDX was placed in the luggage of a passenger at Airport by Serbian police as part of a training exercise. Due to an error, the package was not recovered and the luggage was loaded onto a Wings flight to Dublin. The error was not realised until the plane had departed. The Sochna were not informed until 5 January, causing a bomb alert in Dublin. The innocent passenger was arrested but later released when the Slovak Government admitted he was blameless.;3 January*Berlin Flight 2450, operated by Boeing 737-800 D-ABKF overran the end of the runway after an aborted take-off at high speed due to an airspeed discrepancy on the two pilots instruments. The incident happened at Airport. There were no injuries among the 171 people on board.();10 January* Airlines Flight 634, operated by Airbus A319-131 N816UA made an emergency landing at Liberty International Airport when the right main landing gear failed to deploy. The aircraft sustained some damage when the right engine contacted the runway. The 53 passengers and crew evacuated the aircraft via the emergency chutes without injury.() Initial fears that the wing had been damaged in the accident later proved groundless, with damage being confined to the engine and nacelle.();13 January* German airline Wings ceased operations.();15 January* Air 100 EP-IDA, operating Flight 223 was substantially damaged when the nose gear collapsed after landing at International Airport.();16 January* Aviation Boeing 737-500 VQ-BAC departed the runway on landing at International Airport and was substantially damaged when the nosewheel collapsed.();19 January* Japanese carrier Airlines files for protection from bankruptcy.* BinAir Swearingen SA-227-C Metro D-CKPP was damaged when the right main undercarriage collapsed on landing at Airport.()* Airlines CRJ-200 N246PS overran the runway at Airport, West Virginia following a rejected take-off. The aircraft was stopped by the EMAS at the end of the runway, sustaining substantial damage to its undercarriage.();21 January* Cargolux Flight 7933, operated by 747-400 LX-OCV struck a vehicle on landing at International Airport. The van suffered major damage and the aircraft sustained a damaged tyre. Three investigations have been launched into the incident.();24 January* Air Flight 6437 crashed on landing at International Airport Iran. All 170 people on board escape from the burning aircraft.;25 JanuaryAirlines Flight 409 crashed into the Mediterranean shortly after take-off from Rafic Hariri International Airport for International Airport, Ababa.;26 January* Spanish airline Air ceased operations.;31 January* Guicango Yak-40 D2-FES suffered the collapse of all landing gears on landing at de Fevereiro Airport, Luanda, Angola on a flight from Cabinda.()February;4 February* Airlines Flight 425, operated by An-24 RA-47360 suffered an engine failure on take-off from Airport for Airport. During the subsequent landing, the nose and port main undercarriage were retracted, causing substantial damage to the aircraft.();11 February* Air Service Flight 168, operated by ATR-42-300F PK-YRP made a forced landing in a field at Bone, Indonesia. Two people were seriously injured and the aircraft was written off.* Mexicana Flight 7222, operated by 100 XA-SHJ suffered an undercarriage malfunction on approach to International Airport, Laredo. A low fly-past confirmed that both main gears had not deployed. The aircraft diverted to Mariano Escobedo International Airport, Monterrey, where it was substantially damaged in the landing, having departed the runway and spun through 180.();15 February* Spanish airline Airlines ceases operations.March;1 March* Airlines Airbus A300B4-200 TC-ACB sustained substantial damage when the port undercarriage collapsed on landing at Air Base, Afghanistan.() The port engine and wing were also damaged.()* Tanzania Flight 100, operated by Boeing 737-200 5H-MVZ sustained substantial damage when it departed the runway on landing at Airport and the nosewheel collapsed. Damage was also caused to an engine.();18 March* Exin Flight 3589, operated by An-26 SP-FDO received an unsafe gear warning on approach to Meri Tallinn Airport, Tallinn, Estonia on a flight from Airport, Helsinki, Finland. A go-around was initiated, during which an engine failed and a wheels-up landing was made on the frozen surface of lemiste. Two of the six crew were injured.();22 March* Aviastar-TU Flight 1906, operated by Tu-204 RA-64011 crashed on approach to International Airport, Moscow. The aircraft was written off, the first hull loss for Aviastar and the first of a Tu-204.;25 March* Scottish airline Airways ceases operations.()April;10 AprilA Air Force Tupolev Tu-154M carrying the Polish President Kaczyski and many other Polish officials crashed on approach to Smolensk, Russia.;12 AprilJamaican airline Jamaica ceased operations. All services taken over by Airlines.;13 AprilNusantara Airlines Flight 836 operated by Boeing 737-300 PK-MDF overran the runway at Airport, Manokwari, Indonesia. All 103 passengers and crew escape alive. Aerotransporte de Carga Union Flight 302 operated by Airbus A300B4F XA-TUE crashed on approach to Mariano Escobedo International Airport, Monterrey, Mexico. All five crew were killed, as was one person in a car that was hit by the crashing aircraft.;15 AprilFollowing the second eruption of Eyjafjallajkull in Iceland, large areas of airspace were closed, causing widespread suspension of services across Europe.;21 AprilEast Asia Cargo Airlines Flight 7815, operated by An-12 UR-AN216 crashed on approach to Macapagal International Airport, Philippines after a fire broke out in flight. Three of the six crew were killed.()May;12 MayAirways Flight 771 operated by Airbus A330-202 5A-ONG crashed on approach to International Airport, Libya, killing 103 people.;15 MayA Wing Airlines An-28 crashed shortly after take-off from Holo Airstrip killing all eight on board.;17 MayAirways Flight 112, operated by An-24 YA-PIS crashed in the Pass killing all 43 on board.;22 MayIndia Express Flight 812, operated by Boeing 737-800 VT-AXV crashed at International Airport with the loss of 162 lives.;26 MayAirways ceases operations.June;16 JuneStates Airlines Flight 8050, operated by Embraer ERJ-145 N847HK overran the runway at Macdonald-Cartier International Airport and was substantially damaged when the nose gear collapsed.();19 JuneBerlin Air Services DC-3 D-CXXX crashed shortly after take-off from Schnefeld Airport on a local sightseeing flight. Eight people were injured and the aircraft was substantially damaged.;21 JuneAero Service C-212 Aviocar TN-AFD crashed in the of the Congo killing all eleven people on board, including Australian mining magnate TalbotJuly;78 JulyThe Solar Impulse I HB-SIA makes a circumnavigation of the planet, the first by a powered aircraft. The flight also set records for length of flight and altitude for solar powered aircraft.;18 JulyThe 787 Dreamliner makes its first international appearance at the Farnborough Airshow, UK.();26 JulyAn Israeli Air Force (IAF) Sikorsky Sea Stallion helicopter crashes during a joint Israeli-Romanian aviation exercise in the Mountains in northern Romania, killing six IAF officers and one Air Force officer.()();27 JulyLufthansa Douglas MD-11 D-ALCQ crashes at Khalid International Airport, Riyadh, Arabia;28 JulyAirblue Flight 202, operated with an Airbus A321, crashes in the Hills near Islamabad.C-17 Globemaster III 00-0173 of the States Air Force crashed near Air Force Base killing all four people on board.August;1 August* West Freight C-123 Provider N7099R crashes at Healy, Alaska killing all three crew.();2 August* Todd Reichert of the University of Toronto Institute for Aerospace Studies pilots a human-powered ornithopter, Snowbird, in Ontario, sustaining 19.3 seconds of flight, covering a distance of 145 metres (475 ft). The 42.6 kg (92.59 lb) craft has 32 metre-span flapping wings.();3 August* Katekavia Flight 9357 crashes in Igarka, Russia, killing eleven people.;10 August* A de Havilland Canada DHC-3T Turbo Otter crashes near Aleknagik, States killing former Senator Stevens. Former NASA Administrator and current EADS North America CEO OKeefe is amongst the survivors.;13 August* Regional Spanish airline Lineas Aereas ceases operations.;16 August* AIRES Flight 8250, operated by Boeing 737-73V HK-4682, crashes short of the runway at Rojas Pinilla International Airport, San Andrs, Colombia and breaks into three sections. One passenger dies from a heart attack following the accident. The other 124 passengers and six crew survive.;24 August* Arabian airline SAMA ceases operations.* Air Flight 101 crashes near Shikharpur, Nepal killing all 14 people on board.* Airlines Flight 8387 overruns the runway on landing at Airport, China. 42 of the 96 people on board were killed.;25 August* Filair L-410 Turbolet 9Q-CCN crashes short of the runway at Airport, killing all 14 people on board.* Transportes Areos Flight 2231, operated by E-145 PR-PSJ, lands short of the runway at da Conquista Airport and is substantially damaged but all 27 people on board survive.()* Aseman Airlines Flight 773, operated by a 100, overruns the runway on landing at International Airport. The aircraft is substantially damaged.()September;3 September* UPS Flight 6, operated by Boeing 747-44AF N571UP crashed shortly after take-off from International Airport, killing both crew and destroying the aircraft. N571UP was operating an international cargo flight to Bonn Airport, Germany.();4 September* A Fletcher FU24 crashed on take-off from the Glacier, killing all nine people on board. This was the worst aircraft accident in Zealand for 21 years, and at the time the 7th worst in New Zealand.;7 September* Mirny Air Enterprise Flight 514, operated by Tupolev Tu-154M RA-85684 suffered a complete electrical failure in flight. A successful emergency landing was made at Airport, Russia but the aircraft overran the runway. All 81 passengers and crew escaped uninjured.;13 September* Conviasa Flight 2350, operated by ATR 42-400 YV-1010 crashed shortly after take-off from Carlos Piar Guayana Airport, Guayana, Venezuela on a domestic scheduled passenger flight to Caribe Santiago Mario International Airport, Porlamar, Margarita. The aircraft was carrying 47 passengers and crew. Initial reports suggest 24 survivors.();15 September* DHC-8-103B LN-WIF of Flyveselskap was substantially damaged in a hard landing at Airport, Stokka when the undercarriage collapsed. The aircraft was operating a domestic scheduled passenger flight from Airport.();24 September* Wind Jet Flight 243, operated by Airbus A319-132 EI-EDM,() landed short of the runway at Raisi Airport, Palermo, Italy after encountering a thunderstorm and windshear on approach. The aircraft was substantially damaged when it impacted the localiser. Both main undercarriage sets collapsed and the aircraft was evacuated by the emergency slides.() Around 20 passengers were injured in the evacuation.(;25 September* Flight 782, carrying 273 people bound from Toronto for Karachi, landed at Stockholms Airport on September 2010 because of a hoax bomb threat on board. After evacuating the passengers from the plane, a thorough check was made to find any explosives, if present, on the aircraft. Police operation leader Stephan Radman said later that no explosives were found on board.()October;12 October* International Flight 662, operated by L-100 Hercules 5X-TUC crashed into a mountain  east of International Airport, Afghanistan, killing all eight crew.;28 October* A AS350 helicopter crashed in Antarctica, killing four people.;29 October* A terrorist plot to send bombs by air freight from Yemen to the States via the Kingdom is uncovered.November;4 November* Qantas Flight 32, operated by A380 VH-OQA suffered an uncontained engine failure over Island, Indonesia. Falling debris injured one person on the ground. The aircraft dumped fuel and returned to Changi Airport, where a safe landing was made.* Caribbean Flight 883, operated by an 72 crashed at Sancti Spritus, Cuba killing all 68 people on board.;5 November* A Siddiqui Air 1900 crashed near Karachi, Pakistan, killing all 21 people on board.;10 November* An Air Force F-16I crashes in Ramon while on a training over the Negev desert in southern Israel, killing both the pilot and navigator of the plane.(Bodies of IAF pilot and navigator found after F-16I crash in Negev haaretz.com. Retrieved: November 10, 2010.);28 November* Way Flight 4412, operated by Il-76 4L-GNI on a cargo flight crashed in a populated area of Karachi, Pakistan, shortly after taking off from International Airport. All eight people on board were killed, as were a further two people on the ground. The aircraft was reported to have been trying to return to Jinnah after suffering  an engine fire.()December* The Australian Air Force retires the worlds last operational General Dynamics F-111.(Severn, Fran, Aardvarks Go Extinct: Last Flight of the F-111, Flight Journal, June 2011, p. 58.);3 December* East Airlines Flight 372, operated by Tupolev Tu-154M RA-85744 crashed on landing at International Airport, Moscow, Russia. Of the 168 people on board, two passengers were killed. The aircraft was written off.;15 December* A Air flight operated by DHC-6 Twin Otter 9N-AFX crashed into a mountain shortly after departure from Airport, Nepal. The aircraft was operating a chartered passenger flight to International Airport, Kathmandu, Nepal. All 19 passengers and crew were killed.()* Last operation by a Jump Jet, from Cottesmore.;28 December* An-22 RA-09343 of the Air Force crashed at Oktaybr, Russia killing all twelve crew. The aircraft was on a positioning flight from Airport to Airport.()First flights* 29 January, first flight of the Sukhoi T-50 in Russia.* 8 February, first flight of the 747-8 in the States.()Referencesv letectven aronautiquea lgi kzlekedsbenja:2010  
25669436
Aubrey_Landing,_Arizona
footnotes                 Aubrey Landing is a town at the mouth of the Williams River in southern County, Arizona. The town was founded before 1865 and was abandoned sometime after 1886. Aubrey is located two miles northeast of Dam.()  Aubrey Landing was inundated when Havasu was formed.()HistoryThe first construction for the town of Aubrey Landing began sometime before 1865 during the Civil War in Arizona. The unknown founder named the river settlement after Xavier Aubrey, a famous American pioneer from a decade earlier. The town was ideally located but in 1865, a break in copper left the town almost deserted but enough people stayed, prompting a post office establishment in 1866. Little had changed though by 1878, the town never grew to the size anticipated by the owners. The town consisted of the usual camp structures, as well as a hotel, saloon and a general store. The town supported a small population for almost ten years more. In 1886 the post office closed and the town soon after.(ReferencesExternal Links*Aubrey City, Williams Fork, Arizona Territory, by Edward Fairman, artist Date: 1866. Drawing on paper: pen and ink 48.4 x 64.6 cm.  View across river looking towards one-story buildings surrounding plaza with US flag on flag pole; mining operation owned by Martin & Co. to left; several wagons pulled by oxen teams; paddlewheel steamship towing barge in river; high mountains in distance. Located at confluence of Williams Fork and Colorado River. Bancroft Library.
25676927
San_Pedro_Cholula_(municipality)
footnotes               San Pedro Cholula is a municipality in the Mexican state of Puebla and one of two municipalities which made up the city of Cholula. The city has been divided into two sections since the pre Hispanic era, when revolting Toltec-Chichimecas pushed the formerly dominant Olmec-Xicallanca to the eastern side of the city in the 13th century. The new lords called themselves Cholutecas and built a new temple to Quetzalcoatl on the San Pedro side, which eventually eclipsed the formerly prominent Pyramid of Cholula, now on the San Andrs side. When the Spanish arrived in the 16th century, the city of Cholula was an important religious and economic center, but the center of power was on the San Pedro side, centered on what is now the main city plaza and the San Gabriel monastery. The division of the city persisted and San Pedro remained the more dominant, with Spanish families moving onto that side and the rest of the population quickly becoming mestizo. Today, San Pedro is still more commercial and less residential than neighboring San Andrs with most of its population employed in industry, commerce and services rather than agriculture. Although Cholulas main tourist attraction, the Pyramid, is in San Andrs, San Pedro has more tourism infrastructure such as hotels, restaurants and bars.San Pedro as part of the city of CholulaSan Pedro is one of two municipalities which make up the city of Cholula, or formally Cholula de Rivadavia. This city is divided into eighteen barrios or neighborhoods, ten of which are on the San Pedro side.() The division of the city into two semi-separate halves has its roots in the pre Hispanic period, when the Olmec-Xicallancas were pushed to the east side of the city by the rebelling Toltec-Chichimeca ethnicity. The division remained in the colonial period with San Pedro quickly becoming a mix of Spanish and indigenous with San Andrs remaining mostly indigenous for the rest of the period.() Today, San Andrs still has the higher indigenous population.()When the Spanish arrived the San Pedro side was still dominant, with the Quetzalcoatl Temple (on which now stands the San Gabriel monastery) overshadowing the Great Pyramid, which was already overgrown. This side contains what is considered the center of the city, large plaza with several important buildings, including the San Gabriel monastery, facing it.()What keeps the city united socially is a complex calendar of religious and social events with the costs and efforts associated with them rotated and shared among the various barrios or traditional neighborhoods.(  Among the important shared festivals, there are Carnival,() the Vaniloquio, when the bells of the citys churches ring in coordination,()  Week,  La Bajada, when the image of the of the Remedies comes down the pyramid to visit the various neighborhoods and the most important, the feast day of the Virgin of the Remedies on 8 September.()These and other traditions have roots in the pre Hispanic period. Many Cholutecans still use their pre-Hispanic surnames, such as former town stewards Raymundo Tecanhuehue and Humberto Tolama Totozintle. This is because a number of the old Indian nobility was allowed certain privileges after the Conquest .( The town chronicler still refers to the barrios as calpulli, the pre-Conquest political organization of neighborhoods.(Another unifying factor is a straight street grid oriented in the cardinal directions. Most streets in the center are numbered with indications as to their location vis--vis the center, north, east, south or west. Outside the city center street names lose this system.()LandmarksSan Pedro is home to what is considered to be the main plaza or square the city, called the Plaza de la Concordia. In the morning, this plaza of Cholula is filled with vendors selling typical street food, sweets and handcrafted toys for children.() On the west side of this plaza is the Portales (Portals). This is a commercial area framed by forty six arches supported by Doric columns.() These arches measure 170 meters long and are the longest in Latin Americal.(pedro his) .( The San Pedro municipal palace is located behind this commercial area, occupying a space which was called the Xiuhcalli, (House of Turquoise), where a council of nobles met in the pre Hispanic era.()On the south side of the plaza is the Museum of the City of Cholula, housed in a structure called the Casa del Caballero Aguilar (House of the Eagle Knight), one of the oldest residential structures in the area. This museum was opened in 2001 after extensive restoration of the colonial era building by INAH, the city and the Universidad de las Amricas-Puebla. This work restored the original floor plan and much of the carved stone work. The museum traces the habitation of Cholula from about 1000 BCE. Three rooms display pre Hispanic artifacts, two contains colonial era items and one features a John OLeary photographic exhibit of the citys religious festivals. Lastly, the facility also contains restorations laboratories run by UDLAP. The basis of the collection was a group of 1,500 artifacts donated by Omar Jimenez.(()The main archeological attraction, the Great Pyramid of Cholula is actually in the municipality of Andrs Cholula, marking where that part of the city begins. However, 154 hectares of the entire city have been declared archeological heritage. It is strongly believed that the Quetzalcoatl Temple lies beneath the San Gabriel monastery, but no excavations have been done on the site.((  Most excavations in San Pedro have been under streets and other public areas, especially when there has been construction, such as the laying of water pipes. However, there is widespread opposition to excavation in most of the zone, mostly because most of the land is privately owned.()More evident in San Pedro is a large number of Cholulas many churches. According to legend, Corts promised to build one church here for every day of the year or for every pre Hispanic temple destroyed after the Massacre.() In reality, there are only 37 for the entire city, 159, if all the chapels on surrounded haciendas and ranches are counted.( The architectural styles of the churches vary from Gothic to Renaissance to Churrigueresque and Neoclassical, with many mixing elements of two or more styles. A number also have Talavera tile as a decorative feature, which is common in Puebla. A few have intricate stucco work done by indigenous hands.( The citys churches contain more than 300 works of art, together valued at millions of dollars. However, due to increases in the theft of religious art, many churches have implemented extra security measures and some have stopped opening during the week.()()The most important religious institution in San Pedro, and the second most important after the Sanctuary of the Virgen de los Remedios on the Great Pyramid, is the San Gabriel monastery. This monastery was established over the site of the destroyed Quetzalcoatl Temple in 1529 and one of the largest Franciscan monasteries in Mexico.( It was established first in the city, because this was the power center and the Franciscans had a limited number of monks in Mexico.( The complex consists of a large atrium, a main church, a cloister area, and two important chapels which face the atrium area. Its architecture is rococo style Gothic.( The Franciscan monastery is dedicated to the Gabriel. The complex is surrounded by a wall with pointed merlons which separates it from the main plaza of the city. There are three entrances to the atrium, but the main one is to the west, in front of the main church. The atrium is very large and most of it is in front of the two chapels. A second entrance in the atrium wall leads to this area, which may have been used for evangelization purposes and masses for the indigenous during the very early colonial period. In three corners of the atrium, there are chapels, called capillas posas, with pinnacle roofs, simple arches which are closed off by railing.() The atrium cross was sculpted in 1668. It is identical to that in the atrium of the Nuestra Seora de los Remedios sanctuary.(The main church is one of the oldest in Mexico, which the first stone laid in 1549 by de Hojacastro, who would be the third bishop of Puebla.( The facade of the main church is smooth and its corners are reinforced with diagonal buttresses. The towers have arched windows, columns and a small dome topped by iron cross. The interior has a Latin cross layout, covered with vaults and a cupola. The altarpieces are made of wood and plaster and decorated in gold leaf. The main one is dedicated to the Virgin of the Remedies. The main portal is sculpted in sandstone in Renaissance style. The main doors are of wood and contain metal studs with different designs. The north portal has richer ornamentation. The interior is covered by vaults with Gothic nerves and arched window openings. It conserves a number of oil paintings from the 17th and 18th centuries. The main altar of San Gabriel is Neoclassical, dating from 1897.()The cloister contains frescos with six religious scenes in a style similar to those at the former monastery of Huejotzingo. The upper floor has one called the Mass of Saint Gregory and the ground floor contains frescos with scenes from the life of of Assisi, along with portraits of a number of Franciscan monks.(( The San Gabriel monastery is still inhabited by about fifteen Franciscan monks. In 1986, the monastery agreed to let part of their building be renovated and converted into the Franciscan Library, done in cooperation with the Universidad de las Americas. This library is open to the public on request.  The monks were initially opposed to the project as they know the monastery sits of the Temple of Quetzalcoatl and did not want to be forced out.(The Capilla Real (Royal Chapel) is also called the Capilla de Naturales (Indigenous Chapel). It is located on the north end of the complex. It is similar to a mosque. It had never received any kind of royal recognition. There are twelve columns and twenty four octagonal pilasters.  Twelve of the pilasters support the entrances to the side chapels and have sixteen corbels. There are seven naves and forty nine cupolas.( The capilla real received its name because of a chapel inside dedicated to the Virgin of the Remedies, the patron of Cholula. The current interior was created in 1947.  The faade has some Baroque elements, with its main entrance marked by a simple arch flanked by Corinthian columns and fluted pilasters. The choral window is flaned by Ionic columns. The crest is a pediment with a flutter.( The holy water font dates from the 16th century. The base and cup are sculpted from one piece of stone. The base is decorated with acanthus leaves, other flowers and leaves and a simple molding a Franciscan cord.(The Capilla de la Tercera Orden is located between the Capilla Real and the main church. I is a small church with a Baroque portal and columns. In the pendentives of the cupola, there are paintings of various important Franciscans. The altars are Neoclassical in white and gold.(The parish church of the San Pedro municipality faces that main square of the city and was built in the 17th century.(( The architecture is a mix of Baroque and Renaissance, which is uncommon in Mexico for the 17th century. The bell tower is Baroque and one of the tallest in the city. It has a Latin cross layout and a vaulted ceiling. The interior has been restored and contain a Churrigueresque cupola, along with 18th century paintings such as depictions of Christ by de Borgraf .((The various barrios or traditional urban neighborhoods and communities of the municipality have their own parish church dedicated to a patron saint, and some have more than this. The oldest of these churches dates from the 16th century and  a number are painted in what is called popular Baroque with bright colors.(The San Miguel Tianguishahuatl church is located behind the San Gabriel monastery and is dedicated to the Michael. Its atrium is entered through arches that separate it from the street. This church was built in the 19th century with one nave and covered in cannon vaults and a cupola over the presbytery. The main portal of the church is a simple arch supported by pilasters. There are two other arches which lead to small chapels. Above the facade, there is a single bell tower. The interior contains Neoclassical altars with ornamentation typical of the 19th century.(The Jesus Tlatempa church  is distinguished by its tall bell tower, the tallest in Cholula and dedicated to the Nazarene. It was built in the 17th century. It has a sober portal with a simple arch and pilasters. Above it, there is a choral window decorated with pinnacles and small spheres. Above this, there is a Calatrava coat of arms, topped by an anagram. The bell tower has a wide base and three levels. The first and second have highly decorated windows and a balcony, and the third has a simpler octagon window. The interior has two vaults. In the upper choir, there are pelicans serving as an allegory of Christ.(The Santiago Mixquitla church is located in the far northwest of the city. The complex in entered through a portal with three arches, an entablature and pinnacles. This leads into a very large atrium, which is surrounded by a stone wall similar to that of the San Gabriel monastery. The facade of the church is wide and has a portal of grey sandstone, sculpted in a sober style from the 17th century. The entrance is formed by an arch supported by two pilasters. Above this, there is a choral window with two pilasters and two coats of arms. One belongs to Mexico and the other to Cholula. Above this, there is a niche which contains a cross. On either side, there are two pyramids with spheres. The bell tower has columns on its corners. The church has three naves, with an octagonal cupola, some paintings and altarpieces. There is a sculpture of Saint James on horseback in the main altar area.(The San Matias Cocoyotla church is one of the oldest parish churches in the region, dating from the 17th century. It has a Renaissance style portal with Herrerian style crests. The interior is covered by three vaults, which are decorated with gilded plasterwork.(The San Juan Texpolco church dates from the 17th century and is dedicated to the Evangelist as he was crucified. The church is oriented east-west. It has one bell tower and its facade is in the shape of a niche. Inside, it has three short naves, and a octagonal cupola.(The San Cristobal Tepontla church is the farthest from the city center. The facade is bordered by plants sculpted in stone. It has a small bell tower, with one level square and the other as an octagon.(The Santa Maria Xixitla church is in the southwest of the city. The entrance to the atrium has three arches. The exterior of the church looks somewhat like a castle with buttresses and pinnacles, and a simple facade. The bell tower has Salomonic and estipite columns. The atrium has a cross sculpted with signs of the Passion, dating from the 16th century, the only one from that time period in Cholula. The interior has three naves covered in vaults and an octagonal cupola.(The La Magdalena Coapa church has a Neoclassical facade. Its interior is covered by three vaults and a circular cupola. The cypress in the presbytery has been there since the beginning of the 20th century.(The San Pedro Mexicaltzingo church as a very simple facade with a round arch doorway, imposts and narrow jambs on its also narrow windows. It was probably built in the 19th century but conserves its 16th century holy water font.(The San Pablo Tecama church is the unification of two church buildings, one from the 17th century, converted into the sacristy and the other from the 19th century. The older church building has a bell tower with pilasters and Salomonic columns on two levels, with an open cone (oculo) as a crest. The 19th century building contains various Neoclassical altarpieces along with paintings. It also has a bell tower. The complex makes it one of the largest churches in Cholula.(The Santa Cruz de Jerusaln church is done in a style called barroco republican (Republican Baroque) or neoclasico abarrocado (Baroque Neoclassical), which was popular in Mexico in the 19th century. It has a portal with a simple arch, which is highly decorated supported by Doric columns. Above this, there is a coat of arms of the Holy Burial in Jerusalem and a niche containing an image of of Assisi. On either side, there are large flowerpots covered in Talavera tile. There are two towers which contain sections that are square and cylindrical. The corners are decorated with volutes, small domes and linternillas to let in light. The interior is white with gold accents, with a number of paintings.(The Santo Sepulcro church is located in the far northwest of the city. The facade is simple with a round arch for the entrance. This portal has two crests in the shape of pyramids with sphere which date from the 17th century. Above this, there is a choral window flanked by small pilasters with pinnacles. The bell tower was never completed and its brickwork can still be seen. The interior has a Latin cross layout, with a short principal nave and a cupola. There are a number of paintings along with altarpieces.(The San Miguelito church is located in the north of the city.  It is small, but the arch that leads into the atrium is considered to be significant. It is a semicircular arch flanked by estipite (inverted truncated pyramids) pilasters and there is a niche with estipites and topped by a cross. The facade of the church is brick. The bell tower is low with only  a part of it decorated with estipite pilasters. The interior has one cannon vault and a cupola. There are a  number of paintings inside, some are folk artwork and some are by masters. One of the latter is the Virgin de la luz by Berrueco from the 17th century.(This side of the city contains a number of large markets as it is more commercial and less residential than the San Andrs side.( The Mercado Municipal has managed to conserve the look of traditional Mexican markets, with women seated on the floor selling seeds, flowers, herbs, and more. There is a cold chocolate and water, whipped until foamy served in wooden bowls with flowers painted on them.() Ponche in Cholula is a drink prepared with blue corn and milk.( This market is augmented on Wednesday and Sundays by a tianguis, when people from surrounding communities come to buy and sell. The market specializes in locally produced products, especially flowers, fruit and vegetables. There are also food stands preparing local dishes.( The Cosme del Razo market on Calles 3 and 5 Norte has food stands which serve local specialties.(  The Centro Artesanal Xelhua display s wide variety of handcrafts made in the area.(La Quinta Luna was selected to be a member of the Hoteles Boutique de Mxico. It was built as a house in the 17th century and it is catalogued as a historic monument by INAH. It has a courtyard in the center, containing a garden. It is located in the Santa Mara Xixitla neighborhood. It was the home of an indigenous noble by the name of Juan de Len y Mendoza. The hotel contains seven luxury rooms, a meeting room, a library, a lobby and a restaurant. The library area contains about 3,000 books and its roof is crossed by beams which were rescued during renovations to the building. The lobby and restaurant are located in what was the chapel. The decoration is based in paintings by Silva and Gomez Brito, various pieces done in local onyx and a number of antiques from various places in the world. The lobby occasionally hosts small concerts. It has adobe walls and very high ceilings.()EducationThe municipality has forty preschools, forty three primary schools, twenty one middle schools and thirteen high schools. There are six technical/professional schools above this level as well as an extension of the Universidad de las Amricas.(HistoryThe first human settlements of Cholula are on the San Andrs side of the city, dating somewhere between 500 and 200 BCE, during the middle Preclassic period.(() Through the Classic period, the village grew and social hierarchy developed, with the first pyramid to define this social and religious hierarchy begun at the end of the Preclassic.(At the end of this period, many settlements were abandoned, but Cholula grew, making it politically dominant in the region. It rapidly developed into an urban center in the Classic period (200-800 CE) dominating the Puebla-Tlaxcala region, growing to an area of about four km2 and a population of between 20,000 and 25,000. The Great Pyramid was expanded twice during this time. The city had relations with the larger Teotihuacan, but the nature of this is not known. However, at the end of the Classic period, Teotihuacan fell. Cholula had a population decline, but the city survived.( However, there is evidence of a change of dominant ethnicity, with a people known as the Olmec-Xicallana coming to power and pottery and other artifacts showing Gulf Coast influence.( The city continued to grow during the Post Classic period (900-1521) as well, although there was another regime change. Toltec-Chichimecas from the fall the Tula arrived in the 12th century as refugees. The ruling Olmeca-Xicallanca allowed their arrival but oppressed them, until the Toltec-Chichimecas revolted and took over in the 13th century. The new lords called themselves the Choloteca, but they did not eliminate the Olmeca-Xicallanca. The defeated group was pushed to the eastern half of the city with the new rulers living on the San Pedro side and constructing a new religious center, the Quetzalcoatl Temple to replace the Pyramid.( This is the origin of the division of the city.(By the time the Spanish arrived, Cholula was actually divided into three sub entities, roughly corresponding to the municipalities of San Pedro Cholula, Andrs Cholula and Isabel Cholula. However, only the first two are considered to be part of the modern city of Cholula.() San Pedro is defined by the main plaza of the city west of the Great Pyramid and area west of that.( The city was important as a mercantile crossroads and a religious center, although religious practice was centered on the Quetzalcoatl Temple in San Pedro rather than on the Pyramid, which was overgrown.(((() Hernn Corts noted he could see about 2,000 houses in the city with as many temples as days of the year.( It had a population of about 100,000;( however, the area was overpopulated leading to chronic hunger among the poor.( During the Conquest, the Spanish would kill about 6,000 residents of the city in an event known as the Massacre. It is from this episode that the 365 churches legend evolves.((()The two parts of town were divided into encomiendas for a very short time, but in 1537 the entirety would be declared a city by the Crown, receiving its coat of arms in 1540.( However, there is evidence that the division of the city was recognized since the early colonial period. The Franciscans established themselves in San Pedro first, with the San Gabriel monastery because this was the power center of the city and at first the monks were not sufficient to be spread out around the entire city. This early emphasis on the San Pedro side, along with the settling of the Spanish population almost exclusively here, resulted in this side of the city becoming mixed race (mestizo) early in the colonial era. Evidence of political distinctions can be found as early as 1548, but in 1714, the two halves were definitely separated when San Andrs was made an Indian Republic. This separation would cause political and economic problems between the two halves of the city, but still coexisting in matters of religion.( The two municipalities were established by 1861.( However, the two halves never completely split and the two municipalities formed a partial union called the Distrito Cholula de Rivadavia in 1895, with the appendage in honor of de Rivadavia.( As such, San Pedro is part of what is the oldest continuously inhabited city in the Americas.(Neighborhoods and festivalsTen of Cholulas eighteen barrios or traditional urban neighborhoods are located in San Pedro. These barrios have their roots in the pre Hispanic period, but after the Conquest, the Spanish reorganized them around parish churches giving each a patron saint.(  The neighborhoods of San Pedro Cholula are San Miguel Tianguisnahuac, Jess Tlatempa, Santiago Mixquitla, San Matias Cocoyotla, San Juan Calvario Texpolco, San Cristbal Tepontla, Santa Mara Xixitla, La Magdalena Coapa, San Pedro Mexicaltzingo and San Pablo Tecama.( Almost all of the oldest and most central neighborhoods of the city are in San Pedro and include, Tianguisnahuac, Calvario, Tlatempa, Mexicaltzingo, Xixitla and Tecama.(  The main unifying factor of the city is its complicated system of mostly religious festivals which occur year round. This has been true of Cholula since the pre Hispanic period, although religious rituals have changed.( The most important of these festivals are celebrated city-wide. These include  Vaniloquio (when church bells are rung in concert), Week, Carnival, and Fiesta del Pueblo with the two most important being the Bajada, which the Virgin of the Remedies leaves her sanctuary on the Pyramid to visit the various barrios and the feast for this same Virgin image on 8 September.(  For these and more local festivals, the costs and efforts associated with them are shared in a complicated system of mayordomos who sponsor a particular event in a particular year. Mayordomos can be men or women, and each neighborhood takes turns sponsoring the city-wide festivals.(The most important festival in any of the neighborhood is that of the patron saint. The night before the church is decorated with lamps and then fireworks are set off to announce the event. The next day, Maanitas is sung to the image, there are a number of Masses and it is possible to receive a visit by the image of another saint from another neighborhood. During one of the Masses, there is a ceremony to name a new mayordomo, which is usually attended by mayordomos from other neighborhoods. After this mass, food is offered to all in attendance. If the saints day falls during the week, it is moved to the following Sunday.(Two annual events particular to San Pedro include the Altepeihuitl and the Tlahuanca. The Altepeilhuitl is an event that takes place on the Sunday before the Thursday marking the ascension of Christ at the Capilla Real. Here images of towns and neighborhoods patron saints are adorned with fruit, squash, chili peppers, corn and bread and presented. This tradition dates far back into the colonial period. The Tlahuanca is an event held on the fourth Monday of Lent at the Capilla Real. Originally, it was a festival held on the street, involving drinking to excess. The name comes from the word tlahuanqui, which means drunk. Today, it is a procession inside the Capilla Real in which wooden crosses are handed out and a host offers food to visitors.()Economy and tourismSan Pedros traditional economic activity is agriculture and the raising of livestock. Most farming is irrigated and San Pedro has most of the irrigated farmland in the Cholula area. The main economic activities of the city are still commerce and agriculture.( Its production is second in importance in the Valley of Puebla. However, the economy is shifting away from agriculture towards small industry, with only 17.4% of the population employed in this area. Residential areas are taking up more land as well. Principle crops include corn, beans, alfalfa, nopal cactus, onions, cilantro, radishes, cauliflower, cabbage, lettuce and cucumbers. There are also various fruits such as pears, plums, apricots, peaches, apples and capulin. There is also extensive floriculture. Livestock includes cattle, goats and pigs. Bee keeping has been growing in importance. Fishing is limited to a small pond called Zerezotla, which is stocked with carp and catfish. There are small areas of pasture and some forest on the Tecajetes Mountain, with pine, oyamel and white cedar.(Industry, mining and construction employ 39% of the population.  Natural resources include deposits of clay, sand, gravel and basalt. One of the most important products of the area is the making of hard apple cider and other food processing. There is also the making of bricks, cinderblock and clay roof tiles. Other industries include textiles, chemicals, metals, furniture, ceramics and glass.(Commerce, tourism and services employ 39% of the population. This commerce includes that geared to local, regional and tourist needs.( Tourism in San Pedro is based on its history, but the biggest attraction, the Cholula Pyramid is technically located in neighboring San Andrs.( This is what has made Cholula one of the better known destinations among foreign travelers to Mexico, as images of the pyramid with the church on top is often used for tourism promotion.(( The second most important attraction, the San Gabriel monastery is in San Pedro along with most of the 37 churches Cholula is famous for. Services  are more geared to tourism than those in San Andrs as many establishments are clustered around the citys main square.(Geography and environmentSan Pedro Cholula is located in the Valley of Puebla, with is a flat area bordered by the Sierra Nevada to the west, the La Malinche volcano to the north. It is located in the center west of the state of Puebla, with the city of Puebla only about ten kilometers to the east.( It extends over 51.03km2 and  borders the municipalities of Juan C. Bonilla, Coronango, Cuautlancingo, San Gregorio Atzompa, Andrs Cholula, Puebla, San Jernimo Tecuanipan and Calpan .(The valley floor is an expanse of plains crossed by a number of small rivers, streams and arroyos, with the most significant being the River. The Atoyac River has its beginning in the runoff of both the Iztacchuatl and Popocatepetl volcanoes.( The area has an average altitude of 2,190masl, with a gentle descent from northwest to southeast along the Atoyac River. There two main elevations: the Zapotecas Mountain,which rises about 200 meters over the valley and the Tecajetes, which rises 210 meters.( There is mountain biking and motocross on the Zapotecas Mountain as well as parasailing at the San Bernardino Chalchilhuapan Mountain. Each year, there is a mountain biking event just north of the city in March in three categories: beginners, advanced and expert. The race begins from the main plaza of Cholula and extends for 50 kms through a number of small communities.( The Zapotecas Mountain is important culturally as well, figuring in a number of local myths and legends, including one about a man who made a pact with a demon in order to obtain money to sponsor a religious festival.(It has a temperate climate with an average temperature of between 18 and 20C, and typically no more than 20 to 40 days with frost per year. There is a rainy season that lasts from May to October which provides about 800 to 900 mm of rainfall per year. This climate made the area very important agriculturally during the pre Hispanic and colonial eras.(Outlying communitiesSan Pedro has 22 communities the largest of which are Almoloya, San Cosme Tezintla, Acuexcomac, San Cristbal Tepontla, San Agustn Calvario, Zacapechpan, San Matas Cocoyotla, San Diego Cuachayotla, and San Francisco Cuapa. These communities primary economic activities are agriculture, floriculture and brick making.(References
25688531
Mount_Morgans_Gold_Mine
The Mount Morgans Gold Mine is a gold mine located 37 km west-south-west of Laverton, Australia.It is operated by River Gold, who purchased the mine from Gold in May 2009.(MINEDEX website - Mount Morgans search result) The mine, having closed in 1998, reopened in December 2009.(Range River raises Mount Morgan gold output forecast miningweekly.com, published: 15 September 2009, accessed: 6 January 2010)The mine should not be confused with the Morgan Gold Mine at Morgan, Queensland.Historymines Leonora.jpg|180px|thumb|left|Gold mines in the Leonora region.Gold was discovered at Mount Morgans in 1896 and, up until 1952, 328,000 ounces of gold at 15 g/t of were produced, mostly in underground mining at the Westralia deposit.(Mt Morgans flyer Range River Gold website, accessed: 6 January 2010) Morgans, later to become of Western Australia for just 32 days, was responsible for the development of the Mount Morgans mineral field.(Morgans, Alfred Edward (1850 - 1933) Australian Dictonary of Biography, Online edition, accessed: 6 January 2010)In a second activities period, from 1988 to 1997, the mine produced 917,000 ounces at 3.2 g/t, now mostly from open pit operations. Mining at Mount Morgans ceased in 1998.( The processing plant of the mine was later removed.The current site, was originally owned by Resources, a major Australian gold mining and exploration company.(PLUTONIC RESOURCES LIMITED (PLU) delisted.com.au, accessed: 1 January 2010)(Atlantic Gold NL website accessed: 1 January 2009) Mining Company purchased Plutonic in April 1998 for more than $1.0 billion,(Homestake Mining Company - History accessed: 1 January 2009) and, in turn, Homestake was acquiered by Barrick Gold at the end of 2001.(MINEDEX website Plutonic search result, accessed: 5 January 2010) Barrick then sold the mine to Range River Gold in May 2009.(Completion of acquisition of Mt Morgans project Range River Gold ASX announcement, published: 21 May 2009, accessed: 6 January 2010)After the purchase of the mine, Range River concentrated its efforts at the The Craic deposit, which it hopes to recover 19,000 ounces of gold at 17.7 g/t.( On 14 December 2009, Range River announced that mining at re-commenced at Mount Morgans at The Craic open pit. The company plans to also mine the Transvaal deposit nearby, as an underground operation. An annual production of 40,000 ounces of gold is forecast.(Mining commences at Mount Morgans Range River Gold website, published: 14 December 2009, accessed: 6 January 2010) An agreement was signed with Barrick in January 2010 to purchase Mount Morgans ore and treat it at Barricks Smith Gold Mine from February 2010 onwards.(Mt Morgans - Ore Sale Terms agreed with Barrick Range River Gold ASX announcement, published: 27 January 2010, accessed: 9 February 2010)ProductionProduction figures for the mine:Sources* The Australian Mines Handbook: 2003-2004 Edition, Louthean Media Pty Ltd, Editor: Ross Louthean* Western Australian Mineral and Petroleum Statistics Digest 2008 Page 34: Principal Mineral and Petroleum Producers - Gold References  External links * MINEDEX website
25709038
South_Kalgoorlie_Gold_Mine
The South Kalgoorlie Gold Mine is a gold mine located south-west of Kalgoorlie, Australia. The mine is sometimes also referred to as South Kal Mines - New Celebration, being a merger of the former New Celebration Gold Mine and the Jubilee Gold Mine, which were combined in 2002.(Gold Process Plant Acquisition Integra ASX announcement, published: 15 May 2006, accessed: 20 January 2010)(Integra`s Gold Processing Plant Dismantled Integra ASX announcement, published: 29 May 2008, accessed: 20 January 2010)It was operated by Exploration NL, who purchased the mine from Kal Mines Pty Ltd in December 2007,(MINEDEX website - South Kal Mines - New Celebration result) until April 2010, when Avoca succeeded in its bit for Dioro and Dioro was delisted from the ASX.(Removal from Official List Dioro ASX announcement, published: 21 April 2010, accessed: 7 May 2010)Dioro had been the subject of a takeover war between Resources Limited and Resources from mid-2009 onwards.(Response to Dioros 8th Supplementary Targets Statement Avoca Resources announcement, published: 17 August 2009, accessed: 6 September 2009)(Ramelius shares rise on strong gold results news.com.au, published: 10 August 2009, accessed: 6 September 2009) Avoca eventually had to drop its bid for Dioro,(Avocas bid for Dioro beaten by Ramelius offer business.watoday.com.au, published: 30 July 2009, accessed: 6 September 2009) having reached a 44.85% interest in Dioro at the close of the offer on 20 August, short of the 50% needed.(Avoca reaches 44.85% at close of Offer for Dioro Avoca Resources announcement, published: 17 August 2009, accessed: 6 September 2009) Rameliuss offer for the company closed on 8 February 2010. Avoca made a renewed takeover offer for the company in late December 2009.(NOTICE OF INTENTION TO MAKE A NEW TAKEOVER OFFER FROM AVOCA AND UPDATE ON RAMELIUSS AMENDED OFFER Dioro ASX announcement, published: 4 January 2010, accessed: 6 January 2010)HistoryJubileeOriginally owned by Australia, the mine was taken over by Mining in January 1994. It was then owned by Normandy until April 1996, when it was acquired by Hampton Goldfields Limited, which, in turn, was taken over by Harmony Gold in April 2001 for A$54 million.(MINEDEX website - Junilee search result accessed: 7 February 2010)(Copy of letter dispatch to HNG Shareholders by Harmony Gold New Hampton ASX announcement, published: 8 January 2001, accessed: 6 February 2010)(The Australian Mines Handbook: 2003-2004 Edition, page: 96)New CelebrationOriginally owned by Newmont Australia Ltd, the mine became part of Newcrest Mining Ltd in April 1991. New Celebration became a subsidiary of Hill 50 Gold in August 2001, when Newcrest sold the mine for A$10 million.(Acquisition of New Celebration Gold Mine Hill 50 ASX announcement, published: 29 June 2001, accessed: 19 January 2010)Harmony announced a take over bid for Hill 50 Gold Limited in December 2001 and compulsory acquired outstanding Hill 50 shares and listed options in April 2002, after achieving a 99% interest in the company.(Harmony to proceed to compulsory acquisition Hill 50 ASX announcement, published: 17 April 2002, accessed: 19 January 2010) Harmony paid A$233 million for this acquisition.(The Australian Mines Handbook: 2003-2004 Edition, page: 467, accessed: 18 January 2010)South KalHarmony merged the New Celebration and the Jubilee operations to form South Kal in 2002.(South Kal became part of Harmonys Australian operations, consisting of Hill 50, the 50 Gold Mine, the Bell Gold Mine (closed June 2003) and the Gold Mine (sold in December 2003).In December 2007, Harmony in turn sold the operation to Dioro Exploration NL.(Dioro settled the purchase of the mine on 30 November 2007. Harmony Gold received A$45 million for the operations, of which $25 million were in cash while the remainder was paid in Dioro shares.(Dioro to settle with Harmony on A$45M acquisition of Kalgoorlie gold assets Dioro ASX announcement, published: 3 December 2007, accessed: 6 January 2010)Dioro suffered a number of set-backs at its South Kal mine, when, on two occasions, major pit wall collapses interrupted mining. These events, in October 2008 at the Mt Marion pit and in January 2009 at the HBJ pit, made access to high-grade ore temporarily impossible and affected operational cash flow for more than six months.(Annual report 2008-09 Dioro ASX announcement, published: 27 November 2009, accessed: 6 January 2010)Ore from the South Kalgoorlie mine is processed at the nearby Dioro-owned Jubilee Mill, commissioned in 1987,( which also processes ore from the Leg Gold Mine, which Dioro owns 49% of.(Quarterly Report for the period ending 31 August Dioro ASX announcement, published: 31 September 2009, accessed: 6 January 2010) The former New Celebration plant, which functioned as the processing facility for the mine, was sold to Mining in May 2006 for A$3 million.( Integra removed the processing plant by May 2008, to use it at its new Gold Mine.(The South Kal operation, together with Dioros 49% stake in the Frogs Leg mine were part of a takeover war between Avoca Resources and Ramelius Resources. Avoca, owner of the Gold Mine and Ramelius, owner of the Dam Gold Mine, both in the area south of Kalgoorlie, were both interested in acquiring Dioro to combine their existing operations with Dioros.(Dioro out of touch, says Avoca Resources The Australian, published: 17 June 2009, accessed: 6 January 2010)(Avoca opens offer for gold miner Dioro Sydney Morning Herald, published: 19 May 2009, accessed: 6 January 2010) After a failed bit by Avoca in August 2009 and a subsequent extension to the bit by Ramelius, Avoca made a new offer for Dioro on 29 December 2009, despite having earlier declared that its August bit was final.(Avoca increase bid for Dioro Exploration ninemsn.com.au, published: 29 December 2009, accessed: 6 January 2010)mines Kalgoorlie.jpg|180px|thumb|right|Gold mines in the Kalgoorlie regionProductionProduction figures for the mine:New CelebrationJubileeSouth Kal* 1 2007-08 figures are for Dioro ownership only, compromising the time from 1 December 2007 to 31 August 2008. Dioros financial year runs from 1 September to 31 August.* 2 Result for Harmonys combined Australian operations, consisting of South Kalgoorlie, the 50 Gold Mine, the Bell Gold Mine (closed June 2003) and the Gold Mine (sold in December 2003).* 3 Figures for January to September 2002 only.Sources* The Australian Mines Handbook: 2003-2004 Edition, Louthean Media Pty Ltd, Editor: Ross Louthean* Western Australian Mineral and Petroleum Statistics Digest 2008 Page 34: Principal Mineral and Petroleum Producers - Gold References  External links * MINEDEX website
25730778
Over_Hulton
Over Hulton is a suburb of Westhoughton within the Borough of Bolton, in Manchester, England.() It lies  south west of Bolton. HistoryThe ancient district of Hulton, contained three townships, Over Hulton, Hulton and Hulton, it was recorded as Helghtun and Hulton in 1235, Hilton in 1278 and 1292, Hulton in 1292 although Hilton was still used until the 17th century.() The chief manor was at Hulton Park in Over Hulton.()The earliest recorded Hultons were Iorweth and Madoc who came from Wales in 1167. It is possible they were joining family who were in the township from 989.() Richard de Hulton, is recorded as having freehold of lands in the districts of Hulton,  Ordsall, Flixton and Heaton in 1304. At Hulton he built Hulton Hall which was surrounded by a  park with  of water. The estate was rich in coal mines. The last surviving member of the Hulton family was Sir Geoffrey Hulton, his family had owned the land for 800 years. The hall was demolished in 1958.()In 1819, a member of this family, the magistrate Hulton ordered the Yeomanry Cavalry in to arrest William Hunt as he addressed the demonstration at St Peters Field in Manchester setting off what was to become known as the Massacre.(). The and Leigh Railway ran to the west serving the Hulton Collieries. The Hulton Collieries Hulton Bank Colliery, otherwise known as the Pretoria Pit, was situated to the south of Hulton Park and just north of the Atherton boundary. The colliery was open from 1901 to 1934. An explosion on 21 December 1910 was the third worst mining disaster in British mining history.()In 1902 a tramway from Lowton via Leigh and Atherton opened to Four Lane Ends where it connected with the trams of Bolton Borporation.()In 2010 the Hulton Park Estate was offered for sale after being home to the Hulton family since 1167.()It was bought by the Group.()GovernanceHistorically a part of the hundred of Salford in the county of Lancashire, until the 19th century, Over Hulton was a township in the Parish of Deane.(() In 1837 Over Hulton along with neighbouring townships (or civil parishes) became part of the Bolton Law Union which took responsibility for the administration and funding of the Law in that area.() In 1898 the Daubhill area of Over Hulton was added to Bolton Borough and the remainder was added to Westhoughton Urban District.GeographyThe area of Over Hulton is  of mainly arable land and the underlying rocks are the middle measures of the Coalfield.( Over Hulton is the most westerly of the Hulton Townships.() The Manchester to Chorley road, the A6, crosses the Bolton to Leigh road, the A579 at Four Lane Ends which was the original hamlet in the township. The M61 passes to the north of Over Hulton.ReligionThere are two churches in Over Hulton, St Andrews C. of E.() was established in 1977 and the Roman Catholic St Vincent de Paul.()References;NotesHulton
25750099
Ruhr_Uprising
Image:Hagen Rembergfriedhof Mrzgefallene.JPG|right|thumb|250px|Memorial to the Ruhr Uprising, HagenThe Ruhr uprising (German: Ruhraufstand) was a left-wing workers revolt in the Ruhr in March 1920. The uprising took place initially on the occasion of the call for a strike issued by the Democrat members of the German government in response to the Putsch of 13 March 1920::Throttle the reactionary clique! Fight with every means for the maintenance of the Republic. Lay aside all petty discord. There is only one way to prevent the return of II::::Paralyze all economic activity!:::No hand dare more!:::No proletarian dare help the military dictatorship!:::General strike all down the line!:::::PROLETARIANS UNITE!:::::DOWN WITH THE COUNTER-REVOLUTION(Vanguard of Nazism, p.170)However the Communists in the Ruhr had previously laid plans for winning political power by the of the proletariat in the event of a general strike. After the collapse of the Kapp Putsch, the German government sent in the Reichswehr (the German army), to crush the ongoing insurgency. In fact, many of the soldiers used were precisely those who had mobilised behind Kapp and von Lttwitz in their putsch. History On 13 March 1920, right-wing Freikorps units that were threatened with disbandment marched into Berlin. The Transitional Reichswehr refused to protect the legitimate government, whereupon the government fled the city, and the participants in the Putsch declared Kapp as the new Reich Chancellor. Since the ministerial bureaucracy refused cooperation, however, he could not govern effectively; when a strike was declared in protest at the Putsch, he finally gave up on 17 March 1920. The general strike was officially declared as having ended on 22 March.The first demonstrations were in the Ruhr region on 13 March 1920. For example, in Bochum, 20,000 people turned out.At the same time as the Putsch, on 14 March 1920 in Elberfeld a meeting of representatives of the Party of Germany (KPD), the Social Democratic Party of Germany (USPD) and the Democratic Party of Germany (SPD) was held. The left-wing workers parties decided on a spontaneous alliance against the Putschists. The SPD, USPD and KPD drafted a joint appeal to winning political power by the of the proletariat. As a consequence of this appeal and in the context of the general strike, a few workers attempted to take over the power of the state on a regional scale. In the larger localities of the Ruhr area, spontaneously formed local Executive Councils took over political power. These were mostly dominates by the USPD, with the KPD also participating. The anarcho-syndicalist Workers Union of Germany (FAUD) was also represented. Worker-soldiers were deployed, who controlled the cities.The Red Ruhr Army, whose strength was estimated at approximately 50 000 members judging by the rifles that were later confiscated, managed to prevail over the forces of the state in the area in a very short time.On 17 March 1920, units of the Red Ruhr Army near Wetter attacked an advance party of the Lichtschlag under Hauptmann Hasenclever, who upon being asked had identified himself as a supporter of the new Kapp government. They took the enemy forces weapons, captured 600 Freikorps members and occupied Dortmund.On 20 March 1920 in Essen, a Central Committee of the Workers Councils was formed, the latter being in the process of taking power in parts of the Ruhr. Another central organ was in Hagen.The Zitadelle Wesel was attacked on 24 March.The legitimate government, newly returned to office, issued an ultimatum, demanding that the Workers Councils put an end to the strike and the uprising by 30 March and 2 April respectively; the Councils did not comply with this.The attempt to settle the conflict at the negotiating table in the Bielefeld Agreement failed ultimately due to the unauthorized actions of the regional military commander, von Watter.The consequence was the renewed proclamation of a general strike. More than 300,000 miners (about 75 percent of the work force in mining) joined this. The communist uprising brought Dsseldorf and Elberfeld into the hands of the communists. Until the end of March the whole Ruhr area was taken.Those involved in the uprising, who were often world war veterans, even received wages from the Workers Councils. They often operated in small groups, transporting themselves by bicycle. The former stronghold in Wesel was also besieged, but here the Ruhr Army experienced its first defeat. The structure of the Ruhr Army was, like the political demands and positions of the different Workers Councils, very heterogeneous and subject to frequent changes. In general, one can make out a strong difference between East and West. The USPD-dominated eastern Ruhr area organised and armed itself earlier, but did not support a continuation of armed actions against the newly restored Reich government. On the other hand, the mobilization was slower in the trade union-dominated western Ruhr area, but later the continuation of the uprising found greater support here.On 2 April 1920, Reichswehr units marched into the Ruhr area to suppress the uprising. Interestingly, this force also contained units that had supported the Putsch only days previously, such as the Marine-Brigade von Loewenfeld.With the support of the Reich government, the uprising was suppressed by General Watter, approaching from the north. Based in Mnster, his staff led the civil war in the Ruhr area on the orders of the government, in which units of the Reichswehr and Freikorps suppressed the Ruhr Army. There followed death sentences as well as mass executions. Those who were carrying weapons at the time of their arrest, were shotincluding the wounded. On 3 April 1920 Reichsprsident Ebert forbade these summary trials, to prevent the worst. On 12 April 1920 General von Watter forbade his soldiers from engaging in unlawful behaviour.The Reichswehr stopped itself only at the Ruhr, as the British occupation forces were threatening to occupy the Land due to a breach of the Versailles Treaty.After the end of the fighting, the participants in the uprising had lost rather more than 2000 lives, the Reichswehr and Freikorps about 273 lives.See also* of the Ruhr District* Marchwitza* Zaisser* strikesReferencesBibliography* Waite, Robert G L. Vanguard of Nazism, 1969, W W Norton & Code:Ruhraufstandnl:Ruhropstandno:Ruhroppstanden
25759102
William_X._Wang
footnotes         William X. Wang (Chinese: , pinyin: wng xio cn) (born: June 6, 1958) is a Chinese American scientist and entrepreneur.Early lifeWang was born in Wuhan, a metropolitan lying at the intersection of the middle reaches of the Yangtze and River (Hanshui) in Central China. During his childhood he lived in Hanchuan, a small town by the north bank of the Han River and 60 kilometers away from downtown Wuhan.Wang was 15 years old when he wrote and submitted his first scientific paper to the Academy of Science Institute of Brain Research. The paper endeavored to explore the biological nature and physical composition of human intelligence. To apply his idea of Darwinian theory, he gathered first-hand data from hundreds of children and adults by interviewing them and measuring profiles of their foreheads. Zhang Xiangtong (), the director of the institute as well as an academician of the Chinese Academy of Science responded Wang a hand-written letter with high praise and encouragement, and the letter became Wangs treasure of lifetime and an invaluable inspiration that led him to the future career of science.In China during the ten years of the Great Revolution, between 1966 and 1976, most of the universities and colleges were shut down, and education was abolished. In 1977 when Xiaoping () overturned the old policies, the paralyzed high education system was restarted and millions of young people were encouraged to prepare for the Higher Education Entrance Examination. At this time, Wang was 19. Two weeks before the national examination, he was still working in the remote countryside as a farmer because at that time all high school graduates had to work at farms for at least two years before they were allowed to return to their home town.UniversityIn December 1977, over six million applicants from all over the country participated in the national examination, which had been overdue for more than ten years. Two months later, one twentieth of them were accepted by a handful of universities, and Wang was one of those lucky ones. He was selected by University, which was one of the top five universities at that time in China.Wang had not much opportunity to study mathematics, physics and chemistry in the ten years prior to the national examination since such subjects at elemental, junior or high school either were not taught or inadequate as result of countless political movements. Wang was obliged to choose social sciences as his subject for the national entrance examination. So history became his first major. Greece & Rome, taught by Wu Yujin (), and of Three Kingdoms, taught by Tang Changru (), were a few of the classes that he had greatly enjoyed during his freshman and sophomore years.Besides evolutionary theory and human intelligence, some of  interdisciplinary junctions between genealogy, genetics, psychology, sociology and geopolitics, also captivated Wang and became his focus during first his first two college years. He studied trees using his own family as the subject and traced the family history even back to one thousand years. The ancestor on Wangs father side was descended from Nurhaci (), the first emperor of Dynasty(); and originated from one of eight Qings royal tribals called Xianghuang Banner () , a nationality called Qing () that used to be nomads in Northern China before having crossed over the Wall and conquested the much more advanced nationality in 1644. In the late Song dynasty () the ancestor on Wangs mother side (surnamed Lin(), a clan of Han nationality that lived in Southern China), joined the troop led by Wen Tianxiang (), Lu Xiufu () and Zhang Shijie () at the Yaishan Battle () fought against Mongols led by Khan () in 1279. In the first half of 20th century, three elders, Lin Yun-Gai (), Lin Bai-Sheng (), and Lin Li-Ru (), who were all from Wangs mother side (Lin), but with distinct political views from each other, respectively served as minister-level officer in the Kaishek () administration, in the Chingwei () regime, and in the Zedong () government. In his second scientific paper, Wang presented himself as a chimera resulting from the cultural integration and genetic merge between two unique nationalities, one of which has been dominating Northern China as nomads for centuries, and the other of which has been living in Southern China as a highly civilized group for over one thousand years. Later Wang presented his theory as an article titled Genetic shift, gene fusion and hybrid advantage resulted from the immigration and re-settlement of grouped clans coming from distinctive geographic territories induced by historical events or wars. Shi Quan (), a leading geographer, and Yu Xianjue (), a well-known human geneticist, both taught at the university then, reviewed the paper with great interest and pointed out its weakness from their different perspectives.After two years of study at the university, Wang reached a pinnacle of his college career by delivering his third scientific paper, which described how the language that is composed and delivered by a brain, acts in turn to stimulate, promote, optimize and advance the brain, when this interaction is viewed from the perspective of the evolution of human intelligence. Antecedents to the thoughts reflected in the third paper can be found in the second paper and even in his first paper seven years before. The paper was reviewed by Wu Xizai (), a distinguished professor in the field. Wu made a strong recommendation to the president of the university, Liu Daoyu (), and asked the president as a favor, to allow Wang to change his major. Twenty days after Wang submitted his paper, which was on January 11, 1980, Wang became the first student in the nation and in the history of the modern Chinese higher education, to be allowed by Ministry of Education to switch from a major in sciences  history, to be a major in sciences - biology. Wangs paper was a significant incident in the history of Chinese education and also changed his goals in life.In earlier 1980s, scholars from leading universities and research institutions in China were fascinated with phenomenon called special human body functions (), a number of adults and children had claimed they have capabilities of  reading a certain Chinese characters that were written in a folded paper through ears or hands. Brain has been Wangs favour subject and Freud has also been inspiring him for years. Exploring this phonomenon, became a new extension of his imgination. He organized a team that including freshman, graduate students and even junior faculty members, and devoted a large portion of his effort on the project. Wang tried design experimental systems that would ascertain how acquisition of information by means external to the basic limiting assumptions of science could have been possible. Wang realized that it was extremely difficult to replicate such extraordinary experiences under controlled scientific conditions. Several Chinese leading scholars, Hsue-shen (), specialized on cybernetics, Wei Nengrun (), specialized on otolaryngology, and Yu Guangyuan (), specialized on humanities, had become strong supporters on those investigations, and because that, a national debate even had been triggered then. Wang in 1981 actually founded first group on somatic science in China  Wuhan University Society of Special Human Body Functions, which used to have over 200 members during 1980-1982.In 1983, during his fourth college year as a student of biology, Wang drafted his fourth scientific paper, which was intended to explore a four possible origin for cancer, which Wang categorized as: 1) environmentally at the level where cancer could be induced by exogenous factors such as a entity, composition, behavior and so on; 2) biologically at the level due to variances of structure, structure, and structure; 3) chemically at the level resulted from bonds, positions and configurations; and 4) intrinsically at the level. The paper is titled as of DNA caused by nitrogen protons perturbation: a possible relationship of the activation of proto-oncogenes and the intrinsic instability of duplex, and three years late in 1986 Wang was invited to give a talk at the 14th Cancer Congress in Budapest based on the original idea. Wang presented his theory at the conference: cancers can be induced not only environmentally, biologically, chemically, but intrinsically at cellular, molecular, atomic level and even at the subatomic level. He believed that modern science and technologies, would never be able to fully control, completely stop or fundamentally eliminate the origin and development of cancers, because of the fourth cause, and the nature of the fourth cause.To the United StatesCreative thought and pioneering work on the intrinsic instability of DNA duplex has created controversy among scientists in the related field. Over ten academicians of Academy of Science including Tang Aoqing (), Liang Xiaotian (), Liang Zhiquan (), Zou Chenglu (), Gao Shangyin (), etc., have either liked, supported or challenged Wangs determination and predication. The Central Television has even made a special program called Talents in Challenge of the story and broadcast it three times nationwide. It had also bought him great opportunities: Chinese Academy of Sciences awarded him a research grant for encouraging the further research; a leading scholar from Cambridge University offered him a Ph.D. scholarship; and several US universities generously offered him pre- or fellowships. William made a wise choice: go to the United States. On December 24, 1987, just one day before Christmas, Wang was granted an visa from the US embassy at Beijing, and flew over the Pacific on January 11, 1988.Phase of learningUptown Manhattan Campus of Columbia University is the place where Wang has spent his first four years in the United States. From 1988 to 1992, Wang undertook Ph.D. studies in immunology at University College of Physicians & Surgeons. One unique feature of our system is the level of specificity in recognitionhttp://www.ncbi.nlm.nih.gov//pubmed/9469799: a specific antigen binds to the receptorhttp://www.ncbi.nlm.nih.gov//pubmed/9586631, the receptor recognizes it, and triggers an response. Dr. Ned S. Braustein directed his work on identifying and mapping the sequences in both class II histocompatibility complex - and -chains that contribute to the binding of the superantigen shock syndrome toxic I. Wang performed good work on those innovative and intriguing research subjects and also demonstrated the potential and capability for being a leading scientist in future. On January 11, 1992, four year after he arrived the country, Wang was granted for US Residency (towards to US citizenship five years late) by Department of State, as the 1st priority called exceptional foreign talent initially recommended recommended by Dr. Isidore S. Edelman, a member of US Academy of Science taught at University College of Physicians & Surgeons.  A few weeks before leaving Columbia University,  Wang received two offers of postdoctoral fellowships from two leading institutions after presentations were being made: University Department of Biochemistry and NIH Institute of Mental Health.  Facing a difficult choice, Wang recalled a moment that were many years ago, when he was 15, he was so fascinated by the mystery of the compactness and complexity of brain,  and committed himself into that sort of pioneering and exciting workexploring the neural network puzzle of human brain. So, he chose NIH for his next step.In January 1992, Wang started his postdoctoral studies on disease at the Institute of Mental Health, Institutes of Health. With the guidance from Dr. David M. Jacobowitz he investigated the pattern of chymotrypsin in CNS and SERM compounds molecular and mechanism in both the normal brain and the brain affected by disease. Based on those genomic and proteomic approaches, as the first person in the world, Wang has proven the presence of chymotrypsin-like protease in organs. Although no definitive evidence for the synthesis of this enzyme in tissue other than the pancreas is available, identified potential activities of chymotrypsin-like protease in the human cortex where has potential disease.From 1994 to 1995, during the period of working at ICRF unit of clinical oncology at of Oxford Institute of Molecular Medicine, which led by Sir Bodmerand Dr. Adrian L. Harris, William has performed a variety of experiments: establishing based two-hybrid system and animal model; localizing, cloning and characterizing receptor kinase gene; constructing receptors; generating stable-transfectants; and mapping transduction pathways based on proteomic profiling. The work has led the isolation and characterization of an ovarian-cancer associated protein kinase and its ligand, and thus Wang has became a member of the first team of scientists who identified novel tyrosine kinase genes in human cancer cells.In his research at Clinic as an assistant professor in 1996, Wang has established a mouse model and successfully demonstrated interferons potential for intervention against cancer.Phase of trialsAfter near ten years doing intensive research at prestigious world-class institutions, Wang has changed his life path again. He switched himself from academic to industry, from basic science to high tech, and from learning to invention. To him, the change wasnt simply for job, money and making living, but for experience of tool-management, knowledge of component-integration, and execution of systems engineering.In 1997, Wang went to Japan and spent a few months of working at Roches laboratory located in Tsukuba as a investigator. There he has put his effort to identify a novel ligand to the receptor by using integrated screening systems that support mapping of (molecular) hits and screening of compounds. As principal engineer and architect working at Corporation in 1998-1999, Wang has instrumentally engaged himself on design of the Clinic Database  one of the most powerful data management systems in medicine, based on relational and object-oriented technologies; and development of an administrative console of healthcare system that extends UI to Oracle database with integrated technologies of XML, HTML, PL/SQL, JavaBeans, JSP and Java. As program director working at Lilly & Company in 2000-2001, Wang led a multidisciplinary research team consisting of pharmaceutical scientists, bioinformatics scientists, software engineers, and validation specialists, in development of the mining system that sorts, edits, visualizes and reports data generated from target-identification, research and trials phases, and the pharmacogenomic data system that supports annotation required for analyzing variation and determining polymorphism by implementing algorithms. As vice president of bioinformatics working at DNA Technologies Inc. in 2002, Wang led a team working on developing match engine which can perform similarity searches, determination, indication, assembly, alignment, and automatic sequence loading.Phase of practiceAt age 15 as a teenager, Wang was fascinated of the labyrinth of brain though it was not more than kind of imagination; at age 22 as a college senior at Wuhan University, Wang has one step further for getting close to entrance of the puzzle by proposing a hypothesis that how the human intelligence could be developed, promoted and advanced; at age 32 as a scientist on brain research in NIH, Wang found a place where he was able to put theoretical concepts of human brain on top of a modern laboratory bench; at age 44 as an inventor and entrepreneur through establishing Pharmacom Microelectronics in 2002, Wang eventually puts his foot at a platform in which he can convert the experimental work to be workable models or real machines, which he called Biochip-based Microsystemshttp://www.nsti.org/BioNano2008/showabstract.html?absno1029http://biophysics.physics.brown.edu/bpjc/JC%20pdf%20paper%20files/Spring%202005/Magnetoresistive-based%20biosensors%20and%20biochips.pdfAt Wangs perspective, grouped sensing systems can be simulated to have the most important features and functions of neural system. It is embodied from following four aspects: i) in the way that the distinct sensing terminals synapses are designed to response to stimuli such as sound, light, electronic, temperature, odor, taste or others respectively and deliver the signals to the centre control point (brain) of the sensing system; ii) in the components that built in the sensing system have their mirror entities in an neuron such as receptive zone, trigger zone, conducting zone, and output zone; iii) in the network that implemented in the system to perform crosstalk among multiple sensing pathways just like what happened in the complex of fibers; iv) in the two-way signaling delivery that utilized by the sensing system to transfer input signals from downstream (dendrite and axon of the sensing system) to upstream (cortex of the sensing system) and then deliver output message from the upstream to the downstream based on implementing microarrays at terminals of the sensing system and grouping signaling transfer channels as cord of neural fibers.Since Pharmacom was established in 2002, Wangs attention has been focusing on developing smaller-sized screening, detecting and interpreting systems with faster response, lower cost and higher sensitivity. A series of instruments are designed to be able to perform real-time detection on biomarkers of diseases (e.g. Niles virus, Cow Disease, AIDS, SARS); signature molecules of pathogens (e.g. coli O157:H7); contaminates of air and water; and epidemic factors of allergies(e.g. Flu, Asthma). They undertake all steps in a streamlined analysis from raw sample collection, optional sample separation, captured target identification, specific confirmation triggering and remote reporting.Wang currently serves as Chairman, President and CEO of Pharmacom Corporation, an Iowa City-headquartered biotech company, consisted of fifteen subordinate companies operated at States, Japan, China, Republic, Italy and Finland respectively. The business mainly involves developing portable/implantable biochip-based microsystems for monitory, detection, diagnosis and therapy, and producing organic products that naturally extracted from animal organ or plant portion for skincare, energy-enhance, impotency-improvement, cancer-prevention, and diabetes-cure.Wang is currently a lecture professor of Qingdao Agricultural University Pharmacom College of Biomedical Engineering. During 2010, Wang served as an adjunct professor of biomedical engineering at University of Iowa College of Engineering.Wang intends to create a super chain called education-research-manufacture. The chain is consisted of three master pierces: education on life science and biomedical engineering; research on microsystem-related subjects including genomics, proteomics, microarray, microfluidics and microfabrication, and manufacture of chip-driven microsystems for monitory, detection, diagnosis and therapy.Note on publications and patentsWang has authored a number of scientific papers in the fields of genomics, immunology, chemistry and neuroscience, and holds eighteen patents or provisional patents for genomics software and biosensing devices.ResidenceWang and his family reside in a registered historical home in the center of City, Iowa. The Clark House was built by the first governor of the State of Iowa, Lucas (governor)s family during the middle of the 19th century. Over the last 150 years, only five families had lived in this four-storage house prior to the Wang familys residency. The second resident was Mr. Adesida Clark, a grandson of Clark, a co-signer of Declaration of Independence. The third resident was a world-famous mathematician in early 20th century, Richard P. Baker who educated at Oxford and the University of London, did advanced work on surface models at the University of Chicago and then taught at the University of Iowa during 1905-1937. The fourth resident was Raymond G. Bunge. During middle 1950s he has developed the glycerol medium for preserving sperm, thus developing the first bank in the world, paving the way for human insemination, and the clinical area of treatment was born due to his pioneering work.Honors and awards* 05/2007    Named as CEO in American Hightech Enterprises by (US) Street Journal* 04/2007    Named as Honorary Chairman of the Business Advisory Counsel by (US) National Committee* 06/2007    Named as American Entrepreneur by Cambridge Biographies* 04/2007    Presented by Gazette, in 4-edition article titled World Class IC global Technology Company Pharmacom Works on Small Scale* 08/2006    Presented by a Chinese best-selling book titled Namecards of a university, authorized by Liu Daoyu, a well-known educator, and former president of Wuhan University* 05/2004    Presented by Review, in the article titled The silicon guinea pig, Can silicon microchips mimic living organisms?** 04/2003    Presented by SmallTimes, in the article of Working to develop sensor to combat bioterrorism* 01/1995    Honored as Linacre Fellow by of Oxford* 01/1994    Awarded for ICRF Fellowship by (UK) Cancer Research Fund* 02/1992    Awarded for NIH Internal Fellowship by (US) Institutes of Health* 01/1992    Granted for US Residency(towards to US citizenship five years late) by US Department of State as the 1st priority so-called exceptional foreign talent recommended by University* 12/1987    Presented by Central Television in a nationwide 45-min program titled Talent in Challenging* 02/1987    Named as Top 200 Young Scientists by (China) Academy of Science* 04/1985    Elected as Member by (UK) Society of Chemistry Professional memberships * of Electrical and Electronics Engineers* Association for Cancer Research* York Academy of Science* Society of Biochemistry* Society of Chemistry* Chinese Society of UFO* Chinese Society of Human Sixth Sense Presentations * Wang X., Genetic shift, gene fusion and hybrid advantage resulted from the immigration and re-settlement of grouped clans coming from distinctive geographic territories induced by historical events or wars (11/1981), lecture at Wuhan University (Wuhan, China).* Wang X., Self-unwinding of DNA caused by nitrogen protons perturbation: a possible relationship of the activation of proto-oncogenes and the intrinsic instability of DNA duplex (8/1986) Key speech at the 14th International Cancer Congress (Budapest, Hungary).* Wang X., Design, develop and implement a relational, algorithm-driven, web-enabled and wireless-ready bioinformatics data warehouse (4/2002) Opening Speech as the Annual Meeting of Iowa Bioinformatics Workshop (Ames, Iowa, USA)* Wang X., Neural nature of biosensing microsystems (9/2007) Lecture at Wuhan University (Wuhan, China).* Wang X., Architecture of biosensing microsystems (9/2007) Key speech at the 1st IEEE International Conference on Bioinformatics and Biomedical Engineering (Wuhan, China).* Wang X., Pharmacom Microsystems (5/2008) Key speech at the Iowa IEEE Annual Meeting (Cedar Rapids, Iowa, USA). Publications * Wang X.,  The alternative asymmetric distribution of protein-in-nitrogen-atom around axis induces the instabilization of hydrogen bonds in DNA dulex contributed by N-1 of prine or N-7 of pyrimidine, Nature (Chinese), No. 2, 169-189, 6/1987* Wang X.,  A theoretical model of negative controlling of protooncogene transcription. Nature (Chinese), No.6, 167-169, 6/1988***** Wang X., Halmela M., Ke S., Jun Y. Microsystems that integrate three-dimensional microarray and multi-layer microfluidics for combinatorial detection of bioagent at single molecule level. USPTO, Publication No: 20070116607; Publication Date: 5/25/2007* Wang X., Halmela M., Ke S., Jun Y. Gastropod Biological Fluid, Method of Making and Refining and Use. World Intellectual Property Organization, Publication No: 19760WO01, Publication Date: 12/31/2008 Patent applications* Wang X., etc.  Control stick-embedded biosensor that authenticates pilots fingerprinting and rejects unscheduled operators or hijackers. USPTO No: 60/403,043, Date of Filing: 08/13/2002* Wang X., etc.  Steering wheel-embedded biosensor that authenticates drivers fingerprinting, rejects car-stealer, and monitor operators physiological activities. USPTO No: 60/406,352 8636, Date of Filing: 08/28/2002* Wang X., etc.  Universal monitoring system for screening, validation, notification and warning of suspicious pathogen sequences possessing the potential of bioterrorism. USPTO No: 60/409,062, Date of Filing: 09/09/2002* Wang X., etc.  Pathogen detection system that has a lab-on-chip and performs single-run DNA sequencing. USPTO No: 60/413.011, Date of Filing: 09/24/2002* Wang X., etc.  Chip-based, database-supported, internet-enabled biosensing system for detecting, validating, warning and notifying of biowarfare pathogen sequences. USPTO No: 60/413,018, 09/24/2002* Wang X., etc.  Microarray-featured affinity-based biosensing system built with nanoparticles and molecularly imprinted polymers. USPTO No: 60/413,017, Date of Filing: 09/24/2002* Wang X., etc.  MAIDS (microarray-featured affinity-based imprint-polymerized data-mining empowered sensing): an innovative technology for high throughput molecule screening and drug discovery. USPTO No: USPTO No: 60/418,302, Date of Filing: 10/15/2002* Wang X., etc.  Microarray-featured MIP-fabricated algorithm-driven wireless-ready biosensing system for detection of chemical, biochemical and cellular agents basing on MAIDS technology, USPTO No: 60/425,757, Date of Filing: 11/13/2002* Wang X., etc.  Nanoscale biosensing device that is embedded a lab-on-a-chip, driven by wireless genomics database, and performs analysis of single molecule USPTO No: 60/428,959, Date of Filing: 11/26/2002* Wang X., etc.  Control-stick-embedded biometrics-based microelectronic device that authenticates pilots fingerprinting, rejects hijacker, triggers the built-in unmanned landing system and assists the aircrafts safe landing. USPTO No: 60/431,015, Date of Filing: 12/06/2002* Wang X., etc.  Handheld microelectronics artificial nose that can be used for detecting materials of volatility such as liquids solvents, odors and flavors from combat, terrorist or suspicious entity sources. USPTO No: 60/445,905, Date of Filing: 02/10/2003* Wang X., etc.  Microsystems that integrate three-dimensional microarray and multi-layer microfluidics for combinatorial detection of bioagent at single molecule level. USPTO No: 20070116607, Date of Filing: 11/23/2005* Wang X., etc.  Biochip-Based Drug Delivery Microsystems. USPTO No: 60/937,121, Date of Filing: 06/28/2007* Wang X., etc. The Biomembranes for Skin-Renew, Wound-Repair and Scar-Removal. USPTO No: 60/937,008, Date of Filing: 06/28/2007* Wang X., etc.  Microfluidics/Microarray-Facilitated Microsystems for Both Diagnosis and Therapy of Bodyfluid-Related Diseases 06/28/2007  USPTO No: 60/937,642, Date of Filing: 06/28/2007* Wang X., etc.  Biodetection Microsystems Non-Centrifugal Turnplate Performing Clockwise DNA Extraction or Protein Purification. USPTO No: 60/937,852, Date of Filing: 06/28/2007* Wang X., etc.  Intelligent Drug Delivery Microsystem for Prevention, Warning and Instant Therapy of Heart Attack. USPTO No: 61057845, Date of Filing: 05/31/2008* Wang X., etc.  Gastropod Biological Fluid, Method of Making and Refining and Use. USPTO No: 19760WO01, Date of Filing: 06/24/2008 References* William Wang presented in Liu Daoyus book: Namecards of a university* William Wang presented in Liu Daoyus book:Testimony of a university president* William Wang presented in MIT Technology Review: The silicon guinea pig, Can silicon microchips mimic living organisms?Further reading*Wang X. W. Microsystems that integrate three-dimensional microarray and multi-layer microfluidics for combinatorial detection of bioagent at single molecule level Publications of USPTO, 2007*****T. Osipova, Z. Sokolova, T. Ryabykh, V. Karaseva, M. Modorsky, V. Matveev, A. Baryshnikov. Biochip-Based Test System for Cancer Diagnostics. Simultaneous Quantitation of Total and Free Forms of Prostate-Specific Antigen Nanotech 2008 ConferenceExternal links* William Wang  presented by MIT Technology Review* William Wang chaired at Chinese IEEE conference* William Wang  awarded lecture professorship at Qingdao Agricultural University* William Wang  lecturing on biomicrosystems at Qingdao Agricultural University* William Wang presented by SmallTimesWorking to develop sensor to combat bioterrorism* William Wang introduced by University of Iowa Press Release Biotechnology firm Pharmacom locates at UIs Technology Innovation Center* William Wang featured inBAIDU WIKIPEDIA()* William Wang featured in in HUDONG WIKIPEDIA()* William Wang featured inABC of People()* William Wang featured in Huchang County Annals()* William Wang featured in People at Wuhan University ()* William Wang introduced by CCTV (China Central Television) in the Program of Science and Technology of China () Williams Story and Science of Snails (  )
25781947
Upper_Harz_Water_Regale
The Upper Harz Water Regale () is a system of dams, reservoirs, ditches and other structures, much of which was built from the 16th to 19th centuries to divert and store the water that drove the wheels of the mines in the Harz region of Germany. The term regale, here, refers to the granting of royal privileges or rights(Langenscheidts Muret-Sanders German-English dictionary (Berlin, 2004) gives one translation of the German word Regal as regale, a legal and historical term.) (de rgale) in this case to permit the use of water for operations in the Harz mountains of Germany.The Upper Harz Water Regale is one of the largest and most important historic mining management systems in the world.( The facilities developed for the generation of power have been placed under protection since 1978 as cultural monuments.( The majority are still used, albeit nowadays their purpose is primarily to support conservation (the preservation of a historic cultural landscape), conservation, tourism and swimming.  From a water management perspective, several of the reservoirs still play a role in protection and the supply of water. On 31 July 2010 the Regale was declared a UNESCO Heritage Site affiliated with the of Rammelsberg and the Historic Town of Goslar.( Oberharzer Wasserregal zum Weltkulturerbe ernannt tagesschau.de, accessed on August 1, 2010)The water system covers an area of roughly  within the Saxon part of the Harz, the majority of structures being found in the vicinity of Clausthal-Zellerfeld, Hahnenklee, Andreasberg, Buntenbock, Wildemann, Lautenthal, Schulenberg, Altenau and Torfhaus. The Water Regale Regale in this context means a prerogative. Through the so-called Bergregal, or mining rights, the monarch granted the right to mine and, through the Wasserregal, he granted the right to use local water supplies for the purpose of mining.() Other water users, particularly mill owners, had a lower priority. This water regale or right to use water was part of the overall Bergfreiheit or mining rights that were valid in in Lower Saxony until the 1960s.(In German, the term Oberharzer Wasserwirtschaft (Upper Harz Water Management) has also been frequently used to refer to these historic facilities. But this is not precise enough, because in the last hundred years an intensive, modern water management system has been put in place in the Upper Harz in the form of a number of new dams and their associated structures and ditches. The Upper Harz mining industry The Upper Harz was once one of the most important mining regions in Germany.() The major products of its mines were silver, copper, lead, iron and, from the 19th century, zinc as well. The main source of income, however, was silver. From the 16th to the middle of the 19th centuries about 4050 % of the entire German silver production originated in the Upper Harz.() The taxes raised from this contributed significantly to the revenue of the royal houses in Hanover and Brunswick-Wolfenbttel and helped to secure their positions of power and influence within the Roman Empire.Its lucrativeness justified a high commitment in terms of investment and effort. Hereby the Upper Harz mining industry produced a considerable number of innovations and inventions, including such important advances as the engine, the engine (Wassersulenmaschine) and the cable. Mining and water File:Dumreicher.jpg|thumb|Sketch of ponds, ditches and tunnels between Zellerfeld and Bockswiese around 1868Mining becomes a very energy-intensive activity as soon as excavation extends any significant distance underground. In the Upper Harz, vein mining (Gangerzbergbau) was the main form of extraction, with excavation following the near-vertical lodes straight down into the earth.() Only a few metres down the ingress of water increased the difficulty of excavation considerably. Initially it was mopped up using men standing on ladders, the so-called Wasserknechten (water servants), with their leather buckets. Later, the introduction of horses and whims (Gpel) enabled larger quantities of water to be lifted. But horses were expensive and had to be changed every few hours.( As a result, mines - particularly the richer, deeper ones - started to use hydropower systems, able to work continuously, 24 hours a day. To do this, streams were diverted onto water wheels that drove reciprocating pumps in order to raise water from greater depths and in greater quantities. The principle was to raise water with water.(To operate these wheels, a continuous and substantial supply of water was needed. Although the Upper Harz, with an annual precipitation of over 1300 millimetres per year, received copious amounts of water, the mines often lay high up in the mountains close to the watersheds where there were only a few streams of any size. In addition the flow of mountain streams in the rocky terrrain was very variable. It often only needed a few weeks of low rainfall for the water supply to the mines to be threatened. This led to several mines having to be closed.()In their heyday, the mines of the Upper Harz were among the deepest in the world. For example, as early as 1700, shaft depths of  300 metres were exceeded and, around 1830, a depth of 600 metres was attained; this was now so deep that the mine was actually below sea level - something which was considered significant at that time.() Deep shafts, however, demanded correspondingly high levels of energy to lift ore and pit water. This high energy consumption, combined with the heavy demand for water, led to even more strenuous attempts to develop the available water power.The miners usually built new water structures in those periods when no ore could be extracted due to the lack of water to power the wheels. When the water wheels stopped running, the underground water that ingressed the mine could no longer be removed; the mine drowned and the miners were driven out. During these phases work concentrated on upgrading the facilities of the Upper Harz Water Regale. Water diversion and storage elements File:Wasserregal-dammgraben.jpg|thumb|upright|The Ditch near AltenauIn all, 143 dammed ponds, 500 kilometres of ditch and 30 kilometres of tunnel were built for the collection, diversion and storage of the runoff water in the Upper Harz.() In addition about 100 kilometres of drainage adits are included as part of the Regale.  These facilities were not, however, all in operation at the same time. The Harzwasserwerke today operates and maintains 65 dammed ponds, 70 kilometres of ditch and 20 kilometres of tunnel.() Several smaller dammed ponds still belong to the Lower Saxon State Forestry Department or are even in private hands.The principle  of water diversion is to collect the water in ditches, running almost parallel to the contours of the slope, and to divert it to the mining areas. These supply channels can easily be ten or more kilometres long (like the Ditch or the Upper Schalke Ditch). Sometimes the water so collected was not fed directly to the water wheels, but into large, artificial, dammed ponds (Teiche) which acted as reservoirs, in order to ensure enough water was available for the wheels even in times of drought. From the bottom outlets of these ponds the water could be led into a ditch system in order to power the water wheels. Usually several wheels were arranged one after another, like a cascade, so that the water could be used to drive more than one wheel. In order to lead the water over as many wheels as possible, it had to be collected, stored and routed around at the highest possible elevation.( The technology of the time did not enable dams to be built with heights of more than about 15 metres. This meant that many small ponds had to be laid out rather than a few larger ones. By arranging the ponds in a cascade, water could be retained at a high elevation in order to drive as many water wheels as possible. A number of these pond cascades were built, comprising four to six ponds.The majority of water wheels were used to drive pumps. Occasionally, the power they generated had to be transmitted over several hundred metres to the mine itself using rods (Feldgestnge). Important mines also had a reciprocal water wheel which was used to provide power for transporting the ore and the material to be crushed.( All water wheels were of the overshot type. Apart from a few reconstructions, the water wheels all disappeared during the last century.File:Gewoelbebogen.JPG|Arches on the Zellerfeld DitchFile:Morgenbrodstaler Graben.JPG|Walkers by the Morgenbrodstal Ditch near DammhausFile:Regulierung-wasserregal.jpg|Regulating equipment for water supply on the Dam DitchFile:kehrrad.png|Reconstruction of a reciprocal water wheel, with a 9.5 metre diameter, in Clausthal-Zellerfeld Structures ; ReservoirsThe 143 reservoirs, known as ponds (Teiche), were impounded using dams. Dam heights varied between 4.0 and 15.0 metres; impoundment volumes were, on average, about 150,000 cubic metres.; DitchesThe ditches are supply channels almost parallel to the terrain contours, with a very slight incline of around 1-2 mille and are accompanied by an inspection path. ; TunnelsThe underground water tunnels of between 20 and 1000 metres long were the most expensive investments in the Upper Harz Water Regale. They were worth the cost however because of their low operating costs and high hydraulic capacity. ; Special structures* The Dyke is an aqueduct built from 1732 to 1734 with a length of over 900 metres and a height of  16 metres.* The Oderteich differs considerably from the other Upper Harz ponds with regard to its construction materials and dimensions. Following its completion in 1722 to the start of the modern dam building period in 1892, it was the largest dam in Germany.(* In the Pumphouse water could be pumped from the Dam Ditch to a height of 8 metres using hydropower.* The Huttaler Widerwaage is also frequently mentioned in this connexion: it is quite complex and enables water to flow in two different directions.File:Huettenteich Altenau.JPG|The Smelter Pond (Httenteich) near AltenauFile:KClausthal.JPG|The dam of the Klein Clausthal PondFile:HuttalerWW.JPG|The Huttaler Widerwaage and portal of the Huttal TunnelFile:UHasenbAL.JPG|Exit portal of the Lower Hasenbach Tunnel Tourism Due to the sheer number of structures and the length of the ditches the Upper Harz Water Regale is best explored on foot. Thanks to the Harzwasserwerke a large number of waterside footpaths have been created in recent years: the so-called Wasserwanderwege. Visitors can get to know about the typical elements that make up the Upper Harz Water Regale by means of information boards along the clearly marked routes.(() With a few exceptions, most of the ponds can be used by swimmers during the summer months. The majority are also are leased to local angling clubs. History  Construction Mining activity in the Harz goes back to the 10th and 11th centuries.(( The first wheels in the Harz were erected in the 13th century in the Pandelbach valley southeast of Seesen.( At that time mining, including this early used of the so-called waterworks (Wasserknste) for the mines, was managed by the Cistercian abbey at Walkenried.The Death in the Ages depopulated the Harz to a great extent and almost brought mining operations to a standstill. Another factor was probably that mining had reached its technical limits at the time with depths of up to about  60 metres.A clear recovery followed from about 1520 onwards, initially at the instigation of the Duke of Brunswick-Wolfenbttel, Henry the Younger.( But it was his son, Duke of Brunswick-Lneburg, who gave added impetus to existing mining operations in the Upper Harz and initiated the creation of a large number of ponds and ditches. It was the extensive use of hydropower that made the mining boom in the Upper Harz possible. As the mines became ever deeper over time they needed more and more energy. The lack of water following months of little rain or long periods of frost were time and again a limiting factor for the mines.( The expansion of the water system was achieved by raising the existing pond dams, building new dams, laying new ditches and extending existing ditch runs. Further improvements: water tunnels and drainage adits One example of the expansion of the Water Regale network was the optimisation of several ditch courses (the Dam Ditch, Upper and Lower Rosenhof Chutes), mainly during the 19th century, by the construction of so-called Wasserlufen (also Wasserberleitungsstollen) or water tunnels. These enabled the distance travelled by the water to be significantly shortened.( It also guaranteed winter working, because the water running underground did not freeze up. In addition the maintenance cost of a short section of tunnel was much cheaper than that of a long ditch run. But a  particularly important advantage was the higher discharge capacity. The tunnels descended the same height difference over a shorter distance and therefore had a steeper incline.( Initially the underground sections were laboriously hewn out with and chisel. Later gunpowder was used as an explosive, making the construction of water tunnels considerably easier and faster.Because most of the energy was needed to drain the mines of water and because the need for that continued to grow as mines became deeper, there were attempts early on, to dewater mines using drainage adits (Wasserlsungsstollen). This entailed driving tunnels from the mines to the valleys, through which water could drain away under gravity. The deeper the level of drainage, the longer the adit had to be. The longest of these tunnels is the Ernst August Adit, built in the mid-19th century, which is 35 kilometres long. It collected water from the mines in Bockswiese, Lautenthal, Zellerfeld, Clausthal and Wildemann and led it to Gittelde on the edge of the Harz.( Heyday and decline About 8090 % of the ponds in the Upper Harz Water Regale were created in the 16th and 17th centuries,( whilst the system of dam ditches was further expanded in the 19th century.( These structures contributed significantly to the Harz becoming the largest industrial region of Germany in the Modern Period. The invention of the engine and the discovery of energy did not immediately change the use of hydropower. These other forms of energy were introduced relatively gradually in the Upper Harz. Of course, with the introduction of the steam engine, the difficulties of acquiring coal in sufficient quantities was also a factor until the construction of the Valley Railway.With the nationalisation of the mines on 1 January 1864 by the of Hanover, not only did mining rights now transfer to the state, but also the rights to water usage. So the Kingdom of Hanover also claimed the Water Regale, which was first legally defined in the Prussian Water Law (Preuisches Wassergesetz) of 1913 in sections 16 and 381. Following the absorption of the Kingdom of Hanover into the of Prussia, the Royal Prussian Mining Inspectorate (Kniglich-Preuische Bergbauinspektion) and, later, Preussag took over the operation of mines in the Upper Harz.An inventory dating to the year 1868 reveals that a total of 198 water wheels of various diameters and a total capacity of about 3000 horsepower were driven by the Upper Harz Water Regale .()Around 1900, mining shaft depths of 1,000 metres were attained. But the cost of mining at greater and greater depths continued to rise. As the same time the industry had to compete with other metal mining areas at home and abroad in an era of improving transportation. Overexploitation during the World War and plummeting metal prices during the Depression caused, at its peak, a great wave of closures, as large mines in Clausthal-Zellerfeld, Bockswiese and Lautenthal had to shut down. In Bad Grund, however, mining in the Upper Harz continued until 1992, but it only needed to use a small fraction of the facilities of the Upper Harz Water Regale. Hydroelectric power Following the demise of the mining industry in 1930, water from the Upper Harz Water Regale was switched to generating electricity, some new structures being built as a result. The generation of electricity was carried out by Preussag until 1980 in the Kaiser Wilhelm (maximum output 4.5 MW) and Ottiliae (maximum output 1.5 MW) mines. These hydropower stations were closed in the early 1980s when water rights had expired and the profitability of power stations steadily declined against a background of sharply increasing wages and stagnating energy prices.() Nevertheless, in Sankt Andreasberg the water of the Oderteich, transferred along the Rehberg Ditch, is still used to generate electricity today. In addition to the Teichtal and Grundstrae power stations, there are two stations in the Pit: the Grner Hirsch power station at a depth of 130 metres and the Sieberstollen power station at 190 metres.()() The Water Regale today Following the closure of power stations the facilities of the Water Regale were initially transferred to the Lower Saxony State Forestry Department, which maintained them through the Clausthal-Schulenberg Forestry Office at the cost of much labour and money. In order to relieve the state purse, in 1991 the Harzwasserwerke was given the task of operating and maintaining 65 reservoirs, 70 kilometres of ditch and 20 kilometres of water tunnel. The Harzwasserwerke has delegated the management of the Upper Harz Water Regale to its Clausthal office. No public money is spent; the cost of maintenance, a seven-figure sum annually, has to be borne by the Harzwasserwerke through its sale of drinking water.(In addition to the facilities entrusted to the Harzwasserwerke there is a large number of dam ruins, tunnel entrances and several hundreds of kilometres of ditches that are not maintained. These structures enjoy the status of a so-called passive protected monument. That means that they are like the ruins of castles, subject to very gradual decay, but which may not be destroyed by modern measures without legal permission under conservation law.(The Hirschler Pond is used by the public utilities of Clausthal-Zellerfeld to supply drinking water to Clausthal-Zellerfeld and Altenau; similarly Zellerfeld uses the Upper and Middle Kellerhals Ponds. Hahnenklee gets its drinking water from the Auerhahn Pond, the New Grumbach Pond and the Upper Kellerhals Pond.Kellerhals Pond, in the background the Kahle Berg, the western side of the Schalke Similar systems There are similar water supply systems in the historic silver mining region near (Sachsen), in Norwegian Kongsberg, in Schemnitz (today part of Slovakia) and in Sweden, and records show that there was an regular exchange of experience and know-how between these regions. Nevertheless, the Upper Harz Water Regale,  is the largest and most interconnected system of its kind in Europe, with significantly more dams and ditches as well as larger structures than all its counterparts elsewhere.( See also * Harz Pond and Ditch System*Kunstteich*Kunstgraben References ( Sources * * * *  External links * Upper Harz Water Regale* Location plan by the Harzwasserwerke for the currently active facilities (PDF; 679 kB)WasserregalHarz vannreguleringssystemvattenregalWasserregal
25810020
Charles_F._Schweinfurth
File:Cleveland Mansion.jpg|thumb|right|T. Everett mansion on Euclid Avenue (since demolished)File:Rockefeller Park bridge.jpg|thumb|right|Wade Park Avenue Bridge over Martin Luther King Boulevard in Clevelands ParkCharles Frederick Schweinfurth (September 3, 1856November 8, 1919) was a prominent architect in Cleveland, Ohio.() His brother Julius Schweinfurth was also an architect and they did some projects as a partnership.BackgroundSchweinfurth was born in New York to Charles J. and Katharine (Ammon) Schweinfurth. He graduated from high school in 1872 and worked at architectural offices in New York City.Cleveland careerSchweinfurth moved before to Cleveland to design T. Everetts Euclid Avenue mansion. It would be the first of at least 15 he designed on Row by 1910.The 23-room mansion Schweinfurth designed for Samuel Mather  in Bratenahl, Ohio was built in 1890 is now the Club.(Shoreby Club)Schweinfurth was also responsible for the designs of remodels at the Old Stone Church, Calvary Presbyterian Church, and Cathedral and Parish House. He was also the architect for four landmark stone bridges crossing Martin Luther King Boulevard, his own residence on East 75th Street, declared a Historical Architectural Landmark in 1974 by the Cleveland Landmarks Commission.(Schweinfurth Collection Cleveland Public Library)Projects*At least mansions on Euclid Avenue /Millionaires Row)( including:**Mather Mansion (190610) (now University Hall at State University), a 43-room Tudor mansion built for iron-mining millionaire Mather. The property included sunken gardens.(Archival photo of Mather Mansion sunken garden) Completed in 1910 at a cost of $1,200,000, it was the most expensive home in Cleveland to that point in time.(Cleveland State Mather Mansion restoration (includes photos) IMP Amicus) It was also used as the Institute of Music until 1940 and then by the Automobile Club until 1967 when it was purchased by Cleveland State University. Located at 2605 Euclid Ave.((http://events.ohio.com/cleveland-oh/venues/show/1092775-samuel-mather-mansion#)(Mather Mansion photo)(http://www.csuohio.edu/class/com/clevelandstater/Archives/Vol%203/Issue%2010/highlights/highlights2.html November 21, 2001 Cleveland Stater Cleveland State University)(Mather Mansion ghost stories)*Shoreby in Bratenahl, Ohio (now the Shoreby Club)*Stone Mather Memorial Hall (191013), Western Reserve University 11220 Bellflower Rd.( Stone was Samuel Mathers wife.(Archival photo of Flora Stone Mather)*Old Stone Church (restoration 1884), designed reconstruction of interior after a fire, located at 91 Square, Heard & Porter designed the original (185355) (http://www.lakeviewcemetery.com/newsletters/LVC-Newsletter3-09.pdf)(Designated Cleveland Landmarks Cleveland Planning Commission City of Cleveland)(National Park Service)*School of Law (1896) at Case Western Reserve University 2145 Adelbert Rd.(*Calvary Presbyterian Church (188790), 2020 East 79th St.*Park Bridges over Martin Luther King, Jr. Drive (18971900), at Lake Shore & Michigan Southern Railroad, St. Clair Ave., Superior Ave., Wade Park Ave.(* Harkness Memorial Chapel (190102) at Case Western Reserve University, 11200 Bellflower Rd. The neo-Gothic building includes antique oak and Georgia pine woodwork and Comfort Tiffany windows.(Florence Harkness Memorial Chapel Case Western Reserve University)(* Church of the Covenant (1904)(* County Courthouse (190912), designed by and Schmitt with Charles F. Schweinfurth at 1 Lakeside Ave., NE  (*Old Main building at Case Western (Largely destroyed by fire)* Oaks 210 4th St., North East, Massillon, Ohio* Schweinfurth House 1915 E. 75th St. Cleveland (Schweinfurth House photos Cleveland City Planning)* Trinity Cathedral Euclid Ave. at E. 22nd St. Cleveland* Union Club 1211 Euclid Ave. ClevelandThe Schweinfurth Collection today is part of the Public Library in Cleveland.()ReferencesExternal linksThe Julius Adolphe Schweinfurth papers, 1882-1927 are located in the Northeastern University Libraries, Archives and Special Collections Department, Boston, MA.
25833434
Great_Western_Railway_(Tasmania)
The Tasmanian Great Western Railway was a proposed railway that was never built to connect Hobart with the west coast during the 1890s mining boom in Tasmania. It would have passed through a route somewhat similar to the current Highway through the northern edge of West Tasmania into the west coastIt was a proposal by business interests to utilise Hobart on the east coast, rather than the west or north west coast ports.()  However the proposal was not a simple idea that failed - but a play between rival companies and regions (For a full appreciation of the players and the details of the wars - Geoffrey Blaineys Peaks of Lyell - chapter 13 The Railway War pp112-133 and Glyn Roberts Metal Mining... - chapter 19 pp 363-380 Access to the West Coast give different and useful approaches to the events) In 1896 two rival companies lobbied for permission to build railways from Hobart to the west. The Great Western Railway Company, promoted in Melbourne, planned an electric railway from Glenora to Mount Lyell and Zeehan.... The theoretical plans of the rival syndicates passed as genuine currency in Hobart, where the Mercury printed a huge red and black map  (The Great Western railway proposal was part of a complex play of political and business interests between the three regions of power in Tasmania that were relatively balanced in the 1890s through to the time of the First World War - after which the distribution was never balanced again.(Geoffrey Blaineys Population Movements in Tasmania, 1870-1901, in Tasmanian Historical Research Association, Papers and Proceedings, vol.3, 1954, pp.62-70. The Rise and Decline of the West Coast, in Tasmanian Historical Research Association. Papers and Proceedings, vol.4, 1955, pp.66-74. both articles give an early view on the Tasmanian regional rivalries and the resolution through the downfall of the west Coast influence)   The solution of the North West Route to Burnie and the rise of the Lyell Mining and Railway Company and Bay Railway routes saw the Great Western Railway proposals vanish in time. Notes  See also * on the West Coast of Tasmania References * * 
25850042
Welded_wire_mesh
Welded wire mesh, or welded wire fabric is a steel reinforcement material in concrete.  The mesh is used for replacing the traditional cut & bend and placing of steel thermo-mechanical treated bars.  The mesh is an electric fusion welded prefabricated reinforcement consisting of a series of parallel longitudinal wires with accurate spacing welded to cross wires at the required spacing.  Machines are used to produce the mesh with precise dimensional control.  The product results in considerable savings in time, labour and money.Uses of Welded Wire MeshThe welded wire mesh is a metal screen that is made up of low carbon steel wire or stainless steel wire. It is available in various sizes and shapes. It is widely used in agricultural, industrial, transportation, horticultural and food procuring sectors. It is also used in mines, gardening, machine protection and other decorations.Different types of welded wire mesh:There are several types of welded wire mesh which can be categorized according to their structure, use and characteristicsElectro 	galvanized welded wire mesh with square openingThis type of welded wire mesh is designed for building fencing and in other infrastructural purposes. It is a corrosion resistant wire mesh that  is largely used in structural building.  It is also available in different forms like rolls and panels for industrial uses.Hot 	dipped galvanized welded meshThis type of mesh wire is generally made up of plain steel wire. At the time of processing it goes through a hot zinc covering process. This type of welded mesh ware with square opening is ideal for animal cage structuring, fabricating the wire boxes, grilling, partition making, grating purposes and machine protection fencing.PVC 	Coated Welded MeshPVC coated welded mesh with plastic covering is constructed with galvanized iron wire of high quality. It has PVC powder covering that is processed by an automatic machine. The smooth plastic coating on this corrosion protective wire is attached with a strong adhesive which make increases durability of the wire. It is used in fencing residential and official properties like gardens, parks, building etc. The PVC coated welded mesh which is available as both rolls and panels, is also available in different colors like white, black, green etc.Welded 	Stainless Steel MeshThis kind of welded mesh wire is basically used in industrial fencing purposes. It is made up of stainless steel that has high strength and integrity. This corrosion resistance meshed wire is long lasting and is widely used in transportation, agricultural, mining, entertainment and other service sectors.Welded 	Wire Fencing Panels:This is a type of meshed wire that is available as panels and is basically used for fencing purposes. It is available with or without galvanization. The non-galvanized version comes for a lower cost.Welded 	Steel Bar Gratings:This type of welded mesh wire provides advantages like high strength, easy installation and feasible cost. It is mostly used for grating roads, making drainage coverings and building safety walls. It also has uses in chemical plantation, platform grating, metallurgy etc.
25866816
2010_Jos_riots
 Footage    File:Locator Map Jos-Nigeria.png|250px|right|thumb|Location of Jos in NigeriaThe 2010 Jos riots were clashes between Muslim and Christian ethnic groups in central Nigeria near the city of Jos.  The area has been plagued by violence for the past twenty years motivated by multiple factors.() The clashes have been characterized as religious violence by many news sources,()() although others cite ethnic and economic differences as the root of the violence.( The Anglican Archbishop of Jos, Benjamin A. Kwashi stated, What seems to be a recurring decimal is that over time, those who have in the past used violence to settle political issues, economic issues, social matters, intertribal disagreements, or any issue for that matter, now continue to use that same path of violence and cover it up with religion. ()The first spate of violence of 2010 started on 17 January and lasted at least four days. Houses, churches, mosques and vehicles were set ablaze during the fighting.() At least 200 people were killed.( )Hundreds of people died in fresh clashes in March 2010. According to the York Times, the slaughtered villagers were Yoruba, mostly Christians, slain by machete attacks from the Hausa-Fulani, a group of Muslim herdsmen.() Hundreds more left the scene of the attack in case the perpetrators returned.OverviewJanuaryJos is the capital of State, in the middle of the divide between the predominantly Muslim north of Nigeria and the predominately Christian south.() More than 5,000 people have been displaced in the violence. Reports on the catalyst vary. According to the state police commissioner, skirmishes began after Muslim youths set a church, filled with worshippers, on fire.() Other community leaders say it began with an argument over the rebuilding of a Muslim home in a predominantly Christian neighborhood that had been destroyed in the November 2008 riots.( A 24-hour curfew was imposed on the city on 17 January 2010,() and Vice-President Jonathan ordered troops to Jos to restore order.()  Vice-President Jonathan currently holds executive authority, as President YarAdua was in Arabia receiving medical treatment from November 2009 until his return on 24 February 2010 with current medical and governmental status as yet unclear.()(  By 19 January 2010, at least 50 people had been arrested.()On 20 January 2010, the BBC reported the fighting had spread to Pankshin, 100 km from Jos. These reports have been denied by the Army.()Figures provided by medical and aid officials, religious and community leaders as well as global rights watchdog Human Rights Watch (HRW) put the death toll in the clashes at 492. HRW, quoting figures it got from Muslim officials, said that 364 of those killed were Muslims.( The state police command said that there were 326 deaths and 313 arrests.( )This is the third major incident of rioting in Jos in the last ten years. One thousand people were killed in riots in 2001, and 300 died in subsequent violence in 2008.( )MarchBefore dawn on 7 March 2010, more than one hundred Christian villagers were killed by Muslim Hausa-Fulani herders in Dogo-Nahawa village near Jos.(( The attacks went on for four hours,( and nearby villages were also targeted.() Guns were fired by the perpetrators to cause panic and led to villagers running towards them to be chopped up by machetes.() The villagers were mainly Berom Christians.( Buildings were also set alight.() Most of the dead were women and children.( One of the dead was an infant less than three months of age.() Corpses were dumped in the streets.( Jonathan urged that the killers be caught.() The death toll was later updated to more than 300() and later 500.() Hundreds more left the village in case the attackers returned.( )CausesBoth Muslim and Christian youth have been blamed for starting the violence, with various reasons given.() According to a local paper, attackers yelled Allahu Akhbar before burning down churches and homes. The Vatican has expressed outrage and sadness. The Plateau State Christian Elders Consultative Forum said that the attack was yet another jihad and provocation.( )The significance of religious differences has been questioned with the roles of social, economic, and tribal differences also considered. An ethnic rivalry between the Hausa and Berom peoples may be a factor in the violence. However, this simplistic assertion is challenged because most ethnic groups in Plateau, who are predominantly Christian share the same sentiments with the Berom, and collectively see an Islamic threat in their own lands.() The archbishop of the capital Abuja said that it was a classic conflict between pastoralists and farmers, except that all the Fulani are Muslims and all the Berom are Christians.( Professor Kabiru Mato of the of Abuja also played down the role of religion in the riots: I dont see anything religious. Wherein religion could be the difference between the two warring factions, fundamentally its a manifestation of economic alienation. So social apathy, political frustration, economic deprivation and so many factors are responsible. But this view has also been challenged by the fact places of worship like Churches have always been the targets of these riots for whatever root reason. So religion is a galvanizing force in the crisis no matter what the initial cause of conflict.() The Beroms have been accused of resenting the economic progress of other settler groups: yet, this is another simplistic assertion. Most Plateau natives collectively feel they do not have the Federal connections or patronage other major ethnic groups have. And most Nigerian wealth has been driven by oil money. The Beroms and other Plateau natives are predminantly farmers and have had to experience their lands taken away and degraded by tin mining. Now, they have to contend with migrant groups who use Federal influence and wealth to displace them from their own lands.  The massive structure of the Federal Government is fueled primarily by oil money. The Beroms, as well as other Plateau natives, feel they should have a measure of autonomy in their core lands just the way Native Americans in their homesteads are treated as a Sovereign nation, elevated to the status of a protected minority. Nigerias constitution has no place for respecting the rights of minorities, whether it is Jos, or the Niger Delta.(Economist, March 11th 2010 article Another massacre in Nigeria: An unending cycle.)There is also the issue of discrimination against the mainly Muslim settlers of Jos, even if they have been living in the city for decades. This further accentuates divisions in the city. While the mainly Christian indigenous population are classified as indigenes, the mainly Muslim immigrants to Jos are classified as settlers and find it difficult to stand for election- among other things.()Response: Benedict XVI said this was atrocious and Violence does not resolve conflicts but only increases the tragic consequences.()The Socio-Economic Rights and Accountability Project wrote to the Criminal Court, asking them to investigate the riots for potential against humanity. The prosecutor replied in November 2010 saying the situation is being analysed by the prosecutor to see if a case should be opened. (ICC is Analysing Jos Crisis, Says Prosecutor, Trust, 2010-11-08)See also*of Nigeria*violence*Alexandria bombingReferences Jos de 2010di Jos (2010) , 2010Jos 2010w Dos (2010)   (2010)sa Jos noong 2010zh:2010
25888102
Phacelia_monoensis
Phacelia monoensis is an uncommon species of phacelia known by the common name Mono County phacelia. It is native to the plateaus of central western Nevada and a few locations over the border in County, California, where it grows in sagebrush, on wooded slopes, and on open expanses of alkaline clay soils. It is apparently most abundant in disturbed areas, such as along road cuts and in areas of mining activity.(Nevada Natural Heritage Program Rare Plant Fact Sheet) It is a small, patchy annual herb producing spreading, stout stems up to about 12 centimeters long. It is glandular and coated lightly in hairs. The leaves are 1 or 2 centimeters long and sometimes have lobed edges. The hairy, glandular inflorescence is a one-sided cyme of several narrow bell-shaped yellow flowers each no more than half a centimeter long.ReferencesExternal links*Jepson Manual Treatment*USDA Plants Profile*Photo gallery
25918508
Gold_parting
Gold parting is the separating of gold from silver. Gold and silver are often extracted from the same ores and are chemically similar and therefore hard to separate. Over the centuries special means of separation have been invented. The very earliest precious metals had mixes of gold and silver; gold and silver alloy is called electrum; gold with small impurities of silver (5% and less) is called bullion.(Rapson, W. S. 1992. Mining, Extraction and Refining of Gold. Interdisciplinary Science Reviews. Vol. 17. No. 3. pp209) With the advent of coinage, methods had to be invented to remove impurities from the gold so that gold of specific purities could be made. Cupellation was able to remove gold and silver from mixtures containing lead and other metals, but silver could not be removed. Gold parting as a process was specifically invented to remove the silver. The main ancient process of gold parting was by salt cementation and there is archaeological evidence of that process from the 6th century BC in Sardis, Lydia.  In the post-medieval period parting using antimony,  sulphates and mineral acids was also used. In the modern period chlorination using the process, and electrolysis using the process are the most widely used methods of refining gold by removing silver and platinum. History of gold partingEarly historyThe very earliest attempts at refining gold can be shown by the surface enhancement of gold rings. Gold quality was enhanced at the surface by 8095% gold compared to 6475% gold at the interior found in Nahal Qanah Cave dated to the 4th millennium BC.(Craddock, P. T. 2000a Historical Survey of Gold Refining: 1 Surface Treatments and Refining Worldwide, and in Europe Prior to AD 1500. In A. Ramage and P. T Craddock (eds) King Croesus Gold; Excavations at Sardis and the History of Gold Refining. London: British Museum Press pp28) Further evidence is from three gold chisels from the 3rd Millennium BC royal cemetery at Ur that had a surface of high gold (83%), low silver (9%) and copper(8%) compared with an interior of 45% gold, 10% silver and 45% copper. The surface was compacted and heavily burnished and indicates early use of gilding to enhance the surface.( La Niece, S. 1995. Depletion Gilding from Third Millennium BC Ur. Iraq Vol 57. 41-47)Gold parting in ancient and medieval worldSeparation of gold from silver was not practised in antiquity prior to the  Lydian Period (12th century BC to 546BC).(Craddock, P. T. 2000a Historical Survey of Gold Refining: 1 Surface Treatments and Refining Worldwide, and in Europe Prior to AD 1500. In A. Ramage and P. T Craddock (eds) King Croesus Gold; Excavations at Sardis and the History of Gold Refining. London: British Museum Press pp27) Material from Sardis (in modern Turkey) is evidence of the earliest use of gold and silver parting in the 6th century.(Rehren, T. 2003. Crucibles as Reaction Vessels in Ancient Metallurgy. In Craddock, P. T and Lang, J. (eds.) Mining and Metal Production through the Ages.  London: British Museum Press pp207) Literary sources and the lack of physical evidence suggest that gold-silver parting was not practised before the mid first millennium BC. Gold parting came with the invention of coinage and there is no evidence for the use of a true refining processes before the introduction of coinage. As refining gold (as opposed to surface enhancement) results in a noticeable loss in material, there would have been little reason to do this before the advent of coinage and the need to have a standard grade of material. The first possible literary reference to the salt cementation parting process is in the Arthasastra, a 4th century BC treatise from India, that mentions heating of gold with Indus earth. Indus earth is taken to mean soils high in salt, nitre and ammonium salts and therefore ideal for the cementation parting process. A better known and more detailed early description is given by Siculus in the 1st century BC quoting an earlier lost book, On the Erythraean Sea from the 2nd century BC by of Cnidus.( Notton, J. H. F. 1974. Ancient Egyptian Gold Refining: A reproduction of early techniques. Gold Bulletin. 2 (7) pp52) An experiment recreating the process as described by Diodorus Siculus by heating a mixture of the gold and salt in a sealed pot for 5 days was done by Notton and was found to be successful.Pliny in this Historia mentions the purification of gold a number of times and makes reference to the salt cementation process of gold parting. He says that the gold is roasted with a double weight of salt and three times the weight of misy (ferric sulphates) and again with two portions of salt and one of the stone which is called schiston. Here he is describing the heating of gold with salt and iron sulphates which act to dissolve the copper and silver in the gold.( Craddock, P. T. 2000a Historical Survey of Gold Refining: 1 Surface Treatments and Refining Worldwide, and in Europe Prior to AD 1500. In A. Ramage and P. T Craddock (eds) King Croesus Gold; Excavations at Sardis and the History of Gold Refining. London: British Museum Press. Pp38) Parting vessels used for refining gold with the cementation process have been found in London, Lincoln, York and Winchester. The London vessels, dating from the Flavian period (c.7085AD), were sealed using luting clay;  XRF analysis detected gold and silver, with highest concentration around the sealed region showing possible escape of silver as the volatile silver chloride.( Bayley, J. 1990. Archaeological Evidence for Parting. In E. Pernicka and G. A. Wagner (eds) Archaeometry 90. Basel ; Boston : Birkhuser Verlag)Gold parting had been well used throughout the ancient times but only in the Medieval period were clear and detailed descriptions of the processes written. All the archaeological finds of Roman and early medieval parting point to a solid state process using common salt as the active ingredient.(Bayley, J. 2008. Medieval precious metal refining: archaeology and contemporary texts compared. In Martinon-Torres, M. and Rehren, T. (eds) Archaeology, history and science: integrating approaches to ancient materials. Walnut Creek: Left Coast Press. Pp142-3) The only large group of medieval parting vessels so far discovered were found at Coppergate and Picadilly sites in York.( Bayley, J. 1992. Non-Ferrous Metalworking at 16-22 Coppergate. The Archaeology of York 17/7. London:CBA) The pinkish-purple discolouration of the vessels showed them to have been used with the salt cementation process which removes iron from the clay as chloride. Other vessel fragments are known from Carlisle and Winchester.(Bayley, J. 2008. Medieval precious metal refining: archaeology and contemporary texts compared. In Martinon-Torres, M. and Rehren, T. (eds) Archaeology, history and science: integrating approaches to ancient materials. Walnut Creek: Left Coast Press pp143)  Theophilus was a 12th century German monk and in his book De Diversus Artibus( Hawthorne, J. G. and Smith, C. S. 1979. Theophillus: On Divers Arts. New York: Dover) gives the clearest description of the salt cementation process.This mixture is then added to an earthenware pot and layered with thin sheets of gold fold. The pot is then sealed and heated in a furnace. It was during the medieval period that distillation was discovered and the first description of nitric acid production was given by Geber in the Summa perfectionis, 1330. acid is able to dissolve silver. The addition of ammoniac to nitric acid creates regia and this acid is able to dissolve gold. Both acids are used in the acid method of parting but the acids were expensive so were not used until the post medieval period.(Taylor, F. S. 1956. Pre-scientific Industrial Chemistry. In C. Singer, E.J. Holmyard, A.R. Hall and T. I. Williams (eds) A history of technology: Vol.2, The Mediterranean civilizations and the Middle Ages; c700 B.C. to c,A.D. 1500. Oxford : Clarendon Press pp356-7)Post medieval to Modern PeriodComprehensive accounts of the salt cementation processes is given by; Biringuccio in  his The Method of cementing gold and of Bringing it to its Ultimate Fineness.; in the Probierbuchlein  Little Books on Assaying; by Agricola in book 10 of Re Metallica; and by Ercker in his Treatise on ores and assaying. This was a period where new techniques began to be explored. Granulation of the gold instead of gold foil increased surface area and therefore the efficiency of the reaction. Salt cementation continued to be the main method of parting until the 16th century but in later Middle Ages processes using sulphur, antimony and mineral acids began to be used. There are archaeological finds at sites in London of distillation vessels for making acids in Britain from the 15th century which include fragments of ceramic cucurbits (vessels for heating reacting chemicals) which were used with alembics for distillation.(Bayley, J. 2008. Medieval precious metal refining: archaeology and contemporary texts compared. In Martinon-Torres, M. and Rehren, T. (eds) Archaeology, history and science: integrating approaches to ancient materials. Walnut Creek: Left Coast Press pp145) By the 18th century cementation was rarely used and had been replaced by acid treatment. Into modern times the acid parting method continued to be used but other methods were discovered. In 1860s Australia the process was developed, this removed silver by bubbling chlorine gas through the molten gold mixture. Soon after, in the 1870s, Electrolytic refining of gold was developed, the process, to deal with the problem of removing platinum from the gold. This technique is the most commonly used today.( Craddock, P. T. 2000b Historical Survey of Gold Refining: 2 Post-medieval Europe. In A. Ramage and P. T Craddock (eds) King Croesus Gold; Excavations at Sardis and the History of Gold Refining. London: British Museum Press pp69)Parting processesSalt cementationThis process was used from Lydian to post medieval times. It is a solid state process relying on common salt as the active ingredient but it is possible to use a mixture of saltpetre (KNO3) and green vitriol (FeSO4). The basic process involved the mixing of argentiferous gold foil (in later periods granules were used), common salt and brick dust or burnt clay in a closed and sealed container. Theophilus mentions the addition of urine to the mix. With heating, the silver reacts with the salt to form silver chloride which is removed leaving a purified gold behind. Conditions needed for this process are below 1000C as the gold should not melt. Silver can be recovered by smelting the debris.(Rehren, T. 2003. Crucibles as Reaction Vessels in Ancient Metallurgy. In Craddock, P. T and Lang, J. (eds.) Mining and Metal Production through the Ages.  London: British Museum Press 207) Heating can take 24 hours. Hoover and Hoover( Hoover, H.C. and Hoover, L. H. 1950. Georgius Agricola: De re metallica New York : Dover pp456) explains the process thus; under heating salt (sodium chloride, NaCl) decomposes in the presence of silica and alumina (from the brick dust or clay) to produce hydrochloric acid and also some chlorine. This reacts with the silver to produce silver chloride (AgCl). The urine is acidic and aids decomposition. Silver chloride is volatile and would be removed from the metal. And the container is sealed to stop the escape of the silver which can be recovered later. Notton in experiments found that with one heating the gold content could be taken from 37.5% to 93%( Notton, J. H. F. 1974. Ancient Egyptian Gold Refining: A reproduction of early techniques. Gold Bulletin. 2 (7) pp55)Sulphur and antimony processesThis is similar to the salt cementation process but creates sulphides instead of chlorides. Finely divided impure gold and elemental sulphur are reacted together under moderate heat in a sealed crucible. The impurities form metal sulphides and the gold is left unreacted. The gaseous sulphide condenses on the crucible fabric. The antimony process is the same but uses stibnite (Sb2S3) instead of sulphur because stibnite is stable at a higher temperature than sulphur. This is much quicker than the salt process and gave a purer gold, but it could dissolve some of the gold as well. This process is first described in the Probierbuchlein.(Craddock, P. T. 2000b Historical Survey of Gold Refining: 2 Post-medieval Europe. In A. Ramage and P. T Craddock (eds) King Croesus Gold; Excavations at Sardis and the History of Gold Refining. London: British Museum Press. pp68)Acid partingThe distillation was used in the 12th century Europe after its introduction from the East(Taylor, F. S. 1956. Pre-scientific Industrial Chemistry. In C. Singer, E.J. Holmyard, A.R. Hall and T. I. Williams (eds) A history of technology: Vol.2, The Mediterranean civilizations and the Middle Ages; c700 B.C. to c,A.D. 1500. Oxford : Clarendon Press) and after that period more powerful acids could be created. Nitric acid (aqua valens) could be made by the distillation of saltpetre (KNO3) with alum (KAl(SO4)2) or vitriol (FeSO4) with water.(Craddock, P. T. 2000b Historical Survey of Gold Refining: 2 Post-medieval Europe. In A. Ramage and P. T Craddock (eds) King Croesus Gold; Excavations at Sardis and the History of Gold Refining. London: British Museum Press pp69)(Bayley, J. 2008. Medieval precious metal refining: archaeology and contemporary texts compared. In Martinon-Torres, M. and Rehren, T. (eds) Archaeology, history and science: integrating approaches to ancient materials. Walnut Creek: Left Coast Press pp145)2KNO3 + H2O + FeSO4   FeO + K2SO4 + 2HNO3Nitric acid, after distillation to increase the acid strength, was capable of dissolving the silver from a finely divided mixture of silver and gold, leaving the gold. regia was also used for parting. It was made by adding ammoniac to acid which produced a mixture of acid and nitric acid. This acid dissolved the gold to a soluble chloride and the silver was attacked and precipitated as an insoluble chloride. Silver was removed by filtering and gold was then recovered by evaporating the liquid and heating the residue. Nitric acid was suitable for separating small quantities of gold from silver and Aqua regia used to separate small quantities of silver from gold.( Taylor, F. S. 1956. Pre-scientific Industrial Chemistry. In C. Singer, E.J. Holmyard, A.R. Hall and T. I. Williams (eds) A history of technology: Vol.2, The Mediterranean civilizations and the Middle Ages; c700 B.C. to c,A.D. 1500. Oxford : Clarendon Press pp356-7)Miller processThe Miller process was invented by Francis Bowyer Miller in 1860s Australia. It is able to refine gold to 99.95% purity. The process involves blowing a stream of chlorine gas over and through a crucible filled with molten impure gold. Impurities in the gold form chlorides before the gold does and these insoluble salts are removed from the melt by skimming the surface.( Yannopoulos, J. C. 1991 The Extractive Metallurgy of Gold. New York: Van Nostrand Reinhold pp242243)( Rapson, W. S. 1992. Mining, Extraction and Refining of Gold. Interdisciplinary Science Reviews. Vol. 17. No. 3 pp210)Wohlwill processInvented by Emil Wohlwill in 1874 this produces the highest purity gold (99.999%). It is an electrolytic process using pure gold for the cathode (or titanium as a starter cathode) and chloroauric acid (gold chloride-hydrochloric acid) as the electrolyte; this is made by dissolving gold with chlorine gas in the presence of hydrochloric acid. Gold is dissolved at the anode, and pure gold, traveling through the acid by ion transfer, is plated onto the cathode. Silver forms an insoluble chloride slime and copper and platinum form soluble chlorides that are removed. This procedure is used on a very large industrial scale and has a large set up cost due to the amount of gold that needs to be permanently dissolved in the electrolyte.( Yannopoulos, J. C. 1991 The Extractive Metallurgy of Gold. New York: Van Nostrand Reinhold pp242243)( Rapson, W. S. 1992. Mining, Extraction and Refining of Gold. Interdisciplinary Science Reviews. Vol. 17. No. 3 pp210)See also*extraction*mining*Gold*Cupellation*Re Metallica*assayFootnotesBibliography*Bayley, J. 1990. Archaeological Evidence for Parting. In E. Pernicka and G. A. Wagner (eds) Archaeometry 90. Basel; Boston : Birkhuser Verlag 1928*Bayley, J. 1992. Non-Ferrous Metalworking at 1622 Coppergate. The Archaeology of York 17/7. London:CBA*Bayley, J. 2008. Medieval precious metal refining: archaeology and contemporary texts compared. In Martinon-Torres, M. and Rehren, T. (eds) Archaeology, history and science: integrating approaches to ancient materials. Walnut Creek: Left Coast Press, 131150.*Craddock, P. T. 2000a Historical Survey of Gold Refining: 1 Surface Treatments and Refining Worldwide, and in Europe Prior to AD 1500. In A. Ramage and P. T Craddock (eds) King Croesus Gold; Excavations at Sardis and the History of Gold Refining. London: British Museum Press, 2753.*Craddock, P. T. 2000b Historical Survey of Gold Refining: 2 Post-medieval Europe. In A. Ramage and P. T Craddock (eds) King Croesus Gold; Excavations at Sardis and the History of Gold Refining. London: British Museum Press, 5471.*Dodwell, C. R. 1971. Gold Metallurgy in the Twelfth Century: The De Diversis Artibus of Theophilus the Monk. Gold Bulletin. 3 (4) 5155*Hawthorne, J. G. and Smith, C. S. 1979. Theophillus: On Divers Arts. New York: Dover*Hoover, H.C. and Hoover, L. H. 1950. Georgius Agricola: De re metallica New York : Dover *La Niece, S. 1995. Depletion Gilding from Third Millennium BC Ur. Iraq Vol 57. 4147*Notton, J. H. F. 1974. Ancient Egyptian Gold Refining: A reproduction of early techniques. Gold Bulletin. 2 (7) 5056*Rapson, W. S. 1992. Mining, Extraction and Refining of Gold. Interdisciplinary Science Reviews. Vol. 17. No. 3. 203212.*Rehren, T. 2003. Crucibles as Reaction Vessels in Ancient Metallurgy. In Craddock, P. T and Lang, J. (eds.) Mining and Metal Production through the Ages.  London: British Museum Press 207-215*Taylor, F. S. 1956. Pre-scientific Industrial Chemistry. In C. Singer, E.J. Holmyard, A.R. Hall and T. I. Williams (eds) A history of technology: Vol.2, The Mediterranean civilizations and the Middle Ages; c700 B.C. to A.D. 1500. Oxford : Clarendon Press 347382*Yannopoulos, J. C. 1991 The Extractive Metallurgy of Gold. New York: Van Nostrand Reinhold
25937590
Lovat_Dickson
Lovat Dickson, born Horatio Henry Lovat Dickson (June 30, 1902 &ndash; January 2, 1987) was a notable publisher and writer, the first Canadian to have a major publishing role in Britain. He is best known today for his biographies of Owl, Hillary, Hall and G. Wells. He also wrote a history of the Ontario Museum.BiographyLovat Dickson was born in Australia to parents of Empire Loyalist descent.(The Canadian Encyclopedia: Lovat Dickson entry) His father was a mining engineer. At the age of seven, he moved with his family to Rhodesia (now Zaire), and at eleven he was sent to school in England. At age fifteen, he moved to Canada where he worked in a mining camp near Alberta. A precocious entrepreneur, he founded and edited the Blue Diamond Mine newsletter while in Jasper.(Lovat Dickson Biography - (190287), Out of the west land, Fortnightly Review, The Review of Reviews) He began studies at the of Alberta (U of A) in 1923, graduating in 1927 with first class honours in English and earning the Lieutenant Governors Gold Medal and a Society of Canada Fellowship in English literature.(Clara Thomas, Canadian Novelists 1920-1945, Longmans, Green and Company, Toronto, 1946 p. 34-35) He earned a Master of Arts degree from the U of A in 1929, but by this time he had already returned to England where he embarked on a successful career as an editor and publisher. He was first assistant editor of the Review, and later the editor of the of Reviews. He started his own publishing company in 1932, called Lovat Dickson Limited, later forming a publishing partnership with Gilchrist Thompson. He also founded the short-lived Lovat Dicksons Magazine (20 issues, November 1933 to June 1935) in which he published short stories by such writers as de la Mare, E. Bates, Nilsson, S. Pritchett, and H. Lawrence.(The FictionMags Index)One of his principal successes as a publisher was Pilgrims of the Wild by Grey Owl, whom Dickson made a celebrity in England by taking him on two highly successful promotional tours in the late 1930s.( Grey Owl and Dickson became friends and Dickson wrote two biographies of the enigmatic Englishman that appeared in 1939 and 1973.In 1938, Dickson sold his catalogue to the publisher Llewelyn Davies and joined the staff of Macmillan & Company in London. In 1940 he became a director( and the following year, 1941, he was appointed the companys general manager, a position he held until his retirement in 1964.(He was married to Marguerite Brodie of Montreal. He died in Toronto at 84.Bibliography* Out of the West Land (1934)* The Green leaf : a tribute to Grey Owl (editor, 1938)* Half Breed (1939), biography of Grey Owl* Out of the West Land (1944)* Richard Hillary (1950)* The Ante-Room (1959)* The House of Words (1963)* H.G. Wells: His Turbulent Life and Times (1969; reprinted in 1971)* Wilderness Man: The Strange Story of Grey Owl (1973)* Radclyffe Hall and the Well of Loneliness: A Sapphic Chronicle (1975)* The Museum Makers: The Story of the Royal Ontario Museum (1986)ReferencesExternal links* Lovat Dickson Fonds, Library and Archives Canada
25953980
Augustin_Gottfried_Ludwig_Lentin
Augustin Gottfried Ludwig Lentin (17641823) was a German chemist. He was a lecturer at the of Gttingen and subsequently inspector of saltworks, and a writer and translator of works on chemistry and metallurgy.Early life and educationLentin was born in Dannenberg, Lower Saxony, Germany on 4 January 1764, the son of Lebrecht Friedrich Benjamin Lentin (17361804), physician and prolific writer on medical topics.He took the degree of Ph.D. at Georg-August-Universitt Gttingen and acted as private lecturer in the same university from 1795 to 1801 where he gave courses on technical chemistry and practical economic chemistry.(Heiner Hegewald, Zur Entwicklung der Technischen Chemie im 19. Jahrhundert unter besonderer Bercksichtigung der Chemikerausbildung an der Technischen Hochschule Dresden und ihren Vorgngereinrichtungen (Dissertation for degree of Dr. Rer. Nat. Martin-Luther-Universitat Halle-Wittenberg, 2005, pp 15-16) During this period he translated from English a number of recent publications on chemistry including works by Fulhame, Kirwan and Keir, and published several books and papers himself on chemical and mining matters. MetallurgyDuring this period he visited Wales where he took a particular interest in the copper industry. He spent some time(Said by one source to have been six years. ) at Mountain on Anglesey, a major source of ore during the second half of the 18th century, and also at the works at Ravenhead and Stanley, both near Helens, Merseyside, where ore from Parys Mountain was smelted. His findings were described in a publication that appeared in 1800 under the title Briefe ber die Insel Anglesea : vorzglich ber das dasige Kupfer-Bergwerk und die dazu gehrigen Schmelzwerke und Fabriken (Leipzig : Crusius, 1800). His style has been described as cumbersome and pedantic(J R Harris, The copper king : a biography of Thomas Williams of Llanidan (Liverpool University Press, 1964), p 170) but his work still represents a useful source for the historians of technology and in particular of the mining and smelting of copper. An English translation appeared in 2007.(Parys Mountain and the Lentin letters; original translation by Nancy Rothwell (Amlwch : Amlwch Industrial Heritage Trust, 2007))The frequent papers and translations of the 1790s ceased after 1801 following Lentins appointment as clerk at a saltworks in Rothenfelde, and subsequently in 1817 as salt inspector at Slbeck and Salzderhelden in the kingdom of Hanover. He also made experiments on the roasting and smelting of ores at Rammelsberg in a large furnace.Death He died at Slbeck, near Eimbeck, on 18 January 1823.(John Ferguson, Bibliotheca chemica : a catalogue of the alchemical, chemical and pharmaceutical books in the collection of the late James Young of Kelly and Durrisi (Glasgow : Maclehose, 1905), v. 2, p 26)Original works* Ueber das Verhalten der Metalle wenn sie in dephlogistisirter Luft der Wirkung des Feuers ausgesezt werden (1795)* Taschenbuch fr Freunde der Gebirgskunde (1798)* Etwas ber den Prozess der Destillation nebst einer Anzeige seiner Vorlesungen (1799)* Contributions to Allgemeines Journal der Chemie, Bd 3 (1799)* Briefe ber die Insel Anglesea : vorzglich ber das dasige Kupfer-Bergwerk und die dazu gehrigen Schmelzwerke und Fabriken (Leipzig : 1800)* Nachricht von dem Kupferbergwerke auf der Insel Anglesea und den damit in Verbindung stehenden Schmelzhtten und Fabriken (in Magazin der Handels- und Gewerbskunde, 1804)Translations* Versuche und Beobachtungen ber die Auflsung der Metalle in Suren und ihre Niederschlagungen  (1791) (Translation of: James Keir, Experiments and observations on the dissolution of metals in acids; and their precipitations (1790)* Versuche ber die Wiederherstellung der Metalle durch Wasserstoffgas, Phosphor, Schwesel, Schweselleber, geschweseltes Wasserstoffgas, gephosphorte Wasserstoffgas, Kohle, Licht und Sauren (1795) (Translation of: Elizabeth Fulhame, An essay on combustion with a view to a new art of dying and painting wherein the phlogistic and antiphlogistic hypotheses are proved erroneous (1794)* Beantwortung der Fragen: Welches sind die palichsten Dngmittel fr die verschiedenen Arten von Boden   (1796) (Translation of : Richard Kirwan, Essay in answer to the following question proposed by the Royal Irish Academy, what are the manures most advantageously applicable to the various sorts of soils and what are the causes of their beneficial effect in each particular instance? (1795)* Geschichte des Feldzuges von 1796 in Deutschland und Italien (1798) (Translation of : The history of the campaign of 1796 in Germany and Italy (1796) (attributed to Thomas Graham)References
25975462
Kris_Tompkins
Kristine McDivitt Tompkins (born in 1950) is an American conservationist and former CEO of Inc..(Kris Tompkins, Former Patagonia CEO: Impact is What Counts  The Wharton Journal) Since 1993, she has worked with her husband, Tompkins, to create large wilderness conservation areas in Chile and Argentina.(Foundation for Deep Ecology,The First Ten Years)Early lifeFor the most part, Tompkins grew up on her family ranch south of Santa Barbara, California, although she spent some early years in Venezuela, where her father worked for an oil company.(Edward Humes, Eco Barons (New York: Harper Collins, 2009))  At age 15, she met and befriended rock climbing legend and equipment manufacturer Chouinard; he gave her a summer job working for Equipment. After finishing college in Idaho, where she ski-raced competitively, she started to work full time for what then became Patagonia, Inc..At PatagoniaBeginning in 1973, Tompkins helped Yvon Chouinard turn his fledging piton business into the renowned anti-corporation Patagonia, Inc..(XX Factor: Visionaries) During her over 20 years at Patagonia, Tompkins pushed the company expand and establish itself as a leader in both the outdoor apparel industry and the environmental movement. Creating a new corporate culture and ethic was central to this effort. In 1980 Patagonia came up with the idea of donating 10 percent of their profits to radical environmental organizations such as Earth First! Recognizing that manufacturing inherently causes some pollution of the earth, they sought to create a model for how companies could mitigate their ecological impacts and put ethics into action. In 1984, the company formed what was called the One Percent for the Planet Club, which donates either 1% of sales or 10% of profitswhichever is greaterto environmental causes.(Conservation WorkSince retiring from Patagonia, Tompkins has, with her husband Doug, protected more land than any other private individualalmost one million hectares (two million acres).(Pleistocene Park emerges from Patagonias rescued grasslands  1996-2010 National Geographic Society) She married Doug in 1993 and moved to south Chile, where she helped create Park, in Lagos Region.. The park, a project of the Land Trust, represents an innovative private initiative to create a public-access nature preserve in the threatened Valdivian temperate rainforest. The Tompkins later launched conservation efforts in the Ibera wetlands of Northeastern Argentina, where they now live part-time. In the biodiversity-rich wetland ecosystem, they have launched innovative projects to reintroduce extirpated species, such as the giant anteater.(The philanthropists paying rent to planet Earth in Argentina  CNN)The Tompkins conservation projects center around the aim of conserving and restoring biodiversity, taking the position that the mass extinction of species represents an ecological crisis as profound as global climate change. Their work encompasses wild lands conservation, ecological restoration, sustainable organic agriculture, and environmental activism.Conservacion PatagonicaIn 2000, Tompkins founded Patagonica (CP), a land trust focused exclusively on conserving land within the Patagonia region  an area depleted by intensive overgrazing, mining, oil drilling and logging. In 2001, CP purchased Estancia Monte Len, one of the oldest sheep ranches in the Argentine Patagonia, located on the southern Atlantic shoreline a few hundred miles north of the Strait of Magellan. Monte Len had long been one of the priorities for Argentine National Parks because of its richness and diversity of species, including penguins, sea lions, elephant seals, leopard seals and several migratory seabirds.(Patagonia Land Trust Current Projects) CP purchased this  estancia, crafted a master plan for its transition to a national park and, in 2002, donated the property to the Argentine National Parks Administration, creating the first coastal national park in Argentina.(nationalparksummit.org)In 2003, CP had the opportunity to purchase Estancia Valle Chacabuco, a historic sheep ranch in Chiles Region. The Chilean National Parks had made this ranch their number-one conservation priority for over 35 years because it sits between two existing National Reserves, together . This area is prime habitat for the endangered deer, one of Chiles national animals. After developing a public-access infrastructure system, including a trail system, visitor center, campgrounds, lodging, and a restaurant, CP will donate this property to the Chilean park service. Along with the two adjoining National Reserves, this will become the Patagonia National Park, a flagship park for Latin America. Stretching between two of the countrys largest lakes, Lago General Carrera and Lago Cochrane, the future park contains an impressive diversity of landscapes: arid Patagonian steppe, Southern Beech forests, wetlands, high peaks, alpine lakes, and streams. As the president of CP, Tompkins has been heavily involved in every aspect of this project, from landscape restoration to infrastructure construction.(Patagonia Environmentalism: Essay)See alsoTompkinsReferences
25994100
Tegucigalpa
footnotes              Tegucigalpa (, formally Tegucigalpa, Municipality of the Central District  Spanish:  Tegucigalpa, Municipio del Distrito Central  or  Tegucigalpa, M.D.C. ()), and commonly referred as  Tegus  ()(), is the capital of Honduras and seat of government of the Republic, along with its twin sister Comayagela.()  Founded on September 29, 1578 by the Spanish,() it became the countrys capital on October 30, 1880 under President Aurelio Soto.()  The current of Honduras, enacted in 1982, names the sister cities of Tegucigalpa and Comayagela as a Central District to serve as the permanent capital, under articles 8 and 295.()()During the short-lived Constitution of the of Central America of 1921, Tegucigalpa served as a Federal District and capital of then-newly formed as one nation: the states of Salvador, Guatemala and Honduras.()  After this failed attempt to maintain a Central American republic, Honduras returned to become an individual nation and on January 30, 1937, Article 179 of the 1936 Honduran Constitution was reformed under Decree 53 to established Tegucigalpa and Comayagela as a Central District.()Tegucigalpa is located in the southern-central highland region of Honduras()  in the department of Francisco Morazn of which it is also the departmental capital.()  It is situated in a valley, surrounded by mountains and both Tegucigalpa and Comayagela, being sister cities, are physically separated by the River.()  The Central District is the largest of the 28 municipalities in the Francisco Morazn department.()Tegucigalpa is Honduras largest and most populous city as well as the nations political and administrative center.  Tegucigalpa is host to 25 foreign embassies and 16 consulates()() in addition to being the home base of several state-owned entities such as ENEE and Hondutel, the national energy and telecommunications companies, respectively.()  The city is also home to the countrys most important university, the Autonomous University of Honduras,() as well as the national soccer team.()  The capitals international airport, Toncontn, is notorious around the world for its extremely short runway for an international airport and the unusual maneuvers pilots must undertake upon landing or taking off to avoid the nearby mountains.()()()The Central District Mayors Office (Alcaldia Municipal del Distrito Central) is the citys governing body,()  headed by a mayor() and 10 aldermen forming the Municipal Corporation (Corporacin Municipal).()  Being the departments seat as well, the governors office of Francisco Morazn is also located in the capital.  In 2008, the city operated on an approved budget of 1.555 billion lempiras (US$82,189,029).()  In 2009, the city government reported a revenue of 1.955 billion lempiras (US$103,512,220). (More than any other capital city in Central America, except Panama City)Tegucigalpas infrastructure has not kept with the population growth.()  Deficient urban planning,() densely condensed urbanization, and poverty() are ongoing problems.()  Heavily congested roadways where current road infrastructure is unable to efficiently handle the over 400 thousand vehicles create havoc on a daily basis.()  Both current national and local governments have taken approaches at improving or increasing infrastructure as well as to reducing poverty in the city.()() Etymology Most sources indicate that the origin and meaning of the word Tegucigalpa is derived from the language.()  The most widely accepted version suggests that it comes from the Nahuatl word Taguz-galpa, which translates to cerros de plata in Spanish (hills of silver in English), but this interpretation is uncertain since the natives who occupied the region at time were unaware of the existence of mineral deposits in the area.Another source suggests that Tegucigalpa derives from another language in which it means painted rocks, as explained by Leticia Oyuela in her book Minimum History of Tegucigalpa.()  Other theories indicate it may derive from the term Togogalpa which refers to tototi (small green parrot, in Nahuatl) and Toncontn, a small town near Tegucigalpa (toncotn was a Mexican dance of Nahuatl origin).()()In Mexico, it is believed the word Tegucigalpa is from the Nahuatl word Tecuztlicallipan, meaning place of residence of the noble or Tecuhtzincalpan, meaning place on the home of the beloved master.()Honduran philologist Alberto de Jess Membreo, in his book Indigenous Toponymies of Central America, states that Tegucigalpa is a Nahuatl word meaning in the homes of the sharp stones and rules out the traditional meaning hills of silver arguing that Taguzgalpa was the name of the ancient eastern zone of Honduras.() History Tegucigalpa was founded by Spanish settlers as Real de Minas de San Miguel de Tegucigalpa on September 29, 1578 on the site of an existing native settlement of the Pech, Tolupans and the Twahkas.()  The first mayor of Tegucigalpa was Juan de la Cueva, who took office in 1579.()  The Dolores Church (1735), the San Miguel Cathedral (1765), the Casa de la Moneda (1780), and the Immaculate Conception Church (1788) were some of the first important buildings constructed.()Almost 200 years later, on June 10, 1762, this mining town became Real Villa de San Miguel de Tegucigalpa y Heredia under the rule of Fernndez de Heredia, then-acting governor of Honduras.  The late 1700s and early 1800s saw disruption in Tegucigalpas local government, from being extinguished in 1788 to becoming part of Comayagua in 1791 to returning to self-city governance in 1817.()In 1817, then-mayor Narciso Mallol started the construction of the first bridge, a ten-arch masonry, connecting both sides of the Choluteca River.  Upon completion four years later, it linked Tegucigalpa with her neighbor city of Comayagela.()  In 1821, Tegucigalpa legally became a city.()  In 1824, the first Congress of the Republic of Honduras, declared Tegucigalpa and Comayagua, then the two most important cities in the country, to alternate as capital of the country.()After October 1838, following Honduras independence as a single Republic, the capital continued to switch back and forth between Tegucigalpa and Comayagua until October 30, 1880, when Tegucigalpa was declared the permanent capital of Honduras by then-president Aurelio Soto.(  A popular myth claims that the society of Comayagua, the long-time colonial capital of Honduras, publicly disliked the wife of President Soto, who took revenge by moving the capital to Tegucigalpa.() A more likely theory is that the change took place because President Soto was an important partner of the Mining Company, an American silver mining company, whose operations were based in San Juancito, close to Tegucigalpa, and he needed to be close to his personal interests.()By 1898, it was decided that both Tegucigalpa and Comayagela, being neighbor cities on the banks of the Choluteca River, would form the capital, but with separate names and separate local governments.()  During this period, both cities had a population of about 40,000 people.Between the 1930s and 1960s, Tegucigalpa continued to grow reaching a population of over 250,000 people, giving way to what would become one of the biggest neighborhoods in the city, the Colonia Kennedy; the nations autonomous university, the UNAH; and the construction of the Honduras Maya Hotel.()  It still remained relatively small and provincial until the 1970s, when migration from the rural areas began in earnest. During the 1980s, several avenues, traffic overpasses, and large buildings were erected, a relative novelty to a city characterized until then by two-story buildings.()  However, lacking the enforcement of city planning and zoning laws, it led to highly disorganized urbanization.  This lack of proper urbanization as the population has grown is evident on the surrounding slopes of the several hills in the city where some of the citys most impoverished neighborhoods have prevailed.()On October 30, 1998, Mitch devastated the capital, along with the rest of Honduras.()  For five days, Mitch pounded the country creating devastating landslides and floods, causing the death of thousands as well as heavy deforestation and the destruction of thousands of homes.()  A portion of Comayagela was destroyed along with several neighborhoods on both sides of the Honduran capital. After the hurricane, infrastructure in Tegucigalpa was severely severed.  Even 12 years later, remnants of Hurricane Mitch are still visible specially along the banks of the Choluteca River.()()Today, Tegucigalpa continues to sprawl far beyond its former colonial core: towards the east, south and west, creating a large but disorganized metropolis.  In an effort to modernize the capital, increase its infrastructure and improve the quality of life of its inhabittants, the current administration has passed several ordinances and projects to turn the city around within the upcoming years.() Geography Tegucigalpa is located on a chain of mountains at elevations of  on its lowest points and  on its highest suburban areas.  Like most of the interior highlands of Honduras, the majority of Tegucigalpas current area was occupied by open woodland.  The area surrounding the city continues to be open woodland supporting forest interspersed with some oak, scrub, and grassy clearings as well as needle leaf evergreen and broadleaf forest.The metropolitan area of both Tegucigalpa and Comayagela cover a total area of  while the entire Municipality of the Central District covers a total area of .()  Geological faults have been identified in the Distrits high regions surrounding the capital which are a threat to the neighborhoods on and below the hills.()The Choluteca River, which crosses the city from north to south, physically separates Tegucigalpa and Comayagela.()  El Picacho hill, a rugged mountain of moderate height convert rises above the downtown area; several neighborhoods, both upscale residential and lower income, are located on its slopes. The city consists of gentle hills, and the ring of mountains surrounding the city tends to trap pollution.() During the dry season, a dense cloud of smog lingers in the basin until the first rains fall.There is a reservoir, known as Embalse Los Laureles, west of the city providing 30 percent of the citys water supply as well as a water treatment plant south of the city about  from the airport; part of the Concepcin Reservoir just  southwest of the water plant.()The Central District shares borders with 13 other municipalities of Francisco Morazn:( (to the north) Cedros and Talanga; (south) Ojojona, Santa Ana, San Buenaventura and Maraita; (east) Juan de Flores, de San Francisco, Santa Luca, de ngeles, Antonio de Oriente, and Tatumbla; (and to the west) Lepaterique.  It is also bordered on the west by two municipalities of the Department, de San Antonio() and Laman, with the latter exactly at the quadripoint where the Central District, Lepaterique, Villa de San Antonio and Laman all meet. Climate Teguicigalpa features a more moderate form of a wet and dry climate. Of the major Central American cities, Tegucigalpas climate is among the most pleasant due to its high altitude.()  Like much of central Honduras, the city has a climate, though tempered by the altitudemeaning less humid than the lower valleys and the coastal regionswith even temperatures averaging between  and  degrees.()The months of December and January are coolest, with an average min/ low temperature of 14 C (57 F); whereas March and Aprilpopularly associated with Weeks holidaysare hottest and temperatures can reach up to  degrees on the hottest day.()  The dry season lasts from November through April and the rainy season from May through October.()  There is an average of 107 rainy days in the year, June and September usually the wettest months.The average sunshine hours per month during the year is 211.2 and the average rainy days per month is 8.9.  The average sunshine hours during the dry season is 228 per month while  is the average monthly precipitation during the wet season.  The wettest months of the rainy season are MayJune and SeptemberOctober, averaging 16.2 rainy days during each of those periods.source 2 weather-and-climate.com (Sunshine hours)() climatetemp.info (Avg. rainy days)() Hurricane Mitch Tegucigalpa, as with the rest of Honduras, experienced significant damaged by Hurricane Mitch, something of a magnitude Hondurans had not witnessed since Fifi. Mitch destroyed part of the Comayagela section of the city, as well as other places along the banks of the Choluteca River. The storm remained over Honduran territory for five days, dumping heavy rainfall late in the rainy season. The ground was already saturated and could not absorb the heavy precipitation, while deforestation and debris left by the hurricane led to catastrophic flooding throughout widespread regions of the country, especially in Tegucigalpa.()The heavy rain caused flash floods of Cholutecas tributaries, and the swollen river overflowed its banks, tearing down entire neighborhoods and bridges across the ravaged city. The rainfall also triggered massive landslides around El Berrinche hill, close to the downtown area. These landslides destroyed most of the Soto neighborhood, and debris flowed into the river, forming a dam. The dam clogged the waters of the river and many of the low-lying areas of Comayagela were submerged; historic buildings located along Calle Real were either completely destroyed or so badly damaged that repair was futile.() Cityscape Situated in a valley and surrounded by mountain ranges, Tegucigalpa is hilly with several elevations and few flat areas.  The city is also highly disorganized, particularly around its oldest districts.()()() It has seen a rapid growth in the last 30 years() and only until recently has the government passed certain laws to establish city planning and zoning rules.()  Surface roads can be narrow with the most important avenues carrying no more than two or three lanes running in each direction, adding to the problem of heavy traffic congestion.  Several of the main boulevards have been equipped with interchanges, overpasses and underpasses, allowing for sections of controlled-access highways but considering that even the citys beltway does not entirely circle the city, the roads are generally limited-access.  Intense webs of electrical and telephone lines above the streets are a common site in the capital, and virtually in all Honduran cities, since implementation of underground utility lines has only been adopted in the recent years.Tucked in a valley and bisected by a river makes Tegucigalpa prone to flooding during the rainy season, as experienced to the fullest during Hurricane Mitch and to a lesser degree every year during the rainy season.  Despite being several thousand feet above sea level, the city currently lacks an efficient flood control system, including canals and sewerage powerful enough to channel rain water back into the river to flow down to the ocean.  The river itself is a threat since it isnt deep enough below the streets nor there are levies high enough to prevent it from breaking out.()  There are currently more than 100 neighborhoods deemed zones of high risk, several of them ruled out as uninhabitable in their entirety.( Around the city Tegucigalpa is presently divided into barrios and colonias and there are currently 892 of them. Colonias represent relatively recent 20th-century middle class residential suburbs that are continuously spreading while the barrios are old inner-city neighborhoods. Most of the citys outskirts give way to the most impoverished neighborhoods, housing the poorest elements of Honduran society. The marked difference between social classes in Honduras is evident in Tegucigalpa with its largely improvised growth.  The northern-east region of the city concentrates most of the citys upper income neighborhoods.Tegucigalpa, as a colonial city, has several barrios in the oldest districts of the city, generally around the historic centers of both sides of the city.  The rest of Tegucigalpa gives way to colonias, such as the neighborhoods encompassed east of the Choluteca River, south of the northern tributary, Rio Chiquito (which confluences with the Choluteca below the Mallol Bridge), and west of the beltway (Anillo Perifrico).  However, most neighborhoods dont have well-defined limits or even town-centers.Colonia Palmira, a wealthy neighborhood to the east of the city center on Boulevard Morazn, hosts many of the foreign embassies as well as upscale restaurants. Lomas del Guijarro, Loma Linda and El Hatillo are upscale neighborhoods that house most of the apartment complexes in the city. The leading hotels of the city are found around these districts, including within the Plaza San Martn hotel district. These include: Marriott Hotel, Clarion Hotel, Hotel El Centenario, Intercontinental, Honduras Maya, Plaza Del Libertador, Plaza San Martn, Hotel Alameda, Excelsior Hotel and Casino.()()ComayagelaMost of Comayagela is made up of lower income neighborhoods and these concentrate in the area encompassed north of Carretera de Lepaterique (Lepaterique Road) and westward of Boulevard de la Comunidad Europea (European Community Blvd).  The area south and southwest of the airport, around Los Laureles Reservoir and south of Lepaterique Road, has grown in the last decade and includes some of Comayagelas upper income communities.  Colonia Cerro Grande is a growing middle class neighborhood at the northern outskirts of Comayagela while Residencial la Arboleda and Residencial los Hidalgos are some of the growing upper income developments in the southern outskirts of Comayagela.Arterial roadsThe Anillo Perifrico (beltway) and Boulevard de las Fuerzas Armadas (Armed Forces Blvd) are the citys two expressways, equipped with center dividers, interchanges, overpasses and underpassesallowing for controlled-access traffic.  These connect with the citys other major boulevards (Miraflores Blvd, Suyapa Blvd, European Community Blvd, Kuwait Blvd) which are essentially limited-access roadways as they have been equipped with interchanges but lack underpasses and overpasses to bypass crossing surface road traffic.  Despite a network of major highways, none reach directly into downtown and while having been improved with separations, drivers rely heavily on surface streets to move about the city, including reaching the downtown area.  Like in most Central American cities, there doesnt seem to be much rhyme or reason as to how streets are named, making orientation and driving rather difficult to first-time visitors to the city.()  The current city administration has green lit several road infrastructure projects to help reduce traffic congestion and improve the overall aspect of the city.() Demographics As of 2011, following the trend of population growth between 1988 and 2001 of 2.79 percent, the population of Tegucigalpa is estimated anywhere between 1.2 and 1.3 million people.()  Tegucigalpas population and metro area is expected to double by 2029.()The 2010 Population Projections estimated that the Central District had a population of 1,126,534 residents,() continuing a trend of population growth in the city since the 2001 Census, which recorded 850,445 residents.()  In 2010, the average monthly income was L.8,321 (US$440.49), compared to the total national average of L.4,767 (US$252.35) and the national urban zone average of L.7,101 (US$375.91).()(Gerencia de Estadisticas Sociales y Demografia.  Ingreso Promedios por Trabajo aos 2008-2010. Instituto Nacional de Estadistica (INE): Encuesta Permanente de Hogares de Propsitos Multiples, Mayo 2010, pg 1.)  4.9 percent of the population is illiterate, compared to the national rate of 15.2 percent.()The Development Index (HDI) is the highest in the country at 0.759 in 2006.  In 2006, 47.6 percent of the Central Districts population lived in poverty29.7 lived in moderate poverty and 17.9 in poverty.  expectancy in the District as of 2004 is 72.1 years.  In 2004, there were 185,577 households with an average of 4.9 members per household.()The ethnic and racial makeup of Tegucigalpa is strongly tied to the rest of Honduras.()  90 percent of the city-dwellers are predominantly mestizos with a small White-Hispanic minority. They are joined by Chinese() and Arab immigrants,()  the latter mostly from Palestine.(Amaya, Jos Alberto.  Los rabes y Palestinos en Honduras (1900-1950). Tegucigalpa: Guaymuras, February 1997, 157pp.) There are indigenous Amerindians and Afro-Honduran people as well.Tegucigalpa by numbers:()4 theaters, 12 marketplaces, 12 pedestrian bridges, 12 universities, 14 hospitals, 14 museums, 28 supermarkets, 40 movie screens, 64 health centers, 64 signal light-controlled intersections, 87 middle school and high schools, 100 farmacies, 123 local emergency committees, 170 restaurants, 200 parks and plazas, 200 sports facilities, 400 firemen, 600 volunteer workers, 892 neighborhoods classified as barrios and colonias, 1,200 physicians, two thousand public transportation vehicles, 12 thousands taxis, 60 thousand illiterates, and 140 thousand with direct access to potable water only.EconomyFile:Alfonso 13 Highrise Tegucigalpa.jpg|thumb|left|XIII, a condo high-rise in one the citys upper income communities, Lomas del Guijarro.The Central District has an economy equal to 19.3 percent of countrys GDP.  The Districts active work force is of 367,844 people of which 56,035 are employed in the public sector.  There are 32,665 business establishments throughout the capital, the most of any city in the country.  The citys major economic sources are commerce, construction, services, textiles, sugar, and tobacco.()  In 2009, the citys revenue and expenditures budget was of L.2,856,439,263 (US$151,214,182)()  while in 2010 it was of L.2,366,993,208 (US$125.204.606)()() In 2009, the unemployment rate in Tegucigalpa was 8.1 percent.() and an unemployed person may spend up to four months seeking employment.()File:HSBC Bank Tegucigalpa.jpg|thumb|right|HSBC main offices on Suyapa Blvd (former BGA bank building).Economic activity in the capital is broken down as follow: commerceincluding wholesale, retail, auto repair, hardware (42.86%); manufacturing industry (16.13%), hospitalityhotels and restaurants (14.43%), banking and real state (10.12%), social and personal services (8.94%), health-related services (3.90%), and others (3.60%).()Manufacturing assembly plants (maquiladoras) were introduced in Honduras in 1976.()  While their contribution to the economy remained small, they boomed at the beginning of the 1990s, mostly concentrating in northern Honduras but after the mid 1990s they were expanded to the central region, including Tegucigalpa.  By 2005, at least 6 maquiladoras operated in the Central District.()By the end of the 1990s and early 2000s, Tegucigalpa continued to be a focus city for the development of industrial parks.  The main obstacle to establish factories in Tegucigalpa has been facilitating infrastructure to provide efficient access between the capital and countrys economic hubs: Pedro Sula and Cortez.()The industrial production taking place in the region include textiles, clothing, sugar, cigarettes, lumber, plywood, paper, ceramics, cement, glass, metalwork, plastics, chemicals, tires, electrical appliances, and farm machinery.  Maquiladora duty-free assembly plants have been established in an industrial park in the Amarateca valley, on the northern highway.()  Silver, lead and zinc are still mined in the outskirts of the city.() Government As capital of Honduras, as department head and as a municipality, the Central District seats three separate governments: national, departmental and municipal.()  Prior to 1991, the government held great jurisdiction over the execution of city management across the country, leading to uneven representation and improper distribution of resources and governance.()  As a result, in late 1990, under Decree 134-90, the National Congress of Honduras enacted the Law of Municipalities (Ley de Municipalidades), defining the countrys department and municipal institutions, representatives and their functions to give city government autonomy and decentralize it from the national government.()While autonomous, the Central District is still influenced by the national government given the territory remains seat of government of the republic.  Major changes in public policy and funding of major city projects usually reach the Office of the President prior to approval by the Districts local government.()National and departmental governmentsTegucigalpa is the political and administrative center of Honduras.()  It is also the seat of government of the Francisco Morazn department.()  All three branches of the national government as well as their immediate divisionsincluding the 16 departments of the Executive Branch,() the National Congress,() the Supreme Court of Justice,() the Armed Forces and National Police headquartersare located in the city.  Most public agencies and state-owned companies are headquartered in the capital as well.(Local governmentCity government takes form in a mayor-council system and is regulated under the Law of Municipalities which came into effect on January 1st, 1991.  The Central District Municipal Government (Alcalda Municipal del Distrito Central or AMDC) is the citys governing authority.  As established by current city governing law, AMCD is structured as a corporation, which is the deliberative-legislative body, voter-elected, and highest authority within the municipality.()The Municipal Corporation is formed by a mayor serving as chief executive and general administrator and legal representative of the municipality() and a vice mayor to serve as acting mayor when required and to oversee functions within AMDC as instructed by the mayor.()  The current mayor of the Central District is Ricardo lvarez (PNH)() who is serving his second term (2006-2010, 2010-2014) after winning reelection in 2009.()  Alvarez is the first candidate to win a consecutive reelection, he is the seventh person to serve as mayor of the Central District since local elections were restored in 1986, (prior to 1986, the Central District local government, known as Consejo Metropolitano (Metropolitan Council), was appointed by the President); and this is the eight elected mayoral term since then.Ten aldermen (regidores) are also members of the Municipal Corporation who along with the mayor execute the duties as described in the Law of Municipalities, including management, budgeting, and local law and ordinance legislation.()  Six of the current aldermen belong to the National Party while another two belong to the Liberal Party; one alderman belongs to the Unification Party and the other is Independent.()Both the city mayor and aldermen are elected to 4-year terms by voters of the Central District.  Removal of the mayor or any aldermen for any cause is reserved to the Secretary of State in the Ministry of Interior and Justice (Secretara de Gobernacin y Justicia).()  The Municipal Corporation also counts with a Municipal Development Council (Consejo de Desarrollo Municipal) which serves as an advising cabinet on all the areas of issues of the city such as development, safety, utilities, etc.()Law enforcement in the city falls under the National Preventive Police (Polica Nacional Preventiva) and its sub-division, the Municipal Police (Polica Municipal), one with nationwide jurisdiction while the other serves as local police.()()  The State Attorney (Procuraduria Estatal) and the Attorney General (Ministerio Pblico) are in charge of crime prosecution at the national and departmental level.() The Municipal Court (Juzgado de Justicia Municipal) handles cases at the local level. Central District For all practical purposes the capital of Honduras is Tegucigalpa.  However, politically and officially speaking, the Municipality of the Central District (DC for short) is the capital of Honduras and Tegucigalpa and Comayagela are two entities within the district.(  Traditionally, they are regarded as twin or sister cities in part because they were originally founded as two distinct cities.()  When the Central District was formed on January 30, 1937 under Decree 53 of reformed Article 179 of the 1936 Honduran Constitution, both cities became one political entity sharing the title of Capital of Honduras.(The current Constitution of Honduras, under Chapter 1, Article 8, states (translated), The cities of Tegucigalpa and Comayagela, jointly, constitute the Capital of the Republic.( Furthermore... Chapter 11, Article 295, states (translated)  The Central District consists of a single municipality made up of the former municipalities of Tegucigalpa and Comayagela;( however, municipalities in Honduras are defined as political entities similar to counties, and they may contain one or more cities.  For example, in the Department of Atlntida, Ceiba is the largest citybeing also the third largest in Hondurasboth in terms of population and metropolitan area;() however, Tela, one of the eight municipalities of Atlntida, is the biggest municipality in terms of physical administrative area in that department.()  Since the Municipality of Tela is not considered the entire city of Tela, it is not bigger than La Ceiba.  There are an additional of 41 villages and 293 hamlets through the Central District Municipality.(  These may be assigned deputy mayors (alcalde auxiliar) to serve as local representatives. Culture File:Estatua de Francisco Morazan.JPG|thumb|200px|left|Statue of Morazn in Central Park.Tegucigalpa is a colonial city with a history spanning for more than 400 years.  According to the National Chamber of Tourism (Canatur), the city is visited by 250,000 tourists during the summer.()  For 2011, at least 300,000 visitors came to the city.()  There are several conventional tourist attractions in Tegucigalpa, including parks, museums, and landmarks.Some of the parks in the city include Parque La Leona, Parque Herrera, Parque Del Soldado, Parque Juan A. Lainez, Plaza Espaa, Plaza del Libertador, and Central Park, the latter located in the heart of the historic center which leads to Paseo Liquidambar, a zone street.()  Tigra National Park lies several kilometers north of the city and covers an area of .  The United Nations National Park on El Picacho Hill just north above the city offers a great view of the city and hosts the Picacho Metropolitan Zoo.Some of the popular landmarks include the Metropolitan Cathedral, the former Presidential Palace (now a museum), the National University, the Basilica of the Virgin of Suyapa, La Merced Church, and the Manuel Bonilla Theater.()There are several charming colonial villages within easy driving distance from Tegucigalpa: Lucia ( away), de Angeles ( away), Ojojona, Yuscarn and San Juancito. Each has its own distinct character and sense of history and all of them make easy day-trips out of the city. Media Tegucigalpa is home to two of the nations four most important newspapers:()() Tribuna, the liberal and leading newspaper in the city() and Heraldo, the more conservative.()  There are three other daily papers printed in the city: El Libertador, El Patriota, and Tiempos del Mundo.  Hondudiario, Proceso Digital, and Honduras Weekly are online-only newspapers based in the capital, the latter offered in English.  Gaceta is the Honduran governments official newspaper, printed and published in the capital.()Tegucigalpa is also served by the rest of countrys newspapers, including La Prensa and El Tiempo from San Pedro Sula() and the sports newspaper and fashion magazine, Diez() and Estilo, respectively; divisions of La Prensa.  Voz el Soberano and Revistazo are political watchdog online publishers.()There are currently eight channels broadcasting on VHF (3, 5, 6, 7, 8, 9, 11, 13) and 12 channels on UHF (21, 30, 33, 36, 39, 45, 48, 51, 54, 57,  66, 69) in the Central District region from TV networks of the major cities in the country.  There are five television networks based in Tegucigalpa: Televicentro Corporation, the largest television media conglomerate in the country which operates three television networks: Compaia Televisora Hondurea (Channel 5), Telesistema Hondureo (channels 3 & 7) and Telecadena 7 & 4 (Channel 7);() Channel 11() owned by Grupo Continental & R. Media;() Televisin Educativa National-TEN (Channel 10), a public broadcasting network() featuring the Telenoticiero Abriendo Brecha()  newscast, Maya TV (Channel 66),()  and Telered 21 which has its principal offices in San Pedro Sula.  Cable Color, based in Tegucigalpa, is one of the major cable TV providers in the country.()There are 24 FM radio stations and 28 AM stations transmitting into or from Tegucigalpa.()()  Emisoras Unidas,() the largest radio conglomerate in the country, is headquartered in Tegucigalpa and operates 94-SU 94.1 FM, Rock N Pop 92.3 FM, Vox 101.9 FM, Suave 102.5 FM, Sterio xitos 88.1 FM, Radio Satlite 790 AM, XY Honduras 90.5 FM, Radio HRN 92.9 FM.()The following radio stations are based in Tegucigalpa: 88.7 Radio Globo Honduras,() 91.1 Radio Kairos, 91.7 Estereo La Buenisima, 93.5 Radio Cadena Voces,() 94.7 Radio America,() 95.9 Radio Panamericana, 97.1 La 97 FM Radio, 97.7 Stereo Azul, 100.1 Super 100 Estereo, 101.3 Radio Nacional de Honduras, 103.1 Tu Alternativa, 103.7 Stereo Luz,() 104.3 Momentos FM Estereo, 104.9 Estereo Amor,()() 106.7 Radio CHN-Cadena Hondurea de Noticias, and 107.3 W-107 Radio del Flow. Museums There are 14 museums in Tegucigalpa.  Most of the popular museums are located around historic center of the city.  These include the National Identity Museum (Museo para la Identidad Nacional), founded in 2006; the National Anthropology and History Museum or Villa Roy National Museum (Museo Nacional de Antropologa e Historia-Museo Nacional Villa Roy), founded in 1976 on the former residence of President Lozano Daz (1954-1956) and reopened after a complete restoration in 1997;() the National Art Gallery (Galera de Arte Nacional), founded in 1996;() the Republic History Museum (Museo Histrico de la Repblica), founded in 1993;() the Museum of Man (Museo del Hombre), founded in 1989,( the Telecommuncations Museum (Museo de las Comunicaciones), founded in 1985; the Military History Museum (Museo Histrico Militar), founded in 1983;( and the Archaeological Museum (Museo Arqueolgico).The Natural History Museum (Museo de la Historia Natural) is located within the National Autonomous University of Honduras.()  The Numismatic Museum (Museo Nimismtico Rigoberto Rojas) was founded in 1993 and is located in Comayagela next to the Central Bank of Honduras Annex.()  There is a childrens museum, (Centro Interactivo de Enseanza CHIMINIKE), founded in 2003, located on Blvd. Fuerzas Armadas within the Government Civic Center complex, which also houses the Foreign Affairs Ministry, the Supreme Court of Justice and the Magistrates Courts.Other places of cultural interest are the Colonial Museum (Museo Colonial) located in Casa Cural, the Cultural Center of Spain in Tegucigalpa - CCET, founded in 2007; and Sala Bancatlan, located in Plaza Bancatlan of Banco Atlantida.(  The  Honduran Institute of Anthropology and History, founded in 1952, promotes cultural heritage and manages several museums throughout Honduras.()  There is an art and history museum, Santa Mara de los ngeles, in de ngeles,  northwest of Tegucigalpa.() Cuisine There is a variety of restaurants of different cuisine styles and origin in Tegucigalpa.  Locals and visitors alike can enjoy of several restaurants serving traditional Honduran dishes as well, either from a typical streetside vendor or family restaurant to upscale food establishments.() Shopping centers The centre of shopping in Tegucigalpa is Multiplaza, a multi-level indoor shopping mall that includes design name stores, a major grocery store, a movie theater complex, restaurants, and banking.Shopping malls of considerable size in Tegucigalpa include:* City Mall (Opening 2012)* Multiplaza* Mall El Dorado* Mall Las Cascadas* Mall Premier (Opening 2012)* Metromall* Paseo Los Castaos* Paseo Los Proceres* Plaza America* Plaza Millenium* Plaza Miraflores* Plaza NovaTegucigalpa will be home of the largest shopping mall in Central America after the opening of City Mall in early 2012.()()() Sports Tegucigalpa is home to Deportivo Olimpia and Deportivo Motagua, members of the Honduran National Soccer League. Between the two teams, they have won more than 30 championships.  The Tiburcio Carias Andino National Stadium is the multi-purpose venue hosting the national and international soccer games taking place in the capital.  Inter-city school sports championships take place in Tegucigalpa as well.()The National College of Engineers Coliseum, west of the city near UNAH, is a basketball arena occasionally fitted as a music concert venue as well.()  There is a sports facility known as Olympic Village Sports Complex (Complejo Deportivo Villa Olmpica) hosting several Olympic sports such as boxing, archery, tennis and tae-kwon-do; it is located north of the National University-UNAH.() Education Tegucigalpa serves as the national education center, hosting most of the universities and higher education institutions in the country.  The public and private education system in Tegucigalpa is divided into 16 school districts (distritales).()  All districts are part of the Department of Francisco Morazn Education Managament (Direccin Departamental de Educacin), which in turn is a part of the countrys Secretary of Education.()There are 1,235 public schools in the Central District broken down as 488 preschools, 563 elementary schools, and 184 middle and high schools.  In 2003, there were a total of 287,517 students enrolled throughout the municipality28,915 in preschool, 159,679 in elementary school, and 98,923 in middle or high school.(  There are about 147 bilingual schools in Tegucigalpa.(Jerez, Blanca.  Lista de Escuelas Bilinge en el Distrital # 16. Tegucigalpa: Sistema de Estadstica Educativa, 2010, Distrital # 16.)There are two modalities in regards to the school calendar: American Period (August to July), mostly used by private and bilingual schools; and Latin Period (February to November), used by public schools.() Universities There are 12 universities in Tegucigalpa, including three state-funded higher education institutions.()  The National Autonomous University of Honduras (UNAH), founded in 1847, is the countrys most important university which also operates regional campuses in several other cities in the country, including San Pedro Sula and La Ceiba.()  The other two publicly-funded institutions are Francisco Morazn National Pedagogic University (UPNFM), founded in 1989, focusing on preparing future educators in several disciplines. () and the National Institute of Professional Formation (INFOP), founded in 1972, focusing on economic and social development disciplines.There are 10 private universities in Tegucigalpa.  These include the Pan-American Agricultural School (Zamorano), located in Zamorano valley,  east of the city, founded in 1941;()  Jos Cecilio del Valle University (UJCV), founded in 1979;() Technological University of Honduras (UTH), founded in 1986;() Central American Technological University (UNITEC), founded in 1987 in Jacaleapa,() member of International Universities;() Catholic University of Honduras (UNICAH), founded by the Church in 1992;() Center of Design, Architecture, and Construction (CEDAC), founded in 1996; Metropolitan University of Honduras (UMH), founded in 2001; New Millenium Christian-Evangelic University (UCENM-Tegucigalpa Campus), founded in 2001; Polytechnic University of Honduras (UPH), founded in 2006; and the Polytechnic University of Engineering (UPI), founded in 2007. There is also two higher education centers: the Technological University Center (CEUTEC), part of UNITEC; and Guaymura University Center (CUG), founded in 1982. Transportation All barrios and colonias in Tegucigalpa can be accessed by automobile, although some neighborhoods in the city suffer from unpaved, narrow, and hilly streets making them difficult to maneuver.()  A grid of surface streets and a network of major avenues and boulevards cross through the major areas of the capital.  However, the most transited roads suffer from heavy traffic congestion due to the regions geography and the disorganized urbanization that has led to poorly-thought roadways of one or two lanes.  An estimate of 400,000 vehicles take on the city streets and roads everyday.  The oldest districts were not built with the advent of the automobile in mind and therefore lack efficient road structure to accommodate the overwhelming amount of vehicles.  Newer developments, such as the malls, have been built with the car in mind allowing for large parking lots to accommodate their  visitors.  In the last decades, several of the boulevards and avenues have bee retrofitted with interchanges, overpasses and underpasses to ease up the flow of traffic.Public transportationThe public transportation system in Tegucigalpa is highly disorganized.()  Being a for-profit business, it encourages competition between the fleet owners where revenue is the priority while heavily ignoring the quality and efficiency of the service.  Public transportation regulation is heavily flawed.  Bus drivers must compete for the passengers in order to bring the highest earnings possible while becoming a hazard for other drivers and pedestrians and contributing to traffic jams.()  There is currently an overflow of public transportation vehicles on the roads.()  The government has declared its public transportation system as oversupplied and inefficient.()Public transportation covers 71 percent of the capitals road migration.  Bus routes are named based on the neighborhood they cover.  For example, routes that travel from the downtown area to the UNAH are labeled Centro-UNAH.  Taxis are quickest way to move around the city after personal auto transportation.  Taxis are popular for short-distance trips or trips that required a sense of urgency.  Taxis are relatively cheap for the international tourist.  They are not the cheapest form of public transportation for the locals, however.  There are over 12,000 taxis in the Central District.National and intl ground transportationTegucigalpa is connected with the rest of the country through its city to city bus services.  There are several bus lines connecting the capital with the rest of Honduras.()  Tegucigalpa is connected with the rest of Central America and Mexico through its international bus lines.  Buses leave for Guatemala, El Salvador,()  Nicaragua, Rica, Panama and Mexico everyday.()() Air transportation File:757landing-toncontin.jpg|right|thumb|right|An Airlines flight landing at Toncontn International Airport.Toncontn International Airport (IATA: TGU, ICAO: MHTG), serves as the main airport in and out of Tegucigalpa.  It is currently served by three domestic airlines and six international airlines connecting the capital to three cities in the United States and four cities in Central America as well as four cities within Honduras.()The airport is frequently criticized as being dangerous; due to its location next to a sierra, short runway, and difficult approach. Large commercial jets are required to execute a tight hairpin left turn at very low altitude to land on the short runway. International airline pilots flying into Toncontn receive additional, specific training for the Toncontn approach.  Toncontn has been improved by the work of the Airport Corporation of Tegucigalpa (CAT), which is owned by TACA of El Salvador.    It is currently managed by InterAirports, the company hired by the government of Honduras to manage the four airports in the country.()The airport authority and the government of Honduras resumed the airport relocation talks in April 2011 and announced that work on the new Palmerola airport would start by the fall of 2011 after years of efforts to replace Toncontn International with an airport at Palmerola in Comayagua where the Cano Air Base is located.()  However, on a September 25, 2011 update, President Lobo stated officials were still evaluating the pros and cons of constructing the new airport.()  This comes three years after former President Zelaya had announced that all commercial flights would be transferred to Soto Cano Air Base; however, work on the new terminal at Soto Cano was then cancelled after Zelaya was removed from office on 28 June 2009 in the Honduran coup dtat.()  Upon realization of the Palmerola airport, international flights to and from Toncontn would continue to operate but would be limited to small aircraft. Sister cities *  Horizonte, Brazil()*  Gainesville, United States*  Orleans, United States()*  Guadalajara, Mexico()*  Lima, Peru()*  Madrid, Spain()*  Quito, Ecuador()*  Taipei, Taiwan()*  Amman, Jordan*  Bogot, Colombia*  Caracas, Venezuela*  Managua, Nicaragua*  City, Guatemala*  Paz, Bolivia*  Banjarbaru, Indonesia*  Manado, Indonesia*  Palu, Indonesia*  Seoul, South KoreaReferences External links * Official Portal of the Government of Honduras* Official Portal of the Government of Tegucigalpa* Interactive Map of Tegucigalpaace:Tgucigalpaaf:Tegucigalpaam:an:Tegucigalpaaz:Tequsiqalpazh-min-nan:Tegucigalpabe-x-old:bo:bs:Tegucigalpabr:Tegucigalpabg:ca:Tegucigalpacs:Tegucigalpacy:Tegucigalpada:Tegucigalpade:Tegucigalpaet:Tegucigalpael:es:Tegucigalpaeo:Tegucigalpoeu:Tegucigalpafa:hif:Tegucigalpafr:Tegucigalpafy:Tegusigalpaga:Tegucigalpagd:Tegucigalpagl:Tegucigalpako:hy:hr:Tegucigalpaio:Tegucigalpaid:Tegucigalpaie:Tegucigalpais:Tegucigalpait:Tegucigalpahe:ka:rn:Tegucigalpasw:Tegucigalpaht:Tegousigoualpala:Tegucigalpalv:Tegusigalpalt:Tegusigalpalij:Tegucigalpaln:Tegucigalpalmo:Tegucigalpahu:Tegucigalpamk:mr:nah:Tecuitlapannl:Tegucigalpaja:no:Tegucigalpann:Tegucigalpanov:Tegucigalpaoc:Tegucigalpapap:Tegucigalpapms:Tegucigalpapl:Tegucigalpapt:Tegucigalparo:Tegucigalpaqu:Tegucigalparu:sah:sco:Tegucigalpasimple:Tegucigalpask:Tegucigalpasr:fi:Tegucigalpasv:Tegucigalpatl:Tegucigalpath:tr:Tegucigalpaudm:uk:vi:Tegucigalpawar:Tegucigalpayo:Tegucigalpazh:
26016293
Lille,_Alberta
Lille is a ghost town in Alberta located in the Pass region. It held a significant population between 1901 and 1912. In the latter year, the coal mine and coke ovens were closed due to the collapse of the local industry. The company running the town, West Canadian Collieries, suffered a loss of $40,000. History Lille was established as a coal mining town in 1901 by two representatives of a French company, United Gold Fields Ltd. The representatives, J. J. Fleutot and C. Remy, were looking for coal in the Pass of Alberta when they happened upon a seam near the future site of Lille. The town was initially called French Camp, but the founders of the town changed its name to Lille after the French town of the same name where the mining ventures financial backers were located.() The next year, the Frank-Grassy Mountain Railway was built, giving the town a strong connection to the outside world. Lille was built mostly by the company, which was renamed West Canadian Collieries in 1903. Approximately 20 residences existed, along with a doctor, a school room, a hospital and a hotel. The company also rented space for firms to conduct business. Although originally planned for nearby Frank, coke ovens were established in Lille in 1903. In 1912, the local coal mine closed due to the collapse of the local coke industry. West Canadian Collieries suffered a loss of over $40,000, as wages exceeded revenue by that amount.()Although Lille is a Provincial Historic Site, much of the town site has fallen prey to scavengers, and as such very little of Lille remains.() References  (Alberta)
26028471
ROWVA_High_School
ROWVA High School, ROWVA Senior High School, or RHS, is a public four-year school located at 346 East ROVA Drive in Illinois, a village in County, Illinois, in the United States. RHS is part of Community Unit School District 208, which serves the communities of Rio, Oneida, Wataga, Victoria, and Altona, and also includes ROWVA Junior High School, Central Elementary School, and East Elementary School. (http://www.rowva.k12.il.us/) The campus is 10 miles northeast of Illinois and serves a mixed village and rural residential community. The school is the only school in the village of Oneida, and lies within the Galesburg statistical area.(http://www.census.gov/prod/2008pubs/09statab/app2.pdf)AcademicsROWVA High School teaches courses in the following academic departments(http://www.rowva.k12.il.us/Academics.htm):* Agriculture* Art* Business & Computers* Drivers Education* English* Family & Consumer Education* History* Industrial Arts* Media* Math* Music* PE & Health* Science* SpanishAthleticsROWVA High School competes in the Trail Conference and is a member school in the High School Association. Its mascot is the Tiger. The school has no state championships on record in team athletics or activities.(http://www.ihsa.org/school/schools/1643.htm)HistoryThe history of ROWVA high school is the history of its preceding component schools:* Rio High School* Oneida High School* Victoria High School* Altona and Walnut Grove High Schools* ROVA High School* Wataga High SchoolRio High SchoolThe community of Illinois provided a school system for its children from approximately the late 19th century until 1948. It was in that year the communities of Rio, Oneida, Victoria, and Altona consolidated their schools to form the original R.O.V.A. School District.  Rio at first kept its grade school for its children, however the grade school in Rio is no longer used as a school. The building and its baseball diamond are still present.(http://www.illinoishsglorydays.com/id70.html Illinois High School Glory Days, Rio High School, Accessed February 1, 2010)Onedia High SchoolThe first school in Illinois was organized in 1855. A high school was established in 1870, however a storm destroyed the building just seven years later. The bell from the building was saved and was reconstructed. The memorial is pictured at the bottom of the page. Nine pupils graduated from its first high school class in 1891. During the 1890s, high school curriculums were offered, but often not many people studied a full four, or three, years of its education to earn a diploma. This explains the 21-year gap between the organization of a high school and the first graduating class. From 1899 to 1908, the school became a three-year one. A gym was acquired in 1926 from the Congregational Church building until a new gym was built in 1937. Oneida supported their own high school until 1948 when the high school was deactivated. The reason for this was a consolidation between the high schools in the towns of Rio, Oneida, Victoria, and Altona. The result was the formation of the original R.O.V.A. school district (Watagas addition later made it ROWVA). The town of Oneida landed the high school in their town.(http://www.illinoishsglorydays.com/id76.html Illinois High School Glory Days, Oneida High School, Accessed February 1, 2010)Victoria High SchoolThe history of the village of Illinois begins in 1835.  According to legend, George Reynolds stole the town and moved it to its current location where his cabin sat.  This locale was important for the fact the stagecoach line between Iowa and Illinois went through this area.  The Swedes who eventually settled in Hill, Illinois first stayed in Victoria and is believed if they had converted Eric Janson to Methodism, Victoria may have been home to the Swedish Colony.(http://www.illinoishsglorydays.com/id42.html Illinois High School Glory Days, Victoria High School, Accessed February 1, 2010)Victoria was once a booming city with a prosperous future due to its successful mining industry that lay south of town in an area now called Little John Conservation Club.  Victorias historical significance is that it was a major Swedish Settlement in its day. It is home to the first Swedish Methodist Church in the world.  A railroad also ran to Victoria from Wataga to transfer the freshly mined coal.  This is significant because it was the Shortest Railroad in America at about 9 miles long. Once the train arrived in Victoria, it ran backwards back to Wataga due to the abrupt end of Americas Shortest Railroad!  The railroad is no longer in use, and Victoria is no longer home to a great mining society.(http://www.illinoishsglorydays.com/id42.html Matt Smith, Quote on the History of Victoria, Accessed February 1, 2010)In 1895, Victoria High School was established, which lasted until 1948 when the towns of Rio, Oneida, Victoria, and Altona formed R.O.V.A. High School located in Oneida. The grade schools in each town remained active at the time. The Victoria school building is no longer used as a high school, nor is it used as the elementary school that it once was.  It was sold to the village of Victoria by ROWVA school district for only $1. The Village of Victoria sold it to a man who now runs a business out of the building.(The reason for the sale and closing of the Victoria school was a consolidation of  the elementary schools of Rio, Oneida, Wataga, Victoria, and Altona.  The consolidation formed ROWVA West Elementary (3rd and 4th grades in Wataga) ROWVA Central Elementary (1st and 2nd grades in Oneida)  And ROWVA East Elementary  (5th and 6th grades in Altona).(Altona and Walnut Grove High SchoolsThe history of education in Illinois dates back to the mid-19th century. The first school building in the town of Altona was built in 1863. The school housed grades 1 - 8 and supported a three-year high school course. The first graduatiing class of Altona High School was the class of 1874. The class consisted of three graduates, Emmerson Shade, Nellie Colburn, and Fannie Hillerby.The three-year Altona High School continued through 1915, with the largest classes to graduate consisting of eleven students.(http://www.illinoishsglorydays.com/id29.html Document located at Ransom Library, Illinois High School Glory Days, Altona High School, Accessed February 1, 2010)A four-year high school course of study began in 1916. Being newly established, there were no graduates that particular year. A new brick school building was built in 1916 to accommodate the new agenda. It was also voted at that time to become a school for the entire township in which Altona was located. The name of the new high school district would become the Walnut Grove Township High School District. A new grade school building for the district was erected in 1917. The grade school was named after its biggest donor, Mary Riner Kufus. Walnut Grove Township High School would flourish for several years to come.  Classes of 25 students in 1931 and 23 students in 1937 were the schools biggest in enrollment. In 1931 the school added a gymnasium to the grounds. The district established a bus system in 1946.(Talks began in 1945 regarding the potential consolidation of several school districts in Knox County. Ultimately the suggestion was made to consolidate the high schools of Rio, Oneida, Victoria, and Altona. After a couple of years of planning the school boards of the four school districts put the suggestion on a ballot for the voters to decide. The vote was held in the spring of 1948. All districts agreed to establish one combined school district to be effective beginning with the 1948-49 school year. The Altona Walnut Grove High School class of 1948 would be the last to graduate from the school.(Altona Walnut Grove Township High School continues to have an active alumni association.  Annual banquets have been held to honor the former students and the memory of the high school for over 100 years. Though dwindling in numbers, the banquet is still be held on a yearly basis. The Altona High School building is still active today as part of the ROWVA school system and is now utilized as the ROWVA East Grade School.(Wataga High SchoolThe villages of Illinois openned its high school in 1888. However, the high school closed in the 1940s (1949), shortly after the R.O.V.A. District was formed. The residents of Wataga at the time chose to send their students to the Galesburg school system. However, Wataga maintained control of its grade school. In the mid-1980s the residents of Wataga chose to detach from the Galesburg school system. The children of Wataga were accepted into the R.O.V.A. school district in 1987, effectively putting the W in R.O.W.V.A. The grade school in Wataga is now home to ROWVA West Grade School.(http://www.illinoishsglorydays.com/id77.html Illinois High School Glory Days, Wataga High School, Accessed February 1, 2010)Timeline* 1870 - Onedia High School established* 1870s - Altona High School established* 1888 - Wataga High School established* 1895 - Victoria High School established* Late 19th century - Rio High School established* 1917 - Altona High School becomes Walnut Grove Township High School* 1948 - Rio, Oneida, Victoria, and Walnut Grove (Altona) High Schools consolidate to form ROVA High School* 1949 - Wataga High School closes and students attend High School* 1987 - Wataga students leave Galesburg High School and consolidate with ROVA to form ROWVAReferences* Interactive Illinois Report CardExternal links* ROWVA High School* ROWVA Community Unit School District #208
26043929
List_of_guests_and_residents_of_the_Astor_House_Hotel_(Shanghai)
Notable people who have stayed at the Astor House Hotel in Shanghai, China as guests or residents over the years include: Notable guests  18601873 * Pioneering Swiss photographer Rossier stayed at the Astor House from June 1860 for several weeks;(North China Herald (30 June 1860):102. Rossier arrived from Hong Kong on the ship Pekin. Rossiers staying at the Astor House Hotel is mentioned in the North China Herald (14 July 1860):110. See Terry Bennett, The Search for Rossier: Early Photographer of China & Japan, The PhotoHistorian-Journal of the Historical Group of the Royal Photographic Society (December 2004); http://www.old-japan.co.uk/article_rossier.html . Retrieved 8 July 2009.)* British military engineer Lt. Thomas Lyster (born 5 July 1840; died 17 August 1865), of the Engineers,(The Cork Examiner (17 October 1865); http://www.irelandoldnews.com/Cork/1865/OCT.html) aide to George Gordon (then commander of the Victorious Army), stayed at the Astor House Hotel from 24 August 1862;(Thomas Lyster,With Gordon in China: Letters from Thomas Lyster Lieutenant Royal Engineers, ed. E. A. Lyster (T.F. Unwin, 1891):83.)* Representatives of the Embassy of Japan stayed at the Astor House in February 1864 while negotiating with other foreign powers in Shanghai regarding the practical implications of extraterritoriality;(China: The Consular Meeting at Shanghai, The New York Times (8 May 1864):6.)* American Carleton Coffin, a journalist for Boston Journal, and his wife, stayed at the Astor House Hotel in early 1868;(Charles Carleton Coffin, Our New Way Round the World (London: Frederick Ward & Co., 1869):327328.)* Prince Duke of Saxe-Coburg and Gotha, the Duke of Edinburgh, and second son of Victoria of Great Britain, chose to stay at the Astor House Hotel when he visited Shanghai in 1869;(Hall of Fame) 18731900 * Scotsman Francis Campbell (18211885), authority on folklore, publisher of Tales of the West Highlands, and inventor of the CampbellStokes sunshine recorder, was a guest at the Astor House in January 1875;(John Francis Campbell, My Circular Notes: Extracts from Journals, Letters Sent Home, Geological and Other Notes, Written While Travelling Westwards Round the World, from July 6, 1874, to July 6, 1875 Vol. 2 (Macmillan, 1876):64.)* American attorney Benjamin Robbins Curtis, Jr. (18551891) (the son and namesake of Robbins Curtis, the former Justice of the Supreme Court of the United States (18511857), and a lead defence attorney at the 1868 of Andrew Johnson) stayed at the Astor House for three nights from 12 September 1875;(Benjamin Robbins Curtis, Dottings Round the Circle, 7th ed. (Boston: Houghton, Mifflin and Company, 1879):112, http://www.archive.org/stream/dottingsroundcir00cur#page/112/mode/1up)* Cornish antiquarian Copeland Borlase (1848  31 March 1899), later a Liberal of Parliament for East Cornwall in 1880, and from 1886 Secretary to the Local Government Board, but resigned later that year due a scandal involving a Portuguese mistress, and bankruptcy,(Extracts from The West Briton Newspaper, 1887 (Part 4), http://west-penwith.org.uk/wb18874.htm) stayed at the Astor House from 30 May 1878;(William Copeland Borlase, Sunways: A Record of Rambles in Many Lands (1878):335.)* Scottish American industrialist Carnegie stayed at the Astor House Hotel for almost a week from 5 December 1878;(Andrew Carnegie, Round the World (Reprint: Echo Library, 2007):40; Peter Krass, Carnegie (John Wiley & Sons, 2002):149.)* American adventurer Wallace Knox (born in New Hampshire, 26 June 1835; died 1896), one of the preeminent travel writers in the second half of the Nineteenth Century(James R. Phelps, Thomas Wallace Knox: An Uncommon American Adventurer in the Holy Land; http://knox.maxboots.com/thomasknox) and the author of 46 books, who had been martialed by S. Grant during the Civil War,( stayed at the Astor House in 1879;(Thomas Wallace Knox, The Boy Travellers in the Far East, Part First: Adventures of Two Youths in a Journey to Japan & China (New York: Harper, 1879):319320.)* King David Kalkaua I of Hawaii, the last reigning king of the of Hawaii, the first monarch to travel around the world,(King Kalakauas Tour Round the World: A Sketch of Incidents of Travel (Pacific Commercial Advertiser Company, 1881):54; William N. Armstrong, Around the World with a King (F. A. Stokes Company, 1904):2.) stayed at the Astor House Hotel(Armstrong, Around the World with a King, 8990.) in April 1881, where he occupied a suite of rooms on the first floor;(Holcombe, The Real Chinaman (Dodd, Mead & company, 1895):72.)* Prussian born Christian evangelist Mller, philanthropist and founder of orphanages in Bristol, stayed at the Astor House during his two weeks in Shanghai from 4 October 1886, in which he preached 17 times;(Mary Groves Mller, The Preaching Tours and Missionary Labours of George Mller (of Bristol), 2nd ed. (J. Nisbet, 1889):272273.)* Adler Stern (born 8 December 1838 in Philadelphia; died May 2, 1904), American Jewish author, and editor of Penn Monthly and Industrial Review,(Henry Samuel Morais, The Jews of Philadelphia: Their History from the Earliest Settlements to the Present Time (The Levytype Co., 1894):346; American Jewish Year Book, 5665 (19045):409418; http://www.jewishencyclopedia.com/view.jsp?letterS&artid1090) was a guest in the Hotel in 1887;(Simon Adler Stern, Jottings of Travel in China and Japan (Porter & Coates, 1888):121.)* In May 1894, American mezzo-soprano singer Hauk (18511929), who was rumoured to be the illegitimate daughter of American financier Jerome, and was the first American to sing the title role in Carmen,(Picture History: Minnie Hauk (1851-1929)) and her husband, Austrian journalist Baron Ernst von Hesse-Waltegg, were guests during Hauks performances in Shanghai;(Joseph Bennett, Forty Years of Music, 18651905 (Methuen & co., 1908):404; Francis D. Perkins, Minnie Hauk, in Notable American Women, 16071950: A Biographical Dictionary, eds. Edward T. James, Janet Wilson James, Paul S. Boyer (Harvard University Press, 1971):155156.)* American theatre manager Miss Hawthorne (born ca.1847 in Maine; died 23 May 1922, London, England),(Born Priscilla A. Cartland, daughter of Asa Cartland, an innkeeper on Levant Road, and Priscilla Godwin; first married John Murray, at Kensington, England; later married to Bernard Sargeant de Santleys (born 1877 in London; died 23 June 1912 in New York), see: Family of Priscilla W. GODWIN (31) & Asa Samuel CARTLAND; http://www.jengod.com/genealogy/reunion/maine/rr01/rr01_021.htm#P2690; Arrested in 1915 in New York as an accomplice in an attempted murder: Disguised Suitor Shoots Two Women...Actress Gave Costume; Grace Hawthorne, Arrested as Accomplice of Jersey Barber, Denies She Knew He Was Armed, The New York Times (8 May 1915):13; http://query.nytimes.com/mem/archive-free/pdf?res9E05E6DC1338E633A2575BC0A9639C946496D6CF) a tall, handsome American actress,(Erroll Sherson, Londons Lost Theatres of the Nineteenth Century (Ayer Publishing, 1925):179.) who had starred as Zoe in Octoroon in the 1880s,(Disguised Suitor Shoots Two Women...Actress Gave Costume; Grace Hawthorne, Arrested as Accomplice of Jersey Barber, Denies She Knew He Was Armed, The New York Times (8 May 1915):13; http://query.nytimes.com/mem/archive-free/pdf?res9E05E6DC1338E633A2575BC0A9639C946496D6CF) and former lessee of the Theatre, London and the Theatre, London, who must have had abundant means of her own or else was backed by others who had, for she met failure after failure with a grim determination to go on at all costs,( stayed in the Astor House during her round the world trip in 1895, because of its name;(A Trip Around the World; The New York Times (13 October 1895):28; http://query.nytimes.com/mem/archive-free/pdf?res9B06E5D8113DE433A25750C1A9669D94649ED7CF; J. P. Wearing, ed., Grace Hawthorne, in American and British Theatrical Biography: A Directory (Scarecrow Press, 1979):471.)* James Aubertin (18181900), British railway engineer and translator of Portuguese poet de Cames magnum opus Lusadas(2 vols. (1st ed. 1878; 2nd ed., London, 1884); Luis Vaz de Camoens, Encyclopaedia Britannica 11th ed. (1911);http://www.1911encyclopedia.org/Luis_Vaz_de_Camoens) and also seventy of his sonnets,(J. J. Aubertin, Camoens Seventy Sonnets, Portuguese Text and Translation (London, 1881); Luis Vaz de Camoens, Encyclopaedia Britannica 11th ed. (1911); http://www.1911encyclopedia.org/Luis_Vaz_de_Camoens) stayed on five separate occasions between Sunday and November 1890;(John James Aubertin, Wanderings & Wonderings: India, Burma, Kashmir, Ceylon, Singapore, Java, Siam, Japan, Manila, Formosa, Korea, China, Cambodia, Australia, New Zealand, Alaska, the States (K. Paul, Trench, Trbner & co., 1892):263, 301, 310, 352 and 362; http://digital.library.cornell.edu/cgi/t/text/text-idx?csea;idnosea287)* Annie Londonderry Cohen Kopchovsky, the first woman to bicycle around the world, stayed at the Astor Hotel on her pioneering journey in 1895;(Peter Zheutlin, Around the World On Two Wheels: Annie Londonderrys Extraordinary Ride (Reprint: Kensington Pub Corp, 2008):78.)* English travel writer Lucy Bird (15 October 1831 to 7 October 1904), the most famous and influential of the Victorian lady travelers,,(Isabella Lucy (Bird) Bishop, Dictionary of Literary Biography; http://www.bookrags.com/biography/isabella-lucy-bird-bishop-dlb/) and the first woman admitted into the Geographical Society in 1892, stayed at the Astor House in 1896;(Mrs J.F. Bishop L. Bird, The Yangtze Valley and Beyond: An Account of Journeys in China (London: John Murray, 1899):21; http://libweb.uoregon.edu/ec/e-asia/read/yangbeyond.pdf; Olive Checkland, Collected Travel Writings of Isabella Bird Vol. 10 (Ganesha Pub., 1997):21.)* British travel writer and explorer Mary Hall (born 1857 in Southwark; died 1919 in Hampstead),(Susan L. Blake, A Womans Trek: What Differences Does Gender Make? in Western Women and Imperialism: Complicity and Resistance, eds. Nupur Chaudhuri and Margaret Strobel (Indiana University Press, 1992):21.) one of the first women to be admitted as a fellow of the Geographical Society in 1913,(Morag Bell and Cheryl McEwan, The Admission of Women Fellows to the Royal Geographical Society, 18921914; the Controversy and the Outcome, The Geographical Journal 162 (1996); Susan L. Blake, A Womans Trek: What Difference does Gender Make? Womens Studies International Forum 13:4 (1990):347355.) later the first woman to have crossed Africa from south to north,(H.H. Johnston, Africa From South to North, The Geographical Journal 31:1 (January 1908):94; http://www.jstor.org/pss/1777267; Patricia W. Romero, Womens Voices on Africa: A Century of Travel Writings (M. Wiener Pub., 1992):71ff.) stayed at the Astor House in 1897, and again in April 1914;(Mary Hall, A Woman in the Antipodes and in the Far East (Methuen, 1914):286.)* American Congregational clergyman Henry Barrows (born 11 July 1847 near Michigan; died 3 June 1902 of pneumonia and pericarditis),(Mary Eleanor Barrows, John Henry Barrows: A Memoir (Chicago: Fleming H. Revell, 1904):16, 429.) president of the of the Worlds Religions held in Chicago in September 1893 in connection with the Columbian Exposition, and later president of College,(John Henry Barrows (18471902), Oberlin College Archives; http://www.oberlin.edu/archive/holdings/finding/RG2/SG5/biography.html) stayed at the Astor House in April 1897;(John Henry Barrows, A World-Pilgrimage (McClurg, 1897):439.)* British travel writer Foster Fraser, arrived at the Astor House Hotel on 23 December 1897 during his bicycle trip around the world;(John F. Fraser, Round the World on a Wheel: Being the Narrative of a Bicycle Ride of Nineteen Thousand Two Hundered and Thirty-seven Miles Through Seventeen Countries and Across Three Continents (1899; Reprint: Adamant Media Corporation, 2004):414.)* American mariner Lt. Allen Fiske (13 June 1854  6 April 1942), later a Admiral and Aide for Operations for the States Navy (a post that later became that of of Naval Operations), stayed at the Astor House Hotel in December 1898, while on furlough after the Battle of Manila Bay;(Bradley Allen Fiske, From Midshipman to Rear-Admiral (The Century Co., 1919):290291.)* Future American president Hoover, then a leading mining engineer, and his wife, Henry Hoover, stayed at the Astor House on their honeymoon for 4 days from 8 March 1899,(Anne Beiser Allen, An Independent Woman: The Life of Lou Henry Hoover (Contributions in American History) (Greenwood Press, 2000);23.) and again in August 1900 just after the Uprising, registered under the pseudonym of Mr. Clark to allow the registering of a mining lease without detection;(John Hamill, The Strange Career of Mr. Hoover Under Two Flags (William Faro,. N.Y. 1931; Reprint: Kessinger Publishing, 2005):71.)* British mining expert Herbert William Lewis Way stayed at the Astor House Hotel from 4 October 1899;(Herbert William Lewis Way and Robert W L Way, Round the World for Gold: A Search for Minerals from Kansas to Cathay (S. Low, Marston & company, ltd., 1912):181182.) 19001915 * English magician Charles Bertram (18531907), who was a favourite of the future King VII, performing for him more than twenty times,(Geoffrey Frederick Lamb, Victorian Magic (Routledge, 1976):83, 121, 123; http://www.geniimagazine.com/wiki/index.php/Charles_Bertram) performed at the Astor House in March 1900, and stayed there;(Charles Bertram, A Magician in Many Lands (G. Routledge & sons, limited, 1911):157158.)* American journalist J. Chamberlin, who stayed at the Hotel in September 1900 and again in March 1901, to cover the aftermath of the Uprising, whose reporting for the York Sun fueled the Indemnities Controversy by criticising missionary Scott Ament;(Georgia Louise Chamberlin, ed., Ordered to China: Letters Written from China While Under Commission from the York Sun During the Boxer Uprising of 1900 and the International Complications which Followed (Methuen, 1904):35, 274.)* Scottish author C.D. Mackellar stayed overnight in January 1901;(C.D. Mackellar, Scented Isles and Coral Gardens: Torres Straits, German New Guinea and the Dutch East Indies (London: John Murray, 1912):311.)* Future Lady of the United States Herron Taft was staying at the Astor House Hotel in October 1901, when she received news that her husband, Howard Taft, then of the Philippines, was severely ill in Manila;(Margaret Byrd Bassett, Profiles & Portraits of American Presidents & Their Wives (B. Wheelwright Co.; distributed by Grosset & Dunlap, New York, 1969):262; Henry Fowles Pringle, The Life and Times of William Howard Taft: A Biography Vol. 1 (Archon Books, 1964):214215.)* American mariner Captain D. Bucknam (born 1869; died 27 May 1915), later pasha of the Empire and admiral of the navy of Turkey stayed at the Astor House prior to 1902;(American Pasha in Sultans Favor The New York Times (21 February 1909): THE MARCONI TRANSATLANTIC WIRELESS DISPATCHES, Page C4; http://query.nytimes.com/mem/archive-free/pdf?res9A04E1D81738E033A25752C2A9649C946897D6CF; Bucknam Pasha, Ex-Admiral, Dead, The New York Times (30 May 1915); Picture Section Rotogravure, Page 16; http://query.nytimes.com/mem/archive-free/pdf?res9E06E5D81338E633A25753C3A9639C946496D6CF)* American geological engineer Willis, who was employed by the States Geological Survey (USGS), and later a leading global expert in earthquakes,(Eliot Blackwelder, Bailey Willis: 18571949: A Biographical Memoir (Washington D.C.: National Academy of Sciences, 1961), http://books.nap.edu/html/biomems/bwillis.pdf) stayed at the Astor House during his geological expedition in China in 1903;(Bailey Wills, Friendly China: Two Thousand Miles Afoot Among the Chinese (Stanford University Press, 1949):50.)* Controversial American practitioner and radio pioneer R. Brinkley, who paid $65 a day for his suite at the Astor House in 1903;(R. Alton Lee, The Bizarre Careers of John R. Brinkley (University Press of Kentucky, 2002):48.)* Singh Bahadur (18721949), the ruling Maharaja of the princely state of Kapurthala in the Empire of India from 1877, stayed at the Astor House in 1903;(Jagatjit Singh, My Travels in China, Japan and Java, 1903 (Hutchinson, 1905):28, 160.)* English feminist and travel writer Margaret Lowthian Bell, later associated with Lawrence, stayed at the Astor House Hotel in April 1903;(Gertrude Bell, Letters of Gertrude Bell (Volume I) 18741917 (Reprint: Echo Library, 2006):102.)* American humorist P. Wilder (born 19 September 1859 in New York; died 10 January 1915),(William Herringshaw, Herringshaws National Library of American Biography Vol. 5 (American Publishers Association, 1914):695; Colliers New Encyclopedia Vol. 10 (P.F. Collier & Son, 1928):366.) born with congenital kyphosis, who was editor of the 10 volume The Wit and Humor of America, made 16 command performances for the future King VII,(Marshall Wilder, Famous Wit  Dead, The New York Times (11 January 1915):9; http://query.nytimes.com/mem/archive-free/pdf?res9901EFD6113FE633A25752C1A9679C946496D6CF) was a guest in 1905;(Marshall Pinckney Wilder, Smiling Round the World (Funk & Wagnalls Co., 1908):83, 166; The Encyclopedia Americana Vol. 2 (Encyclopedia Americana Corp., 1920):312; Bampton Hunt and John Parker, eds. The Green Room Book; Or, Whos Who on the Stage (T.S. Clark, 1909):518,)* American poet and essayist Miller, the Poet of the Sierras, was a guest in 1905;(Caspar Whitney, ed. The Outing Magazine 46 (1905):313; http://www.literarytraveler.com/literary_articles/joaquin_miller.aspx)* After the beating of the British Consul D. Pitzipios and the torching of his car, American General to Shanghai,(John King Fairbank, Martha Henderson Coolidge, and Richard Joseph Smith, H. B. Morse, Customs Commissioner and Historian of China (University Press of Kentucky, 1995):183.) James Linn Rodgers (born 10 September 1861; died 2 September 1930), and his family stayed in the Astor House Hotel from 18 December 1905 during anti-American riots(ANTI-FOREIGN OUTBREAK PUT DOWN AT SHANGHAI Foreign Forces Guard City  Naval Reinforcements Expected. JAPANESE MIX WITH MOBS Twenty Chinese Killed and Some Property Damaged  American Vice Consul Beaten by Rioters, The New York Times (19 December 1905):5; http://query.nytimes.com/mem/archive-free/pdf?res9402E6DA143DE733A2575AC1A9649D946497D6CF) during the boycott of American goods by Chinese in response to the Exclusion Act of 1882, because of the isolation of their official residence on Bubbling Well Road;(Alfred Emanuel Smith, New Outlook 82 (1906):353355.)* American herpetologist Barbour (18841946), later director of the of Comparative Zoology, stayed at the Astor House Hotel during his honeymoon trip in May 1907;(Thomas Barbour and Rosamond Barbour, Letters Written While on a Collecting Trip in the East Indies (s.n., 1913):183, 186.)* Danish explorer Frits Holm, leader of an expedition to copy and purchase the Stele in Xian, stayed there in February 1908;(Frits Holm, My Nestorian Adventure in China: A Popular Account of the Holm-Nestorian Expedition to Sian-Fu and Its Results, ed. Abraham Yohannan (New York: Revell, 1923; Reprint: Gorgias Press LLC, 2001):300.)* The Ashburton Guardian reported that British General MacDonald, who had been reported as commiting suicide in Paris in 1903 after allegations of illicit homosexual activity, was seen breakfasting at the Astor House in 1909 by a officer who had served with MacDonald in India and Egypt.(Local and General, Ashburton Guardian 29 (8316) (13 March 1911):2, http://paperspast.natlib.govt.nz/cgi-bin/paperspast?ad&dAG19110313.2.10)* American Presbyterian evangelist Wilbur Chapman stayed at the Astor House from 7 September 1909, during the first Chapman-Alexander worldwide campaign, which was held in Shanghai from 816 September;(Ford Cyrinde Ottman, J. Wilbur Chapman: A Biography (Doubleday, 1920):187-188; http://www.archive.org/stream/jwilburchapmana00ottmgoog/jwilburchapmana00ottmgoog_djvu.txt)* American singer McCallon Alexander and his wife, Cadbury, stayed at the Astor House from 7 September 1909, during the first Chapman-Alexander worldwide campaign, which was held in Shanghai;(Ford Cyrinde Ottman, J. Wilbur Chapman: A Biography (Doubleday, 1920):187188.)* Malayan-born Chinese medical practitioner Dr. Lien-teh () (18791960), the first person of Chinese ancestry to study medicine at the of Cambridge, and later first president of the China Medical Association (19161920), stayed at the Astor House Hotel about 1910;(Lien-t Wu, Plague Fighter: The Autobiography of a Modern Chinese Physician (W. Heffer, 1959):256; Yu-Lin Wu, Memories of Dr Wu Lien-Teh: Plague Fighter (World Scientific Pub Co, June 1995); Obituary: WU LIEN-TEH, M.D., Sc.D., Litt.D., LL.D., M.P.H Br Med J. 1:5170(6 February 1960):429430; http://www.pubmedcentral.nih.gov/picrender.fcgi?artid1966655&blobtypepdf )* Commander of the US Marine detachment at the American Legation in Peking Major H. Russell, Jr., and later the of the Marine Corps,(Donald F. Bittner, John H. Russell 19341936, in Allan Reed Millett and Jack Shulimson, eds., Commandants of the Marine Corps (Naval Institute Press, 2004):234252.) stayed at the Astor House in 1911, with his family, including the seven-year old Astor, future socialite and philanthropist;(Dong, 208.)* British Antarctic explorer Cherry-Garrard (2 January 1886  18 May 1959), a survivor of Falcon Scotts Nova expedition stayed at the Astor House from 30 March 1914, while in China on an expedition to study Asiatic schistosomiasis and bilharziasis;(Sara Wheeler, Cherry: A Life of Apsley Cherry-Garrard (Random House, 2002):167.) 19151929 * Canadian engineer Mann, who dueled with a Russian count with an axe;(Chase Salmon Osborn, The Iron Hunter (1919; Wayne State University Press, 2002):198.)* Anthony Walsh (born 24 February 1867; died 14 April 1936) the co-founder of the Maryknoll Fathers and Brothers, attended a banquet in his honour at the Astor House in December 1917;(James Anthony Walsh, Observations in the Orient: The Account of a Journey to Catholic Mission Fields in Japan, Korea, Manchuria, China, Indo-China, and the Philippines (Ossining, NY: Catholic Foreign Missionary Society of America, 1919):175.)* Randolph Ortman, owner of Ridge Farm in Virginia,(http://familytreemaker.genealogy.com/users/h/u/t/Christopher-F-Hutchins/FILE/0002text.txt) and his wife, Blanche Sellers Ortman, stayed in late December 1919;(Blanche Sellers Ortman, New York to Peking (Private Printing, 1921):141144; http://www.archive.org/download/newyorktopeking00ortmiala/newyorktopeking00ortmiala_bw.pdf)* English novelist and playwright Somerset Maugham, stayed at the Astor House Hotel from 3 January 1920, and this visit to China influenced his On a Chinese Screen (1922);(Ted Morgan, Maugham (Simon and Schuster, 1980):244.)* American banker, publisher, and capitalist Charles Henry Crocker (born August 29, 1865),(John P. Young, Journalism in California (San Francisco, CA: Chronicle Publishing Company, 1915):253.) and his wife, Carlotta L. Steiner, stayed at the Astor House in June 1920;(At the Shanghai Hotels, Millards Review of the Far East 13 (June 19, 1920):203.)(Prince of Siam a Regular Fellow, The Delmarvia Star (Delmarvia, Delaware) (August 8, 1920):25.)* A United States Congressional delegation stayed at the Astor House in August 1920;(Junketeers in Orient Split Up in a Row: Unattached Women Cause Trouble in Congressional Committee, Los Angeles Times (August 8, 1920):I1; Shanghai En Fete To Greet Congressional Junketers, The Sun (Baltimore, MD) (August 8, 1920):2.)* Italian poet and playwright Baronti, who wrote A Modern Phoenix,(Gerve Baronti, The North-China Herald (February 14, 1920):411.) stayed at the Astor House in September 1920 after a domestic dispute with her husband American businessman Paul R. Danner, and announced that she would marry G.A. Bena, the wealthy president of Shanghais Italian Chamber of Commerce;(Love Rebel Missing, The Milwaukee Journal (September 21, 1920):1.)* British newspaper magnate Harmsworth, 1st Viscount Northcliffe stayed for one night on 20 November 1921;(Alfred Viscount Northcliffe, My Journey Around the World, ed. Cecil St. John Harmsworth (Philiadelphia, PA: J.B. Lippincott, 1923):150)* German physicist Einstein, arrived in Shanghai on 13 November 1922 en route to Japan on the Kitanu Maru,(Alice Calaprice and Trevor Lipscombe, Albert Einstein: A Biography (Greenwood Publishing Group, 2005):8687.) four days after the announcement that he had won the Prize for physics,(Abraham Pais, Subtle Is the Lord: The Science and the Life of Albert Einstein (Oxford University Press, 2005):526.) and stayed for one night.(Danian Hu, China and Albert Einstein: The Reception of the Physicist and his Theory in China 19171979 (Harvard University Press, 2005):71.) Einstein returned to Shanghai on 31 December 1922 after a visit to Japan, and departed on 2 January 1923.(Hu, 74; Guang Pan, The Jews in China (China Intercontinental Press, 2001):36, for photo of Einstein arriving in Shanghai.) It is claimed that Einstein stayed in Room 304 in the Astor House Hotel;(* American artist Bertha Boynton Lum (18691954), influenced by Japonism and the stories of Hearn,(Mari Yoshihara, Embracing the East: White Women and American Orientalism (Oxford University Press US, 2003):5773.) stayed at the Astor House during her frequent visits to China from 1922 onwards;(Bertha Boynton Lum, Gangplanks to the East (The HenkleYewdale House, Inc., 1936):261; http://www.bertha-lum.org/Biography.htm)* American Quaker Waln (18951964),(She married George Edward Osland-Hill, an officer in the English Foreign Service, whom she called Ted. Ted had one daughter by his first wife, Marie Osland-Hill Wade.) a best-selling author, who lived in China for 13 years from 1920, stayed at the Astor House in March 1924;(Nora Waln, The House of Exile (Little, Brown, and Company, 1933):176.)* From 17 May 1924 two women who claimed to be Mrs Millicent McKiney (or Montgomery), daughter of an English millionaire, Mr Montgomery; and her daughter, Miss Marie Montgomery (or McKiney), stayed at the Astor House. During their stay they successfully defrauded many foreign residents of Shanghai by borrowing expensive furs, money, attracting marriage proposals and rings, before escaping to Manila on 21 June 1924;(A Bogus Millionairess and Her Daughter in Shanghai, North-China Herald (26 July 1924):14; Hibbard, Bund, 1179.)* The aviators from the American Air Service, including Lt. Smith, who were in the process of making the aerial circumnavigation of the world by air stayed at the Astor House for three nights from 4 June 1924;(Ernest A. McKay, A World to Conquer: The Epic Story of the First Around-the-World Flight (Arco Pub., 1981):102; FIRST ROUND-THE-WORLD FLIGHT, KAGOSHIMA, JAPAN, TO CALCUTTA, INDIA, JUNE 430, 1924; and Carroll V. Glines, Around the World in 175 days: The First Round-the-World Flight (Smithsonian, 2001):85.)* Mrs Simpson, the future wife of the of Windsor, and her friend Mary Sadler stayed at the Astor House for ten days in 1925, while Shanghai was in the grip of war;(Charles Higham, Wallis: Secret Lives of the Duchess of Windsor (Sidgwick & Jackson, 1988):38.)* P. Duggan, the American co-founder and first president of Institute of International Education, and later professor of diplomatic history at the College of the City of New York, stayed at the Astor House in the late spring of 1925;(Stephen Duggan, A Professor at Large (1943; Reprint: Ayer Publishing, 1972):314.)* American journalist B. Wood, foreign correspondent for the Daily News stayed at the Astor from 25 September 1925;(The China Weekly Review 26 (1923):106; E. C. Alft, Elgin: Days Gone By, http://www.elginhistory.com/dgb/ch06.htm)* The School of Dancing and Related Arts troupe, including creators St. Denis and Shawn, stayed at the Astor House Hotel from 16 November 1925 and again about 4 October 1926 during their eighteen-month tour of the Far East;(Jane Sherman, Soaring: The Diary and Letters of a Denishawn Dancer in the Far East, 19251926 (Wesleyan University Press, 1976):225; Ruth St. Denis, Ted Shawn and their Denishawn Dancers Souvenir Program, 1926, 1925; 1,5.; http://www.oceanpark.ws/1925test.htm#DenishawnSouvenirProgram)* Manchurian Major General Xueliang (Chang Hseh-liang), later Warlord of Manchuria, stayed at the Astor House Hotel in late November 1925, disguised as an American mans servant, to avoid detection;(Elizabeth Jeffreys, ed., Byzantine Style, Religion and Civilization: In Honour of Sir Steven Runciman (Cambridge University Press, 2006):xlvii; http://www.cambridge.org/us/catalogue/catalogue.asp?isbn9780521834452&ssexc)* American naturalist and explorer W. Douglas Burden (18981978), stayed in May 1926 en route to capture dragons for the Museum of Natural History.(W. Douglas Burden, Dragon Lizards of Komodo: An Expedition to the Lost World of the Dutch East Indies (1927; Reprint: Kessinger Publishing, 2003):43.) His account of his expedition to Island inspired the movie Kong;(John Walsh, The First (and Original) King Kong The Independent (10 December 2005); http://www.independent.co.uk/arts-entertainment/films/features/the-first-and-original-king-kong-518889.html . Retrieved 12 April 2009.)* Chinese Foreign Minister Eugene Chen (Chen, You-ren) (born in Trinidad in 1878; died 1944 in Shanghai),(Yuan-tsung Chen, Return to the Middle Kingdom: One Family, Three Revolutionaries, and the Birth of Modern China (Sterling Publishing Company, Inc., 2008):xiii, xx, 239ff, 330.)(Yuan-tsung Chen, The Saga, http://yuantsungchen.com/the_saga.htm) a friend of Yat Sen, who later married artist Chen, and his four children, stayed at the Astor House in the spring of 1927;(Dont Quote Me, The Telegraph-Herald (Dubuque, Iowa) (January 27, 1932):5.)(Yuan-tsung Chen, Return to the Middle Kingdom: One Family, Three Revolutionaries, and the Birth of Modern China (Sterling Publishing Company, Inc., 2008):xx.)* During the Civil War, when the Astor House Hotel was struck by bullets on March 21, 1927,() Admiral General Pi shu-chen (Pi Shou-chen) leader of the anti-Communist Shantung forces who defended Shanghai against the Kuomintang forces from Canton,(War Guns Roaring in Shanghai, The Evening Standard (St. Petersburg, Florida) (March 21, 1927):1.) and who negotiated the surrender of the city to Kai-shek on March 21,(Two Cities Captured, The Telegraph-Herald (Dubuque, Iowa) (March 18, 1927):1.)(Bloodless Victory, The Brisbane Courier (Brisbane, QLD) (March 22, 1927):13.) stayed in the Astor House Hotel(News Flashes, Miami Daily News and Metropolis (March 23, 1927):5.) until 25 March 1927;(Frederick Moore, More British Troops at Shanghai and Foreign Defenses There Hold, The New York Times (March 25, 1927):1.)(Pi Shou Chen Executed, The Straits Times (8 April 1927):9, http://newspapers.nl.sg/Digitised/Article/straitstimes19270408.2.51.aspx)(Coolidge Silent on British Plan for Ultimatum, Amsterdam Evening Recorder (April 5, 1927):2, http://fultonhistory.com/Newspaper4/Amsterdam%20NY%20Daily%20Democrat%20and%20Recorder/Amsterdam%20NY%20Daily%20Democrat%20and%20Recorder%201927%20Apr-Jul%20Grayscale/Amsterdam%20NY%20Daily%20Democrat%20and%20Recorder%201927%20Apr-Jul%20Grayscale%20-%200033.pdf)* Former of California Richardson was forced to sleep on the floor of the lobby of the Astor House in April 1927 when the ship he was scheduled to depart on was prevented from departing by a storm;(NO BED FOR RICHARDSON: Former Governor Forced to Sleep on Lobby Floor When Storm Maroons Tourists in Shanghai, Los Angeles Times (April 16, 1927):11.)* American playwright and laureate in literature ONeill, stayed for a month from mid-November until 12 December 1928, sometimes with his future third wife, Carlotta Monterrey,(Haiping Liu, Beyond the Horizon to The Good Earth: Transformation of China in American Literary Consciousness; http://www.eoneill.com/library/essays/liu.htm) excepting for a period he was in hospital after a binge and when Carlotta moved into a separate hotel after an argument.(William M. Peterson, A Portrait of ONeills Electra The Eugene ONeill Newsletter 17:1&2 (Spring/Fall 1993); http://www.eoneill.com/library/review/17/17i.htm) While in Shanghai, he was called a faker posing as Eugene ONeill,(TWO PEN PORTRAITS OF EUGENE ONEILL, BROADWAYITE, The Eugene ONeill Newsletter 8:2 (Summer-Fall ); http://www.eoneill.com/library/newsletter/viii_2/viii-2e.htm) and was treated for alcoholism in his room at the Astor House.(Curse of the Misbegotten; http://www.eoneill.com/library/curse/xvii.htm; Croswell Bowen, The Curse of the Misbegotten: A Tale of the House of ONeill (McGrawHill, 1959):188; Brian Rogers, ONeill in France The Eugene ONeill Review 26 (2004); http://www.eoneill.com/library/review/26/26b.htm) 19301939 * French author and anti-imperialist politician Malraux,(Andr (Georges) Malraux (19011976), http://www.kirjasto.sci.fi/malraux.htm) stayed at the Astor House in 1931,(Dominique Auzias, Sverine Bardon, and Jean-Paul Labourdette, Le Petit Fut Chine (Petit Fut, 2005):241.) while researching material for his Goncourt award winning 1933 novel,(Michel Dye, Andre Malraux and the Temptation of the Orient in La Condition Humaine Journal of European Studies 29 (1999).) Fate (French: La Condition humaine), about the massacre of 1927;* American journalist and author Helen Foster, who married Snow in 1932, stayed in Room 303 at the Astor House upon her arrival in Shanghai in 1931;(Helen Foster Snow, My China Years: A Memoir (Morrow, 1984):2123; Kelly Ann Long, Helen Foster Snow: An American Woman in Revolutionary China (University Press of Colorado, 2006):31.)* American humorist and actor Rogers spent his only Christmas away from his family at the Astor House Hotel in 1931;(Betty Rogers, Will Rogers (Reissue: University of Oklahoma Press, 1979):263.)* Otto Braun, a German Comintern secret agent, stayed in the Astor House for several weeks in the autumn of 1932;(Otto Braun, A Comintern Agent in China 19321939 (Stanford University Press, 1982):1; Harrison Evans Salisbury, The Long March: The Untold Story (Harper & Row, 1985):39.)* Italian scientist Marchese Marconi, the inventor of the wireless, stayed in Room 8103 at the Astor House Hotel in 1933;(* Bernard Shaw (18561959), Irish-born British playwright, politician and winner of the Prize in Literature in 1925, visited the Astor House Hotel with Ching-ling, the widow of Yat-sen, on 17 February 1933;(Eastday-George Bernard Shaw)* Noted University historian M. Schlesinger, Sr., his wife, and two sons, including future Prize winning historian M. Schlesinger, Jr. stayed at the Astor House Hotel in October 1933.(Arthur Meier Schlesinger, A Life in the Twentieth Century: Innocent Beginnings, 19171950 (Houghton Mifflin Harcourt, 2002):98.)* On 25 March 1934 Courtney Chauncey C.C. Julian, former president of the failed Julian Petroleum Company of Los Angeles, who had skipped bail of US$25,000 for mail fraud charges and fled to China,(Julian Will Fight Extradition Move: Difficulties Loom as Oil Man Found in Shanghai Claims Canadian Nationality. Charges He was Framed. Promoters Former Lawyer in Oklahoma, Surety on Bond, Going to China to Seek Return, The New York Times (26 April 1933):9; Julian Broke: Faces Eviction. Promoters Credit Cut Off by Shanghai Hotel, Los Angeles Times (11 September 1933):3.) staged a banquet for friends at the Shanghai Astor House, during which he excused himself, went to his room, and committed suicide(William Marling, The American Roman Noir: Hammett, Cain and Chandler (University of Georgia Press, 1998):283; Fugitive Oil Man Suicide in Shanghai: C.C. Julian, Wanted Here on Mail Fraud Charges, Takes Poison in Hotel. Fled Country a Year Ago. Promoter Jumped $25,000 Bail, The New York Times (25 March 1934):1.) by taking poison, during a glittering dinner party with a woman,(3 Million Oil Fugitive Kills Self by Poison: Ends Own Life, Chicago Daily Tribune (25 March 1934):1; Julian then moved his twenty-one-year-old secretary and girlfriend Leonora Levy to the Weida Hotel and checked into room 300 at the Astor House. (See Daniel S. Levy, Two-Gun Cohen(St. Martins Press, 2002):181.)) and was subsequently buried in a grave;(Friends to Bury Julian, Penniless at His Death: Dinner Companion Who Also Took Poison Says Fugitive Promoter Told Her of Suicide Plans. Los Angeles Times (26 March 1934):1; Carey McWilliams, Southern California: An Island on the Land, 9th ed. (Gibbs Smith, 1994):245246; Jules Tygiel, The Scandal: What a Money-Gusher Special to The Los Angeles Times (3 December 2006 ); http://www.latimes.com/news/local/history/la-et-125depression3dec03,0,2189468.story . Retrieved 13 April 2009.)* On 20 July 1936, Marshall Smith Hairston (c. 18961936), American factory manager of the Pudong branch of the Yee Tsoong branch of the American Tobacco was found dead in room 302 of the Astor House;(The China Monthly Review 77 (1936):285; http://www.powerhousemuseum.com/collection/database/?irn151033; http://boards.ancestry.com/localities.northam.usa.states.virginia.counties.henry/5086/mb.ashx?pnt1)* Dr. Robert K. Reischauer, professor of international relations at the Wilson School at University on a study tour of China, had stayed at the Astor House Hotel for a few days in August 1937, before deciding on 14 August to evacuate to the Palace Hotel believing the latter, farther from the Japanese center of operations, would be safer,(Missiles Hit Crowd in Street, The Evening Independent Petersburg, Florida (14 August 1937):2; http://news.google.com/newspapers?idjqkLAAAAIBAJ&sjidK1UDAAAAIBAJ&pg2274,2836784&dqastor-house-hotel+shanghai) only to be killed in the lobby of the Hotel later that day by a bomb dropped from a Chinese plane during the of Shanghai,(Missiles Hit Crowd in Street, The Evening Independent (14 August 1937):12.) making him one of the first U.S. WWII casualties;(Jonathan Dresner, Attempting Analogy: Japanese Manchuria and Occupied Iraq, History News Network (31 May 2004); http://hnn.us/articles/5247.html)* On 17 March 1939 Japanese gangster Kodama, later prominent Yakuza figure, began his stay at the Astor House. At 12 a day, meals not included, he found the hotel expensive, yet comfortable.(Kathryn Meyer and Terry Parssinen, Webs of Smoke: Smugglers, Warlords and the History of the International Drug Trade (Rowman & Littlefield, 2002):200.) Unconfirmed guests Historian Peter Hibbard indicates that In the early years of the 20th century the anarchic and flamboyant Astor House played host to a potpourri of regal guests.(Hibbard, Bund, 217.) The following are people that some have claimed have stayed at the Astor House Hotel in Shanghai, but for whom there is no supporting evidence. In fact, as Mark ONeill wrote in 2006 in relation to the claims of the Astor House Hotel: historians suspect some of them stayed elsewhere in the city.(Mark ONeill, Bund to Happen: As Host of the 2010 World Expo, Shanghai is Hanging the Expense to Return this Symbol of Prosperity to its Former Glory, South China Morning Post (11 February 2006); http://www.skyscrapercity.com/showthread.php?t316879)* Various members of the Japanese Imperial family;(* Nicholas II, the last czar of Russia;(* Heinrich of Prussia;(* Khan III,( who visited Shanghai in 1900;(Aga Khan III, The Memoirs of Aga Khan: World Enough and Time (Simon and Schuster, 1954):126-128.)* Prince of Phitsanulok of Siam (3 March 188313 June 1920);(* While former United States president S. Grant stayed in Shanghai for two days in 1879,(ARRIVAL IN SHANGHAI, Chicago Daily Tribune (June 29, 1879):3.)(John Russell Young, Around the World with General Grant, abridged by Michael Fellman (JHU Press, 2002):341; An Old Army Officer Ralph Abarbanell, Life and Memoirs of Gen. Ulysses S. Grant: Being a Full Record of his Early Days, His Military Achievements during the War, His Two Administrations as President of the United States, His Tour Around the World (New York: Norman L. Munro, 1885); and W.H. Hicks, General Grants Tour Around the World (Chicago: Rand McNally, 1879).) some (including the Hotel itself)(Hall of Fame, http://www.pujianghotel.com/e-cn-6.htm; and many, including Wasserstrom, 57;) claim that he stayed in Room 410,(The Hotel indicates it was in 1897, but according to contemporary sources Grant visited Shanghai in May 1879.) but there is no compelling contemporaneous evidence to substantiate this oft-repeated assertion. Historian Peter Hibbard disputes the claim: Although the current management would have us believe that ex-president Ulysses S. Grant stayed there, two years into his familys round the world tour in 1879, he actually didnt;(Hibbard, Bund, 117.)* The Astor House Hotel claims that Welsh philosopher, mathematician and logician Russell stayed in Room 310 in 1920.( However, another source indicates that Russell was in Shanghai from 12 October to 20 October 1920, and stayed at room 103 in the Yipinxiang Hotel (the present junction of Middle Xizang Road and Hankou Road).(Eastday-Bertrand Russell) Russells time in China influenced his 1922 book, The Problem of China;(Bertrand Russell, The Problem of China (London: George Allen & Unwin, 1922).)* Enlai, the first of the Peoples Republic of China, has a room named after him at the Astor House Hotel, where according to an legend he hid in the Astor House when he was a Communist agitator in the 1920s;(Rob Gifford, China Road: A Journey into the Future of a Rising Power (Random House, 2007):4; http://ispyshanghai.com/2009/03/30/astor-house-hotel)* American composer and pianist Joplin (b. 24 November 1868; d. 1 April 1917) is alleged to have stayed at the Astor House both in 1931 and 1936 in Room 404, and has one of the four celebrity rooms named in his honour(Sharon Owyang, Frommers Shanghai, 4th ed. (John Wiley and Sons, 2006):86.) but his death in 1917 invalidates this assertion.* The management of the Astor House claims British comedian Chaplin,() came to Shanghai with Goddard, where they stayed in Room 404 from 5 February 1936,(http://hkq.sh.gov.cn/webfront_en/sub_news.aspx?cid462; It may have been from 9 March 1936. It is quite possible that Chaplin visited Shanghai earlier, in 1931 while on his first world tour that took him to Europe, Africa and Japan. The Astor Hotel on Huangpu Road claims Chaplin stayed in Room 404 in 1931 though there are no official records of that trip; see This Little Tramp Wears Panties Shanghai Daily (25 December 2007):C4; http://www.snakeoilproductions.com/images/Shanghai%20Daily%20Lauren.pdf) however the Hotel also claims Chaplin and Goddard stayed there during that visit. Hibbard indicates: As Chaplin was a friend of Sir Sassoon,... Sir Victors cousin, there would be little doubt where he stayed in Shanghai.(Hibbard, Bund, 238.) Notable residents Among those who resided at the hotel for a significant period are:* Australian journalist Pickwoad, who took over the ownership of the North China Herald after his arrival in Shanghai in August 1860, and also founded the daily China Daily News in 1864, and served for some time as secretary of the Municipal Council, resided at the Astor House Hotel;(* Johannes von Gumpach (died at Shanghai, 31 July 1875), a German-born, British-naturalized professor of mathematics and astronomy, fired from the Imperial Wen College (or Interpreters College), and litigant against Hart in the Supreme Court for China and Japan, which was appealed to the Council in Britain, was residing at the Astor in 1871 while he wrote the controversial The Burlinghame Mission: a Political Disclosure;(Johannes von Gumpach, The Burlingame Mission: A Political Disclosure Supported by Official Documents, Mostly Unpublished (Shanghai, London and New York, 1872); Robert Hart, The I. G. in Peking: Letters of Robert Hart, Chinese Maritime Customs, Vol. One: 18681907, eds. John King Fairbank, Katherine Frost Bruner, Elizabeth MacLeod Matheson, and James Duncan Campbell (Harvard University Press, 1975):69.)* Former States of America General Doby Kennedy, American Consul General in Shanghai from 1886 to 1889, resided at the Astor House;(H.G.F., The Trip to the East, Boston Evening Transcript (October 20, 1888):5.)* American journalist Julian Ralph (born May 27, 1858; died January 20, 1903 in New York City),(Death of Julian Ralph, The New York Times (January 21, 1903), http://query.nytimes.com/mem/archive-free/pdf?resF70816F93B5412738DDDA80A94D9405B838CF1D3) who was China correspondent for Weekly during the Sino-Japanese War from 1894;(Mr. Ralphs Story of the Affair, The New York Times (November 28, 1894), http://query.nytimes.com/mem/archive-free/pdf?resFB0D15FC355515738DDDA10A94D9415B8485F0D3)(Harpers Weekly 38 (Harpers Magazine Co., 1894):1143.)(Julian Ralph, Alone in China, and Other Stories (Harper & brothers, 1896).)* Lithuanian Jewish convert to Christianity Isaac Joseph Schereschewsky, former Anglican Bishop of Shanghai, and founder of Johns University, Shanghai, who completed a translation of the Bible into Chinese in 1875, resided at the Astor House Hotel from 1895;(Irene Eber, The Jewish Bishop and the Chinese Bible: S.I.J. Schereschewsky (18311906) (BRILL, 1999):156.)* British chemist Henry Glendinning (born 9 October 1863 at Hartlepool; died 4 June 1938 at St. Albans, Herts.) of Mond,(Glendinning travelled extensively (China, Korea, Japan and Russia) on behalf of the company 18981900. He was awarded C.B.E. 1918 for war work with explosives. See The Glendinning Family (3 May 2000); http://user.itl.net/~glen/Glendinnings.html (accessed 9 July 2009); and Alex Glendenning, The Whittingham Family, South Cheshire FHS (1994); http://user.itl.net/~glen/Whittinghams.html) resided at the Astor House for two years from 1899;(Patrick Brodie, Crescent over Cathay: China and ICI, 1898 to 1956 (Oxford University Press, 1990):5; ICI Celebrates 100 years in China, Plastics & Rubber Asia (1 March 1999).)* American conman Frederick W. Sutterlee, who defrauded customers of Kern Sutterlee & Co in Philadelphia in 1896, and fled to China, smuggled guns to the Philippine insurgents in the War, and used the name W.F. Sylvester, and became a correspondent for Londons Daily Mail, resided at the Astor House Hotel by 1900.(George Ernest Morrison, The Correspondence of G. E. Morrison: Vol. 1: 18951912, ed. Hui-min Lo (CUP Archive, 1976):148149; Peter Thompson and Robert Macklin, The Man Who Died Twice: The Life and Adventures of Morrison of Peking (Allen & Unwin, 2004):199.)* Australian journalist Henry Donald (18751946), editor of the Eastern Review (19111920), adviser to Yat-sen and Kai-shek, resided at the Astor House for the two years he lived in Shanghai from 1911;(Winston G. Lewis, Donald, William Henry (18751946), Australian Dictionary of Biography, Vol. 8. (Melbourne University Press, 1981):317318; http://adbonline.anu.edu.au/biogs/A080340b.htm; Jonathan Fenby, Chiang Kai Shek: Chinas Generalissimo and the Nation He Lost (Reprint: Perseus Books Group, 2005):209.)* American journalist Franklin Fairfax Millard lived at the hotel from 1911 during his years in Shanghai as founder and editor of The China News and later The China Weekly Review.(Paul French, Carl Crow  a tough old China hand: The Life, Times and Adventures of an American in Shanghai (Hong Kong University Press, 2007):30. Hibbard suggests his residency commenced in 1900. See Hibbard, Bund, 117.)* American journalist B. Powell, took up residence in 1917;(* Chin-tao, the Vice Minister of Finance for the Qing government, and later Finance Minister under Shikai, first elected president of the of China.(Frederick McCormick, The Flowery Republic (New York: D. Appleton & Co., 1913):224, 283.)* Polish-born Jewish Cockney adventurer Morris Cohen, known as Two-Gun Cohen, bodyguard and aide-de-camp to Yat-sen, resided in Room 305 at the Astor House Hotel in Shanghai after 1922;(Daniel S. Levy, Two-Gun Cohen: A Biography (St. Martins Press, 2002):116, 168, 181)* Italian Maestro Paci (born 4 June 1878 in Italy), pianist and conductor for the Symphony Orchestra from 1919 to 1942, and his family resided at the Astor House from at least 1925;(Floria Paci Zaharoff, The Daughter of the Maestro: Life in Surabaya, Shanghai, And Florence (iUniverse, 2005):134.)* In 1927, an eight-year-old girl named Margaret Peggy Hookham came to live at the Astor House with her family. Hookhams father was the chief engineer for American Tobacco, which was located just over the Garden bridge on then Museum Road. While at the Astor House Hotel, Peggy continued her ballet lessons, studying with the Russian teachers Goncharev, and eventually took as her name, Fonteyn, perhaps the worlds greatest ballerina.(Five-star legend, Shanghai Daily News (18 April 2005); http://english.eastday.com/eastday/englishedition/node20665/node20667/node22808/node45576/node45577/userobject1ai1026003.html . Retrieved 11 April 2009.)* American journalist Snow, author of Star Over China, from 1928;(* Future American journalist and spy for Soviet Russia(Biography: Mark Gayn) Gayn and his parents, Russian Jews, lived at the Astor House in the late 1920s until his Father deduced that the hotels were being constantly watched by foreign and Chinese police;(Mark Gayn, Journey from the East: An Autobiography (A. A. Knopf, 1944):122.) References 
26058467
Martin_Ruz_de_Beaulieu
Martin Ruz de Beaulieu, Lord of Beaulieu of Longjumeau and Chilly (c. 1526, Tours &ndash; November 6, 1613, Paris) was a French politician of the late sixteenth and early seventeenth century, who was Secretary of State of the Maison du Roi (or Kings Secretary) under III of France, IV of France and XIII.Biography He was the son of William Ruz, Adviser to the Parliament, and Catherine Briconnet. He was the son of another William Ruz, Lord of Beaulieu, Receiver General of Touraine, Mayor of Tours in 1534. He had a brother, also named William Ruz (born about 1520 and died September 28, 1587), who was confessor and adviser of kings Henry II, Charles IX and Henri III, who was appointed bishop of Saint-Malo 1570, then bishop of Angers August 29, 1572.He began his career in the entourage of the king in 1551, with Henry II.  From 1571 to 1588 he was general superintendent of ammunition and food. In 1573-1574 he was secretary to the King of Poland and in that capacity, he countersigned and raised the royal seal on the letters of King. In August 1574 he was appointed fifth secretary of state.He became, September 25, 1576, advisor of the king and his secretary Finance, and to the Queen Mother (de Medici). In 1578, after the resignation of Louis Valley, he was provided with the load controller of the Chancellery.On April 10, 1589, he became Grand Treasurer of the Order of the Holy Spirit to replace the former Secretary of State de Neufville, seigneur de Villeroy, in disgrace, and he retained that office until his death.On April 15, 1589, he installed, for Henry III, de Mornay in the office of Governor of Saumur. The ceremony took place in front of the arbor: Florent Lessart, the former governor, faithful to Henry III brought the keys of the city, but out of spite and shame, he dropped to the ground. It is the kings secretary, who then picked up and presented them to the new governor.In 1590, when Henri IV  unsuccessfully besieged Laon, faithful to the Catholic League, which was then headed by the Duke of Mayenne, the king had with him, Potier de Gesvres and Revol, while Forget de Fresnes was in Paris. In 1596, he bought land Longjumeau, Gaillard. Having no children, he bequeathed his property to Coffier de Ruz, Marquis Effiat, his nephew, who later became Superintendent of Finance (1626) and Marshal of France (1631).In 1601, during the reign of Henry IV, he was appointed Grand Master of Mining and de Beringhen comptroller-general. Sully ordered them to form a committee to study and conduct excavations in the kingdom of France.On March 3, 1606, Henri IV gets him enlisting Antoine Lomenie, Adviser to the King in his Councils, Cabinet Secretary, who had long been his chief clerk, to relieve him in his task, Because of his age. August 26, 1609, he established a will to his heir nephew Coffier de Ruz dEffiat, on condition of taking the name and arms of Ruze.  He died November 6, 1613.The black marble tomb, topped by a statue of the deceased kneeling, can be seen in the church of de Chilly-Mazarin. Ruz de Beaulieu
26086809
Aristotle,_Inc.
Aristotle, Inc. is a U.S. company founded and led by brothers John Aristotle Phillips and Dean Aristotle Phillips in 1983, specializing in data-mining voter data for political campaigns.( )See also* VocusReferences
26107794
Charles_L._Tutt,_Sr.
Charles Leaming Tutt I, and his descendants are famous in Springs. He became a wealthy man by the time he was forty years old.BiographyHe was born February 14, 1864 in Philadelphia, as a son of a respected doctor, Charles Pendleton Tutt, and Rebecca Leaming. His father died of typhus when he was only two years old. The Tutt familys roots stretch back to England, where one ancestor was once Mayor of London and another was a member of General George Washingtons staff during the Civil War.As a child, Charles L. (I) attended the Protestant Academy, where he met Penrose, nicknamed Speck, who would later become Colorados best-known mining mogul. The two boys shared another trait: both of their fathers were physicians.While Penrose went on to attend University, the death of Tutts father forced him to quit school at an early age. Meanwhile he earned some money as a clerk for the Railroad.Somehow he landed in Platte, Nebraska, and lost $500 in a business venture. Then he moved on to Black Forest, Paso County, Colorado, where he bought a cattle ranch in 1884. In 1885, Tutt sold two cows to earn the return fare to Philadelphia, where he married Josephine Thayer on 29 December 1885, daughter of Martin Russell Thayer, a jurist who had served in President Abraham Lincolns administration. They relocated to Colorado, and a year after moving to the Black Forest ranch, Josephine convinced her husband to sell out and move to Colorado Springs to start a real estate and insurance business. With Josephine Thayer he had four children, three of them died young. This son, Charles Leaming Tutt (II), born January 9, 1889, died November 1, 1961, was the only one who lived to adulthood.Life at Colorado SpringsThe Tutt family lived at 611 North Weber Street, which by then, was a two-story gingerbread house with a combination barn and buggy shed in the rear. Tutts one-room business office was at 14 East Pikes Peak Avenue, Colorado Springs. After opening a branch office in Colorado, in 1889, Tutt visited Creek, walked up Poverty Gulch and stake out a mining claim. Once the claim was staked, a prospector, who held half interest in the mine, sold his half interest to Tutt for $50. Tutt was now the owner of the Cash on Delivery mine, the C.O.D. mine, but had no money to develop it. Charles Tutt, together with C. Findley and A. Carlton, all big players in the future of the mining district at Creek, Colorado, set up the C.O.D. Gold Mining Company, incorporated on February 26, 1892, as a Colorado corporation. Later that year, geologist Richard Penrose, Spencer Penroses brother, travelled through Colorado Springs, met with Tutt and asked him to write to Spencer and encourage him to relocate to Colorado Springs for its business opportunities.Mining BusinessSpencer Penrose, who had already mined for gold in Mexico, received a letter from Tutt in 1892 extolling the virtues of Colorado Springs. In spite of the fact that the two had not seen each other for at least 10 years, Penrose decided to take the opportunity and arrived in Colorado Springs by train December 10, 1892. Two days later, Tutt offered Penrose half interest in his real estate business for $500, as well as 1/16 interest in the Cash on Delivery mine in return for raising $10,000 to pay miners and buy equipment.Lucky for all, the gold vein in the C.O.D. mine was discovered. In 1894, Charles sold the C.O.D. mine for $250,000. He and Spencer decided to go into another business together. They found that milling ore was better way to make money that mining ore. Along with Charles M. MacNeill, they started the Colorado-Philadelphia Reduction Company and did very well with this business. The company operated a barrel-chlorinating ore mill at City. Charles M. MacNeill had already experience in running a barrel-chlorinating ore mill, since MacNeill, Captain De Lamar, W. Peirce (of the Fleece Mine (Colorado)), and some other mining men, owned interest in a barrel-chlorinating plant mill at Lawrence, the first in Colorado, which burned down in 1895.Charles jumped into mining again, but this time he mined for copper. With his friend, Spencer, C. Jackling, and some other men involved, the Copper Company was organized in 1903. Their open pit copper mine was the richest in the country. It was this mine that made him a millionaire.Charles Tutt did much to help plan and develop the city of Colorado Springs. Charles and Spencer converted the riding academy on the Hotel.Charles died young on 21 January 1909 at the Hotel, New York, at age 45. His son, Charles L. Tutt (II) (as well as his own sons), carried on his fathers legacy contributing much to the city of Colorado Springs and to College.ReferencesAn account of his life, written by Joan E. Grant and Carole Hiegert.Kathleen Wallace: The New Falcon Herald, Vol. 7, No.2, February 2010.Nancy Shakeshaft-Slack: Charles Tutt, one of Colorado Springs Pioneers, publ. at Colorado Springs Vintage Homes Blog.SourcesThomas J. Noel and Cathleen M. Norman: A Pikes Peak Partnership: The Penroses and the Tutts. Boulder: University Press of Colorado, 2001. xii + 264 pp. ill. ISBN 9780870816093.Denise R. W. Oldach (Ed.): Here Lies Colorado Springs. Colorado Springs: Fittje Brothers Printing Company, 1995.
26129639
Jayne_Walton_Rosen
Jayne Walton Rosen (August 28, 1917 - January 10, 2010) was an American entertainer, singer and actress, who worked as Welks Lady from 1940 until 1945.()Rosen was born Jayne Flanagan in Antonio, Texas, on August 28, 1917.( However, she was largely raised in Torren, Coahuila, where her father worked for a silver mining company.( Her mother was a pianist and her sister was a dancer.( Rosen was influenced by Mexican culture early in life, learning Spanish and noting the countrys sharp class divisions.She attended Brackenridge High School in Antonio, Texas.( Flanagan performed at talent shows around San Antonio, including the Majestic Theatre, under the stage name, Jayne Walton.( She began singing at local stations in San Antonio, beforing moving on to stations in City, Dallas and Chicago.( One of her radio performances was heard by musician Welk, who asked Walton to join his band, the Welk Orchestra.(Welk named Walton as his Champagne Lady in the early 1940s during War II.( Walton, who could sing in Spanish due to her childhood in Coahuila, recorded the song Elena with Welk, which was certified gold.(Walton left the Lawrence Welk Orchestra in the mid-1940s to pursue a solo singing career.( She enjoyed success in Chicago and York City.( She largely retired from the professional entertainment circuit in 1952, when she married her husband and adopted the name Jayne Walton Rosen.( She continued to make guest appearances on Welks long-running show, Lawrence Welk Show.(Rosen later worked as a salesperson at the Rhodes store and Dillards at the Central Park Mall.( She retired circa 1990.(Rosen remained in good health throughout most of her life.  However, she suffered from failing health during her later years, including disease and kidney disease, which required dialysis.( She also broke her hip in a fall.(Jayne Walton Rosen died in San Antonio on January 10, 2010, at the age of 92.( She was survived by her son, Daniel Rosen, a law professor in Tokyo; grandchildren,  Daniel Rosen Jr. and Allison Rosen; and former daughter-in-law, Sheri Rosen.  She was buried in San Fernando Cemetery No. 3.(ReferencesExternal links*
26153871
Emma_Roberto_Steiner
Emma Roberto Steiner (1852 - February 27, 1929) was an American composer and conductor. She was one of the first women in the United States to make a living from conducting, and did so at more than 6,000 performances during her lifetime. Her career spanned nearly five decades, from the 1870s, when she first began conducting for touring opera companies, until her death in 1929. In the early 1900s, she took a decade-long hiatus from her musical career to move to Alaska, where she was a prospector and traveler. Steiner wrote hundreds of musical pieces, including seven operas, and conducted more than 6,000 performances.BiographySteiner was born in Maryland, in 1852. Her father, Colonel Steiner, was a Mexican War hero and her mother an accomplished pianist. Thus, she was exposed to music at a young age, composing songs by age 7 and a piano duet at 9. Others recognized her talents early, and even suggested to her father that he send her to Paris to study music, but her parents refused and did not encourage her to develop the talent. She nonetheless continued composing, starting on an opera at age 11, Aminaide, one scene of which was produced at the Conservatory, a prominent music school in Baltimore that Steiner was not able to attend.()Music historians are unsure exactly how or when in happened, but by the age of 21, Steiner had left her family behind to pursue her musical career. She moved to Chicago, where she became assistant music director at a small opera company. In the following years, she worked as a conductor for a series of touring light opera companies that performed and Sullivan and other comic operas that were popular during that period. In 1889 and again in 1891, her opera Fleurette was produced to good reviews.( Steiner rose to further prominence when one of her compositions was performed at the 1893 Chicago Columbian Exhibition.( The next year, she conducted a performance of her own works in York City by the well-respected Seidl Orchestra.(Despite a bout of pneumonia in 1896, Steiner continued to conduct, compose, and perform. Soon after the turn of the century, however, she experienced a series of tragedies. A 1902 warehouse fire in New York destroyed many of her works, including the only remaining copy of her first opera. She experienced another, more severe illness that affected her eyesight.( And in 1909, she filed a lawsuit after the death of her father, who had remarried after her mothers death and had written Steiner out of his will in preference to his stepdaughter.()Around this time, Steiner left her career behind, and moved to Alaska. There, she became traveler and a prospector in the tin mining fields northwest of Nome, where she was the first white woman to enter, and where she discovered important tin deposits.( Following her return after nearly a decade, she became an advocate for Alaska, often giving talks about the state. She again turned to music, and continued writing and performing into the 1920s. The Opera held a special performance of her works in 1925, the last time a woman would conduct there until 1976. She also helped found a home for elderly and infirm musicians, to which she dedicated the proceeds of some of her later concerts. In its obituary after her death on February 27, 1929, The New York Times claimed that the stress of running the home had brought on the collapse that ended her life.(During her career, Steiner conducted more than 6,000 performances of operas, operettas, and other works including a number of her own.() She wrote hundreds of musical pieces, including seven operas.( In addition to her original works she is credited along with B. Nichols as being among the first women in the United States to make a successful career out of conducting musical performances.()References
26166050
Thomas_Ballantyne_Martin
Thomas Ballantyne Martin (13 November 1901 &ndash; 28 January 1995) was a British politician, stockbroker and journalist. After an early career as a private secretary he was unexpectedly elected as a Conservative of Parliament in a strongly Labour constituency. After standing up in Parliament for the local mining industry he opted out of defending his seat, and could not find election elsewhere; he then became a political journalist. After wartime service in intelligence, he supported Churchills attempt to bring European unity and then became a stockbroker. A very clubbable man, he attracted interest in the 1990s as a rare survivor of the pre-Second World War Parliament.EducationMartin was the son of Angus Martin, a surgeon from Hall in Northumberland; his mother Robina was from Wooler.(MARTIN, Thomas Ballantyne, Who Was Who, A & C Black, 19202008; online edn, Oxford University Press, Dec 2007, accessed 11 Feb 2010.) He grew up in the borders area but went to School boarding school, and later matriculated at Jesus College, Cambridge(Thomas Martin (Obituary), The Times, 7 February 1995.) where he graduated with a Master of Arts.(Election in BlaydonDuring the 1920s Martin worked as a private secretary,(The Times House of Commons 1931, p. 71.) and was on the staff of the Turkish Embassy in London as its English Secretary in 1928 and in 1930-31. He undertook a lecture tour of Germany in 1929.(Michael Stenton and Stephen Lees, Whos Who of British MPs Vol III, Harvester Press, 1979, p. 239.) In October 1931, when the general election was already underway, he was adopted as Conservative Party candidate for the constituency of Blaydon in Durham;(New Candidates, The Times, 14 October 1931, p. 7, although his name was inaccurately given as Martin, P.B..) the seat had a Labour majority of 13,374( and was thought absolutely safe. However Martin was elected with a majority of 496 as part of the landslide election victory of the National Government; his win was the only time that the seat had been won by a Conservative.(Unparliamentary languageMartins first recorded contribution in the chamber of the House of Commons came in December 1931 during bad tempered scenes. Angered by opposition Members jeering at Prime Minister MacDonald he was overheard by Labour MP MacEntee shouting out Lie down, dog!; MacEntee raised a of order and challenged him to repeat it outside. The Deputy Speaker Robert Bourne pronounced it unparliamentary and urged Martin to restrain his exuberance.(Hansard, House of Commons, 5th series, vol 260 col 1911.)Mining industryIn Parliament, Martin concentrated on issues which affected the working lives of his mining constituents. In May 1932 he made his speech on the Coal Mines Bill, urging a system where the mine owner had a guaranteed profit, while the miner had a guaranteed minimum wage, with additions according to the business  done. He also endorsed a voluntary national levy on the coal trade in order to help exports.(Parliament, The Times, 31 May 1932, p. 8.) He accepted that other industries should not be sacrificed to help the coal trade,(Parliament, The Times, 2 May 1933, p. 8.) but urged that operating theatres be set up near to mines to help miners who had suffered industrial accidents.(Parliament, The Times, 3 March 1934; p. 7.)Martin moved an amendment to the 1933 Budget to limit the tax on hydrocarbon oils to no more than 10%. The Government opposed his amendment and the House of Commons rejected it by 228 to 58.(Parliament, The Times, 20 June 1933, p. 9.) He also voted against the Government and in support of an amendment to remove the profits of Co-operative Societies from tax.(Political Notes, The Times, 23 May 1933, p. 14.) He initially supported the National Governments efforts to help distressed areas, urging that the grants be continued until the Unemployment Act replaced them,(Parliament, The Times, 28 February 1934, p. 7.) but by December 1934 was disappointed on behalf of himself and other younger supporters of the Government to find the latest proposals which would not help the basic industries. Martin stated that he could not go back to depressed areas in his constituency and tell them that the Governments policy was a solution to all their problems.(Parliament, The Times, 4 December 1934, p. 7.)GermanyWhile a Member of Parliament, Martin visited Germany where he met leading Nazis Hitler, Goering and Goebbels; he was invited to a rally, but also visited Dachau. When he returned to Britain, Martin warned fellow Members of Parliament about the dangers of Nazism.( He was one of 31 Members of Parliament to sign a letter endorsing an All-India Federation with provincial autonomy as a way forward of constitutional reform in India.(Views On Indian Policy, The Times, 11 May 1933, p. 14.)1935 electionHe was also much preoccupied with pushing forward a new constitution for the of Durham.(Parliament, The Times, 1 May 1935, p. 7.) Preparing for the next general election, Martin decided not to defend Blaydon, but was instead adopted as candidate for Camberwell North in inner south London in May 1935.(M.P. as Prospective Candidate, The Times, 23 May 1935, p. 18.) The sitting MP Arthur Bateman had stepped down although at one stage considered standing for neighbouring Peckham as an Independent candidate.(Straight Fight at Peckham, The Times, 4 November 1935, p. 18.)At the previous election, Camberwell North had produced a Conservative majority of 765, almost as small as at Blaydon. Martin joined the other Conservative candidates for Camberwell divisions in inviting Churchill to speak for them;(Mr. Churchill to Speak at Camberwell, The Times, 29 October 1935, p. 9.) but observers expected that the leading Labour personality Ammon would succeed in regaining the seat he had lost four years previously.(Contests In South London, The Times, 8 November 1935, p. 9.) Martin was in the end beaten by nearly two to one, with a substantial majority of 5,777 against him.(The Times House of Commons 1935, p. 35.)Daily Telegraph journalistAfter losing his seat, Martin returned to the Palace of Westminster the next year as a political correspondent of Daily Telegraph, where he remained until 1940.( He was also assistant editor of Spectator, becoming a regular houseguest of Lady Londonderry and of the Astor family at Cliveden.( He was a liaison officer between the Foreign Office and the BBC(The Times House of Commons 1945, p. 79.) and then volunteered for military service during the Second World War, becoming a Squadron Leader in the Middle East Intelligence Centre (part of the Air Force Volunteer Reserve) from 1940 to 1943, then leaving the services to become adviser on public relations to the United Kingdom High Commissioner in Australia where he remained until the end of the war.(European unityIn the 1945 general election, Martin was the Conservative Party candidate in Houghton-le-Spring where he was defeated by 21,866 votes.( Martin then became secretary of the United European Movement in 1947, working closely with Winston Churchill for a year before becoming Secretary of the British all-party delegation to the Congress of Europe at Hague in 1948. There Churchill developed his support for European unity, an attitude of which Martin approved. Martin regretted that Churchill did not maintain his enthusiasm when he returned to government in 1951.(Later lifeMartin developed his career by becoming a member of the Stock Exchange in 1949, but retained his interest in politics and contributed many letters to newspapers.( In 1953 he married for the first time, Jean Bennett; they had two daughters.( In 1964 Martin and Dr Goodson-Wickes reformed the Kit Cat Club as an attempt to restart an 18th century Whig dining club; it gathered a significant membership, many of whom entered public life (Dr Goodson-Wickes himself became a Member of Parliament).( After his retirement from the Stock Exchange in 1974,( Martin moved back to the borders area of Northumberland where he lived at Naworth Keep and Castle. He retained his membership of Pratts Club where he was said to be in his element leading the conversation at the head of the table; so welcome was he at the club that when he resigned his membership owing to the decreasing number of visits to London, the club proprietor the Duke of Devonshire refused to accept it and waived the subscription in order to keep him.(In 1990 the Speaker of the House of Commons Weatherill held a dinner in honour of the 23 remaining pre-war MPs at which Martin was one of the star guests; he was interviewed by the BBC afterwards.( He appeared in a 1994 documentary on Westminster at War which interviewed the survivors of the era about what political life was like.() He remained mentally alert but in his later years became physically infirm, which he recognised as a downward glide to a serene death.(ReferencesExternal links* 
26194906
Frank_Allen_(footballer)
 goals9  ?:This article is about the professional English footballer. For other persons named Frank Allen, see the disambiguation page.Frank Allen (5 May 1901  30 October 1989) was an English professional footballer who played as an forward. Originally a coal miner by trade, he became a full-time footballer at the age of 24 and went on to play profesisonally for the next 11 years.( He played for six different teams in Football League, making over 230 league appearances in total.Personal lifeAllen was born on 5 May 1901 in Altofts, West Yorkshire and was brought up in a mining background, which was typical of the area at the time. He started working Altofts Colliery in 1919 and played part-time football for the colliery. After his retirement from football, he returned to the mines, working at Ollerton Colliery from 1937. He regularly played golf and was a keen gardener, entering several flower shows and gardening competitions. In his later years, he lived in Ravenshead in Nottinghamshire. Allen died from pneumonia on 30 October 1989 at the age of 88.()Football careerAllen left Altofts in 1925 to join amateur side Castleford Town, who played in the Football League. Castleford finished bottom of the division in the 192526 campaign, but Allens performances had attracted professional clubs to secure his signature, and he joined League Second Division side Barnsley in February 1926 at the age of 24.( He scored two goals in his first 10 matches with Barnsley, but despite playing as an inside forward he failed to get on the scoresheet in the next two seasons and was released by the club at the end of the 192728 season having scored two goals in 68 league matches.()Upon his release by Barnsley, Allen joined Bangor City in August 1928, but remained at the club for only six months before transferring to Second Division outfit Clapton Orient. He failed to make a single first-team appearance for Orient as they were relegated in 192829 and left to sign for League Third Division North side Southport in June 1929. He spent one season at Southport, scoring six goals in 31 league games.(In August 1930, Allen moved to fellow Third Division North club Nelson on a free transfer. He made his debut for the team on 30 August 1930 in the 45 away defeat to Rochdale.( He played 17 first-team games for Nelson and scored once, in an Cup tie. Nelson struggled in the league in the 193031 season, eventually failing re-election at the end of the campaign, and Allen departed the club to join Barrow in January 1931. He was converted into a half during his time at Street and his goalscoring rate was significantly increased as he scored seven goals in his first 18 league matches. Allen left Barrow in August 1933, having played 67 matches and scored 11 goals for the club.( Prior to the start of the 193334 season, Allen signed for New Brighton where he played for two seasons, netting 18 times in 51 games, the most prolific period of his career. In 1935, Allen joined Le Havre and subsequently had a two-year spell in France, before retiring from professional football in 1937.(References
26214557
Canatuan_mine
The Canatuan mine is wholly owned and operated by TVI Resource Development (TVIRD).  TVIRD is the Philippine operating affiliate of TVI Pacific (TVI), a resource company based in Calgary, Alberta.  TVIRD is 40% owned by TVI, with the remaining 60% ownership held by a number of Philippine residents and companies (TVI Pacific 2008 Year End Report, also titled Managements Discussion and Analysis For the Years Ended December 31, 2008 and 2007).This mine has been the source of some controversy regarding environmental impacts and indigenous peoples rights, but is also strongly defended by the owner and members of the local population as a good example of environmentally and socially responsible mining activities in the developing world.Location and descriptionThe Canatuan mine is based on a copper/zinc massive sulphide mineral deposit located in del Norte province on the island of Mindanao in the Philippines. The area is situated approximately 27 kilometres east of the town of Siocon on the Zamboanga Peninsula.TVIRD holds a Mineral Production Sharing Agreement (MPSA) with the Philippine government, effective October 23, 1996 and covering an area of 508 hectares within Canatuan. Canatuan is part of the claimed ancestral domain of one of the many sub-tribes of the Subanon tribe known to populate the Zamboanga Peninsula and Misamis provinces. The ancestral domain of Apu Manglang sub-tribe of the Siocon Subanon indigenous people (IP) covers 8,213.50 hectares.Mining historyGold panning activity in the Canatuan Creek area was first recorded in the mid 1980s.  The substantial quantities of gold being recovered prompted prospecting efforts to find the bedrock source of the gold.  In 1990 prospectors discovered an extensive field of gold-bearing boulders and the first test pit was sunk that year.Reports of the discovery drew experienced artisanal and small scale miners (SSMs) from elsewhere in the Philippines, as well as local people to form several small co-operatives. By 1994, the area was being worked by nearly 1,500 small scale miners(43-101 Technical Report for the Sulphide Resources at the Canatuan Project of TVI Pacific Inc., April 2008, Written by Pierre-Jean Lafleur, P. Eng.).In 1994 TVI Pacific reached an option agreement with the initial prospectors and continued extensive exploration.  The agreement allowed TVI to explore the area and to purchase the Mineral Production Sharing Agreement (MPSA) that had been applied for in 1992, and which was still making its way through the government approval process (and subsequently approved in 1996).In 1995 a pre-feasibility study was carried out, and in 1996 a two feasibility studies were completed (each examining a different approach to the potential mining operation).  These studies did not proceed to any project implementation.In 2003 a new feasibility assessment was carried out, which recommended further infill drilling to better define the deposit, and this drilling was carried out in 2004.   Two more feasibility studies were carried out in 2004 and 2006  the first examined mining only the gold and silver bearing oxidized portion of the deposit, the second examined mining of the sulphides (copper, zinc, gold and silver) underlying the oxide portion of the deposit.  In 2004 TVI began operations to mine the oxide layer.In April 2006 TVI requested Geostat Systems International Inc (Geostat) to produce a 43-101 Technical Report (publicly available on www.sedar.com).  Another 43-101 Technical Report was completed in April 2008 by Pierre Jean Lafleur Goconseil Inc (PJLGCI).  These reports pertained to potential investments to start mining and processing the sulphide deposit.In April 2008 operations to mine and recover gold and silver from the oxide layer were concluded (TVI News Release on Marketwire  May 14, 2008), and the related ore processing facilities were being converted to process the sulphide deposit.  Also in April, manpower was reduced by 168 personnel as part of the transition to the sulphide operation.  The sulphide deposit mining and processing achieved commercial operations on March 1, 2009, producing copper concentrate, with the zinc recovery circuit expected to be fully operational by late April 2010(TVI Web-site operations/producing/Canatuan-mine).In January 2010 TVI announced a joint venture with the Philippine based company DACON (part of  the DMCI Group of Companies) to carry out further mineral exploration in the Greater Canatuan Tenement(TVI News Release on Marketwire  January 11, 2010).Operations and economic impactMining ConcessionThe property comprises two Exploration Permit Application (EPA) areas totaling 32,400 hectares and three claim blocks totaling approximately 4,755 hectares.  The main claim block within which the reserves have been delineated covers an area of approximately 508 hectares.The basis of the 508 hectare mining concession is the Mineral Production Sharing Agreement (MPSA No. 054-96-IX) under the authority of  the Philippine Government, registered in the name of TVIRD.  The MPSA has a term of 25 years (starting from 1996), renewable for another period, and grants the contractor the exclusive right to explore, develop, and utilize for commercial purposes gold, silver, copper, zinc and other minerals existing within the contract area.Gossan Phase Gold and Silver Operation (now closed)From 2004 to 2008 TVIRD operated an open pit mine, milling and processing operation producing gold and silver dor from the Gossan ore deposit.   Over that period the operation produced in the order of 100,000 oz of gold (Au) and 1,700 oz of silver (Ag).  The mill process consisted of crushing, milling and processing of mined ore. A hybrid process consisting of a Merrill-Crowe and Carbon in Leach circuit was used for the recovery of gold and silver.Sulphide Phase Copper and Zinc Operationthumb|right|altAlt tag for the image appears on mouse over.|Canatuan Copper MineIn 2008, as the mining operation moved into an ore zone with different composition, the gold/silver dor operation was decommissioned and a the operation converted to copper and zinc concentrates.  The Sulphide Phase operation will use the same front end crushing and grinding process from the Gossan operation and will use a Flotation Circuit for the recovery of copper and zinc concentrates. The first shipment of copper concentrate was in March 2009 and completion of the zinc circuit is expected in April 2010.Mining of the Sulphide ore deposit will be the same as surface mining method used during the Gossan Phase. The overall surface mine area will encompass approximately 26 ha. This includes portions of the Gossan Surface Mine which is outside the boundaries of the Sulphide ore reserve and the Sulphide ore reserve underlying the Gossan surface mine. Mining of the Sulphide ore will require excavation depths ranging from less than 1 m to approximately 60 m.Production capacity is 1,850 tonnes per day of ore, with a request to increase this to 2,500 tonnes per day. Total material moved has averaged 3,800 tonnes per day and will peak at 6,700 tonnes per day in 2012 (based on the current mining plan to 2013).  The operating fleet of the mine (including both TVIRD and contractor owned) includes 54 haul trucks, 9 excavators, six bulldozers, and four loaders.Economic ImpactThe companys operations have had a huge economic impact both for the Subanons and for the Philippine economy at large:*As of January 2010, TVIRD has nearly 900 employees in operations and exploration activities, some 31 percent of whom are Subanons. The salaries and benefits these employees receive are the highest in the Zamboanga Peninsula. At Canatuan, they acquire skills that support lifelong employability.  This number includes of the Special CAFGU (Citizens Armed Forces Geographical Unit) Active Auxiliary or SCAA, which are under the direct control of the Armed Forces of the Philippines.  Most members of the SCAA are Subanon.*TVIRD has been a continuing taxpayer to the national government. With the exception of 2008, when TVIRD decommissioned its Gossan Phase gold and silver operations, the companys tax payments have been increasing each year.*TVIRD has consistently been Siocons top taxpayer and employer.Also a direct beneficiary are TVIRDs Subanon hosts, who have been receiving royalty payments from the company equivalent to one percent of gross sales.Environmental managementControl of impacts from current operationsEnvironmental activities at the Canatuan mine include those related to controlling impacts of the operation, and those related to rehabilitating areas that are closed (i.e. In which mining activity ceases  either during the period of the overall mining operation, or at the end of mine life when the operation is permanently closed).The principal control activities related to the current operation are those of water management (runoff and process water), and water monitoring tailings management (permanent containment of the non-mineral material that is physically separated from the ore in the process plant). During Year 2009, five sediment ponds were maintained within the MPSA. These ponds serve as control strategies to mitigate the impacts of soil erosion and sediment conveyed by surface water runoff to Canatuan Creek and Lumot Creek. This does not include the Sulphide Tailings Impoundment which serves as a large sediment pond to control sediment materials within the Canatuan Creek watershed that are not captured by the smaller sediment ponds. A neutralization pond was also constructed in series with a sediment pond currently maintained downstream of the Nursery Area. This pond serves as a treatment pond during instances when acid mine drainage is observed. These series of ponds drain run off water from the Phase II Mine Area where acid mine drainage is anticipated to occur.Water quality data is collected by a Multipartite Monitoring Team (MMT) at 14 locations on streams and rivers in and around the project area (2010 Annual Environmental Protection and Enhancement Program, page 4-28).  Sampling for 2009 reported in the 2010 environmental protection program document indicates the water quality was within required required ranges.TVIRD also carries out noise measurement, and air quality sampling both from stack emissions and for ambient air quality.Rehabilitationthumb|right|altCanatuanReForestationNursery.|Canatuan Reforestation NurseryAs with most mining operations, rehabilitation activities are carried out progressively  with activities carried out each year to rehabilitate areas no longer active.  These rehabilitation activities include rehabilitation of the small scale mining areas operated by others prior to the opening of the TVIRD mine.As of the end of Year 2009, approximately 39,300 trees were planted within and outside the MPSA. This is 11,000 tree seedlings short of the 55,00 targeted for 2009.  In addition to the trees planted, various grasses and shrubs were also planted.  Some of the species of trees planted include income generating species such as rubber trees and mahogany.In community consultations on closure planning fruit-bearing trees such as marang, lanzones, durian among others were requested. In this regard, an experimental study was initiated to identify heavy metal absorption potential of certain root crops on tailings surface and later determine whether these root crops are safe for human consumption. The study will further determine the final land use plan of the Tailings impoundment areas.The Gossan Dam and Impoundment plus the Upper and Lower Tailings Dam Impoundments are no longer used for tailings disposal. Progressive Rehabilitation activities were initiated during the second half of Year 2008 include addition of soil cover material on top of the tailings at the Lower Tailings Dam while waiting for further tailings consolidation. In Year 2010, topsoil cover will be placed on the tailings surface in preparation for planting.  Current progressive rehabilitation also includes closure of an overburden stockpile by establishing erosion control, coverage with non-acid drainage (NAG) material, and revegetation; and rehabilitation of parts of the Phase 1 mining area through erosion control, soil conditioning and revegetation.TVIRDs annual activities include progressive rehabilitation with the primary focus on slope stabilization and erosion control, revegetation and reforestation activities including soil conditioning and control.Total spending by TVIRD in 2009 on the environmental program was 71,599,512 Php ( approximately US$1.5 million)(2010 Annual Environmental Protection and Enhancement Program, page 6-4).Local environmental concernsOne of the principal concerns raised regarding impacts of the mining activities has been complaints from local fishermen about increased sediment in local rivers affecting fish spawning.   However, there have been other activities in the area that could also contributed to sediment, and there has not been a clear link established between sediment levels and fish stocks in the area(.  Both forestry operations and the earlier artisanal mining both removed ground cover and likely increased sediment content in riversRelationship with local communitiesSubanonthumb|right|altAlt tag for the image appears on mouse over.|Canatuan - TVI Built HospitalThe principal community is the local indigenous people, known as the Subanon. The Apu Manglang sub-tribe inhabits the area around the Canatuan mine, and are represented in the ancestral domain claim.The MPSA held by TVI requires payment to of a royalty of 1% of the market value of the minerals produced to the indigenous people who had a valid ancestral domain claim.  TVI agreed to pay the royalty to the Siocon Subanon Association Inc.   One source of disagreement regarding the mining activity is that the Certificate of Ancestral Domain Claim for the Subanon with respect to the mining area was issued after the MPSA was issued to TVI.Within the Subanon community there is both support for and opposition to the mine.  The relationship between the mining activity and the Subanon community is complicated by the fact that the Siocon Subanon Association Inc. is not a traditional Subanon political structure, and its leader is not of a lineage that would traditionally be allowed a leadership position in the community, and therefore there is dispute over the ability of the Association to make agreements.  Similarly, TVIs agreement gives status to a Council of Elders, initially formed in 2002 at the instigation of the National Commission on Indigenous Peoples, but whos legitimacy is rejected by the traditional leadership group of the Subanon, the Gukom.  The Gukom is not a permanent body, but is a gathering of the leaders of local territories.An additional complication is that the Certificate of Ancestral Domain Claim was awarded a named group of Subanon individuals, not to a representative organization.  The 2007 Rights & Democracy report states that, subsequent to the agreements, The Commission on Human Rights of the Philippines investigated the matter of consent and concluded that the company had not obtained true prior consent from the indigenous people for the mine (the source referenced for this statement is unpublished and has not been confirmed).Artisanal mining communityA second community in the mining area is that of small scale and artisanal miners.  As of 2007, eight thousand small scale miners had started activity in the area and worked without official permits(Mining a Sacred Mountain).  Although some of these miners are Subanon, many of them are not and only arrived in the area since the 1990s when the mineral deposit was discovered.  Canatuan became the haven for migrant small-scale miners who armed themselves to maintain control over their interests. As the SSM community flourished, Subanon control of Canatuan diminished.  Once established, these miners also became concerned that TVI activities could force them out of the area.The introduction of Small Scale Mining (SSM) also introduced the Subanons to the cash economy.  Migrants operated SSM in the area, which displaced the Subanons.  Many Subanons worked for the SSM operators (typically for low wages with very poor working conditions); some of them became small SSM operators themselves. A few of the formal and informal leaders of the tribe greatly benefited from the SSM as the migrant mine operators ingratiated themselves to the leaders.Relocation of residentsWhen TVIRD started to operate in Canatuan, the company implemented a settlement program for those who were to be affected by the companys activities for reasons of safety or displacement due to mining activities.  This program had to address three different groups of residents: Subanon from the Apu Manglang sub-tribe local to the Canatuan mining area (local IPs/owners of the ancestral lands); Subanon originally from tribes distant from the Canatuan mining area (migrant IPs), and non-Subanon that migrated to the area for the SSM activity (non-IP migrants).The settlement program involved a compensation package for migrants both indigenous and non-indigenous. The Subanon (indigenous) leadership was not amenable to a relocation program within the ancestral domain for the migrants. The compensation package  8 to 12 times higher than those prescribed by the provincial ordinance governing real properties  was meant to provide the families a good opportunity to earn a decent and lawful living and have a fresh start outside Canatuan.The settlement program for SSM IPs who are considered owners of the ancestral domain was of two types. Some of them opted for a smaller multiplier but with a housing package, while others chose to be paid an amount similar to those received by migrant SSMs.Human rights impactsIn the early years of TVIRD in Canatuan, the company had to contend with various layers of conflicts.  Large-scale mining, after many years of practically being dormant, was being reintroduced by the Philippine government and being put forward as an industry that can be an engine of economic growth. This reintroduction created friction between large-scale mining companies and SSM interests. The Indigenous Peoples Rights Act (IPRA) that finally recognized that IPs have the right over their ancestral domains was still new then, and vested interest groups were being affected. The IPs had to familiarize themselves with their new found rights under IPRA. Meanwhile, local government units were fighting with the national government over the sharing of benefits over the latters minerals development program. Communities then were not as familiar as they are now with large-scale mining operations. Consequently, civil society organizations and church groups took it upon themselves to raise emerging issues generated by the evolving, often confusing, milieu.One source of controversy is the view held by some that the Subanon of the southern peninsula consider Mount Canatuan to be a sacred place.  The peak of Mount Canatuan, according to some of the Subanon was not for occupation, flamboyant use, or architectural manifestations.   However, there are different views within community regarding the accuracy and interpretation of this designation(.In May 2007, Rights & Democracy (R&D) issued a report titled Mining a Sacred Mountain: Protecting the human rights of indigenous communities Environmental Management which was critical of a number of aspects of the impact of the mine and actions of TVI, but also noting a history of conflict between groups in the area that preceded the TVIs presence in the region.  The principal findings of the report were that the TVI operation created some jobs in an impoverished area and generated revenues for the indebted national government. However, that it also displaced many families; divided the local indigenous people; deprived thousands of small-scale miners of their livelihood; negatively affected rice farmers and fishers living downstream; and that it is located on the peak of Mount Canatuan, which the Subanon living in the area consider to be sacred.  The report made recommendations for action both by the Philippine Government and TVI - including that the mining operation be halted until an independent monitoring procedure is in place.TVI expressed disappointment with the report, noting that the 3rd parties engaged by R&D to carry out the research and report writing were well know opponents of mining in the Philippines.  TVI objected that the report provides no information on the positive benefits of the mining operation, and that We expect it is more than simple coincidence that the conclusions and recommendations set out in the Philippines Case Study coincide with positions advocated by members of the research team over the past decade(TVI News Release, May 30, 2007).  TVI offered clarifying information in a separate document detailing specific biases and inaccuracies in the R&D report.(Companion Document to the TVI Pacific News Release, dated May 30, 2007, concerning the Rights and Democracy Case Study on the Human Rights Impact of its project in the Philippines)An alternate view of the situation of the local population was also painted in a 2005 letter(February 20, 2005 SSAI Open Letter) from TIMUAY JUANITO TUMANGKIS, President of the Siocon Subano Association Inc. and Chairman of the 30 member Council of Elders of the Subanons of Siocon, Zamboanga del Norte.  Among others, the six page open letter is addressed to Aid, Mining Watch Canada, the DIOPIM Committee on Mining Issues (DCMI), Tebtebba, (Canada), International, LRC-KSK (the Legal Rights and Natural Resources Kasama sa Kilikasan/Friends of the Earth Philippines).  In the letter he states the case that:* The Subanons desire the development of their ancestral domain, employment and freedom from poverty, ...* They are working in a partnership with TVI, with specific conditions that have been agreed to by TVI, and that there right to Free Prior Informed Consent (FPIC) has not been violated.* The TVI MPSA area does not embrace any of the sacred places claimed by the Subanon* The artisanal mining activities caused pollution, employed child labour, and were often not Subanon - and they do not want to go back to the days of the artisanal mining operations* Many of those who speak out against the TVI operation are not Subanon, and at least some have commercial interests in the artisanal mining activities that were not properly permitted and did not receive Free and Prior Informed Consent from the Subanon community* In essence, the wrong involvement by external NGOs inhibits the local Subanons right to self-government.NotesReferences2010 Annual Environmental Protection and Enhancement Program, TVIRD, November 30, 2009Mining a Sacred Mountain (report), Rights & Democracy, (2007)43-101 Technical Report for the Sulphide Resources at the Canatuan Project of TVI Pacific Inc., April 2008, Written by Pierre-Jean Lafleur, P. Eng. (available on www.sedar.com)Companion Document to the TVI Pacific News Release, dated May 30, 2007, concerning the Rights and Democracy Case Study on the Human Rights Impact of its project in the Philippines2007 Submission to the Committee on the Elimination of all forms ofRacial Discrimination regarding Discrimination against the Subanon of Mt Canatuan, Siocon,Zambonga del Norte, Philippines in the context of large-scale goldmining on their ancestral domain. 
26239201
Smith_v._Bolles
Smith v. Bolles, ,  was an action to recover out-of-pocket damages for alleged fraudulent representations in the sale of shares of mining stock.  The plaintiff was denied benefit of the bargain damages.  The case is important in contract law, specifically legal remedies and compensating expectancies.FactsPlaintiff, Richard J. Bolles, agreed to buy from defendant Lewis W. Smith four thousand shares of the stock, at $1.50 per share.  The contract was completed in March, 1880, by the payment of $6,000.  Plaintiff then alleged that defendants representations regarding the stock were false and fraudulent, and that in fact the stock was worthless.  Plaintiff claimed furthermore that had the representations been true, the stock would now be worth $10 per share, and so plaintiff claimed that he had sustained damages of $40,000.JudgmentChief Justice Fuller disagreed, saying the measure of damages is not the difference between the contractprice and the fair market value if the property had been properly represented.  The trial court should not have looked to what the plaintiff might have gained if the representations had been true, but rather what he had lost by being deceived into the purchase.  Defendant is bound to make good the loss sustained, such as the moneys the plaintiff had paid out and interest, and any other outlay legitimately attributable to defendants fraudulent conduct; but this liability did not include the expected fruits of an unrealized speculation.(Smith v. Bolles, 132 U.S. 125, 130 (1889).)The judgment was reversed, with directions to grant a new trial.See also*damages*of United States Supreme Court cases, volume 132*v New Sombrero Phosphate Co (1878) 3 App Cas 1218 *v PeekNotesReferences*External links*http://supreme.justia.com/us/132/125/case.html Justia.com (full case)
26251844
Wilson_Canyon
Image:NV208.jpg|thumb|right|Route 208 following Wilson Canyon of the River near YeringtonWilson Canyon is a gorge cut by the River through a series of volcanic cliffs.  The canyon is located  west of Yerington, along State Route 208.  It is managed by the U.S. of Land Management.()DescriptionThe canyon runs through the Range in Lyon County, where the Walker River flows northeast into the Valley.  Over the  of canyon the elevation of the Walker River drops by , or an average grade of 1% (compared to 0.1% to the west of the canyon).()  The canyon was named after Billy Wilson who was a miner and rancher,() and for whom the Wilson Mining District is also named.()  The Copper Belt Railroad ran through Wilson Canyon; the track laid to the canyon was completed shortly before Uncle Billy Wilsons death.(FloodingWhat were known as the 1997 New Years Floods occurred in western Nevada and northern California. They were the result of a group of snow storms in the Sierra Nevada at the end of 1996. Three additional rainstorms came between December 20, 1996. and January 2, 1997. These heavy rainstorms melted most of the snowpack below  elevation, including that at the headwater of the Walker River. This, plus additional heavy rain between , increased the amount of runoff from the mountains, with the consequence being the worst flood western Nevada had seen in 150 years.() During this period Wilson Canyon flooded, the narrow width of the canyon increasing the amount of damage to the area. Large portions of Route 208 were destroyed, with pieces of roadway being found in the river after the flood subsided. Following the flood the highway was closed for two months and repaired at a cost of $726,000.(References
26269245
Moneenroe
footnotes               Moneenroe () is a townland, electoral division and village in north Kilkenny, Ireland. It is located in the province of Leinster along the road about  from Kilkenny city in the south-east of the island of Ireland. Moneenroe is a town with a population of about 688.Moneenroe is approximately  from Castlecomer and  from Carlow town. Clogh village is   west. History In the past many from Moneenroe worked at the coal mines at Mines which closed in the 1960s. Geography It is located on the N78 main road between Castlecomer and Carlow town, approximately 5 kilometres from Castlecomer and 16 kilometres from Carlow town.  The village borders with Laois at several points, with Crettyard being the closest townland in County Laois.Townlands in the electoral division of Moneenroe include Coolbawn, Croghtenclogh, Gorteen, Moneenroe, Smithstown and Uskerty.(Moneenroe DEDs, of Ireland 1911)(Derelict Sites (Urban Areas) Regulations, 2009)Minn Rua means The little red bog due to the marshy land in some parts of the townland.Moneenroe is the most densely populated rural area in the county.(FOOTPATH CONTINUES, People) Demographics As of the 2006 census, by the Central Statistics Office, Moneenroes population was 688.(Census 2006 Table 5, Central Statistics Office) This was a 1.5% increase since 2002.( There is exactly a 50%/50% split of males and females in the village.( Landmarks There are two local churches and a community hall. The Catholic Church is called Moneenroe Church of the Sacred Heart and the foundation stone was blessed in 1928 and was dedicated September 14, 1930. The most striking feature inside this Church is the windows.(Moneenroe Church of the Sacred Heart photo from geograph.ie) There is also a of Ireland church. The hall is called Moneenroe  Parish Hall.(Moneenroe Parish Hall) Education Moneenroe National School is a co-educational school with a catholic ethos.(Moneenroe National School on site clogh.com.) The school participates in the National Childrens Choir.(Making learning fun at Moneenroe NS, People and News from nationalchildrenschoir.org) Goverence The local government is County Council. Ballyragget and its rural area forms an Electoral District which includes Attanagh, Ballyragget, Castlecomer, Clogh, Coon, Moneenroe, Ardra and Muckalee.  The County Council representatives from the Ballyragget electoral district are Maurice Shortall, Mary Hilda Cavanagh, Pay Millea, Dan Brennan and Catherine Connery.In European Parliament elections Moneenroe is part of the Ireland East constituency for voting purposes.  The elected representatives in the 2009 elections for the East were Aylward, Childers and McGuinness.is currently part of the CarlowKilkenny constituency which is a parliamentary constituency represented in ireann, the lower house of the Irish parliament or Oireachtas. The TDs serving the area are currently J. McGuinness, Hogan, Aylward, J. Nolan and Mary White. Industry Agriculture employs about 100 people. The Castlecomer district has 60 farms. These range between 10 and 100 hectares with a total of 2003 hectares being farmed. There are 4451 cattle and 768 sheep, and farming is done with grassland machines, tillage machines, tractors, winter feeding and milking equipments. Specialist farms include beef production, dairy and mixed grazing livestock.After the closure of the coal mines in the 1960s, there was mass emigration to the USA, Canada, the UK and Australia as people searched for work and a better life than that on the dole. Over the years there have been many factories which have closed in the locality leaving people to search for work in places such as Kilkenny, Carlow, Portlaoise and Dublin.In the 1970s the building of the Avonmore plant in Ballyragget helped keep local young people in the area gain local employment and this continued with the jobs created when the plant was operational.  The caravan manufacturing factory was briefly a large employer in the area.  To the disappointment of locals this was closed down.mills was also a major employer of clothing such as Lycra.  However, this closed to a much cost-effective market in the Far East and has left a void for direct employment in the area since.  Due to a lack of local support from Dil members for industry in the area over the last ten years, there is a serious migration issue to Dublin and beyond.However, further investment in the area came quickly when Roadstone (now called brick) constructed a factory in Ardra for the manufacture of bricks for the building industry.  However, this factory is as good as closed now because of high costs, the slowdown in the building industry and also fears about safety of employees and the local environment.SportRailyard Gaelic football team or Railyard GFC was founded mainly by members of Moneenroe FCA in 1943.(Railyard from kilkennycats.com) The Railyard colours of red and white are steeped in glory for years.  The Railyard GAA  team was a great source of enjoyment to the mining community when the majority of local men worked there in the early to mid 1900s. Senior club Gaelic football championships were the norm and this encouraged children to gain a great appetite for the sport.  The club were Senior football league winners as recently as 2009 as a new crop of talent filters through.Old Road Villa soccer club  currently no team entered in Carlow soccer league Junior divisions.A ladies team was entered in the Kilkenny and District league, which performed well on the maiden voyage in the cup competition.Castlecomer Camogie Club comprises players from all of the local primary schools in the area including Clogh, Moneenroe, Castlecomer and Firoda.(Comer Camogie, People)TransportMoneenroe is situated on the Dublin to Clonmel Eireann bus route. Also, a private bus service Buggys of Castlecomer has a daily bus service to and from Carlow town. Ring a Link is a community based rural transport which operates a route in the Northeast of the county covering Castlecomer, Ballyraggett, Coan, Conahy, Muckalee, Ballyouskill, Clogh and Moneenroe.(National Development Plan Advertising People, Friday, October 15, 2004) Culture It is known as the Unofficial Capital of North Kilkenny.Moneenroe was home to Nicholas Boran, a professed communist and union organizer in the Castlecomer mines.(Closing the Mine in Castlecomer, Walter F. Kuentzel, of Vermont)References External links * Clogh & Moneenroe Community Website* Moneenroe Community Council Website on Muintir na Treru:
26289911
Artisanal_Miner
#REDIRECT mining
26326396
Northern_Rockies_Ecosystem_Protection_Act
The Northern Rocky Mountains ecosystem in the United States is known by ecologists, biologists, and naturalists as one of the last areas of the contiguous United States that is relatively undeveloped enough and large enough to support a functioning ecosystem.  The Northern Rockies Ecosystem Protection Act is designed to protect this ecosystem and the many threatened and endangered species such as bears, trout, salmon, and lynx, while creating jobs that restore old roads and clear cuts. The for the Wild Rockies based in Helena, Montana has been campaigning for the legislation for two decades with the help of numerous Congresspersons, celebrities, and grassroots groups such as the Sierra Club and the Wilderness Society.  The legislation has been introduced and discussed in Congress four times since 1993, most recently in May 2009 with 103 co-sponsors by December 2009.Details of the legislationThe legislation would affect roadless areas in five states, including  in Idaho, 7 million in Montana, 5 million in Wyoming, 750,000 in eastern Oregon and 500,000 in eastern Washington.  The total includes  in Yellowstone, Glacier and Grand Teton national parks. The NREPA does not affect private land.()The legislation will:* Designate more than  of Americas premier roadless lands as wilderness,* Connect natural, biological corridors, ensuring the continued existence of native plants and animals,* Keep water available for ranchers and farmers downstream until later in the season when it is most needed,* Allow for historic uses such as hunting, fishing and firewood gathering,* Create over 2,300 green jobs and a more sustainable economic base in the region,* Save taxpayers $245 million over a 10-year period through the elimination of federally subsidized lumber harvests, mining and oil/gas production, and grazing allotments on federally owned land.()Congressional ActionLegislation on Northern Rockies Ecosystem Protection Act*02/11/09 - H.R. 980, the Northern Rockies Ecosystem Protection Act (NREPA) Congress*04/24/07 - H.R. 1975, the Northern Rockies Ecosystem Protection Act (NREPA) Congress*02/07/95 - H.R.852, Northern Rockies Ecosystem Protection Act of 1995 Congress*07/14/93 - H.R.2638, Northern Rockies Ecosystem Protection Act of 1993 CongressCarolyn B. Maloney, representative from the 14th district of New York introduced the legislation in February 2009, as of December 1, 2009 there were 103 co-sponsoring Congresspersons in the House of Representatives.()  The singer King, a resident of Custer County, Idaho, has testified before Congress in 1994, 2007 and 2009 in support of the act.Opposition to the LegislationOpponents to the NREPA state that there will be a loss of extraction jobs in the northern Rockies; mining, logging, and oil/gas production as a whole account for many of the jobs in the five affected states.  Economics professor Tom Powers, Ph.D. from the University of Montana has found that industries based on extracting resources from the land are more prone to boom and bust economic cycles, creating towns, and unstable living conditions, while economies that are based around wilderness areas are more sustainable and have higher than average job growth rates.()Similar Ecosystem Protection ProjectsThere are other wildland protection projects currently being endeavoured by citizens around the world.  In North America there are four wildlife corridors that have been proposed by the Wildlands Network, each providing a highway, called a wildway, for migrating creatures to mitigate the effects of climate change: the Wildway running from Baja to Alaska, Wildway running west-east from Alaska, through Canada, to the northeastern shores of North America, the Wildway running from Everglades in Florida to the Arctic, and the Wildway also called the spine of the continent runs from southern Mexico along the Rocky Mountains up into the Arctic.( )See also*Biology*Ecosystem*Bioregion*BiodiversityReferences(Further reading* McMillion, Scott. U.S. House subcommittee to hear wilderness bill Bozeman Daily Chronicle; Monday, October 8, 2007.* Staff. Jobs for the environment High Country News; September 4, 1995.* Larmer, Paul. Sierra Club to back big wildlands bill High Country News; December 27, 1993.* Richards, Paul. This wilderness bill is a homespun vision for the West High Country News; June 4, 2009.* Larmer, Paul. Regional wilderness bill gets a hearing High Country News; May 2, 1994.* Gilman, Sarah. Wildlife wars High Country News; October 13, 2008.* Frey,David. Massive Wilderness Bill Inches Forward13 Years Later New West; October 11, 2007.* Staff. Hearing finally set on wilderness bill Queen City News (Helena, Montana). Thursday, October 11, 2007.* Staff. The Northern Rockies Ecosystem Protection Act: Bill would close  of land in Wyoming, four other states Uinta County Herald (Uinta, Utah); Friday, May 8, 2009.* Crane, Stephen. Lummis, Bousman rip wilderness bill Pinedale Roundup (Pinedale, WY); Thursday, May 7, 2009.* Stahl, Greg. Congressional committee to review wilderness bill: NREPA would designate 23 million acres across 5 states Idaho Mountain Express; Wednesday, October 10, 2007.* Rasker, R., B. Alexander, J. van den Noort, R. Carter. 2004. Public Lands Conservation and Economic Well-Being. Sonoran Institute. Bozeman, Montana.* Rasker, R., B. Alexander, J. van den Noort, R. Carter. 2004. Prosperity in the 21st Century West. Sonoran Institute. Bozeman, Montana.* Salwasser, H., Morton S. and Rasker, R. 1998. The Role of Wildlands in Sustaining Communities and Economies and Vice Versa. Personal, Societal, and Ecological Values of Wilderness Sixth World Congress Proceeding on Research, Management, and Allocation. Volume !. USDA Forest Service. Rocky Mountain Research Station. Proceedings RMRS P-4. October.* Garrity, Michael T. Economic Analysis of the Northern Rockies Ecosystem Protection Act Alliance for the Wild Rockies.External links* Alliance for the Wild Rockies online brochure for NREPA
26349922
Kelly_Kwalik
Kelly Kwalik (? - December 16, 2009) was a senior separatist leader and commander with the Papua Movement (OPM), a separatist organization based in Indonesias West Papua region.( )Kwalik, a known separatist, had been on Indonesias most wanted list for years.( ) Indonesian police had accused Kwalik of being responsible for a series of shooting incidents and attacks targeting the States mining company, Freeport-McMoRan, which operates large copper and gold mines on West Papua.( In 2009 meeting with police, Kwalik repeatedly denied responsibility for the attacks.(On December 16, 2009, Kwalik was shot in a police raid on one of his hideouts in the Gorong-Gorong neighborhood of Timika.( Police claimed that Kwalik was armed when he was shot while trying to flee.( Kwalik died at a hospital in Timika.(Kwaliks funeral was held at local Papua governments Regional Representative Council building in Timika.( ) Kwaliks family and supporters had requested that they be permitted to fly the Star flag at the funeral.  However, the request was denied by Indonesian and local Papuan police, as the flag, which symbolizes the Free Papua Movement, is banned in West Papua.( Kwaliks Catholic funeral Mass was officiated by Bishop Philip Saklil of the Catholic Diocese of Timika.( He was buried in Timika.(In January 2010, the Free Papua Movement (OPM) appointed Kemong as the new Supreme Commander of its military wing, the Papuan National Liberation Army (TNP) and regional commander of Kawi following Kwaliks death.( )ReferencesKwalik
26363577
List_of_polyurethane_applications
thumb|150px|Polyurethane foam made with an aromatic isocyanate, which has been exposed to UV light. Readily apparent is the discoloration that occurs over time. This particular foam piece is approximately four inches wide and 1 inches thick.Polyurethane products have many uses. Over three quarters of the global consumption of polyurethane products is in the form of foams, with flexible and rigid types being roughly equal in market size. In both cases, the foam is usually behind other materials: flexible foams are behind upholstery fabrics in commercial and domestic furniture; rigid foams are inside the metal and plastic walls of most refrigerators and freezers, or behind paper, metals and other surface materials in the case of thermal insulation panels in the construction sector.  Its use in garments is growing:  for example, in lining the cups of brassieres. Polyurethane is also used for moldings which include door frames, columns, balusters, window headers, pediments, medallions and rosettes. The new iPad Smart Cover is made of polyurethane.Polyurethane formulations cover an extremely wide range of stiffness, hardness, and densities. These materials include:* Low-density flexible foam used in upholstery, bedding, and automotive and truck seating* Low-density rigid foam used for insulation and RTM cores* Soft solid elastomers used for gel pads and print rollers* Low density elastomers used in footwear* Hard solid plastics used as electronic instrument bezels and structural parts* Flexible plastics used as straps and bandsPolyurethane foam is widely used in high resiliency flexible foam seating, rigid foam insulation panels, microcellular foam seals and gaskets, durable elastomeric wheels and tires, automotive suspension bushings, electrical potting compounds, seals, gaskets, carpet underlay, and hard plastic parts (such as for electronic instruments).{| classtoccolours border1 styleclear: both; margin: 0.5em; margin-left: 0; border-collapse: collapse;| aligncenter styleletter-spacing: 1px; color: black; background-color: #efefef; | {}|-| aligncenter colspan1 bgcolorwhite stylepadding: 0.5em; | 640px|-|}Usage per applicationThe following table shows how polyurethanes are used (US data from 2004):()FurnitureOpen cell flexible polyurethane foam (FPF) is made by mixing polyols, diisocyanates, catalysts, auxiliary blowing agents and other additives and allowing the resulting foam to rise freely. Most FPF is manufactured using continuous processing technology and also can be produced in batches where relatively small blocks of foam are made in open-topped molds, boxes, or other suitable enclosurers. The foam is then cut to the desired shape and size for use in a variety of furniture and furnishings applications.Applications for flexible polyurethane foam include upholstered furniture cushions, automotive seat cushions and interior trim, cushion, and mattress padding and solid-core mattress cores.Flexible polyurethane foam is a recyclable product.(http://www.pfa.org/intouch/index.html)Automobile seatsFlexible and semi-flexible polyurethane foams are used extensively for interior components of automobiles, in seats, headrests, armrests, roof liners, dashboards and instrument panels.thumb|150px|Polyurethane foam in the lower half of the mold in which it was made. When assembled into a car seat, this foam makes up the seat back. The forward-facing part of the seat back is the surface of the foam which is face-down in the mold. The two holes in the foam at the top of the picture are for the headrest posts.thumb|150px|Foam after removal from the mold.Polyurethanes are used to make automobile seats in a remarkable manner. The seat manufacturer has a mold for each seat model. The mold is a closeable clamshell sort of structure that will allow quick casting of the seat cushion, so-called molded flexible foam, which is then upholstered after removal from the mold.It is possible to combine these two steps, so-called in-situ, foam-in-fabric or direct moulding. A complete, fully assembled seat cover is placed in the mold and held in place by  vacuum drawn through small holes in the mold. Sometimes a thin pliable plastic film backing on the fabric is used to help the vacuum work more effectively. The metal seat frame is placed into the mold and the mold closed. At this point the mold contains what could be visualized as a hollow seat, a seat fabric held in the correct position by the vacuum and containing a space with the metal frame in place.Polyurethane chemicals are injected by a mixing head into the mold cavity. Then the mold is held at a preset reaction temperature until the chemical mixture has foamed, filled the mold, and formed a stable soft foam. The time required is two to three minutes, depending on the size of the seat and the precise formulation and operating conditions. Then the mold is usually opened slightly for a minute or two for an additional cure time, before the fully upholstered seat is removed.Houses, sculptures, and decorationsThe walls and ceiling (not just the insulation) of the futuristic House were built out of polyurethane foam. Domed ceilings and other odd shapes are easier to make with foam than with wood. Foam was used to build oddly shaped buildings, statues, and decorations in the Seuss Landing section of the of Adventure theme park. Speciality rigid foam manufactures sell foam that replace wood in carved sign and 3D-topography industries. PU foam is also used as a insulator in many houses.Polyurethane resin is used as an aesthetic flooring material. Being seamless and water resistant, it is gaining interest for use in (modern) interiors, especially in Western Europe.Image:Polyurethane insulator.jpg|Polyurethane being used as an insulator in house construction.Image:Seamless_Resin_Floors.jpg|Polyurethane used as a flooring material.Image:Seamless_Resin_Floors_2.jpg|Being poured as a liquid after which it hardens out, polyurethane is a floor material that can be applied seamlessly.Filling of spaces and cavitiesTwo liquids, one of which is a polyurethane (either T6 or 16), when mixed and aerated, expand into a hard, space-filling aerosolid.Construction sealants and firestoppingPolyurethane sealants are available in one, two and three part systems, and in cartridges, buckets or drums. Polyurethane sealants are used to fill gaps thereby preventing air and water leakage. They are also used in conjunction with inorganic insulation, such as rockwool or ceramic fibres, for firestopping. Firestops can thwart smoke and hose-stream passage.Water vesselsInflatable boatsSome raft manufacturers use urethane for the construction of inflatable boats. AIRE uses urethane membrane material as an air-retentive bladder inside a PVC shell, whereas SOTAR uses urethane membrane materials as a coating on some boats. Maravia uses a liquid urethane material which is spray-coated over PVC to enhance air retention and increase abrasion resistance.SurfboardsSome surfboards are made with a rigid polyurethane core. A rigid foam blank is molded, shaped to specification, then covered with fiberglass cloth and polyester resin.Rigid-hulled boatsSome boat hulls have a rigid polyurethane foam core sandwiched between fiberglass skins.  The foam provides strength, buoyancy, and sound deadening.Boat Decks and Outdoor Marine Surface AreasSome boat decks including U.S Navy vessels use specialized polyurethane sealants to protect from constant moisture and harsh oceanic elements.  As an example, Durabak-M26 uses a custom single-part polyurethane to prevent water seepage to unwanted areas.Flexible plasticsTennis gripsPolyurethane has been used to make several Tennis Overgrips such as Yonex Super Grap, Wilson Pro Overgrip and many other grips. These grips are highly stretchable to ensure the grip wraps neatly around the racquets handle.Watch-band wrappingPolyurethane is used as a black wrapping for timepiece bracelets over the main material which is generally stainless steel. It is used for comfort, style, and durability.TextilesA thin film of polyurethane finish is added to a polyester weave to create laminate (PUL), which is used for its waterproof and windproof properties in outerwear, diapers, shower curtains, and so forth. PU is used in some cutting-edge swimsuits to provide buoyancy for competitive swimmers. There are restrictions as the buoyancy enhances swimming performance.A still more popular use of polyurethane in textiles is in the form of spandex, also known as elastane or by DuPonts brand name Lycra. Polyurethane fibers in the form of spandex can stretch up to 600% and still return to their original shape. Spandex is spun with other fibers, such as cotton, nylon, or polyester, to create stretchable fibers essential for clothing for both sports and fashion.()VarnishPolyurethane materials are commonly formulated as paints and varnishes for finishing coats to protect or seal wood. This use results in a hard, abrasion-resistant, and durable coating that is popular for hardwood floors, but considered by some to be difficult or unsuitable for finishing furniture or other detailed pieces. Relative to oil or shellac varnishes, polyurethane varnish forms a harder film which tends to de-laminate if subjected to heat or shock, fracturing the film and leaving white patches. This tendency increases when it is applied over softer woods like pine. This is also in part due to polyurethanes lesser penetration into the wood. Various priming techniques are employed to overcome this problem, including the use of certain oil varnishes, specified dewaxed shellac, clear penetrating epoxy, or oil-modified polyurethane designed for the purpose. Polyurethane varnish may also lack the hand-rubbed lustre of oils such as linseed or oil; in contrast, however, it is capable of a much faster and higher build of film, accomplishing in two coats what may require many applications of oil. Polyurethane may also be applied over a straight oil finish, but because of the relatively slow curing time of oils, the presence of volatile byproducts of curing, and the need for extended exposure of the oil to oxygen, care must be taken that the oils are sufficiently cured to accept the polyurethane.Unlike oils and alkyds which cure, after evaporation of the solvent, upon reaction with oxygen from the air, polyurethane coatings cure after evaporation of the solvent by a variety of reactions of chemicals within the original mix, or by reaction with moisture from the air. Certain products are hybrids and combine different aspects of their parent components. Oil-modified polyurethanes, whether water-borne or solvent-borne, are currently the most widely used wood floor finishes.Exterior use of polyurethane varnish may be problematic due to its susceptibility to deterioration through ultra-violet (UV) light exposure. All clear or translucent varnishes, and indeed all film-polymer coatings (i.e., paint, stain, epoxy, synthetic plastic, etc.) are susceptible to this damage in varying degrees. Pigments in paints and stains protect against UV damage, while UV-absorbers are added to polyurethane and other varnishes (in particular spar varnish) to work against UV damage. Polyurethanes are typically the most resistant to water exposure, high humidity, temperature extremes, and fungus or mildew, which also adversely affect varnish and paint performance.WheelsPolyurethane is also used in making solid tires. Industrial applications include forklift drive and load wheels, grocery cart and, rollercoaster wheels. Modern blading and skateboarding became economical only with the introduction of tough, abrasion-resistant polyurethane parts, helping to usher in the permanent popularity of what had once been an obscure 1960s craze.  The durability of polyurethane wheels allowed the range of tricks and stunts performed on skateboards to expand considerably. Polyurethane is also used to make small equipment tires in the lawn and garden industry for wheelbarrows, hand trucks, lawn mowers, carts, etc. They provide the bounce and feel of an air-filled tire with the benefit of no flats. They weigh about the same as air-filled tires as well, even though they are solid polyurethane all the way through. Other constructions have been developed for pneumatic tires, and microcellular foam variants are widely used in tires on wheelchairs, bicycles and other such uses. These latter foam types are also widely encountered in car steering wheels and other interior and exterior automotive parts, including bumpers and fenders.Electronic componentsOften electronic components are protected from environmental influence and mechanical shock by enclosing them in polyurethane. Typically polyurethanes are selected for the excellent abrasion resistances, good electrical properties, excellent adhesion, impact strength, and low-temperature flexibility. The disadvantage of polyurethanes is the limited upper service temperature (typically 250 F (121 C)). In production the electronic manufacture would purchase a two-part urethane (resin and catalyst) that would be mixed and poured onto the circuit assembly (see dispensing). In most cases, the final circuit board assembly would be unrepairable after the urethane has cured. Because of its physical properties and low cost, polyurethane encapsulation (potting) is a popular option in the automotive manufacturing sector for automotive circuits and sensors.AdhesivesPolyurethane can be used as an adhesive, especially as a glue. Its main advantage over more traditional wood glues is its water resistance. It was introduced in the general North American market in the 1990s as Glue and Excel, but has been used much longer in Europe.On the way to a new and better glue for bookbinders, a new adhesive system was introduced for the first time in 1985. The base for this system is polyether or polyester, whereas polyurethane (PUR) is used as prepolymer. Its special feature is the coagulation at room temperature and the reacting to moisture.First generation (1988)* Low starting solidity* High viscosity* Cure time >3 daysSecond generation (1996)* Low starting solidity* High viscosity* Cure time <3 daysThird generation (2000)* Good starting solidity* Low viscosity* Cure time between 6 and 16 hoursFourth generation (present)* Good starting solidity* Very low viscosity* Cure reached within a few seconds due to dual-core systemsAdvantages of polyurethane glue in the bookbinding industry:* PUR is real wonder compared to hotmelt and cold glue. Because of the missing moisture in the glue, papers with wrong grain direction can be processed without problems. Even printed and supercalandered paper can be bound without problems. It is the most economical glue with an application thickness of theoretical 0.01 mm. But in reality it is not possible to apply less than 0.03 mm.* PUR glue is very weather-proof and stable at temperatures from 40 C to 100 C.Abrasion resistanceThermoset polyurethanes are also used as a protective coating against abrasion. Cast polyurethane over materials such as steel will absorb particle impact more efficiently. Polyurethanes have been proven to last in excess of 25 years in abrasive environments where non-coated steel would erode in less than 8 years. Polyurethanes are used in industries such as:* Mining and mineral processing* Aggregate* Transportation* Concrete* Paper processing* Power* Inflatable boat manufacturePolyurethane is also used in the concrete construction industry to create formliners. Polyurethane formliners serves as a mold for concrete, creating a variety of textures and art.References
26392727
Blue_Ribbon_Mine
#REDIRECT Creek mining district#The Blue Ribbon Mine
26405147
Ballarat_Central
Ballarat Central (also known as the Central Business Area by the City of Ballarat) is a defined locality surrounded by suburban Ballarat in Victoria, Australia. It is the second oldest area in Ballarat (after Ballarat East).  It was formerly known as Ballaarat West.  The population of Ballarat Central at the 2006 census was 5,645(), making it the third most populous in the urban area.  It is the administrative headquarters for the of Ballarat as well as the Base Hospital and health services, the main campus of of Ballarat, home to the citys major religious institutions and a major retail, commercial and city residential area. The boundaries are Lexton, Drummond, Talbot and Pleasant Street to the west; Sebastopol, Hill, Hummfray and Steinford Street to the south; Peel Street to the east and Serviceton Railway Line to the north.Ballarat Central is significant historically and architecturally and much of the Ballarat Central area is covered by Overlays.HistoryToponomyWhile the original name for Ballarat Central was Ballaarat and later Ballarat West, the current name originates from the Central Division, a mining lead in the 1870s.  Several sporting teams used the name, as well as the local primary school as early as the 1880s.  It was officially gazetted Ballarat Central sometime after the 1980s although it is still marked simply Ballarat on some maps.SettlementThe settlement of Ballarat West was established during the gold rush.It was surveyed by Urquhart as early as October 1851.() By 1852 his plan and wide streets were prepared for the first land sales in the new township of West Ballarat.(pg 11. Jacobs, Wendy. Ballarat: A Guide to Buildings and Areas 18511940 Jacob Lewis Vines Conservation Architects and Planners (1981))As the city grew, Ballarat West became home to the citys middle class, bankers and wealthy professionals establishing businesses around Lydiard Street and institutions along Sturt and Drummond Streets.Urban Form and PlanningBallarat Central is laid out in plan.  The tallest buildings in the central city area is the seven storey Henry Bolte wing of the Ballarat Base Hospital (erected 1994); the Law Court (now Arts Academy) tower (erected 1941) on Camp Street; Lydiard House on Lydiard Street  Nth; and the MLC tower Lydiard Street Sth, (erected 1957) at five storeys.  Planning approval was granted in 2010 for a six storey building on Mair Street.The Ballarat City Council approved a Central Business District Strategy for the development of buildings, development sites, transport and streescape for the next 20  25 years in late 2010. It aims to secure funding and private and government interest in the ongoing development of Ballarats CBD. The draft proposal identifies Mair Street as an alternate East-West traffic route with the potential for hi-rise mixed use development and possibilities for the creation of a Civic Heart for the city where public events can be conducted on a regular basis.(Central Business District (CBD) Strategy  http://www.ballarat.vic.gov.au/city-projects-and-strategies/current-projects/central-business-district-strategy.aspx)RetailBallarat Central contains the main retail area of Ballarat, however in recent decades it has been challenged by Wendouree.  Ballarats main mall is Bridge Mall which occupies a section of Bridge Street between Grenville Street and Humffray Street.  The largest indoor mall is Central Square Shopping Centre (built 1988) opposite the town hall which includes the major department stores of Myer and Target.  Other shopping malls in the CBD include Norwich Plaza built in the 1970s and the City Arcade built in the 1980s.  In the CBD there are several supermarkets including two Coles, a Woolworths, an Aldi and a W as well as large specialty stores including The Good Guys, Hi-Fi, Smith Electronics and branches of the big four retail banks.  Bridge Mall, Sturt Street, Armstrong and Mair Street are the major retail streets in the CBD.HousingBallarat Central area also includes some medium to low density housing.  Approximately 89% of housing in Ballarat Central is detached home with 7% of housing is house, house or semi-detached with the lowest amount of housing being titled units or apartments (6%).(http://www.investsmart.com.au/property-research/VIC/3350/Ballarat-Central.asp)  Parks and Open SpaceWith the exception of Street Gardens, and small squares at Civic Hall, Camp Street, Bridge Mall and church grounds there is very little accessible recreational space in Ballarat Central.There are just two sports ovals on the Western Oval on the western fringe and Hickman Street Oval on the southern fringe.TransportFile:Vlocity railcars ballarat.jpg|thumb|left|Modern fleet of VLocity railcars inside the shed of Ballarat railway station.Several busy roads pass through Ballarat Central, they include Lydiard Street (north-south and the historic business street); Mair Street (east west - commercial and future business area); Sturt Street/Bridge Mall (east-west - main retail area); Armstrong Street (north-south); Doveton Street and Drummond Street (the hospital precinct). Car parking is a major problem in Ballarat Central, with restricted parking times (meters).  While there are several lots, including a multi-storey facility on Dana Street owned by the council, parking spaces are heavily used.(Rayner, Meg. Ballarat City Council to probe lack of parking The Courier. 13 Dec, 2010) Ballarat is the hub of the Ballarat Transit bus network, with major terminals at Ballarat railway station and Little Bridge Street.Ballarat railway station is the main railway station for Ballarat Central and also the urban area.ReferencesSee also* district of Ballarat East* Ballarat
26434114
Karkaraly
Karkaraly or Karkaralinsk () () is the oldest city in the Karaganda Oblast (Province).  Karkaraly is also known as Karkaralinsk.  Its history began as a small steppe village.  Caravans from Central Asia would travel through Karkaraly on their way to Siberia. The name Karkaraly is derived from the word karkara- a precious decorative Kazakh headpiece.  According to a legend, long ago a beautiful girl dropped her Karkara in the area that is now Karkaraly. Her search was in vain and the karkara remained on the steppe. The legend states that though the beautiful karkara was lost, the beauty of the land will remain forever. According to another legend, this is the site where the great Khan was proclaimed khan.Karkaraly is the regional center for the Karkaraly district. By demography and economy, the Karkaraly district is one of the largest in the Karaganda Province. The district has an area of 35 million hectares and a population of 42,500 people.  75% of that population live outside the city limits of Karkaraly.  16 ethnic groups are represented within the Karkaraly district. Of these, the largest ethnic group is Kazakh (96.2%), followed by Russian (2.23%), and Ukrainian (0.49%).HistoryA fortress was built here in 1824.  Three years later the Cossacks took it over.  In 1869 Karkaraly was given the status of a city.  In the 19th century, the city was an important trade center.  The famous Koyandy fair helped in the development of trade, economic relationships, and culture.  During this time, Karkaraly was the regional capital of the Semipalatinsk Province. Gradually, Karkaraly became a large public and political center where politicians, people in literature and art, educators, scientists and travelers came.  Among those that visited were:* Valikhanov - the first Kazakh scholar, ethnographer, and historian. He is regarded as the father of Kazakh historiography and ethnography.* Potanin - a famous Russian explorer and ethnographer. He came to Karkaraly in 1913 to study Kazakh folklore.The history of Karkaraly is connected with the great Kazakh educator, poet, and composer Kunanbaev.  His father was the senior sultan of the Karkaraly region and created a name for himself by erecting the towns mosque (known as Kunanbaev Mosque) and from his other acts of charity.  In his historical novel-epic, author Muhtar Auezov wrote that by virtue of building the mosque, Kunanbai has gained respect and glory.  The house in which Abai used to live in has been preserved and is now the citys music school.Ancient TimesIn the Paleozoic Age (250-300 million years ago), this area of Kazakhstan was an inland sea.  The water retreated 1.2 to 2 million years ago, when the ancient Paleozoic shield was cracked by granite.  The area lifted and created the Kent and Karkaraly Mountains.  The rocks and cliffs have been here ever since and for many thousands of years the untamable steppe wind and precipitation has sculpted the rocks into unique shapes.People have lived in the Karkaraly area since ancient times. The earliest archeological finds connected with ancient people dates back to the Paleolithic (or Stone) Age.  Artifacts such as knives, scrapers, and spear heads have been found within what is now National Park. Archeological sites from the Age have been investigated more.  Artifacts and cemeteries from the culture (18-14 centuries BC) have been discovered. In one case, a cemetery was found with two tombs inside a stone fence.  Stone coffins were found at a depth of one meter.  In the tomb were also pots, items made of bronze, an axe, arrowheads, knives, female adornments, and items made of gold, bone and stone.The Akimek Settlement in the Kent Mountains has been one of most investigated sites in the area. It also belonged to the Andronovo people.  They raised cattle and established settlements along bodies of waters.  Settlements were small and usually consisted of houses erected of stone and wood. They focused mainly on raising cows, instead of sheep and horses.  They had wheeled transport, including chariots. The remains of a fighting chariot have been found in the tomb of an Andronovo solder, excavated in the Karkaraly area.  The people were also engaged in hoe-mattock agriculture.  The metallurgy of the bronze age was highly advanced.  Andronovo people were of European descent and are the most ancient genetic ancestors of the Kazakh people.  DNA tests have revealed that 60 % of the tested remains had light hair and blue or green eyes.During the late age (13-9 centuries BC to our current era), successors of the Andronovo people created the Begazy-dandybai culture. In the Kent Mountains, 12 settlements and 10 cemeteries have been uncovered. The ancient city of Kent was also uncovered. Kent is the biggest settlement from the Bronze Age known in the Republic of Kazakhstan.  The settlement was 30 hectares large and was home to 1,000 people. The town was divided into streets and quarters, including a quarter for metallurgists in which copper and bronze artifacts have been found. Most likely the inhabitants of Kent were skilled metallurgists.  Huge furnaces have been found for the purpose of creating bronze. Excavations of Kent have amazed archeologist with an abundance of bronze products and unusual artifacts. Researchers now guess the area was inhabited for 200300 years.  Kent is believed to have been an important political and economical regional center (ceramics found in Kent prove that the settlement had numerous commercial and political contacts with western Siberia, Central Asia, Xinjiang and Iran.http://www.discovery-kazakhstan.com/archive/2008/10_17.php  It is also believed that the inhabitants of Kent did not have a system of writing. The ancient city of Kent is currently located in National Park. Archeological sites from the early age (8-7 centuries BC to 1 century AD) have also been found throughout the territory of the national park, but these sites have been investigated far less.Another famous archeological site, from more recent times, is the mid-17th century Dzungar monastery, in the Kent Mountains.  The name of the monument is Kyzyl Kensh Palace, which means red ore or red city. According to scientists, the monastery was inhabited for as much as 50 years. In the 19th century an ethnographic expedition from Tsarist Russia was conducted in the Kent Mountains. During this time period, part of the complex was still standing. One two-story building was almost untouched and one could see red paint on some of the inner walls. The ceiling was propped up by six wooden columns, carved and covered with gold paint. Unfortunately, after this period, the palace was destroyed for logs and stone. The ruins are now inside National Park and some efforts have been made to restore the palace.Culture and EconomyEconomyThe main contributing areas to the economy are farming, ranching, mining and ecotourism. The following ore deposits have all been found and mined in the area: barite, iron, copper, gold, molybdenum, and tungsten.  In the Karkaraly mountains, nearly 100 minerals can be found, including: smoky topaz, crystal, chalcopyrite, azurite, chalcedony, and malachite.  Significant reserves of building materials are also in the area: granite, marble, limestone, gypsum, gravel, pebbles and sand. Also along numerous lakes are large deposits of mud which are used medicinally in spas to quickly achieve positive sanogenetic effects in the treatment of degenerative joint (rheumatoid and artroidnyh) disease and sciatica.However, the leading role in economic development belongs to National Park.  The park is a geographic point of interest and a scientific and educational center. In recent years the park administration has worked on improving the tourism infrastructure and has encouraged business ventures in the area of tourism. Today there are 16 places of accommodation in and around the national park.  Karkaraly National Park  offers interesting landscapes, archaeological sites, rich biodiversity, and clean mountain air.The natural scenery, natural resources, and vast areas of farm and grasslands offer a good base for future economic development.Places of Interest* House of bai - Kunanbaev (18451904) was a famous Kazakh poet, founder of the modern Kazakh literature, and composer. As a child, bai Kunanbaev traveled through this area on his way to the Fair and stayed in the dark blue house  that belonged to a local family.  The house was constructed without nails.  M. Auezov describes Abais stay in Karkaraly in the novel The Way of Abai. Currently the building is the towns music school.* Kunanbaya Mosque - The construction of this wooden mosque began in 1850 and ended in 1851.  Permission for the construction was granted in 1847 by the heads of the 16 surrounding townships and stamped by Sultan Kusbeka Taukeuly.  At the mosque a madrasas was built, which is housing for students and home for the mullahs (Islamic clergy). The mosque served as a place to educate children and the spread the word of Islam in the Karkaraly District. This mosque was financed by the father of the great Kazkah poet Abai Kunabaev, and from 1849 to 1853 was at the forefront of the social and administrative life in the Karkaraly area.  Kunanbaya Mosque is perhaps one of the first mosques in the northern regions of Kazakhstan.  The mosque is a wooden two-story building, made of local wood.  Initially it was a log building, but later face boards were put on it.  For years the mosque was the site of Muslim teachings.  Here they taught moral truths, humanity, honesty, tolerance, and conducted many national ceremonies.  In the Soviet period, the unique architecture and beauty of the mosque was seriously damaged.  The minaret of the mosque was destroyed in 1920 and soon after the mosque was converted into a school, then a warehouse, and finally abandoned altogether. In the 1980s the mosque was restored to its previous state and today operates in its original purpose.  It is considered a pilgrimage site for believers and all those who cherish the local history.* The house where Potanin stayed - Grigory Potanin (18351920) was an explorer of Central and Middle Asia and Siberia.  In 1913, Potanin visited the city of Karkaraly, to study Kazakh folklore, and stayed in a house that belonged to Vasily Petrovich Ryazantseva.  Before it was a home, the wooden building housed a trading company named Kuzmin and Derov.  On November 6, 1890, VP Rayzantseva bought the building for 600 rubles.  In 1920 the house was purchased by the state.  The building housed various Soviet institutions, including schools. The first library in Karkaraly was established in 1892 and had 626 books given to them by officials.  In 2004 the library was moved to its current location: the house where Potanin stayed.* Monument of the 78 Communists - In the spring of 1921, after being defeated near the city of Akmola, an armed detachment of rebels led by Captain Tokarev retreated south-east to the border of China. Along the way they attacked communist party and government officials and led an anti-communism campaign, using propagandist slogans such as down with the appropriation of surpluses and long live the soviets without the communists. On April 6, 700 wagons carrying 2,500 people entered Karkaraly, where there were only 50 Red Army soldiers and about 60 Communists.  The Communists, while gathered for an emergency meeting in the Peoples House, were arrested, interrogated, tortured, and then killed. 78 people were killed in 6 days.  On April 12, the rebels left town two days before the arrival of detachments from the Red Army.  On April 23, the detachment, including volunteers from Pavlodar (550 bayonets and 70 swords), overtook the rebels 180 km southeast of Karkaraly.  A battle took place and the rebels fled to China. In autumn of 1921, an agreement with the Chinese authorities allowed the 13th Caucasian division of the Red Army to cross the border.  They defeated and captured the remaining members of the gang.  In May 1922 a trail was held in Krasnoyarsk. Captain Tokarev and the other gang members were shot to death. A monument to those who were killed in Karkaraly was constructed outside the Akimat (city hall).* The Grieving Mothers Memorial - The monument and obelisk Fighting Glory was constructed in the city park of Karkaraly.  The monument consists of an obelisk in the form of a bayonet (8 meters tall) next to an eternal flame.  Next to these is a woman wearing traditional dress, sadly holding her hands in front of her. Two stones in front of the memorial read in Russian and Kazakh: Eternal glory to our local countrymen who fell in the Great Patriotic War of 1941-1945.* Folk Ensemble Saltanat - Saltanat was created in 1969 as an amateur vocal/dance group. They gained national recognition in 1970.  In 1975, the ensemble was awarded the honorary title of the Peoples Team of Art. In this period the group has repeatedly performed in Almaty and other cities in neighboring republics. The group was invited to the 19th International Festival, which took place in France in 1976. 27 troupes from around the world visited this festival. Karkaralys Saltanat participated on behalf of the entire Soviet Union. The ensemble won 1st prize and returned with great honor. During the 1990s Saltanat took an active part in the cultural life of the region. During this period they qualified for an international festival in Bulgaria. The folk ensemble is still active today and is still recognized for their talents.NatureThe town of Karkaraly is nestled against the Karkaraly Mountains.  These forests and mountains have been protected, through various government agencies since 1884.  In relatively recent history, this area has historically been a place where coal and metal miners from Karaganda would come to rest.  In 1998, the National Park was formed. The park encompasses 112,120 ha of mountains, forest, and steppe.  The park is separated into 4 geographic areas and covers the Karkaraly and Kent Mountains.The Karkaraly National Park has over 150 species of birds, 46 species of mammals, 6 reptile and 2 amphibian species. Two mammals and eleven bird species are listed in Kazakhstans Red Book of protected species. Among these are the argali, the worlds largest wild sheep, and the eagle.The Karkaraly and Kent Mountains are well known for their unique rock formations and hidden mountain lakes. Hiking, cross-country skiing, downhill skiing, photo safari and cultural guides by the national park, and swimming in the mountains lakes are all popular activities for tourists.  ClimateSpringSpring in Karkaraly begins in mid-March and lasts until the end of May. During this short period the air temperature rises to an average of 15 C. Snow cover in open areas begins to melt quickly, but in shady canyons the snow may last until the end of May. When snow melts there are numerous streams and small waterfalls, as well as dry riverbeds that fill with melt water. The surrounding nature also begins to wake up: the birds and animals arrive. The primrose, tulips, and other flowers begin to arrive. In May, the trees are covered with young leaves and the forest is filled with even more birds. Within the spring months, may is the most enjoyableSummerIn Karkaraly, summer begins in early June. The overall average air temperature for the summer months is 18 C, and in the daytime the air warms up to an average of 25  (on hot days to 37 C). The hottest month of the year is July. Rainfall in the summer usually comes in the form of showers and thunderstorms.The beginning of summer is characterized by the abundant flowering of plants. In the middle of summer, berries begin to ripen (strawberries, stone berry, raspberry, strawberry, currant), and edible mushrooms are abundant. The summer months are considered the most comfortable time of the year to visit Karkaraly.AutumnAutumn is the most vivid and colorful season in the national park. It starts in mid-September and lasts until mid-November. The weather is particularly good in September, as a temperatures begin to drop. In October, there is a possibility of a freeze and there is an increase the number of cloudy days, with possible rain. In the first half of October the average daily temperature falls below 10 C.By the end of October all the migratory birds fly south. The forests in the park are saturated with colors.  Many mushrooms can be found during this time of year.  In late autumn, most wild animals are changing the colors of their coats and preparing for winter. In the autumn months, the most comfortable months are September and early October.WinterWinter in Karkaraly is cold and snowy. Negative temperatures are recorded from November to March and sustained cold weather lasts an average of 135 days. During this period, the daytime temperature does not usually rise above 0 C and nights are usually very cold. In JanuaryFebruary, the temperature drops to an average of  20 to -30 C. In abnormally cold years, the temperature can drop to - 49 C. The snow cover reaches heights of 50-60 cm, and in drifts up to 1 meter or more.  During the winter, locals and tourists enjoy cross-country skiing on the roads and in the forests.Famous people from Karkaraly* Kazybek bi  (16671763)- a composer, diplomat, and one of the authors of the first systematic set of Kazakh customs.He was born in 1665 in the Karkaraly area. Kazybek bi mediated a truce between two fighting Khans. He fought for the consolidation of the Kazakh Khans and developed the Code of the Khan (The Seven Truths). Kazbek bi was a master with words and the people nicknamed him the voice. He is known for his many sayings and aphorisms.* Madi Bapiuly  (18801921)- poet, singer, composer. His songs were used in the first Kazakh national opera.Madi is a prominent figure in the history of Karkaraly. He was a Kazakh folk composer and singer. His world-view and creativity were influenced by Abai Kunanbaev and others. He was familiar with the famous Kazakh musicians Birzhan Sal, Baluan Sholak, and Zhayau Musa. Madi, in his works, called for people to expose injustice and promoted equality. Because of this he was persecuted by the tsarist authorities. He was a member of the national liberation uprising in 1916, helped in the establishment of the Soviet power in Karkaraly, and was a member of the Karkaraly Soviets. Some of his widely known songs are titled: Karakesek, Ushkara, and Madi. These songs were sung in Kazakh operas Er Targyn and Kiz Zhibek. A street in Karkaraly has been named after Madi and a statue has been erected in his honor.* Alihan Bukeyhanov   (18661937)- a Kazakh social activist, teacher, journalist, and ethnographer. He was one of the leaders of the Alash party and was Commissioner of the Provisional Government of Kazakhstan (1917).He was born in a small village outside of Karkaraly. Alikhan is a descendant of Bukeikhan, son of the great Kokzhala Barak Khan. Bukeikhan was one of the last of the Kazakh khans who occupied the Khans throne. In 1877 Bukeikhan sent Alihan to the madrassa of Mullah Zafira in Karkaraly (Kunanbaya Mosque), which was opened in 1851 by the father of the great Kazakh poet Abai Kunabaev. After successfully completing his studies in madrasas in 1879, Alikhan attended the city school and then attended the city vocational school for four years.In school he studied Kazakh grammar, Kazakh literature, and Russian. He especially liked the poems of Abai Kunabaev. In the Karkaraly library he was introduced to Russian world literature. After finishing school in Karkaraly in 1886, Alikhan continued his education in the city of Omsk, which was one of the cultural and administrative centers of the Steppe Region.Alikhan Bukeikhanov is among the most prominent political and public figures in Kazakh history. For his entire life he was devoted to the liberation of his people from social oppression.* Ahmet Baytursinuli   (18731937)- author of the Kazakh alphabet, editor of the only Kazakh language newspaper in Orenburg, Russia, singer, musician, poet, scholar, teacher, translator, essayist, expert on law, and public figure.He was born January 28, 1873 in a village in the Kostanai region of Kazakhstan to a in simple peasant family. He studied in man mullahs and schools throughout Kazakhstan before moving to Karkaraly. Years of residence in Karkaraly acquainted him with modern thinking politicians such as Alihan Bukeyhanov and others. These interactions convinced him that the country needs competent, educated people, more schools, and more books. He became the author and compiler of the primer of the Kazakh alphabet. The Russian Revolution aroused hope for change within Ahmet. He actively took part in the popular unrest, often spoke at demonstrations, and organized a group of Kazakh intelegentia.Between 1913 - 1917 he was editor of the newspaper Kazakh, the only one in the Kazakh language manufactured in Orenburg. Ahmet was a versatile man, was known to be a wonderful singer, musician, even a contested in wrestling matches.* Zhakyr Akbaev (18761934)- among the first Kazakhs to have a LLM (of laws), outstanding historian, and a scholar with an encyclopedic knowledge.Zhakyr Akbaev was born November 7, 1876 in a village outside of Karkaraly. His father was a fairly educated man for his time. In 1886, he was sent to school in Karkaraly and later to Omsk and Tomsk, Russia. After graduating from high school, he enrolled in Petersburg University and graduated in 1903 with honors. Akbaeva worked tirelessly for the people and helped expose illegal arrests and government harassment.  He fought to create a basis of rule of law and equal rights.* Nurken Abdirov (19191942)- Air Force pilot and Hero of the Soviet UnionNurken Abdirov was a sergeant in the 808th Attack Regiment, 267th Air Division for the Soviet Union. He was born in a small village outside of Karkaraly in 1919 to a peasant family. In his childhood years he moved to Karaganda and eventually graduated from aviator school.When World War II began, Nurken Abdirov was a student in Orenburg, Russian.  He was accelerated through the learning program for military attack pilots and spent training time in Tashkent and Siberia. After graduation, he was immediately sent to the front lines in the 808th Attack Regiment, 267th Air Division.In 17 battles he destroyed 18 enemy tanks, 46 trucks and carts, 3 fuel tankers, 5 anti-aircraft artillery, and a few bunkers.On December 19, 1942 Abdirov, along with a radio operator-gunner Sasha Komissarov, made his last flight.  In a raid on a heavily fortified German line, Abdirov disabled 6 tanks, a few bunkers, 2 anti-aircraft artillery.  But his plane was hit and caught on fire. Knowing escape was impossible, Abdirov and Komissarov drove their plane into a German tank column.By decree of the President of the USSR on March 31, 1943 Nurken Abdirova was awarded the high title of of the Soviet Union (posthumously).* Toktar Aubakirov   (1946present)- distinguished test pilot, Kazakhstans first cosmonaut, Doctor of Technical Sciences, professor, Major General, and Hero of the Soviet Union.Toktar Aubakirov was born in a village outside Karkaraly. He worked in the Temirtau foundry-mechanical plant before graduating from aviation school. He graduated from the Moscow School of Test Pilots in 1976 and the Aviation Institute in 1979. Between 1976 and 1992 he worked for the Test Pilot Experimental Design Bureau and flew more than 50 new types of jets. Aubakirov proved himself to be a highly qualified expert in aviation.  He flew to the North Pole without landing, fueling his plane twice in the air. He was the first person to land a 29 on an cruiser. In 1990 he was admitted to a cosmonaut unit and on October 2, 1991 he was launched into space from the Cosmodrome aboard the TM-13.  He returned to Earth on October 10, 1991. Aubakirov was the first Soviet citizen to go into space without actually being certified as a cosmonaut, because his flight was hurried forward due to the flight being a part of the Baikonur rental agreement between Kazakhstan and Russia. In this flight, Aubakirov, along with other experienced specialists and cosmonauts, conducted scientific research in biotechnology, medicine, and metallurgy, as well as conducted astrophysical monitoring and research of the atmosphere and surface within Kazakhstan.He has held the positions of First Deputy to the Minister of Defense for the Republic of Kazakhstan (1992-1993), General Manager of the National Aerospace Agency of the Republic of Kazakhstan (1993-1994), Minister of Science and New Technologies of Kazakhstan, member of the Supreme Council of Kazakhstan (1994-1995), Chairman of the Committee on Defense and Security, Advisor to the President of Kazakhstan (1996-present), and Deputy Secretary of the Council for Security Committee.* Erlan Idrissov (April 28, 1959  present)- current Ambassador of Kazakhstan to the United States. He previously served as Foreign Minister in the Government of Kazakhstan from 1999-2002. References * Karkaraly Regional Library* Begazy-Dandybai Culturebg:de:Qarqaralykk:ru:
26448736
Services_of_Lothian_Buses
Image:Lothian Buses Number 25.jpg|thumb|right|Buses 598, a Dennis Trident with President bodywork, operating route 25Buses is a major bus operator in Edinburgh and the surrounding area. The following is a list of routes operated by the company.RoutesRoutes correct at 3 April 2011.Daytime servicesExpress/Limited stop servicesNight busesIn the city centre, all services call at Princes Street (Waverley Steps) or OMNI (Leith Street), most call at both.Route BrandingTraditionally, Edinburgh Corporation, Lothian Regional Transport (LRT) and Lothian Buses had a livery of madder (a dark red) and cream (white), with matching madder leatherette seating. Some coach-seated Leyland Olympian / Alexander RH-types and Volvo Olympian / Alexander Royales had been painted in the same scheme, but with red in place of the madder. These vehicles are not branded for, but were typically found only on, routes 15/15A.While Lothian had traditionally maintained a uniform livery for all buses, deliveries of low floor vehicles has seen a new standard livery introduced. Low floor vehicles have also seen route branding come to be increasingly used by Lothian. Route branding highlights the route of certain services making the buses easier to be spotted throughout Edinburgh and the Lothians. Since May 2010 the Harlequin livery used to identify low floor buses has started to be phased out, as the company is now a full low floor operation, with a return to the traditional madder and white livery although the style has been altered slightly to suit the lines of modern buses.  Each type of bus owned directly by Lothian Buses has had at least one of their type painted in the new livery.Eco brandingNew branding was created to go with the reintroduction of the madder and white livery to Edinburgh. The buses used on their route 36 have/are being repainted to show their Eco qualities.Penicuik City LinkBuses for routes 37, 47 and X47 between Edinburgh and Penicuik were branded as Penicuik City Link, with blue uppers and roofline, and the positions of the red and madder on the skirting transposed.  One of the Penicuik City Link buses (bus 801) has recently been repainted into madder and white, with no roof colour.  However, the other vehicles in Penicuik City Link colours are now to be repainted into the new madder and white livery with a turquoise mint coloured roof and the name Pen-Y-Cog.  This is to celebrate the history of the area as Pen-Y-Cog is the original name for Penicuik.  The word Pen-Y-Cog is Old Brythonic meaning Hill of the Cuckoo and Penicuiks name is derived from this.Playing cards themethumb|right|A Volvo B7TL/Wright Gemini on Playing Card branded route 44 in Princes Street.Four double decker routes using the low-floor scheme are, or have been, based on a card theme, with the symbol of the suit incorporating the route number;* Route 3/3A was, until September 2010, Club Class - across the City and Midlothian with extra yellow on the uppers and roofline and a black club symbol.  Bus 720, formerly one of the Club Class branded buses, was repainted into the new madder and white livery with a yellow roof and 3 Connect branding in spring 2010, and it was expected that this would replace the Club Class branding.  However, in September 2010, it was announced that the 3 and 3A would be rebranded, using the same livery style as trialled on 720, as The Lady Victoria to honour Midlothians mining heritage as the routes pass the Scottish Mining Museum based in the former Lady Victoria Colliery in Newtongrange.( New look for Lothian Buses  lothianbuses.com)* Route 26 was, until mid-2009, East to West Through the Heart of the City featuring red on the roofline, gold between the decks and a large heart with an arrow symbol.()* Route 31 was Ace of Spades - cutting across the city and Midlothian with orange uppers and roofline, and a black spade symbol, which was worn by buses 751-768. However, these buses have been repainted into madder and white with no route branding.* Route 44 was Service with a Sparkle with black uppers and roofline and a yellow diamond symbol.  This is now being superseded by a new branding, The Mill Race, with pebble grey uppers and roofline.Two single-deck routes also received branding based on the card theme, The Best Deal for route 29 (Volvos 136-150, red) and Leader of the Pack for route 49 (Volvos 151-160 and 170, blue).  151-160 have now been repainted into a new branding for route 49, The Queen of Scots with 136-138 and 170 now repainted into standard madder and white.  As yet, the future of branding for route 29 is unknown.TourismHistory of tour operationsLothian had operated city tours using white liveried coaches. Later, Atlanteans were employed in this same livery, with blinds for City Tour. These wore an updated version of the white livery with blue detailing after a short period.(Fotopic image of the Lothian white livery on an Atlantean) An Edinburgh Classic Tour was set up in 1989 using open top Atlanteans, and later Olympians, which competed with Friday, in response to Guide Friday introducing a competing service between the city centre and the Airport. The buses wore a blue and white livery, each carrying a name e.g.Scottish Star, Lothian Star and Highland Star(Fotopic collection of the Edingburgh Classic Tour fleet)(Fotopic collection of the Edingburgh Classic Tour fleet). Lothian also operated open top tours in Oxford (in conjunction with local operator Tappins) and Cambridge under the Classic Tour identity.In July 2000 Lothian became one of the first City Sightseeing franchisees, re-branding and upgrading the Classic Tour. Lothian purchased the first purpose built low-floor open top buses(City Sightseeing news page), in a tartan scheme with City Sightseeing fleetnames(Fotopic image of a Tartan liveried low floor City Sightseeing tour bus). The Classic tour was rebranded into the City Sightseeing red scheme by May 2001(City Sightseeing news page). In May 2002 City Sightseeing acquired its biggest rival Friday, leading to the absorption of the Guide Friday Edinburgh fleet into the main fleet, leaving Lothian as the only tour operator in the city.A special bus service has previously been run from George Street into Castle via Mound. This service used at least two of the Dash-bodied Darts, in a dedicated overall livery.(Fotopic image of the Edinburgh Castle bus)Edinburgh Bus ToursWaverley station viewed from Edinburgh Castle 2005-06-17 02.jpg|thumb|right|175px|Lothian tour buses (L-R): Mac Tours, Majestic Tour, City Sightseeing and Edinburgh Tour, on Waverley Bridge. Also, an Airlinks bus far right, and Waverley station belowSightseeing bus Edinburgh.jpg|thumb|right|175px|A Dennis Trident in City Sightseeing liveryLothian operates several open top double deck tour bus services, through its Edinburgh Bus Tours subsidiary under four distinct brands: City Sightseeing, Edinburgh Tours, Mac Tours and The Majestic Tour. The City Sightseeing tour is operated by Lothian as a franchise of the City Sightseeing brand.All tour buses operate from the east side of Waverley Bridge, opposite Waverley station (Edinburghs main railway station). Tours can be boarded and alighted throughout the day from there and other selected locations on a hop on hop off basis.City Sightseeing, Edinburgh Tours and Mac Tours visit the Old Town, New Town, Calton Hill, Palace and Castle, albeit on slightly differing routes. The Majestic Tour operates a long loop from Holyrood and New Town, via the Botanic Gardens, to the coast at Ocean Terminal, the site of the former Yacht Britannia.The Mac Tours operation uses Routemaster buses in a dark red and cream livery, with See Edinburgh By Vintage Bus branding. Edinburgh Tours and The Majestic Tour operate converted former main Lothian fleet Olympians. The Edinburgh Tour buses wear a light green and cream version of Guide Friday livery with some Guide Friday fleetnames, while The Majestic Tour wears a blue and yellow livery with some red stripes. City Sightseeing operates a mixture of converted former main fleet Olympians, 4 purpose built Plaxton President-bodied Dennis Tridents and, more recently, converted former main fleet Dennis Tridents. These wear the allover City Sightseeing red graffiti scheme, with localised branding.the edinburgh tour has new livery and new buses former lothian main fleet dennis 512 onwardsAttractions accessible by busAs well as the central area attractions, several other popular tourist attractions in the suburbs of Edinburgh and beyond are accessible by Lothian bus:*Zoo: 12, 26, 31, X48*Yacht Britannia: 1, 11, 22, 34, 35, 36*Botanic Gardens: 8, 23, 27*Chapel: 15*Castle: 24*Snowsports Centre: 4, 15/15AMac Tours bus servicesImage:Mac Tours RM.jpg|thumb|right|200px|Mac Tours Routemaster bus, with Ingliston Park And Ride bus behindThe Mac Tours business unit, in addition to open top tours, also operates two bus routes in Edinburgh. Until 2008, these were operated using a fleet of Dennis Dart Alexander Dash midibuses, a type once found in the main Lothian fleet, but they have now been replaced with Optare Solo SR buses.Route 69 is a normal bus service, and wears the same harlequin livery as the Lothian low-floor fleet, although the Mac Tours fleetname is used.Route 61 is an express service operated for the Life insurance company, who have offices in the city. These wear an allover yellow livery, with Standard Life branding.The Mac Tours bus livery was also applied to three 1990 Mercedes Benz 709D minibuses (27-29) acquired from Western(Mac Tours fleet as detailed on 23 Oct 2007) and which were also re-trimmed with original-pattern London Routemaster moquette.  These buses have now been sold.Airport servicesLothian operates standard, express and shuttle services to Airport located to the west of the city.Standard busesImage:Lothian Buses 833 G833GSX.jpg|thumb|right|A now-withdrawn Olympian on route 1Lothian double deck service 35 and bus service N22 terminate at the airport.Although Route 35 does not call at Princes Street, it intersects with many other services of the standard bus network at these places:* Gyle Centre (2, 12, 18, 21, 22, 24)* Calder Road (3/3A, 25, 20, 25, 30, 32, 33, 34)* Slateford Road (4, 44/44A)* Lauriston Place (2, 41, 42)* South Bridge (8, 29, 37, 47)* Easter Road south (5, 15/15A, 19, 26)* Leith crossroads (7, 10, 13, 14, 16, 49)* Ocean Terminal (1, 11, 22, 34, 35, 36)Airlink 100thumb|right|Route 100 Airlink branded busThe company operates a dedicated limited stop service, route 100, to the Airport from Waverley Bridge along Corstorphine Road. This service uses a dedicated fleet, special fares and its own website. An orange winged A logo adorns the web site and the interior/exterior of the vehicles. Airlink 100 tickets can be bought from the driver, from an airport kiosk, or online (must be printed).The Airlink 100 service calls at these stops only:* Waverley Bridge* West End (Shandwick Place)* Haymarket* Wester Coates* Murrayfield* Edinburgh Zoo* Drum Brae* Maybury* Hilton Hotel* AirportThe Airlink fleet currently comprises B9TL double-deckers with Wright Eclipse Gemini 2 bodywork new in March 2010. The new vehicles included E-Leather upholstery (a type of manmade leather made from recycled waste leather offcuts), electric sockets for charging mobile phones, laptops etc., CCTV which enables passengers on the top deck to watch their luggage on the lower deck, LED lights and free wi-fi. The vehicles are priced at over 200,000 each, meaning that they cost 30,000 more than standard vehicles, and wear a unique two-tone blue and red livery.()Company practice has been to replace Airlink vehicles every four years.  Until March 2010 the route was operated with Polish built Scania OmniCity double deckers fitted with coach seating, luggage space, and some train carriage like seat and table arrangements. Theses buses wore a special livery of white and light/dark blue, with orange detailing, introduced in 1998 with the conversion to low floor Dennis Tridents. The service was previously operated by Olympians in an earlier Airline blue livery(Fotopic image of Airline livery). This was itself introduced in 1995; prior to this the route had been operated by the same vehicles, but in the black and white livery used by the coach fleet.()Park & RideEdinburgh has a network of existing and proposed Park and Ride sites(Edinburgh Council Park and Ride web page). Lothian Buses X48 Limited Stop now only operates at Peak Times. At off-peak times, service 48 will operate stopping at all stops. Lothian buses call at some of these sites:Current* Ingliston A8 (West) - 35, X48(Peak), 48(Outside Peak)* Hermiston A71 (West) - 25, 34 (X25/45 Peak Times Only)* Newcraighall A1 (East) - 30 (Stops on the main road only)* Sheriffhall A7 (South) - X48(Peak), 48(Outside Peak), 49 (Midlothian Council)* Straiton A701 (South) - 47, X47, 67 (Straiton Park and Ride)* Wallyford A199 (East) - 44, 44AStandard fares and Ridacards apply on these services.Contract servicesEdinburgh University Shuttle BusLothian currently operates a zero-fare shuttle bus service for Edinburgh University during semester time, linking the southern Buildings campus with the Central Campus(Edinburgh University shuttle bus page). This service picks up and sets down within Kings Buildings and on George Square, with an additional set down in Buccleuch Street.The service is only available to students and staff. In 2011-12 this service was provided using main fleet buses of the Dennis Trident with President bodywork, in standard livery, with the green display blind Special Service.Buildings is also an alternate Monday to Saturday terminus of route 41, alternated with Craighouse every second journey.Forth ToursAs of 2007 Mac Tours has operated a bus for Forth Tours providing departues from Waverley Bridge for their various tours and cruises of the of Forth(Forth Tours web page bus timetable). The bus used is Alexander Royale bodied Volvo Olympian 433 (P433 KSX) and not, as shown on the Forth Tours website, a Northern Counties bodied Olympian. It carries a special yellow and blue overall livery with the destination blind panelled over(http://garagecat.fotopic.net/p45937097.html Fotopic images of P433 KSX with Forth Tours livery).Bus 433 has a previous nautical connection, having previously been used on the now discontinued limited stop express service X50 to the Royal Yacht at Ocean Terminal, wearing a similar dedicated all over livery.References
26467622
Robert_M._Smith
Robert M. Smith may refer to:*Smith (Canadian politician), (1819-1900)*Robert M. Smith, from Mining Hall of Fame*Robert Mellville Smith, deputy minister of the Department of Highways of Ontario, 1934? during the construction of Middle Road*Robert Murdoch Smith, archaeologist who worked with Thomas Newton*Robert Murray Smith, Agent-General for Victoria, 18821886See also*Smith (disambiguation)
26489271
Cheruvannur_(Koyilandy_taluk)
Cheruvannur one of the 78 grama panchayats of district, lies between North Latitude 11 32 37.11 and 11 36 4.67, East Longitude 75 40 26.32 and 75 43 55.22. It has a total area of 21.61 square kilometers. The adjoining grama panchayats are Thiruvallur and Velom in the north, Perambra in the east, Nochad, Meppayur, and Thurayur in the south, Maniyur and Thiruvallur in the west. The river, erstwhile known as river is flowing from north to south, through the eastern side, detaches the grama panchayat from Vadakara taluk. The physiography is not planar. The ridges of smaller and medium hills and low lying valleys make the area an undulating terrain. Grama panchayat can be divided into three, according to the physiography  viz, hilly area, slopes and valleys. The highest area in grama panchayat is Purakkamala () noted with a height of 115 metres above sea level. Cheruvannur Grama panchayat includes some of the lowest lying places of the region, and parts of these areas are often flooded during monsoon.Image:Cheruvannur GP Location.png|left|thumb|450px|Cheruvannur Grama Panchayat location and relief.HistoryFormed in the year 1934 it is one of the oldest grama panchayats in the state. The area has a long history of human settlements. A stone () - megalithic burial monument - belongs to roughly a period of B.C. to A.D (Ganesh, K.M., 1990.) is seen in Edakkayil () as a proof. A cave (Innes. C.A, Evans. F.B.(Ed.), 1958) is also present in Moyiloth () near Muyippoth belongs to the same period, now lies under thick soil cover which was carelessly deposited on it during the construction of irrigation canal passing there by, remains almost forgotten.Before British occupation, the place was included in Payyormala () a feudal principality controlled by three nair families namely Paleri (), Avinhatt (), and Koothali () and those acknowledged the suzerainty of Zamorin of Calicut ( ) (Innes. C.A, Evans. F.B.(Ed.), 1958). Payyormala is a slightly elevated area near Edakkayil, from where the name of the principality evolved, now remains a place of less importance. Remnants of a small shrine of muthassi ( ) the angel of the principality, still seen here. Under administration the area included in taluk, district of presidency (Innes. C.A, Evans. F.B.(Ed.), 1958). At present it find its place in Perambra development block and in Koyilandi taluk, Kozhikode district of state. The people from the region has a rich tradition of participation in various important historical events, among them revolts ( ) against the rule of East India Company took place between 1796 to 1805 and strike ( ) took place in the period of 1940 -1950 are most notable. Many of freedom fighters who participated in mainstream freedom struggle, and two people who joined in I.N.A and fought against the British were from this area.Grama panchayat ProfileGrama panchayat is divided into 14 ward constituencies for developmental and administrative purposes. The representative members are elected from each ward for a quinquennium to the grama panchayat administrative committee. In the period of 1990-1995 the number of wards were 9, in 1995-2000 it was 10, in 2000-2005 period it increased as 12 and now, for the period of 2005-2010 the number of ward constituencies are 14. The increase in number of wards is based on the criteria set up by the Election Commission, which finds the basics of increase in population, increase in the number of households etc.The total population of Cheruvannur grama panchayat is 22150 and number of households are 4663 (Census 2001). It has a good connectivity of 27.477 kilometers of paved and 59.670 kilometers of unpaved roads. A total number of 65 ponds 12.629 kilometers of irrigation canal is present now.In health sector, people of Cheruvannur Grama Panchayat have accessibility to the three of medicine by the presence of 1 Govt. Heath Centre , three Welfare centres, 1 Govt. Ayurveda Hospital and a Govt. Homeopathy dispensary. A total number of 20 Anganwadi centres serve the welfare part very well.In education sector, 10 lower schools, three upper primary schools, 1 school, 1 secondary school, 1 un-aided school are present, and among them 1 U. P. School , 1 L. P. School, high school and higher secondary school are in Govt sector.LifeAvala pandi field hosts numerous birds each year. groves are places of worship and at the same time, traditional method of ecological conservation. Place has an immense activity in agriculture particularly in rice cultivation. The area has a good potential for eco-tourism, with its scenic beauty not known much outside, connectivity of roads, sensible people, essential communication and facilities.The major source of income for the people living nearby river, is mining from the Kuttiyadi river. Sand mining activity is controlled by grama panchayat, collector, and district level kadavu committee jointly. This is the major income source to own fund for grama panchayat also.Demography India census,() Cheruvannur had a population of 22,150. Males constitute 49% of the population and females 51%. Cheruvannur has an average literacy rate of 81%, higher than the national average of 59.5%; with male literacy of 86% and female literacy of 77%. 13% of the population is under 6 years of age.TriviaCheruvannur grama panchayat is often mistaken with Cheruvannur-Nallalom grama panchayat both in official and civil correspondences by its name, the later lies in Kozhikode taluk of Kozhikode district itself.Referencesbn:bpy:it:Cheruvannurnew:pt:Cheruvannurvi:Cheruvannur
26513016
Azarov_Government
The first Azarov Government () was appointed on March 11, 2010 as part of the Stability and Reform coalition between the of Regions, Bloc and the Party of Ukraine in the Rada, Ukraines parliament. The current government is led by Prime Minister Azarov, who succeeded the ousted Tymoshenko Government led by ex-Prime Minister Tymoshenko.The Azarov Government is working in cooperation with Ukrainian President and head of state Yanukovych.A November 2010 Centre nationwide survey showed that only 13.2 percent of respondents fully support the Azarov Government while 45 percent stated they did not.(Yanukovych to slim ranks of government, Post (December 16, 2010))Creation and parliamentary issuesOn March 9, 2010 the Rada amended its regulations to define a parliamentary coalition as an alliance of parliamentary factions and individual parliamentary deputies constituting the majority of the parliaments constitutional composition while the Court of Ukraine in September 2008 had defined a parliamentary coalition as an alliance of parliamentary factions that consists of at least 226 parliamentary deputies. The reason for that was a hardship of creating a coalition out of the three parliamentary factions Lytvyn, Party of Ukraine, and of regions, combining only 219 and few members short of the necessary number. For that purpose it was decided to form what was defined as a coalition of tushki (Cyrillic: , meaning defectors) consisting out of several members other factions (NUNS and BYuT).( )(- ,    ) One of the leader of the of Regions and the head of the parliamentary procedural committee, Oleksandr Yefremov stated that party will request the Constitutional Court to elucidate the clauses of this law unless the Tymoshenko Bloc faction does it.(Oleksandr Efremov: The coalition will be formed after the alterations to the Procedures of Verkhovna Rada come in virtue, of Regions Official Information Server (March 9, 2010)) According to President Yanukovych, Ukraine could not afford early parliamentary elections because the prolonged political instability would provoke a worsening of the economic crisis in the country.(Key Ukrainian politician Arseniy Yatsenyuk declines premiership, Novosti (March 9, 2010))Ukrainian lawmakers formed a new coalition on March 11, 2010 which included Lytvyn, Party of Ukraine and of regions.(Ukrainian parliament creates new coalition, Post (March 11, 2010)) 235 deputies from the 450-member parliament had signed the coalition agreement.(Update: Former finance minister nominated as Ukraine prime minister, Post (March 11, 2010)) The same day the Our Ukraine- Peoples Self Defense faction officially announces that would be in opposition to the new coalition.(Our Ukraine- Peoples Self Defense faction goes to opposition, Post (March 11, 2010)) On March 3, 2010 Yulia Tymoshenko had already moved into opposition.(Tymoshenko says cabinet wont stay on as caretaker, Post (March 3, 2010))(Tymoshenko: Government members will immediately leave offices after Radas decision on cabinet dismissal, Post (March 3, 2010)) According to Bloc Yulia Tymoshenko the forming of the coalition was a detat.(BYT claims to block cards of lawmakers-absentees, Post (March 11, 2010))On March 11, 2010 Bloc Yulia Tymoshenko appealed to the Election Commission of Ukraine to terminate the parliamentary mandates of its six parliamentarians who had joined the new parliamentary coalition.(Yulia Tymoshenko Bloc wants its members joining coalition to be stripped of mandates, Post (March 11, 2010)) The Verkhovna Rada appointed Azarov Minister of Ukraine on March 11, 2010.( At its morning session the parliament adopted two declarations: to appoint Azarov as the Prime-minister and to dismiss Tymoshenko as the Prime-minister. 242 out of 343 lawmakers registered in the session hall voted for this decision.(Azarov became Prime Minister, UNIAN (March 11, 2010)) The coalition is called Stability and Reforms.(Member of parliament Zhvaniya: Current coalition could be reformatted, Post (March 16, 2010)) Following that the parliament also confirmed:* the position of Khoroshkovsky as the head of the Service of Ukraine (SBU),* the new Cabinet of Ministers of Ukraine including one Primer, six Vice-Premiers, and 21 other ministers,* early discontinuation of deputy duties of those who were appointed to the new cabinet.;Additional decisions;From coalition to majorityThe parliamentary coalition was officially formed on March 16, 2010 when a list of 235 members of the coalition was published on in the official newspaper of the Ukrainian parliament, Ukrayiny.( The list included the Party of Regions faction in all its entirety (172 members), all 27 members of the Communist Party faction, all 20 members of the Lytvyn Bloc, six members of the faction of the Yulia Tymoshenko Bloc (BYuT), another six from the Our Ukraine-Peoples Self-Defense faction, and four independent deputies.(Ukraines parliamentary coalition officially formed, Post (March 16, 2010))(For the Ukrainians finally were printed the names of tushkas Pravda (March 16, 2010)) Among the non-fractional parliamentary members and parliamentary defectors are politicians Omelchenko, Pliushch, Bohoslovska, Chornovil, and others.of the Verkhovna Rada Lytvyn stated on April 2, 2010 that the coalition could expand to 260 members by the middle of the next month.(Lytvyn: Coalition could expand to 260 members of parliament, Post (April 2, 2010)) On April 30, 2010 he expected the coalition to grow to 252 lawmakers after May 11, 2010.(Lytvyn expects majority coalition to grow to 252 lawmakers after May 11, Post (May 4, 2010))On March 30, 2010 the coalition was expanded to 238 parliamentarians(Parliamentary coalition expands to 238 parliamentarians, Post (March 30, 2010)), and on March 31, 2010(Another BYuT member of parliament joins coalition, Post (March 31, 2010)) and April 1, 2010 to 240.(Another Our Ukraine-Peoples Self-Defense member of parliament joins coalition, Post (April 1, 2010)) On April 13, 2010 the tenth representative of BYuT joined the coalition as an independent MP, making the coalition 241 parliamentarians strong.(Another MP from BYT joins coalition, Post (April 13, 2010)) On May 11, 2010 another five lawmakers of BYuT joined the coalition.(New members of parliament join coalition, Post (May 11, 2010)) And on May 14, 2010 another BYuT lawmakers joined the coalition.(Kharkiv mogul, BYuT deputy Feldman joins parliamentary coalition, Post (May 14, 2010)) On June 1, 2010 two more BYuT members joined the coalition.(More BYuT members join coalition in Rada, Post (June 1, 2010))(Denkovich leaves Batkivschyna, Post (June 1, 2010)) The Stability and Reforms coalition now includes 249 lawmakers.(((( On June 18, 2010 another six lawmakers of Our Ukraine-Peoples Self-Defense joined the coalition.(6 lawmakers from OU-PSD joined coalition, Unian (June 18, 2010)) On June 29, 2010(Another oppositional lawmaker joins coalition in Ukraines parliament, Post (June 29, 2010))(BYUT member Radovets joined coalition, UNIAN (June 29, 2010))( and on July 2, 2010(BYUT lawmaker Kurylo joined coalition, Unian (July 2, 2010)) another two member of the Bloc of Yulia Tymoshenko faction joined the coalition, making the coalition 260 deputies strong.( On July 9, 2010 the coalition included 265 MPs out of the 450 in parliament.(Lytvyn officially announces formation of majority in Rada, Interfax-Ukraine (October 5, 2010))After the constitutional amendments of 2004 where reverted in October 2010 the parliamentary majority (instead of coalition) was announced by the of the Verkhovna Rada, Lytvyn consisting of 227 MPs.(In February 2011 the new faction for the Future became part of the coalition.(       ,    , NEWSru.ua (February 19, 2011))According to ex-premier Tymoshenko (in April 2010) lawmakers had been offered a bribe of $5 million each in order to join the coalition.(Tymoshenko: Lawmakers being offered $5 million to join ruling coalition, Post (April 16, 2010)) In June 2010 Lutsenko and Tymoshenko claimed that opposition deputies have been offered up to 1.5 million dollars and 25,000 dollars monthly payment if they join the coalition.(Tymoshenko: opposition deputies offered 1 million dollars to join coalition, Post (June 26, 2010))Controversy and criticismAzarovs immediate predecessor Tymoshenko stated on the day the cabinet was elected this government is completely made up of Ukrainian oligarchs; she predicted the cabinet actions would lead to megacorruption, the closure of strategic state programs, pressure on small and middle business and a return to stagnation and the absence of any reforms.(Tymoshenko: Major ideologists of RosUkrEnergo at key posts in new government, Post (March 11, 2010))According to a February 2010 poll by the Kiev Gorshenin Institute of Management Issues most Ukrainians wanted not a politician for Prime Minister but a professional premier, who will implement unpopular reforms.(Most Ukrainians do not want politician for prime minister, Post (March 1, 2010))Ukraines state budget for 2010 was adopted by parliament after a ten minute long hearing of the bill which consisted of a report by the finance minister and the head of the parliaments budget committee.(Our Ukraine-Peoples Self Defense wants parliament to immediately review 2010 state budget, Post (May 11, 2010)) The Rada 2010 budget was not presented at a parliament meeting, but approved on May 14, 2010.(Coalition adopts parliaments budget for this year, opposition not aware, Post (May 14, 2010))(Verkhovna Rada approved its budget 2010, UNIAN (May 14, 2010))Constitutional Court rulingAccording to former president Yushchenko the March 9, 2010 parliamentary amendment that made it possible for individual members of a parliamentary faction to join a coalition violated the Constitution(Yushchenko: Decision to sanction coalition based on individual lawmakers unconstitutional, Post (March 9, 2010)), former Minister of Internal Affairs Lutsenko accused Yanukovych of trying to buy members of parliament for a new coalition(Lutsenko: Yanukovych team trying to buy members of parliament for new coalition, Post (March 9, 2010)) (President Yanukovych accused Lutsenko of badly handling the affairs at the Ministry of Internal Affairs before appointing Anatolii Mohyliov to Lutsenkos old position.(President presented a new staff to their departments Podrobnosti.ua March 11, 2010 (video-footage))) and Yulia Tymoshenko Bloc lawmaker Mishchenko stated that the Verkhovna Rada had shown to the average citizen a bad example of how to violate the countrys laws and Constitution.(Serhiy Mishchenko: parliament showed the public how to break laws, Official website of Tymoshenko (March 10, 2010)) Yushchenko did sent a letter to Yanukovych with a request to veto the law on March 10.(Yushchenko calls for Yanukovych to veto amendments to law on parliaments regulations, Post (March 10, 2010)) Yanukovych signed the law nevertheless.(Ukraine opposition challenges Yanukovych in court, Post (March 12, 2010)) 56 lawmakers filed a challenge to the law who made these amendments possible on March 11, 2010 at the Court of Ukraine.((Constitutional Court gets motion on constitutionality of parliaments rules of procedure, Post (March 12, 2010)) On March 16, 2010 Minister of Justice Lavrynovych stated that even if the Constitutional Court rules the amendments unconstitutional the format of the Ukrainian parliamentary coalition will remain unchanged because the Constitutional Courts ruling becomes valid on the day of its announcement, not yesterday or the day before yesterday and the Constitutional Courts ruling will apply only to measures intended to establish a new coalition in Ukraine in the future.(Minister: Newly formed Ukrainian coalition will remain unchanged, Post (March 16, 2010)) On March 26, 2010 President Yanukovych told a delegation from the Parliament If the decision of the Constitutional Court will be that the coalition was formed illegally, then I will take a decision on a snap election, I will never go down the path of breaching the constitution that is in force.(Yanukovych to call vote if coalition ruled illegal, Post (March 1, 2010)) The Constitutional Court reviewing the case late March 2010.( On urgent matters the court rules within weeks but on matters deemed less urgent it can take months or even longer.( On March 29, 2010 former premier and Tymoshenko Bloc leader Tymoshenko accused Representatives of Yanukovych of trying to bribe and blackmail Constitutional Court judges in order to get a ruling that legitimates the coalition and the government.(Tymoshenko: Yanukovych entourage aims at recognizing legitimacy of coalition before presidents trip to U.S., Post (March 29, 2010)) This was denied by Yanukovychs of Regions.(Yanukovych allies: Tymoshenko trying to pressure court, Post (March 30, 2010))On April 8, 2010 the Constitutional Court ruled that the coalition supporting the Azarov Government in parliament had been formed legally.(Update: Ukraine court rules Yanukovych coalition legal, Post (April 8, 2010)) The shadow government called the Constitutional Court ruling cynical, hypocritical, and illegal.(Opposition calls unlawful courts ruling on legitimacy of new coalitions formation, Post (April 8, 2010))CorruptionThe Azorovs Government stated that it will fight corruption. However several of its members are assigned to two or more government positions, and, of course, are paid for them. That fact reflects direct disregard for the of Ukraine. Some of the members do not even qualify to the assigned positions either as in case with Khoroshkovskiy who was elected to the Supreme Council of Justice.(Team of Yanukovych: direct misconducts of the Law ) Some of the members of the government received their government assignments without a basic knowledge of the state language as in case with the Minister of Internal Affairs Mohyliov.(TSN (July1, 2010) ) The President Yanukovych gave him two months (until August 2010) to learn the language.Opposition government formationOn March 16, eight parliamentarian parties signed an application for the establishment of an association of opposing political forces to the ruling Azarov government.(Tymoshenko counted over 175 opposition deputies in the Verkhovna Rada) Among the eight opposition parties are Union Fatherland, Rukh, Party of Ukraine, Peoples Self-Defense, and Order Party, Defenders Party, Christian-Democratic Union, and Social-Democratic Party. Tymoshenko immediately nominated a prime minister for the future opposition government (so called shadow government), while the leader of the European Party Mykola Katerynchuk suggests not to rush and consolidate all possible political forces in a single formed opposition government.(Katerynchuk proposes to wait for Yatseniuk and Kyrylenko) On March 31, 2010 all members of this government where named.( It is headed by parliamentarian Serhiy Sobolev of of Yulia Tymoshenko.(Sobolev names members of Ukraines opposition government, Post (March 31, 2010)) Its vice premier, Stretovych, was dismissed on 7 February 2011 because he had finally taken the side of the government.( Stretovych dismissed as vice premier of shadow government, Post (February 7, 2010)) Yatsenyuk formed another oppositional government in March 2010.(Yatseniuk to introduce his oppositional government by end March, Post (March 18, 2010))CompositionOn March 11, 2010, Verkhovna Rada of Ukraine approved the structure of the of Ministers of Ukraine.(VR approved structure of Cabinet of Ministers (update), UNIAN (March 11, 2010)) Note, Tihipko even though is a leader of the Ukraine party, he was elected to Cabinet as unaffiliated. Strong Ukraine in Verkhovna Rada is not an independent party. The same goes with Tsushko who was a former member of the Party of Ukraine at the time of his appointment (he became the leader of that party in July 2010(Economy minister appointed Socialist Party head, Post (July 26, 2010))); Tsushko was appointed on quote of the Communist Party(Socialist leader Moroz rules out a union with the Communists, Post (July 24, 2010)).The Cabinet originally consistsed of 29 ministers, four more than the previous government(If Yanukovych does not change course, he may inspire revolution, Post (April 1, 2010)), but has since been trimmed down.((( At the time of installation the Cabinet contained the highest number of ministers in Europe, and ranked second in Europe in terms of the number of its vice premiers.((Cabmin Azarova beat the European records Interfax-Ukraine (March 16, 2010)) 8 out of the original 29 Cabinet members where born in Donetsk and the Oblast.(          ,   (1319 March 2010)).The Cabinet is (also at the time of its installation) Europes only government that has no female members in its composition.(Azarovs cabinet has highest number of ministers in Europe, Post (March 16, 2010)) It is the first Ukrainian government without a female minister.(Central and East European Politics: From Communism to Democracy Second Edition, edited by  Wolchik and  Curry, & Littlefield Publishers, Inc., 2011, ISBN 0-7425-6734-6 (page 354))As of May 21, 2010 the Cabinet is planning to create a Ministry of Science, Technologies and Innovation of Ukraine.(Ukrainian government to create ministry of science, technologies and innovations soon, Post (May 21, 2010))Current CompositionChanges since June 2010On June 2, 2010 Deputy-minister of Environmental Protection Bogdan Presner was sacked for accepting a bribe of $200,000.(Ukraines Cabinet sacks senior official for bribe, Post (June 2, 2010)) On June 17, 2010 Minister on Communal Living Oleksandr Popov (Party of Regions) was replaced by Yuriy Hivrich.(VR dismissed Popov from post of Minister of housing and communal services, UNIAN (June 17, 2010))(        , Kanal 5 (June 17, 2010))On July 2, 2010 Minister of Environmental Protection Viktor Boiko (Bloc Lytvyn) was replaced by Mykola Zlochevskiy(    , UNIAN (July 2, 2010))(Parliament appoints Mykola Zlochevsky environment minister, Post (July 2, 2010))(Parliament dismisses Boiko as environment minister, Post (July 2, 2010)) and Vice Prime Minister Seminozhenko was fired by the Rada (Ukrainian parliament) the same day.( A draft resolution proposing the dismissal of Semynozhenko was submitted by lawmaker Olha Bodnar of Yulia Tymoshenko.(Parliament dismisses Semynozhenko as vice premier, Post (July 2, 2010)) On July 10, 2010 Minister of Extraordinary Situations Shufrych was dismissed by Rada.(Rada fired Shufrych (Ukrainian Pravda) ) For his dismissal voted 256 deputies. However Yanukovych found a new assignment for Shufrych and appointed him as the assistant to the secretary of the Council for National Security.(Yanukovych thought of a new spot for Shufrych (Ukrainian Pravda) ) Shufrychs duties where temporary assigned to Volodymyr Antonets(Official website of the Ministry of Extraordinary Situations (July 20, 2010) ) till Mikhail Bolotskikh was appointed acting minister on July 23, 2010.( ..     , Ukrinform (July 23, 2010)) Soon after the motion to overturn the 2004 Constitutional amendments was filed on July 14 by the representatives of the Azarov Government, Tsushko, previously as an unaffiliated member of the government, was elected the leader of the Party of Ukraine (extra parliamentarian party, non-coalition) on July 24, 2010.On October 13, 2010 President Yanukovych sacked two deputy prime ministers (Viktor Slauta and Volodymyr Sivkovich).(Yanukovych dismisses Sivkovych and Slauta as vice-premiers, Post (October 13, 2010)) The sackings were the first case when Yanukovych used the powers granted to him by this months constitutional court ruling when 2004 constitutional amendments where overturn.( On November 12, 2010 President Yanukovych appointed Viktor Baloha (Centre) Minister of Emergencies and Minister of the Protection of the Population from the disaster.(Yanukovych appointed Baloha Emergency Minister of Ukraine, UNIAN (November 12, 2010)) According to Baloha this did not mean his party would join the coalition.(    , UNIAN (November 12, 2010)) Early 2010 United Centre had rejected any possibility of joining a parliamentary coalition with the Party of Ukraine.( :          , Official party website (March 9, 2010))( :          , Official party website (March 9, 2010))Another mayor reshuffle took place in December 2010 which reduced the number of ministers(http://www.kyivpost.com/news/politics/detail/92540/)(http://english.peopledaily.com.cn/90001/90777/90853/7227663.html) This was part of an administrative reform set in motion by President Yanukovych with the aim to reduced the number of civil servants in Ukraine.(http://www.kyivpost.com/news/politics/detail/92471/)(http://www.kyivpost.com/news/politics/detail/92609/) (see below Yanukovych Administration Reform)A number of deputy ministers where dismissed early April 2011.(President dismisses a number of deputy ministers, Post (April 6, 2011))Minister of Health Zynoviy Mytnyk was dismissed on May 17, 2011 because he had failed to properly organize the work of the ministry; Oleksandr Anishchenko was appointed for the post on May 24, 2010.(Yanukovych dismisses health minister, Post (May 17, 2011))(Yanukovych appointed Anishchenko Health Minister of Ukraine, UNIAN (May 24, 2011))Vice Prime Minister (Minister of Social Policy) Tihipko became a member of Party of Regions on October 22, 2011; and thus his former party Ukraine had no longer a minister in this Cabinet.(Man With A Mission, Post (October 7, 2011))PolicyThe aims of the cabinet are:*Reducing the gap between the rich and the poor in Ukraine(Azarov to tackle import of luxury goods to Ukraine, Post (March 12, 2010)); which is characterized by these policies:**Raise the minimum wage in 2010 to 888 Hryvnya.(Ukraines gross foreign debt reaches 93.5% of gross domestic product, Post (March 17, 2010))*Improve the living standards of Ukrainians(New coalition promises introduction of European standards of social protection, Post (March 16, 2010)); which is characterized by these policies:** Creating a state anti-crisis food basket and a state anti-crisis medical basket(;** Stabilization of the of price situation on the consumer market and the energy market(.*Introduce the European standards of social protection in Ukraine(; which is characterized by these policies:**Reform of the system of social standards and privileges(;**Improvement of the social protection of children(;**Fight against the demographic crisis(.*Reviewing Ukraines cooperation with international financial organizations(Azarov: Program on Ukraines cooperation with international financial organizations is to be reviewed, Post (March 11, 2010));*Judicial reform(Ukraines prime minister says budget problem hardest, Post (March 11, 2010));*Reduction of corruption(; which is characterized by these policies:**The introduction of a single window in the registration system for entrepreneurial activity and regulation(Azarov: Fight against corruption is main task of executive branch, Post (March 23, 2010));**Transparent state purchases(;**Allocation of land plots(;*Economical growth, based on innovative technologies(;*Improving the financial situation in state companies(;*Reform the housing utility sector((; which is characterized by these policies:**Provision of citizens with affordable housing(;**The formation of a state order for the construction of social housing for young people, public sector employees, poor families, and disabled persons(.*Strengthen the class(Azarov: New government to focus on strengthening middle class in Ukraine, Post (March 11, 2010));*Ensuring the rights and freedoms of citizens in Ukraine and their protection outside the country.(Other priorities of the government are the preparations for expected flooding, preparations for spring agricultural work and the improvement of medical services.(Azarov names main priorities of governments work, Post (March 17, 2010))In order to increase state revenues with at least Hryvnya 10 billion the government is planning to step up privatization in 2010.(Tigipko: Ukraine planning to get at least Hr 10 billion from privatization, Post (March 18, 2010))Led by the Party of Regions faction in March 2010 a draft law on the judiciary and a new criminal procedural code was shelved and the introduction of anti-corruption legislation was pushed back from April 2010 to January 2011 by the Verkhovna Rada.(Jackpot, Post (March 25, 2010))On November 30, 2010 Yanukovych vetoed a new tax code made by the Azarov Government and earlier approved by the Verkhovna Rada but protested against in rallies across Ukraine (one of the largest protests since the 2004 Revolution).(Tax code protests intensify, Post (November 26, 2010))(Update: Yanukovych vetoes tax code after protests, Post (November 30, 2010))(Yanukovych vetoes the tax code, Post (November 30, 2010)) Yanukovych signed an new Tax Code on December 3, 2010.(Yanukovych signs new tax code, Post (December 3, 2010))Yanukovych Administration ReformOn December 9, 2010 the of Ukraine reloaded a new government.( Yanukovych reloaded a new government (Ukrainian Pravda, December 10, 2010)) According to the decree, the number of ministries was reduced from 20 to 16 and the number of cabinet employees (1,174 people at the time) is to be more than halved.(Government to reduce number of its secretariat employees by 50%, Post (December 18, 2010));List of ministries with their respective agencies (if present)* Ministry of Economy is reorganized into Ministry of Economic Development and Trade (coordinated by the First Deputy Premier)** State Service of Export Control** State Committee of Statistics reorganized into State Service of Statistics** State Service of Technical Regulation** National Agency in ensuring of energy resources effective use reorganized into State Agency of Energy Effectiveness and Savings** State Agency in directing national projection and State Agency of investments and development merged into State Agency of investments and directing national projects** State Committee of state material reserves reorganized into State Agency of Reserves** Ministry of Industrial Policy reorganized into State Agency in directing state corporation rights and property* Ministry of Transportation and Communications reorganized into Ministry of Infrastructure with several state services (coordinated by a Deputy Premier)** State Aviation Service** State Automobile-Transportation Service** State Service of Communication** State Service of Sea and River Transportation** State Service of Automobile Roads** National Agency in preparation and conduction the final portion of Euro 2012 championship of football in Ukraine and realization of infrastructural projects* Ministry of Regional Development and Construction and Ministry of Communal Living merge into Ministry of Regional Development, Construction, and Communal Living (coordinated by a Deputy Premier)** State Architectural-Building Inspection* Ministry of Labor and Social Policy reorganized into Ministry of Social Policy and State Inspection in labor affairs (coordinated by a Deputy Premier)** State Inspection in Labor Affairs** State Committee in Veteran Affairs reorganized into State Service in affairs of handicapped and veterans** Pension Fund* Ministry of Agrarian Policy reorganized into Ministry of Agrarian Policy and Food** State inspection of rural management** State Committee of Veterinary Medicine reorganized into State Veterinary Services** State Committee of land resources reorganized into State Agency of land resources** State Committee of forest management reorganized into State Agency of forest resources** State Committee of fishing management reorganized into State Agency of fishing management* Ministry of Internal Affairs** State Migration Service* Ministry in protection of nature reorganized into Ministry of Ecology and Natural Resources** State Ecological Inspection** State Service of Geology and Subsoil** State Committee of Water Management reorganized into State Agency of Water Resources** National Agency of Ecological Investments reorganized into State Agency of Ecological Investments* Ministry of Fuel and Energy and Ministry of Coal Mining Industry merge into Ministry of Energy and Coal Mining Industry* Ministry of Foreign Affairs* Ministry of Culture and Tourism reorganized into Ministry of Culture** State Agency in Cinema Affairs* Ministry of Emergencies reorganized into Ministry of Emergencies** State Service of Mining Supervision and Industrial Safety** State Agency in directing the of alienation** State Inspection of Techno-genetic Safety* Ministry of Defense* Ministry of Education and Science and Ministry in affairs of family, youth and sport merge into Ministry of Education and Science, Youth and Sport** State Service of Intellectual Property** State Service of Youth and Sport** State Committee of Science, Innovations, and Informatics reorganized into State Agency of Science, Innovations, and Informatics* Ministry of Health Protection** State Sanitary-Epidemiological Service** State Inspection in control of medicine quality and State Committee in Drug Control Affairs merged into State Service of Medicine and Drug Control** State Service to counteract HIV-infection/AIDS and other socially dangerous disease* Ministry of Finance** State Treasury Service** State Tax Administration reorganized into State Tax Services** State Customs Service** State Assay Service** State Committee of Financial Monitoring reorganized into State Service of Financial Monitoring** Main Control-Revisionary Directorate reorganized into State Financial Inspection* Ministry of Justice** State Committee of Archives reorganized into State Archive Services** State Executive Service** State Department in affairs of executions reorganized into State Penitentiary Services** State Registration Service** State Service in Protection of Personal Data;Other state services and agencies;;Liquidated* State Committee of Industrial Safety, Labor Security, and Mining Supervision, functions transferred to agencies of Ministry of Emergencies* Supreme Attestation Commission, functions transferred to Ministry of Education and Science, Youth and Sport* Ukrainian Institute of National Memory* State Committee in affairs of regulatory policy and entrepreneurship* State Committee of Nationalities and Religions;;Renamed* State Committee of Nuclear Regulation into State Inspection of Nuclear Regulation* National Space Agency into State Space AgencySee also* of Ministers of UkraineReferencesExternal links* Governmental Portal of Ukraine - official site of the Cabinet of Ministers* Factbox: Challenges facing new Ukrainian government - Post (March 11, 2010)* New Cabinet of Ministers (short biographies of the ministers; including photos) - Post (March 11, 2010)* New old government (short biographies of the ministers; including photos) - Weekly (March 18, 2010)* Power Grab (editorial) - Post (March 11, 2010)* Experts: Ukraines new government could be effective, regardless of absence of famous professionals - Post (March 15, 2010)* / Verbatim of the session on March 11, 2010AsarowMykoy Azarowa  
26527514
Stefan_Meyer_(physicist)
footnotes         Stefan Meyer (27 April 1872  29 December 1949) was an Austrian physicist involved in research on radioactivity. He became director of the Institute for Radium Research in Vienna and received the Prize in 1913 for his research on radium.( ) He was the brother of Leopold Meyer who was also awarded the Prize.()()()Life and workStefan was the second son of the lawyer and notary Gotthelf Karl Meyer and his wife Clara (ne Goldschmidt, sister of Goldschmidt). He went to school in Vienna and later graduated from gymnasium in Horn in 1892. He studied physics at the University of Vienna and attended the University of Leipzig for one year. He obtained his PhD in 1896 for work with Serafin Exner. In 1897, Meyer became assistant of Boltzmann at the Institute for Theoretical Physics, University of Vienna. His research was dedicated to magnetic permeability of liquids. After a talk of Oskar Giesel  a pioneer in the research and production of radium  he obtained a sample of radium from Giesel to determine magnetic properties of the new element. Meyer and his colleague von Schweidler were able to show that the Becquerel rays (beta rays) could be deflected by magnetic fields; this effect was discovered simultaneously by several scientists, but Meyer et al. also showed that the radiation from polonium (alpha rays) behaved differently in the magnetic field.((Meyer was able to organize the production of 4 grams of radium, as recommended in 1901 by the Academy of Sciences. The chemical plant of von Welsbach, which was used to produce rare earth elements, provided the necessary technical equipment and knowledge for separation of small quantities of material from ore. Meyer became interim head of the institute for one year after the suicide of Boltzmann. During that time, Meyer had also contacted Meitner before she left for Berlin in 1907. Meyer became assistant of Exner in 1908 and professor in 1909. The ample supply of radium which he shared with the Curies in Paris, Rutherford in Manchester and Ramsey in London made him a key figure in the research on radium.((The only larger source for radium-containing pitchblende was the Sankt Joachimsthal mines, which were located in Austria-Hungary. To improve the industrial use and mining of radium, Austrian industrialist Kupelwieser donated 500,000 kronen to found an institute for research on radium in 1908. In 1910, the Institute for Radium Research in Vienna was opened. Meyer became its first acting director, and Exner was the director of the institute. The institute in Vienna opened two years before the Institute du Radium in Paris.((During the time when Meyer was acting director, a number of prominent scientists worked at the institute, including de Hevesy, Francis Hess and Paneth. With the Anschluss sterreichs in 1938, the annexation of Austria by Nazi Germany, Meyer as a Jew had to leave office. He requested retirement before he was forced out of the institute. He stayed in his house in the countryside of Austria and, because of the intervention of several people, was left unharmed for the rest of the war. His older brother Leopold Meyer, a professor of chemistry, was less protected and was killed in the concentration camp in 1942. After the war, Meyer was rehabilitated and allowed to return to his Institute as director. Meyer died in 1949.((PublicationsStefan Meyer published several articles on radioactivity together with Schweidler. He compiled most of the findings on radioactivity in a book.() This book became a standard German textbook on radioactivity similar to the book of Curie in French and the book of Rutherford in English. During his forced retirement, he wrote a book on musical instruments and acoustics.(()ReferencesMeyer
26561639
Standard_Model_(Exhibition)
Standard Model is the title of an exhibition held between 1 October and 25 October 2009 at the Nordin Gallery, Stockholm. The exhibition was made in collaboration between Swedish artist Karl Tuikkanen and London based Australian artist David Brazier and represents the first physical manifestation of their artistic partnership exploring ideas of communication and collaboration mediated through the internet.ProcessCentral to the artists process has been mining the public information resource Wikipedia, allowing for the logic of the network to develop the content of the exhibition. Beginning with the Wikipedia page for standard model the artists used the system of selecting and sending Wikipedia links between Stockholm and London to quickly take them to destinations far removed from their points of departure.Reminiscent of surrealist strategies of stream of consciousness and Corpse Tuikkanen and Brazier relinquish authorial control, choosing instead to hand it over to the web based dialogue and the content of internet links. In doing so, coherence and rationality is discarded for a logic which follows loose associations, without hierarchy or proof of authenticity.LinksEach artist began with the Wikipedia page for model. From there the artist would select a link and send it to the other artist who would repeat the process until the final information page was six times removed from the original Wikipedia page for standard model. The information that emerged through this process provided the content for works made and exhibited. This process was repeated 12 times.The chain of links for each work is shown below.Chain 1Model,symmetry,of the United Kingdom,fire of London,Plague,731,Korean human experimentationChain 2Model,Interaction,Bang Theory,Philosophy,of Optics,Razor,of the GapsChain 3Model,Momentum,Numerals,Exiguus,the Great,Scabies,ParasitismChain 4Model,CERN,39 Clues,KGB,and Ethel Rosenburg,Americanism,FormaldehydeChain 5Model,Antimatter,emission tomography,disease,Simplex,Vera,HybridChain 6Model,Matter,Energy,Space Telescope,Tsiolkovsky,Fiction,Man in the High CastleChain 7Model,Prize in Physics,X-ray,Defense Initiative,Disinformation,Mossad,Wrath of GodChain 8Model,diagram,1991,disarmament crisis,uranium documents,affair,MerlinChain 9Model,problems in physics,universes,universe,Creationism,will,demonChain 10Model,of everything,Hawking,hiphop,Nerdapalooza,Pixelh8,computerChain 11Model,Verifiability,review,Kuhn,Relations,transition theory,CenturyChain 12Model,Glashow,Jew,Zionism,Kokhba revolt,Sea scrolls,ScrollWikipedia BookA two volume Wikipedia Book has been created. It includes the Standard Model (Exhibition) article and the seventy three other articles that informed the exhibition.* Order the  bookExternal linksGallery website* Standard Model Exhibition at Nordin GallerySurrealism* What is Surrealism? Lecture by Breton, Brussels 1934* Manifesto of Surrealism by Andr Breton. 1924* Exquisite CorpseScientific organisations* CERN European Organization for Nuclear Research
26586369
Treaty_(song)
Treaty is a song by Australian indigenous music band Yindi, which is made up of Aboriginal and balanda (non-Aboriginal) members.()()() Released in June 1991, Treaty peaked at No. 11 on the ARIA Singles Chart in September.()( NOTE: Used for Australian Singles and Albums charting from 1974 until ARIA created their own charts in mid-1988. In 1992, Kent back calculated chart positions for 19701974.) Treaty was the first song by a predominately-Aboriginal band to chart in Australia() and was the first song in any Aboriginal Australian language (Yolngu-Matha) to gain extensive international recognition, peaking at No. 6 on the Billboard Dance Club Play singles charts.((accessdate2008-11-08 ) In May 2001 Treaty was selected by Performing Right Association (APRA) as one of the Top 30 Australian songs of all time.()In 2009 Treaty was added to the National Film and Sound Archives Sounds of Australia Registry.BackgroundIn 1988, as part of Bicentennial celebrations, Minister of Australia, Hawke, visited the Northern Territory for the Barunga festival where he was presented with a statement of Aboriginal political objectives by Yunupingu and Rubuntja.() Hawke responded to the Barunga Statement with a promise that a treaty would be concluded with Australians by 1990.( In 1991, Yothu Yindi were Hughie Benjamin on drums, Sophie Garrkali and Julie Gungunbuy as dancers, Stuart Kellaway on bass guitar, Witiyana Marika on manikay (traditional vocals), bilma (ironwood clapsticks) and dance, Milkayngu Mununggurr on yidaki (didgeridoo), Gurrumul Yunupingu on keyboards, guitar and percussion, Makuma Yunupingu on yidaki, vocals, bilma, Mandawuy Yunupingu on vocals and guitar, Mangatjay Yunupingu as a dancer.( Mandawuy, with his older brother Galarrwuy, wanted a song to highlight the lack of progress on the treaty between Aboriginal peoples and the federal government. Mandawuy recalls:8 July 2004Treaty was written by Australian musician Paul Kelly and Yothu Yindi members Mandawuy Yunupingu, Kellaway, Williams, Gurrumul Yunupingu, Mununggurr and Marika.()() The initial release received limited radio and television exposure (mainly on ABC radio and SBS television)() and failed to chart.( Records saw the potential for a dance-orientated remix and engaged Melbourne-based sound mixers, Robert Goodge (ex-Talking), Gavin Campbell and Paul Main to produce one.(((  The Filthy Lucre remix was produced without the bands involvement but with the understanding that the Yolngu side of the music was preserved.(  The remix not only modified the musical backing but dispensed with the majority of the English language lyrics, with the song sung almost entirely in the Aboriginal language, Gumatj.((( The Filthy Lucre remix, was released in June, entering the charts in July and peaking at No. 11 on the Recording Industry Association (ARIA) singles charts by September, spending a total of 22 weeks in the national charts.(( Success for the single was transferred to the related album Voice which peaked at No. 4 on the ARIA Albums Chart.( The album produced by Mark Moffatt for Records was released in September 1991.( Mandawuy Yunupingu took leave of absence from his duties as principal to tour and promote the single and album.(( Other singles from the album were a re-released Djpana (Sunset Dreaming) which peaked at #13 in 1992 and Tribal Voice which didnt reach the Top 50.( At the 1992 ARIA Awards Yothu Yindi won awards for Engineer of the Year for Maralitja (maralitja is Yolngu matha for crocodile man - one of Mandawuys tribal names), Dharpa (dharpa is tree), Treaty, Treaty (Filthy Lucre remix) and Tribal Voice by David Price, Ted Howard, Greg Henderson and Simon Polinski; Song of the Year for Treaty; and Single of the Year for Treaty.()() Both Treaty in 1992 and Djpana (Sunset Dreaming) in 1993 charted on the Billboard Dance Club Play singles charts, with Treaty peaking at #6.(In May 2001 Treaty was selected by Performing Right Association (APRA) as one of the Top 30 Australian songs of all time.(Musical styleMusically the song is a mixture of Yolgnu and Balanda ways. The timbres of the song include the Balanda rock ensemble of electric guitars, keyboard and drumkit, and on occasion Balanda voices.  The Yolgnu sounds include the lead singers vocal quality, and the traditional instruments, bilma (ironwood clapsticks) and yidaki (didgeridoo).  The songs text is partly in English and partly in Yolgnu Matha, and the form of the song, while conforming to the Balanda rock structure of verses and choruses with an instrumental break, and the process of intensity through repetition of short motives, is nevertherless that of a djatpangarri, a form of Yolgnu popular music.()VideosThere were two video clips for Treaty. The first features footage of the 1988 Barunga Festival where the Barunga Statement is shown in its final stages of preparation, and Prime Minister Hawke is shown participating didjeridu-playing and spear-throwing competitions.( As the Barunga Statement is presented to the Prime Minister, he is accompanied by the Minister for Indigenous Affairs, Hand. Also included in this first clip are images of the band in concert, and footage from the Peninsula of industrial bauxite mining, ceremonial dancing led by Witiyana in the bush and children dancing on the beach.(  According to the director, Stephen Johnson, it was never his intention to make a consciously political video. A second clip for Treaty was made to accompany the Filthy Lucre remix. It was also directed by Stephen Johnson( and dispenses with the overtly political shots of the previous video.  The video features images of the band in concert as well as footage from the Gove Peninsula of ceremonial dancing led by Witiyana in the bush, Witiyana and Milkayngu dancing with their instruments on the beach, Mandawuy singing over a blazing fire and children dancing on the beach with portable stereo given to them by Mandawuy.((Track listingYothu Yindi original version# Treaty (Paul Kelly, Yunupingu, Stuart Kellaway, Cal Williams, Gurrumul Yunupingu, Milkayngu Mununggurr and Witiyana Marika)  3:35# Yolngu Boy (Mandawuy Yunupingu)  4:14Yothu Yindi (Filthy Lucre remix version)# Treaty (Filthy Lucre Remix)  6:52# Treaty (Radio Mix)  3:50# Treaty (Dub)  7:30PersonnelYothu Yindi members*Kellaway  bass guitar, backing vocals*Marika  vocals, clapsticks, backing vocals*Mununggurr  didgeridoo, backing vocals*Yunupingu  vocals, clapsticks*Yunupingu  keyboards, percussion, guitar, didgeridoo, organ, backing vocals*Yunupingu  didgeridoo*Yunupingu  lead vocals, backing vocals, guitar*Williams  lead guitar, rhythm guitar, guitar, backing vocalsAdditional musicians*Benjamin  drums*Bygrave  backing vocals*Fataar  drums, percussion, backing vocals*Finn  backing vocals*Moffatt  organ, bass guitar, guitar*Murphy  drums*Periera  congas*Roach  backing vocals*Steve Wade  backing vocalsProduction details*Engineer  David Price, Ted Howard, Greg Henderson, Simon Polinski*Producer  Moffatt*Remixers  Robert Goodge, Gavin Campbell, Paul Main (Filthy Lucre version)ReferencesExternal links* Treaty was added to the National Film and Sound Archives Sounds of Australia Registry in 2009* Listen to an excerpt of Treaty and read more about the song on australianscreen online* Aaron Corn (2009) Reflections & voices: exploring the music of Yothu Yindi with Mandawuy Yunupingu Sydney: Sydney University Press (ISBN 9781920899349)* Castles, J. (1992) Tjungaringanyi: Aboriginal Rock Hayward, Philip (ed) From Pop to Punk to Postmodernism Sydney: Allen and Unwin
26611823
Mykola_Azarov
website       Official websiteMykola Yanovych Azarov (); born Nikolai Yanovich Pakhlo () on 17 December 1947, is a Ukrainian politician who has been the Minister of Ukraine since 11 March 2010. He was the First Vice Prime Minister and Finance Minister from 2002 to 2005 and again from 2006 to 2007, and he also served as acting Prime Minister for two short periods in late 2004 and early 2005. Following the victory of Yanukovych in the 2010 presidential election, Azarov succeeded Yanukovych as leader of the of Regions, and he was appointed as Prime Minister in March 2010.(     :  I)()Early life and careerAzarov was born in Kaluga( in the SFSR, Union, to Yan Robertovich Pakhlo and Yekaterina Kvasnikova as Nikolay Pakhlo.(    -, Gazeta.ua (12 March 2010))( When he married his wife, Lyudmila Azarova, he took her name.(( Azarov attended the State University where he earned his doctorate in geology and mineralogy in 1971.( He worked at the Tulaugol coal enterprise until 1976.( Dr. Azarov moved to Donetsk on a permanent basis in 1984 to become deputy director of the State Geological Institute, that he went on to head.( In 19841995 he was a deputy director and director of State Research and Design Institute of Mining Geology and Geomechanics.(Political career1st turn as Parliamentarian and head state tax administrationAzarov served as the head of the budgetary committee of the Rada (Ukrainian Parliament) in 19941997.( He also was a long-term (19962002) head of the State Tax Administration.(Biography of new Ukrainian Prime Minister Mykola Azarov, Novosti (11 March 2010))(Mykola Azarov: Yanukovychs Right-Hand Man, Free Europe/Radio Liberty (12 March 2010)) During this period tax inspections were used to limit the of the press in Ukraine.(1999 Country Reports on Human Rights Practices: Ukraine, Department of State (23 February 2000))(2000 Country Reports on Human Rights Practices: Ukraine, Department of State (23 February 2001))(2001 Country Reports on Human Rights Practices: Ukraine, Department of State (4 March 2002))(2002 Country Reports on Human Rights Practices: Ukraine, Department of State (31 March 2003)) On tapes made during the Scandal Azarov is heard speaking on recordings, secretly recorded in Kuchmas office by Kuchmas bodyguard Melnychenko, about using his position as the head of the tax authority to pressure officials to ensure Kuchmas reelection in 1999.((Virtual Politics  Faking Democracy in the Post-Soviet World, Andrew Wilson, University Press, 2005, ISBN 0-300-09545-7 (page 81)) Critics also stated that the recordings implicated Azarov in other corrupt schemes, including allegedly covering up graft at the state natural gas company Naftogaz,( aiding the demise of the Bank (which was connected to Tymoshenkos natural gas company Energy Systems of Ukraine)( and illegal funding of Kuchmas 1999 election campaign.(Virtual Politics  Faking Democracy in the Post-Soviet World, Andrew Wilson, University Press, 2005, ISBN 0-300-09545-7 (page 117)) Azarov has vehemently refuted all these allegations.( In 2002, he accused Slavyansk Bank president Feldman of being behind the Cassette Scandal recordings.(File:Vice-premiers of Ukraine, Belarus, Kazakhstan, Russia 2003.jpg|thumb|Vice-Premiers Azarov, Kobyakov (Belarus), Massimov (Kazakhstan) and Khristenko (Russia) (April 2003)First Deputy Prime Minister and Finance MinisterIn 2001 he became the head of the Party of Regions but resigned from the post in less than a year. In 2003 Azarov was elected chairman of the Party of Regions political council.( In 2002, the European Choice parliamentary group nominated him for the Prime Ministers post, but he declined, standing aside for Yanukovych, who assumed both the leadership of the Party of Regions and the Prime Ministers job.( Azarov was appointed First Deputy Prime Minister and Minister in late November 2002, when the Yanukovych Government took office.((PM promises Ukraine new team, News (22 November 2002)) During the first Yanukovych Government governing the set of economic reforms was implemented including fiscal, tax, pensionary, regulatory reforms. During Azarovs first term as Finance Minister, the annual GDP growth was 9.6% in 2003 and 12.1% in 2004 (cf. 2.7% in 2005) in Ukraine,(Country Economic Reports & GDP Data Ukraine, Global Finance) with investments of 31.3% and 28.0%(Climate in Ukraine.doc Investment climate in Ukraine in the first half of 2005, Worldbank) (cf. 1.9% in 2005(Parliamentary Assembly, Working Papers: Ordinary Session, June 2006, of Europe (31 March 2007  page 98))).(Main social and economic indicators of Ukraine 20012008, Bank of Ukraine)Azarov first served as acting Prime Minister from 7 December 2004 to 28 December 2004, after Yanukovych was put on vacation leave by President Kuchma in the midst of the Revolution.(( After the runoff, Yanukovych attempted to resume his duties as prime minister, but effectively unable to do so, announced his resignation on 31 December 2004,(Timeline: Battle for Ukraine , News (23 January 2005))(Yanukovych quits as Ukraine PM, News (31 December 2004)) and Azarov was named acting Prime Minister again.(( The Yanukovych Cabinet was officially dismissed on 5 January 2005.(Ukrainian parliament dismisses Tymoshenkos government, Interfax-Ukraine (10 March 2010)) Azarov continued as acting Prime Minister until shortly after the inauguration of Yushchenko, when Tymoshenko was appointed Prime Minister on 24 January 2005.((Azarov remained a strong political ally of Yanukovych, and again became a Member of Parliament for the Party of Regions after the 2006 Parliamentary elections.( When Yanukovych became Prime Minister again on 4 August 2006, Azarov was elected the First Deputy Prime Minister and Finance Minister in the Yanukovych Government.(Prime ministerFollowing his election as of Ukraine((), Yanukovych offered three candidates for Prime Minister on 21 February 2010: Tigipko, Our Ukraine faction member Yatsenyuk and Azarov.()Azarov headed Yanukovychs election campaign during the 2010 Presidential elections.(The Verkhovna Rada appointed Azarov Minister of Ukraine on 11 March 2010.((.) Of the 343 lawmakers registered in the session hall, 242 voted in favor of the appointment.() The next month he was elected head of the of Regions.()A November 2010 Centre nationwide survey showed that only 13.2 percent of respondents fully support his government while 45 percent stated they didnt.(Yanukovych to slim ranks of government, Post (16 December 2010))Cultural and political imageHis Russian origin often leads to accusations by Ukrainian nationalists and Western media. Azarov speaks Ukrainian poorly.()()(     .) Nevertheless he assured his constituents in early March 2010 that his government will be speaking Ukrainian.( In April 2011 he also stated: I feel one hundred percent Ukrainian.(Azarov: I feel one hundred percent Ukrainian, Post (12 April 2011)) In a 11 March 2010 article the UK daily Guardian labelled him the most Russophile member of the new cabinet. In the same article an anonymous Ukrainian official noted Hes extremely boring and anti-populist.()Former of Regions member Chornovil has stated that influential Party of Regions member Akhmetov and the business wing of the Party of Regions are not positive about Azarov.( Chornovil claims he heard Akhmetov say about Azarov: It is better to deal with Tymoshenko; cheaper cost.(Views on societyAzarov had the Prime Ministerial office blessed by a priest from Pechersk Lavra soon after being elected Prime Minister in 2010.( Azarov stated in March 2010 there were no female ministers in the Government because Reforms do not fall into womens competence, while adding that he greatly respects women.()() After criticism from female politicians at home and abroad, Azarov explained that he meant he would not wish any woman, especially if she has children, to work more than 15 hours a day as a Ukrainian minister does.() Ukrainian womens rights groups have filed different cases against him.(According to Azarov, corruption is one of the biggest problems of Ukraine, We must combat not just instances of corruption, but totally corrupt systems.()ReferencesExternal links* Official website* Web page of Mykola Azarov* |-|-|-|- |-|-|-after|-|- AzarovAsarowAzarovAzarovAzarovAzarovAzarovAzarovAzarovsAsarowAzarovasJanovics AzarovAzarovja:AzarovAzarowAzarov AzarovAzarovAzarovAzarov Yanovych AzarovAzarovzh:
26633686
Old_Hansen_Planetarium
 refnum  79002505()The Old Hansen Planetarium at 15 South State Street in Lake City, Utah has served many functions throughout its history. Originally built in 1904 as the Salt Lake City Public Library, the building was renovated in 1965 to become the Hansen Planetarium. After the planetarium closed and was replaced by the Planetarium in 2003, the building was remodeled into the Tanner Company Headquarters, which opened in 2009. The building was listed on the Register of Historic Places in 1979.Salt Lake City Public LibraryThe first library in Salt Lake City opened in 1898 and was located in the top floor of the Lake City and County Building. After the library quickly outgrew the venue, the city began looking for a location to build a new library. A group of women called the Ladies Literary Society helped out by persuading the mining millionaire John Quackenbos Packard to donate land and money for the new building,() which cost $100,000 at the time. The new library opened in 1905 with librarian Joanna Sprague, for whom the Sprague branch of the Lake City Public Library system, also listed on the Register of Historic Places,( is now named. The building would continue to serve as the main branch library until October 1964, when a new library building was constructed at 209 East 500 South.()When the building was constructed, it was described as a combination of the Doric and Ionian styles of architecture, and would later be classified in the Beaux Arts style.( It was designed by Hines and LaFarge of York City, and the local supervising architect was Frederick A. Hale. The library was three stories tall with a two story entrance pavilion constructed of oolite limestone and  of floor space. The roof was slightly flared, and the roofline was broken by a large carved stone gable with a center arched window and four decorated pilasters. The entrance pavilions sides were curved around the spiral staircases at both ends of the entrance foyer. The pavilion was divided into three sections by four columns; each bay contained oak double doors leading to the foyer. After going through the foyer, the main reading room is revealed. In the center of the room stood a librarians desk made of steel and topped by oak, the same finish of the interior of the entrance foyer. On the upper floor, the main auditorium contained seating for 350 people.(Hansen PlanetariumAfter the new library was constructed in 1964, Gail Plummer, professor of speech and drama at the of Utah and chairman of the Salt Lake City Library board, expressed interest in converting the old library into a planetarium. Plummer had several conversations with Mrs. Beatrice M. Hansen, wife of the late George T. Hansen, in which Mrs. Hansen decided to fund the project.() In 1965 she donated $400,000 to the city to build the planetarium in memory of her deceased husband.( After Mrs. Hansens death the building was renamed the Mr. and Mrs. George T. Hansen Planetarium, Space Science Library and Museum in honor of the couple.( During its operation, the planetarium attracted 20% of the population of the city and had the highest capita attendance of any planetarium in the nation.() The Hansen Planetarium continued operation until April 2003, when it outgrew the building and was replaced by the Planetarium in the District.()When the Hansen Planetarium occupied the building, the center doors of the entrance pavilion were replaced by a large sheet of glass, and the center part of the steps was replaced with a fountain. A mezzanine was added above the second floor in the entrance pavilion for exhibit in the planetarium. The same firm that did the original millwork for the 1904 building worked on these new additions. The local architect for the additions was Wesley Budd.( A large dome was also added onto the rear wall of the building to give the planetarium extra space for its exhibits.()O.C. Tanner CompanyAfter four years of lying vacant, the Tanner Company bought the building in 2007 for $1.2 million. Before Tanner came along, two referendums to fund the empty building were rejected, but the jeweling companys clear plan got the votes it needed.( The company spent two years and $24 million renovating the building, which opened in September 2009. The company itself supplied a majority of the funds ($1315 million), and the remainder came from the community.()Upon the companys purchase of the building, O.C. Tanners staff decided to try to mimic the original architecture as closely as possible. Because of this, the dome at the rear of the building was removed. Instead of simply demolishing the dome, however, it was systematically dismantled and donated to the Zions Gateway to the Stars planetarium in Utah. Also, the front staircase was restored to its original condition by removing the fountain in the center, which, coincidentally, was donated by O.C. Tanner himself.(Only three of the four walls, the sides and front, were preserved in Tanners restoration. Since the back had already been altered by the Hansen Planetarium and there were no original images of that wall from the 1905 building, Curtis Bennett, vice president of the companys retail operations, was allowed a little freedom with that design.( The rear wall now consists of glass and stone, both etched with images of the buildings history. The rear wall contains the largest laser stone-carving project in the world with 18 panels covering  and weighing  in all.() The bottom of the rear wall contains repeated images from the library in 1905, the top contains images of a galaxy (signifying the Hansen Planetarium), and the middle contains an image of the founder of the company, O.C. Tanner. The image on the glass is a dot-matrix image, but the stone imaging required a new process developed specifically for this building.(Inside the building a new limestone spiral staircase was built with a Flora Cascade chandelier hanging in the center of the spiral. The chandelier was designed by Sharon Marston and includes about 4,000 strands of optics, more than 14,000 interwoven shapes made of white polymer and steel, and about 3,000 golden and amber glass leaves. Weighing  and extending  from the ceiling, the chandelier stretches nearly the entire height of the building.(ReferencesExternal links*O.C. Tanner Official Site
26666941
Heitkamp_BauHolding
The Heitkamp BauHolding GmbH  located in Herne, Rhine-Westphalia provides solutions for specialized construction work in different construction business areas.HistoryTodays Heitkamp BauHolding GmbH has its origin in the civil engineering company E. Heitkamp, which was founded in Herne-Wanne in 1892 by Engelbert Scharpwinkel, referred to as Heitkamp. Initially, towards the end of the 19th century, the company built canals and roads for the farmers in the neighbourhood.1902The son of E. Scharpwinkel, Heinrich Heitkamp, assumed the management of the still young construction company and expanded the field of activity by, amongst others, entering the mining business which was the characteristic industry in the area at the time.In the following decades, the construction activities were expanded beyond the limits of Herne: engineering, track and infrastructure construction as well as mining services became the main pillar of the company.At that time the projects included, for example, the new construction of the Herne railway station, the construction of the Chemische Werke Hls in Marl, earthwork, canal and regulation work for the Emschergenossenschaft and the Lippeverband, the beginning of motorway constructions as well as numerous shafting sinking activities for regional mines (Shamrock Mine, Unser Fritz Mine and others).thumb|Head office in Herne, Germany1946 to 1963After War II, the E. Heitkamp Tiefbaugeschft in Wanne-Eickel - as it was called at the time - was renamed into Bauunternehmung E. Heitkamp GmbH in 1946. In addition to Heinrich Heitkamp senior, the participators included his sons Heinrich and Robert.Following the removal of debris, the field of activity was expanded to include other areas. Buildings for government agencies and the Bundesbahn were constructed and in the early fifties, the company started providing special mining services with underground track constructions.In 1957, Heitkamp entered the plant construction sector by executing a contract for the Westerholt power plant owned by Hibernia AG. For the first time, refuse dumps were used for the construction of dams and roads.Heitkamp participated in the complete expansion of the Ruhr expressway from Essen via Bochum to Dortmund as well as in the new construction of the railway line between Gelsenkirchen and Haltern am See.This was followed by a participation in the construction of the Henrichshtte 2 plant in Hattingen as well as the power plants Brassert in Marl and Springorum in Bochum.A patent was issued on 28 May 1958 for the track-tamping machine developed by Heitkamp for underground track construction.In 1960, Heitkamp entered the tunnel construction sector when the company built the Erbscheidt tunnel in the course of the Bigge dam construction. In addition, Heitkamp was awarded contracts for the construction of the Ministry of Defence (Germany) at the Hardthhe in Bonn.At this time Heitkamp employed about 4000 people.1964 to 1980In 1964, Robert Heitkamp took over the sole management and expanded the family company in the next decades to become one of the largest construction companies in Germany.In the same year, Heitkamp built the first natural-draught tower for the power plant in Ibbenbren. This was followed by 53 cooling towers in Germany and another 38 cooling towers worldwide (including Australia, America, Africa, Greece, Spain, Netherlands etc.). In 1995 and in the course of the largest individual contract in the history of the company, Heitkamp built two natural-draught cooling towers for the Lippendorf power plant, amongst others, and in 1998 the highest natural-draught cooling tower in the world reaching 200 m at the Niederauem power plant.1970 to 1981Heitkamp participated in national and international construction projects that included, amongst others, power plant and power plant projects, infrastructure, civil engineering, engineering as well as engineering and mining projects.Heitkamp participated, amongst others, in the construction of the nuclear power plants in Brunsbttel, Phillippsburg I and II and Brokdorf as well as internationally in the construction of nuclear power plants in Austria (Tullnerfeld / Zwentendorf) and Switzerland (Gsgen-Dniken).Thanks to the experience gained in the construction of nuclear power plants, Heitkamp, along with the companies Hochtief AG and Dykerhoff & Widmann AG, was awarded the contract to build the reprocessing plant in Wackersdorf. The construction, however, was stopped in 1989 for political reasons.In Germany, important infrastructure projects included the participation in the construction of the subways in Berlin, Hanover, Bielefeld, Dortmund, Stuttgart and Munich as well as work on the 42, the Emscher expressway and the 45, the so-called Sauerland line.Internationally, Heitkamp was involved in construction projects in Yemen (Sanas  Taiz and Taiz to the Sea), in the subway construction in Vienna and took over the technical lead management during the construction of the first tunnel connecting Dover with Calais, which was later interrupted for political reasons.National hydraulic engineering projects at that time included the participation in the construction of the Obernau dam and the redirecting of the Ruhr at Neheim. International projects included the construction of the Hofuf drainage project in Arabia and the construction of a drainage tunnel in Venezuela.Heitkamp expanded its civil engineering activities - in this case turnkey construction services.  Bridge structures (e.g. the 3-bay road bridge Zum Frstenmoor in Hamburg-Harburg, the Emscher bridge in Dortmund-Deusen, the Annener Berg bridge in the Witten-Annen area) as well as the involvement in the construction of the parking at the cathedral and most tunnel projects in the course of the Bundesbahn high-speed line Kassel-Wrzburg clearly show Heitkamps participation in civil engineering projects. Heitkamp was also involved in the construction of the Olympic site in Munich.During that period, Heitkamp was also involved in the construction of the Technische Rathaus in Frankfurt, the construction of the Parkstadion Gelsenkirchen, buildings for the University of Berlin, work for the airport extension in Frankfurt and Hanover Langenhagen, the construction of the Lower-Saxon state parliament in Hanover, hotel constructions (Hotel Penta and Hotel Steigenberger in Berlin) and the construction of hospitals for the Federal Insurance Fund for Miners in Recklinghausen and Bochum as well as the Clinical Centre in Mnster. In the mining sector, Heitkamp was involved in the construction of the shaft tower with reinforced concrete for the Consolidation 3/ 4/ 9 mine in Gelsenkirchen and the construction of the new An der Haard mine in the Recklinghausen district.At this time, Heitkamp also began with the removal, marketing or stockpiling of tailings from the Ruhr area mines.The railway construction division executed, amongst others, a contract for the construction of tracks for the Elmshorn-Barmstedt-Oldesloer-Eisenbahn AG. Internationally, it participated in the renewal of the railway line between Riyadh and Dammam in Saudi Arabia.Dr. Alfred Herrhausen became the first chairman of the newly created advisory board.1981 to 1999In 1981, the company employed approx. 8,500 people and achieved a turnover of approx. 1.1 bn DM. Robert Heitkamp retired from the operational business and passed the management chair to his son, Prof. Dr. Dr. Engelbert Heitkamp.Until the reunification in 1990, Heitkamp expanded the field of activity in the areas of refurbishment, modernization and redevelopment of structures. One of the first modernization projects included the two city hall towers in Marl in Westphalia.Another main pillar was added to the already existing activities: The formation of the subsidiary Heitkamp Umwelttechnik GmbH in 1985.Because of the widespread introduction of mobile phone networks, Heitkamp built stations for the C-net of the Bundespost and later for the private D-net.Heitkamp participated in the realization of the Eurotunnel between Calais and Dover and nationally in the construction of subway and urban railway projects, e.g. in Dortmund.For the Bahn, Heitkamp realized several engineering works in the area of the new line Cologne  Rhine/Main.During that period the construction projects included, amongst others:- The coating of the outer shell of the natural-draught cooling tower at the plant in Vlklingen;- The natural-draught cooling tower for the nuclear power plant Isar 2 in Landshut;- The Hoheward tunnel at the Hoheward waste tip in Herten; - train wash facility for the Deutsche Bundesbahn in Hamburg-Eidelstedt;- Subway structures, amongst others, in Frankfurt, Nuremberg, Duisburg and Berlin;- Participation in the construction of the A 560 motorway, the Hennef by-pass and the 57 motorway between Goch and the Dutch border;- Participation in the construction of the interim storage facility for fuel elements in Ahaus;- An hotel, building, a medical centre with supermarket at the Ungererpark in Munich;- Construction of the centre for the Oel AG in Gelsenkirchen-Scholven;- Participation in the construction of the Daimler-Benz administrative centre in Stuttgart-MhringenAfter the German reunification in 1990, Heitkamp participated in construction projects for the five new federal states and established offices in Chemnitz, Dresden, Erfurt, Magdeburg, Potsdam, Halle and Rostock.Some examples include, amongst others, the rebuilding of the new synagogue in the Oranienburger Strae in Berlin, the coating of the natural-draught cooling tower in Rostock, the participation in the Markt Nordseite development in Weimar, reconstructions in the Dutch district in Potsdam, the participation in the Siemens Microelectronics Center in Dresden but also the lowering of the Rheinufer-Tunnel in Dsseldorf and the extension of the 2 motorway in the Bottrop area.Mining construction activities included, amongst others, the coke-side dust removal for the Zollverein coking plant in Essen as well as different reconstructions in the mining sector in the Erzgebirge.In 1999, Heitkamp merged with Deilmann-Haniel GmbH. The construction activities of both companies were combined in the Bauunternehmung E. Heitkamp GmbH while the mining activities were combined in the Deilmann-Haniel GmbH.The civil engineering projects of Bauunternehmung E. Heitkamp GmbH were also merged to make up the legally independent subsidiary Heitkamp Erd- und Straenbau GmbH.2000 until todayIn 2001, the activities of former Railway Construction Division were transferred to the independent subsidiary Heitkamp Rail GmbH.The following construction projects are examples of projects carried out by or with Heitkamp:- The so-called Bgelbauten (bridging structures) at the Central Station;- Glserne Manufaktur (transparent factory) of Volkswagen AG in Dresden and the Zollernhof in Berlin for the ZDF TV Studio;- Construction of the National Bank building in Riga, Latvia; - Construction of the double water-saving lock in Hohenwarte;- Modernization of the former Mannesmann high-rise building in Dsseldorf;- Construction and modernisation of the Marstallplatz Munich complex at (Munich);- Construction of the new Cologne  Rhine/Main line of the Deutsche Bahn;- Construction of a university building including a library for the University of Malm in Malm, Sweden.In 2005, the civil engineering departments of the Bauunternehmung E. Heitkamp GmbH were combined to make up the independent subsidiary Ingenieur- und Kraftwerksbau GmbH.Due to a massive drop in orders in the mining sector and the increasing competition in the German construction industry, Heitkamp-Deilmann-Haniel GmbH decided at the end of 2005 to take drastic restructuring measures.In the course of these restructuring measures, the ATON GmbH acquired the international and parts of the national special mining sector  todays Deilmann-Haniel International Mining and Tunnelling GmbH. The Dutch group of companies Heijmans acquired the Heitkamp Rail GmbH. In addition, the Turnkey Construction Office in Ratingen closed along with the offices in Dsseldorf, Dortmund, Hamburg, Munich and Stuttgart.In 2008, the Heitkamp-Deilmann-Haniel GmbH was renamed into todays Heitkamp BauHolding GmbH.The Heitkamp BauHolding GmbH combines now the following four business areas:- Civil engineering and power plant construction (Heitkamp Ingenieur- und Kraftwerksbau GmbH)- Infrastructure building (Heitkamp Umwelttechnik GmbH, Heitkamp Erd- und Straenbau GmbH)- Universal construction (domoplan GmbH, Heitkamp ProjektPartner GmbH)- Special construction (BuM Beton- und Monierbau GmbH, Bergsicherung Schneeberg GmbH, Bergsicherung Ilfeld GmbH)Currently, the largest project abroad involves the construction of the nuclear power plant in Finland.In the sector of infrastructure building, it is the participation of the Heitkamp Erd- und Straenbau GmbH in the construction of the Lake Phoenix in Dortmund-Hrde as well as the 6-lane extension and modernization of motorways  including the 1 and Bundesautobahn 2 (including the redevelopment of the Kreuz), the 40 and Bundesautobahn 42 motorways - that deserves special mention.In February 2009, Jrgen R. Thumann, a great-grandson of the founder of the company, took over the majority of the shares in the Heitkamp Group and has ever since been the chairman of the of directors. External links *Heitkamp BauHolding GmbHBauHolding
26677281
List_of_multilingual_Presidents_of_the_United_States
File:Thomas Jefferson by Rembrandt Peale 1805 cropped.jpg|thumb|Jefferson claimed to read and write six different languages.Of the 44 Presidents of the United States, at least half have displayed proficiency in speaking or writing a language other than English. Of these, only one, Van Buren, learned English as his second language; his first language was Dutch. Four of the earliest Presidents were multi-lingual, with Adams and Jefferson demonstrating proficiency in a number of foreign languages.A. Garfield not only knew Greek and Latin, but used his ambidexterity to write both at the same time. Both Roosevelts spoke French, and Wilson and D. Roosevelt spoke German. Few modern Presidents have spoken a foreign language.  Carter and W. Bush displayed a limited ability in Spanish. Two presidents have known an language: Hoover spoke fluent Chinese and Obama speaks conversational Indonesian.18th and 19th centuriesJohn AdamsAdams, the second of the United States, learned to read Latin at a young age.(Crapo (2007), 4.) In preparation for attending University, Adams attended a school for improving his Latin skills.(McLeod (1976), 23.) Adams translated a number of classical Latin works into English, including some works of Horace.(Franklin (2003), 96.) He also demonstrated proficiency in Hebrew by translating books of the Testament into English. He also translated parts of the Testament from Greek.( While posted in France, Adams became fluent in French.(McCullough (2001), 321.)  Adams claimed that John Adams knew nine languages and had translated works from the Greek, Latin, French, and Spanish.(Thomas JeffersonJefferson read a number of different languages. In a letter to Philadelphia publisher Delaplaine on April 12, 1817, Jefferson claimed to read and write six languages: Greek, Latin, French, Italian, Spanish, and English.() After his death, a number of other books, dictionaries, and grammar manuals in various languages were found in Jeffersons library, suggesting that he studied additional languages beyond those he spoke and wrote well. Among these were books in Arabic, Gaelic, and Welsh.(In regard to learning Spanish, Jefferson told Quincy Adams that he had learned the language over the course of nineteen days while sailing from the States to France. He had borrowed a grammar and a copy of Quixote from a friend, and read them on the voyage. Adams expressed skepticism, noting Jeffersons tendency to tell large stories.()James MadisonMadison began his studies of Latin at the age of twelve(Ketcham (1990), 20.) and had already mastered both Greek and Latin by the time he entered the College of New Jersey, later University. He produced many translations of Latin works, including translations of Grotius, Pufendorf, and Vattel.( He also studied Horace and Ovid.( He learned Greek as an admissions requirement for higher college learning.(While in college, Madison learned to speak and read Hebrew.( When he could have graduated, Madison remained at college for an additional year to study ethics and Hebrew in greater depth.(Hodge and Nolan (2007), 35.)James MonroeMonroe adopted many French customs while a diplomat in Paris, including learning fluent French. The entire Monroe family knew the language, and would often speak it among themselves when at home.()John Quincy AdamsQuincy Adams went to school in both France and the Netherlands, and spoke fluent French and conversational Dutch.(Adams (1874), 229) Adams strove to improve his abilities in Dutch throughout his life, and at times translated a page of Dutch a day to help improve his mastery of the language.(Adams (1874), 176.) Official documents that he translated were sent to the of State of the United States, so that Adams studies would serve a useful purpose as well.( When his father appointed him States Ambassador to Prussia, Adams dedicated himself to becoming proficient in German in order to give him the tools to strengthen relations between the two countries.() He improved his skills by translating articles from German to English, and his studies made his diplomatic efforts more successful.(In addition to the two languages he spoke fluently, he also studied Italian, though he admitted to making little progress in it since he had no one with whom to practice speaking and hearing the language.( Adams also read Latin very well, translated a page a day of Latin text,(Adams (1874), 177.) and studied classical Greek in his spare time.(Adams (1874), 380.)Martin Van BurenVan Buren was the only American President who did not speak English as his first language. He was born in New York, a primarily Dutch community, spoke Dutch as his first language, and continued to speak it at home.(Widmer (2005), ii.) He learned English as a language while attending Kinderhooks local school house. He obtained a small understanding of Latin while studying at Kinderhook Academy and solidified his understanding of English there.(Holland (1836), 15.)William Henry HarrisonAt College, Henry Harrison spent a considerable time learning Latin, and favored reading about the history of ancient Rome and Caesar from native language histories. At the college, he also learned a small amount of French.(Owens (2007), 14.)John TylerTyler excelled at school, where he learned both Latin and Greek.(May and Wilentz (2008), 13.)James K. PolkAlthough K. Polk had no background in foreign languages upon entering college, he proved a quick learner.(Mayo (2006), 11.) Upon graduating from the of North Carolina, he was asked to give the welcoming address at graduation; he chose to do so in Latin. He proved very proficient in classical languages, and received honors in both Greek and Latin on his degree.(Behrman (2005), 18.)James BuchananBuchanan studied a traditional classical curriculum, which included Latin and Greek, at the private Old Stone Academy before transferring to College. He excelled in both subjects.(Baker (2004), 12.)Rutherford B. HayesB. Hayes studied Latin and Greek at the Isaac Webb school in Connecticut. He initially struggled with the languages, but soon became proficient in them. He also briefly studied French there.(Trefousse (2002), 5.)James A. GarfieldA. Garfield knew both Latin and Greek. As the first ambidextrous president, Garfield entertained his friends by having them ask him questions, and then writing the answer in Latin with one hand while simultaneously answering in Greek with the other.()Chester A. ArthurA. Arthur was known to be comfortable enough in Latin and Greek to converse with other gentlemen who knew the languages.(Reeves (1975), 21.)20th centuryTheodore RooseveltRoosevelt spoke French. A foreign correspondent noted that, although he spoke clearly and quickly, he had a German accent while speaking in French.(New York Times (1909), 2. ) He read both German and French very well, and kept a good number of books written in these languages in his personal library.(New York Times (1898), IMS10. ) He quite often read fiction, philosophy, religion, and history books in both French and German.(Wagenknecht (2008), 39.) He was most comfortable with informal discussions in French, though he made two public addresses in the Indies in French in 1916.( He recognized that, while he spoke French rapidly and was able to understand others, he used unusual grammar without tense or gender. Hay, Secretary of State under Roosevelt, commented that Roosevelt spoke odd, grammatically incorrect French, but was never difficult to understand.(Though he could read and understand the language thoroughly, Roosevelt struggled to speak German. When Roosevelt attempted to speak with a native German, he had to apologize after botching the attempt.( While not fluent in the language, Roosevelt was also able to read Italian.() Though he at one point studied Greek and Latin, Roosevelt found both languages a dreary labour to translate.(Wagenknecht (2008), 38.)Woodrow WilsonWilson learned German as part of earning his Ph.D. in history and science from Hopkins University. However, he never claimed proficiency in the language. While he did read German sources when they were available, he often complained about the amount of time and effort it took him.(Pestritto (2005), 34.)Herbert HooverHoover spoke Chinese fluently; he lived in China as a young mining engineer.() He and his wife Henry Hoover, also fluent in Mandarin, often had public conversations in the language so that aides and others nearby could not eavesdrop on them.(King (2009), 35.)The Hoovers once translated a book from Latin to English.( The pair took five years, and sacrificed much of their spare time, to translating the Latin mining tract re metallica.(Lewiston Evening News (1933), 5.) While at University, Hoover had access to the extensive library of Casper Branner, where he found the important mining book which had never been fully translated into English.( For years, five nights of the week were spent translating the book, including naming objects that the author had merely described.(Franklin RooseveltDelano Roosevelt spoke both German and French. He was raised speaking both, as his early education consisted of governesses from Europe preparing him for boarding school in his teens. In particular, he had a German governess and a French governess who taught him their languages. A Swiss governess, Jeanne Sandoz, furthered his studies in both languages.(Harper (1996), 14.) She particularly stressed French.(Coker (2005), 4.) Roosevelt spent one summer of his schooling in Germany;(Harper (1996), 17.) both his time with his instructors and his frequent trips abroad allowed him to master German and French, though he always spoke them with a distinct New England accent.(Coker (2005), 6.) Though he never had a mastery of the language, his governesses also taught him a limited amount of Latin.(Freedman (1992), 9.)Jimmy CarterCarter has a functional command of Spanish, but has never been grammatically perfect.() Carter studied the language at the States Naval Academy(Carter (2004), 35.) and continued his studies while an officer of the States Navy.( He could speak fairly fluently, but joked about his sometimes flawed understanding of the language while discoursing with native speakers.(McBride (1978), 1.) Carter has given a number of addresses in the Spanish language, which he wrote himself,(The Washington Post (2002), 2.) and sometimes spoke to constituents in Spanish.(Associated Press (1976), 46.) To practice his Spanish, he and his wife Rosalynn read the Bible in Spanish to each other every night.( )Bill ClintonWhile a freshman at University, Clinton was required to choose a foreign language to study, and chose German because he was impressed by the clarity and precision of the language.(Clinton (2005), 76.) He is able to hold casual conversation in the language.(Maraniss (1996), 99.) Later, while giving a speech at the Gate, he gave part of a speech in German, pledging to the 50,000 Germans gathered there that Amerika steht an Ihrer Seite jetzt und fr immer (America is on your side, now and forever).(Clinton (2005), 609.)21st centuryFile:George W. Bush Weekly Radio Address, May 5, 2001.jpg|thumb|175px|George W. Bush on May 5 (de Mayo), 2001, delivering the first Radio Address of the President of the United States broadcast in both English and Spanish by any President.()George W. BushW. Bush speaks some amount of Spanish, and has delivered speeches in the language.(Gormley (2000), 113.) His speeches in Spanish are imperfect, with English dispersed throughout.() Some opponents, like Ivins, have pointedly questioned the extent to which Bush could speak the language, noting that he kept to similar phrasing in numerous appearances and displayed a Spanish II level of mastery in a Spanish-language press conference.(Ivin and Dubose (2000), xviii.)Barack ObamaObama himself claims to speak no foreign languages.()Others however, including of Indonesia Bambang Yudhoyono, claim he speaks Indonesian at a conversational level.() He picked up the language while he lived in Jakarta from age six to ten with his mother and stepfather, an Indonesian native. Yudhoyono noted that, in a phone call to him, Obama seemed fairly fluent in the language.( There is doubt, however, that his level of expertise in the language would be adequate to conduct foreign relations entirely in Indonesian.(   He can deliver Spanish with a decent accent, but admits to only knowing 15 words and having a poor knowledge of the language.()TableSee also*bin ein Berliner  a German phrase famously spoken by F. Kennedy in a speech in West Berlin* of Prime Ministers of Canada by languages spokenReferencesNotesBibliography****************************** ***van presidenten van de Verenigde Staten
26707214
St_John_the_Baptists_Church,_Atherton
 logosize              St John the Baptists Church, Atherton is a church in Atherton, Manchester, England. It is an active Anglican church and part of Leigh deanery in the archdeaconry of Salford, diocese of Manchester.() It is a Grade II Listed building.() HistoryThere have been three chapels or churches on the site of the of John the Baptist parish church. A chapel dedicated to St John the Baptist at Chowbent was built in 1645 by John Atherton as the second  of ease to Leigh Parish Church. It is sometimes referred to as the Old Bent Chapel.() It was never consecrated and was used by the Presbyterians as well as the Vicar of Leigh.() In 1721, Lord of the manor, Richard Atherton expelled the dissenters who subsequently built Chapel and the chapel was consecrated in 1723 by the of Sodor and Man. The first chapel was replaced by a new St Johns Chapel on the same site which was consecrated by the of Chester in 1814. This second chapel was replaced by the present church designed by the Lancaster architects Paley and Austin and consecrated in 1879.(StructureThe church is built of Runcorn stone, the interior of Stourton Stone with a Yorkshire stone floor. It is  wide,  long, and the  square tower rises to .( The fabric of the church has suffered from mining subsidence.See also*of churches in Greater Manchester*of ecclesiastical works by Paley and AustinReferences;Notes;Bibliography*
26720840
Appat_Island
 country admin divisions  QaasuitsupAppat Island (old spelling: Agpat, ) is an uninhabited(Norwegian University of Science and Technology) island in the Qaasuitsup municipality in northwestern Greenland. At ,( it is one of the larger islands in the Fjord system, located in its north-central part.(Nuussuaq, Saga Map, Tage Schjtt, 1992)Greenland helicopters approach Heliport on the way from Heliport alongside the southern and western wall of Appat, to then pass above the narrow Appat Ikerat strait between Appat and a smaller, mountainous Island. Geography Appat Island is separated from Island and Island in the south by the central arm of the Uummannaq Fjord; from the Salleq Island in the west by the Appat Ikerat strait; from the Peninsula in the north and northeast by the Strait. A small archipelago of low-lying skerries lies directly to the southeast of the island, with a small settlement of Saattut.(It is very mountainous, with precipitous walls falling from the glaciated summit plateau in all directions. The plateau (and the island itself) is bissected by the Naqellorssuaq valley. The highest point on the island is Appat Qaqaa (),(  a nunatak in the western part of the glaciated summit plateau. The coastline is undeveloped, apart from the Umiasuqasuup Ilua fjord at the southeastern end.( Promontories  Mining Qaqortuatsiaq, located on the northern coast of Appat near the shore of the Torsukattak Strait, is a former marble quarry,(nga.mil) now abandoned.(kanukoka.gl) Mining activities in the area are likely to resume in the future,() providing an economic lifeline to the communities of the Uummannaq region, keeping the relatively new Airport open.( Access The island can be reached via individually charetered fishing boats from Saattut, the settlement on a skerry off the southeastern cape, or from Ukkusissat to the northwest. Package tourists visit the desert on the cape as part of an organized tour from Uummannaq.(Uummannaq Tourist Service) Movement within the interior of Appat is restricted to mountaineering. References  External links * Volcanic development in the Nuussuaq Basin, West Greenland(Uummannaq)
26753942
Chamuscado_and_Rodriguez_Expedition
The Chamuscado and Rodriguez Expedition visited Mexico in 1581-1582. The expedition was led by Francisco Sanchez, called El Chamuscado, and Friar Augustin Rodriguez, the first Spaniards known to have visited the Indians since Vasquez de Coronado 40 years earlier.BackgroundFriar Augustine Rodriguez, stationed near the mining town of Barbara, Chihuahua, the northernmost outpost of Spain, organized the expedition.  In 1579, Rodriguez became interested when an Indian told him of settlements to the north in which the Indians grew cotton and wove cloth.  To the Spanish this meant that the Indians were civilized beings who might be made Christian.  Rodriguez got permission from Spanish authorities for the purpose of preaching the Holy Gospel. Rodriguez apparently had little familiarity with Coronados expedition but had read the account of de Vaca.(Mecham, J. Lloyd, The Second Spanish Expedition to New Mexico, New Mexico Historical Review, Vol 1, No. 3, July 1926, 265-267; Bolton, Herbert Eugene, Spanish Exploration in the Southwest, 1542-1706.  New York: Charles Scribners Sons, 1916)The expedition left Santa Barbara on June 5, 1581.  The appointed leader was El Chamuscado, so-called because of his flaming red beard.  The expedition included nine Spanish soldiers, three Catholic clerics, including Friar Augustin, and 19 Indian servants, including two women.  The soldiers were well armed and mounted; the expedition took along ninety horses and 600 sheep, goats, cattle and pigs.(Mecham, 267-268)  The expedition was also authorized to explore the country for valuable minerals#(Riley, Carroll L., Rio del Norte, Salt Lake City: U of Utah Press, 1995, 227)The Route and the IndiansThe expedition preceded down the River to its junction with the Rio Grande.  Along more than one hundred miles of the Conchos lived the Concho and Raya Indians who spoke the same language and were naked and lived on roots and other things.(Hammond, George P. and Rey, Agapito, The Rediscovery of New Mexico, 1580-1594. Albuquerque: U of NM Press, 1966, 70; Bolton, 145)  Beyond the Conchos, occupying 40 miles of the river banks were the Cabris or Pasaguantes, also naked but speaking a different language and cultivating squash and beans in addition to gathering wild plants.  They were described as very handsome. Both the Conchos and the Cabris had been victims of slave raids by Spaniards.(Hammond and Rey, 70; Mecham, 269)Near La Junta, the junction of the Conchos River and the Rio Grande, Chamuscado and Rodriguez found several groups of Indians.  At the junction and south were the Abraidres; northward were the Patarabueyes and Otomoacos or Amotomancos.  They were friendly, the men described as handsome and the women beautiful. They lived in wattled houses and grew squash and beans, but the Spanish considered them naked and barbarous people.(Hammond and Rey, 73-75)  Northwards, near present day El Paso lived the Caguates. They lived in mud brick houses and, while growing corn and beans, they also journeyed to the Plains to hunt buffalo and ate fish caught in the river.  The explorers estimated that the Indians between La Junta and El Paso numbered about 10,000.(Mecham, 270-271)  The Indians directed the Spanish to follow the Rio Grande upstream to where they would find houses two stories high and of good appearance, built of mud walls and white inside, the people being dressed in cotton.(Bolton, 146, Mecham, 271)  Scholars debate which of these various tribes, if any, were the people later known as Jumanos.The Pueblo IndiansAfter many days of following the Rio Grande through unoccupied territory, the expedition reached the first village of Indians south of New Mexico, near the future site of Craig, and continued up the Rio Grande passing through many large and prosperous Pueblo villages.   North of Albuquerque they left the Rio Grande and journeyed eastward to the largest of the Pueblos at Pecos.  It had 400 to 500 houses and rose to four or five storiesindicating a population of perhaps more than 3,000.  The Spaniards described the Pueblo Indians as handsome and fair-skinned and some of the women had light hair.  Coronados army may have left its seed behind. They grew corn, beans, and squash and kept turkeys and, all in all, the Spanish were impressed with them and their manner of living.(Hammond and Rey, 84-85; Riley, 231; Bolton, 146)On September 10, 1581, one of the three Catholic friars, Juan de Santa Maria, decided to return to Mexico.  Reluctantly, Chamuscado acceded to his desire and he departed.The soldiers ventured eastward onto the Great Plains in search of buffalo.  On the River near Santa Rosa they encountered a rancheria of Querecho Indians.  Four hundred men armed with bows and arrows came out to meet them, but Friar Rodriguez calmed them.  The Spanish described them as naked -- uncivilizedpeople who hunted the buffalo.  A short distance further east they found the buffalo in many herds of 200 to 300 and killed about 40 of them and made jerky.(Bolton, 148) The Querechos were the people who would later be called Apaches.Returning to the Rio Grande Valley they journeyed west to Pueblo and Zuni but were stopped by winter snows from continuing on to the Hopi pueblos.  Then, they ventured east again to visit several Pueblos in the salinas east of the Mountains.The chroniclers of the expedition did not note any influence of the Coronado expedition on the Pueblos who apparently had not adopted any Spanish customs nor had they preserved any of the horses or other livestock left behind by Coronado.  They had, moreover, apparently recovered in numbers from the disastrous levies on their resources that Coronado had imposed.,(Riley, 209)  Chamuscado and Rodriguez with their slight numbers made fewer demands on the Pueblos, although they had one altercation after Indians killed three Spanish horses.(Flint)Chamuscado and Rodriguez visited 61 Pueblo towns along the Rio Grande and its tributaries and counted a total of 7,003 houses of one or more stories in the Pueblos.  If a later estimate of eight persons per house is accurate, the population of the towns visited was 56,000. In addition, they heard of other Pueblos, including the Hopi which they were unable to visit.(Hammond and Rey, 115-120,172-173)The ReturnThe Spanish learned that Friar Juan had been killed by Indians only two or three days after leaving the expedition.(Flint, Richard and Flint, Shirley Cushing, Francisco Sanchez Chamuscado and Agustin Rodriguez, http://www.newmexicohistory.org/filedetails.php?fileID468, accessed Apr 1, 2010)  Despite the killing of Friar Juan, the two remaining friars were determined to stay in New Mexico. The soldiers left them, most of their supplies, and several Indian servants behind in Puaray and departed on the return to Santa Barbara on June 31, 1582.(Mecham, 239)  During their return, Chamuscado, almost 70 years of age, died.  The eight remaining soldiers arrived in Santa Barbara on April 15, 1582.(Mecham, 290)The two friars and their Indian servants left behind were also soon killed by the Indians although two Indians escaped and returned to Mexico to tell the story.(Bolton, 152)  The Chamuscado and Rodriguez expedition was a modest affair, but revived Spanish interest in New Mexico leading to a colony being established there a few years later by de Onate. References 
26766855
Page_(surname)
Page, an surname of (servant), may refer to:* (Surrey cricketer) (18th century), English cricketer * Page (born 1945), American football player and judge* Page (1910-2008), film actress of the 1930s* W. Page (born 1883), early practitioner of public relations* Page (1923-2008), U.S. pinup model* Page (blues musician) (born 1953), blues musician* Grafton Page (1812-1868), American electrical physicist* Page (born 1947), newspaper columnist* Page, (1908-1978) British classical scholar* Dallas Page (born 1956), American professional wrestler and actor* M. Page, (1893-1957) Oregon Supreme Court justice* Page (1880-1961), Earle Christmas Grafton Page* Page (born 1987), Canadian actress* Pags (born 1950), French journalist and humorist.* Handley Page (1885-1962), British aircraft manufacturer* Page(born 1930), French actress* Page (1920-2000), Royal Air Force pilot* Page (1924-1987), American actress* Page (musician) (born 1972), Australian musician* Page (born 1960), British singer (Secret Affair) and author* O. Page (1936-2004), director of North Carolinas statewide EMS system* Page (born 1944), usually referred to as Jennie Page, sacked Chief Executive of the London Millennium Dome* Page (born 1944), musician (Led Zeppelin)* Page (Virginia politician) (1744-1808), U.S. politician* Page (1924-2008), American actress* Page (born 1970), American professional wrestling valet and actress; former wife of Diamond Dallas Page* Page (born 1973), co-founder of Google* Page (British singer and manager) (born c. 1938)* Page (sailor), (born 1972), Australian Olympic sailor* Page (footballer), (born 1947), Welsh footballer* Boomer Page, Chicago educator* Page (born 1944), former Australian baseball representative* Page (1908-1954), U.S. jazz musician* K. Page (born 1916), Canadian writer* the village idiot (born 1966), U.S. guitar comic* Page (born 1927), musician* Pag (born 1948), former Canadian ice hockey coach* Page (born 1941), Member of Parliament (in the United Kingdom)* Page (disambiguation)* Page (c. 1880-1912), early aviator* Page, American Actor* Page (born 1970), Canadian musician * Pag (born 1961), Canadian politician* Nelson Page (1853-1922), U.S. novelist* Page (photographer) (born 1944), British photographer* Page (born 1970), US vocalist and pianist.* Page (1892-1978), British motorcycle designer* Page (1811-1885), American painter* Nelson Page (1854-1932), civil and mining engineer* W. Page (1834-1897), Oregon Supreme Court justiceSee also*(disambiguation)ru:
26796558
Harold_Arthur_Morris
Harold Arthur Morris was the fifth person to be awarded the of the City of Kimberley, South Africa, an honour conferred in 1967 in recognition of outstanding services to the City and the Cape. Morris was born in Rondebosch, Cape Town, on 4 May 1884 and died in Kimberley aged 93 on 3 June 1977.(Harold Arthur Morris - Freeman of Kimberley, in Now and Then: Newsletter of the Historical Society of Kimberley and the Northern Cape 18(1), March 2010, pp 1-3.)Early life and educationH.A. Morris was the second of three sons of the Revd Henry Elliott Morris, who was the head of the College Preparatory School and afterwards an Honorary Canon of Georges Cathedral, Cape Town. The three boys grew up with their parents at Feldhausen (The Grove) in Claremont and at Bishops (Diocesan College). Morriss elder brother, Edward, an attorney at Nqamakwe, Transkei, died during the 1918 influeza epidemic, while the youngest of the siblings, Hugh, as a medical graduate from Edinburgh and a fine artist, who rose to the rank of captain in the Great War, was killed by a sniper behind enemy lines in 1915 while sketching enemy positions.Morris was educated at College, 18931901, and began an engineering career in Town in 1902. As a qualified journeyman in 1907 he helped install a wheel hydro electric scheme in the River Valley, and the first 2 200 Volt high tension switchboard at the Dock Road Power Station for Government Railways. Subsequently joining the staff of the English-owned Koffyfontein Mine Ltd, he went to the Free State mining town of Koffiefontein in 1909. In 1912 he qualified as an engineer, being awarded Certificate No 11 which, in 1967, was the oldest valid professional engineering certificate in South Africa.World War IWith the outbreak of War I Morris volunteered for service, first in local hostilities when he joined Horse, a mounted unit forming part of a surprise Eastern Force for an intended cross-desert attack on the German rear in West Africa (the Germans had surrendered, however, by the time the force reached its destination). He then worked his passage to England, as a Third Engineer in Galway Castle, and joined the Engineers. As a Sergeant he took a searchlight contingent to the front. Commissioned in 1918 as 2nd Lieutenant, No 5 Anti Aircraft Searchlight Section, H.A. Morris was awarded a Cross for continuous excellent work and disregard of personal danger, though constantly bombed, machine gunned and sometimes shelled in front of Arras and in the advance on Valenciennes and Mons. He later led his section on the great march across the Rhine as part of the of Occupation in Germany.KimberleyMorris returned to South Africa after the war and went to Kimberley to join Beers as a construction electrician, resigning in 1926 to take up the post of City Electrician with the Kimberley City Council  or as City Electrical Engineer as the position came to be designated from 1930 onwards. Developing Kimberleys electrical reticulationHis first task was to re-organise the obsolete electrical reticulation of the city, although dual control by Kimberley and Beers continued. He encouraged the use of electrical appliances to increase the load, revenue and size of the municipal network. Morris later recalled that although Kimberley was famed for its early street lighting, hed been astonished on his first day with the municipality to have a staff member report for paraffin and fodder for his horse, his job being to light up the rather primitive lamps in the far West End of the city. For prioritising the extension of electric street lighting in the poorer parts of town, Plaatje was to inscribe a copy of his novel Mhudi (1930) to Mr H.A. Morris, with the authors compliments and happy memories of the lights of the first Electric City on the Continent of Africa.(Inscription in the copy of Mhudi presented to H.A. Morris.)In 1941 dual control of Kimberleys electrical reticulation was finally ended, and, as Morris put it, the city regained its birthright. The department expanded rapidly.Kimberley Airport and AviationIn 1930-31, when Airways planned its Trans-Africa Air Service, Kimberley upgraded its aerodrome. This new venture was included in the engineers portfolio, which became City Electrical and Airport Department. The Kimberley airfields night lighting was proclaimed the best on the continent and was subsequently copied by Johannesburg.In 1934 the Kimberley Air Rally, largely organized by H.A. Morris, attracted 20 000 spectators, hugely popularising aviation. He was a co-founder of the Municipal Airports Association, and launched the Kimberley Aviation Society (1936).  In 1938, with impending war, he submitted a scheme to set up a pilot training school on the safest aerodrome in the world where the highest possible number of flying hours could be had. The Defence Force and Air Force leased the whole municipal airport in Dec 1939 for this purpose. During the war, as a key man, he was prevented from volunteering for service and so remained in Kimberley. The Northern CapeIn 1943 Morris conceived the idea of a Cape region, with Kimberley as capital, and in that year he was responsible for publishing a map in which the name Northern Cape was used for the first time to define the area.(Roberts, Brian, 1976. Kimberley, Turbulent City. Cape Town: David Philip.) Thinking along these lines dated back at least to 1936 when he and George Robertson approached Eskom with proposals for power lines along the Vaal and Modder Rivers to feed the Kimberley region. In 1946, with Elliott and Graham Eden, he co-founded the Northern Cape and Adjoining Areas Development Association, publishing further pamphlets and maps to promote this hitherto neglected region which held enormous potential, particularly in terms of its mineral wealth. (Jottings amongst Morriss personal papers indicate a search for a name for the region that would not require translation  Nova Kaap being one possibility  but Northern Cape was the name that stuck). In 1944 H.A. Morris, upon retirement, was re-employed as Municipal Development Officer. One of his campaigns at this time was for the generation of electricity for the Northern Cape using Vierfontein low-grade coal. The idea was taken up in due course. From 1946 he was a member of the fund-raising committee for the building of the Cape Technical College, the Humphreys Art Gallery and the Theatre complex. Freeman of the CityIn 1967 H.A. Morris was made a Freeman of the City of Kimberley and was also the recipient of a Rotary Honours Award. The citation, referring to Morriss yeoman service in pioneering the establishment of the Northern Cape and Adjoining Areas Regional Development Association which had proved to be of inestimable benefit to the City of Kimberley and the Region as a whole, as well as his having been a leading figure in promoting the interests of the City of Kimberley in the early years of commercial aviation in South Africa, was handed to Mr Morris by the Mayor, Councillor Haberfeld, during a municipal ceremony.(Harold Arthur Morris - Freeman of Kimberley, in Now and Then: Newsletter of the Historical Society of Kimberley and the Northern Cape 18(1), March 2010, pp 1-3.)Following his death in 1977 the Intake Substation at Homestead, Kimberley, was opened and named the Harold Morris Substation. FamilyH.A. Morris married Mavis Aitken Hull McIntyre (granddaughter of Kimberley pioneers David McIntyre and George Henry Hull) at St Cyprians Cathedral in Kimberley in April 1920 and the couple had a daughter, Elizabeth, and a son, Roger. In 1947 H.A. Morris and his son Roger Morris, with Graham Eden, founded an electrical firm named Morris & Eden Pty Ltd, later Morris Radio Engineers (Pty) Ltd. Morriss sister-in-law, Olive Grant Vigne McIntyre, was City Librarian of Kimberley.References
26822867
Sport_in_Chile
File:Marcelo Rios 2004.jpg|thumb|200px|Ros was the first Latin American tennis player to be number one in the world, after defeating Agassi in 1998.(Marcelo Ros #1 del mundo: A 10 aos de su mayor acto de magia, prensatenis.cl. Retrieved January 16, 2009.) He was also honored by the General Directorate of Sports and Recreation as the Chilean sportsman of the 20th Century.(Los mejores del Siglo XX, Deportes-Canal13, January 10, 2000 )Sport in Chile is performed in both amateur and professional levels, practiced both at home and abroad to develop and improve, or simply represent the country. The most representative sport in Chile is football,(Chile, nettspansk.uib.no. Retrieved January 15, 2009.) however, the most successful is tennis.(Tenis Chileno, punto de quiebre, Televisin Nacional de Chile. Retrieved January 15, 2009. ) In rural areas, the most practiced sport is rodeo, which is the national sport, and is considered to be the second most popular sport after football.(Conozca los orgenes del rodeo chileno y la falta de recursos que le aqueja, Proaraucana, September 13, 2007) Chile has achieved great international success in other sports, and there have been important figures, however, such exploits are not known to the general population because they are not sports that have been popular throughout the country. History The first sport played in Chile was paln (similar to hockey), first practiced by the Mapuche before the discovery and conquest of the country.(Reglamento del paln o chueca, Deportes mapuches. Retrieved January 15, 2009.) The game was later called Chueca by the Spanish conquerors.Years later Europeans introduced other sports unknown in this country.  Valparaso is Chiles main port, and, due to the emerging nitrate industry in the north, it became a crossroads for ships coming from Europe, bringing equipment and personnel for newspapers, firefighting, railroads, steam engines, and others.  Immigrants from England, Italy and Spain came to work in the hills mining nitrate.  They had traveled to Chile to stay and live, but the immigrants yearned for the customs of the old continent, especially the British.  Chilean sport originated in the town of Valparaiso in the second half of the 19th century by the British and their descendents born in Chile, who began to ride horses, and then played cricket. In 1870 badminton and tennis courts had been built. Then rugby and football clubs were created with British names that continue to be used, as Wanderers and Everton are still present in the port and its neighboring city, del Mar.(Ficha de Santiago Wanderers de Valparaso, Ftbol Chileno. Retrieved January 15, 2009.) Sport initially served as a demonstration of spirit and promoted the health of its followers, but later became an expression of entertainment that would gain spectators and fans.The development of sport was unstable, with no planning by government and without large financial contributions, only the will of those interested.  Chile participated among the select countries inaugurating the Modern Olympics in Athens, Greece, where there was no official representation, but a spontaneous presence of a single athlete, Subercaseaux, who arrive dressed in the national colors to run the hundred meter dash, and had been training in outdoor running.(La presencia de Chile en los Juegos Olmpicos, Comit Olmpico de Chile. Retrieved January 15, 2009. )  After a hundred years of modern sport, the history of Chile has not produced many world level sports heroes, but by the end of the 20th Century, it became clear that the competition was to win.  The triumphs in the meantime have been less than many would like, but objectively, more than many would believe. Athletics File:Cristian Bustos.jpg|thumb|150px|Bustos won second place at the 1992 Hawaii Ironman, and is the only top-ten Latin American in the triathlon.The first Olympic medal that went to Chile was in athletics. Track and field Plaza Reyes ran 42.195 kilometers in 2 hours 33 minutes and 23 seconds to win a silver medal in the 1928 Amsterdam Olympic Games.(Se perdi la medalla de oro, chile.com. Retrieved January 15, 2009.) Ahrens won a silver medal in the javelin in the 1956 Melbourne Olympic Games, the first and only woman representing Chile to win an Olympic medal.(Marlene Ahrens: Siempre que represent a Chile lanc como dos metros ms, Radio Cooperativa, May 16, 2005) The athlete with the most recent win is sprinter Keitel, who was considered at the time to be the fastest white man in the world in the 200 meter dash.(Sebastin Keitel regresar a las pistas con la meta de clasificar a Pekn 2008, Radio Cooperativa, January 29, 2008) Triathlon The prime example of triathlon was the Chile triathlete Bustos, who almost won the Ironman title  in Hawaii in 1992.(Casi casi un Ironman, chile.com. Retrieved January 15, 2009.) Bustos ran a hard race against the legendary American Mark Allen, and in the running phase Bustos took the front position, but at 25 kilometers, Allen overtook him and Bustos took a close second place. Currently the best female Chile participant is Barbara Riveros who was ranked as the best triathlete in Americas and eighth in the world in the 2005 World Triathlon Championship. The best Chile male athlete in triathlon is Felipe Van de Wyngaard who has made significant achievements nationally and abroad. Chile has Ironman 70.3 Pucn South American triathlon test circuits, Triathlon circuits, and Villarrica Via del Mar, an international circuit with the most amateur and professional athletes in the world.(Ironman 70.3 Pucn) Boxing Boxing is popular in Chile.  Vicentini and Loayza (El Tani) are notable Chilean boxers of the 1920s. The greatest boxing figure of the 1930s was Godoy, who fought twice against Louis and was, until his retirement, South American champion in all weights.(Ficha tcnica de Arturo Godoy, Chiledeportes. Retrieved January 15, 2009.)  Tapia, Barrientos and Lucas were silver and bronze medalists in the Melbourne Olympic Games. Stevens fought in 1970 for the world title against Japanese featherweight Saijyo. One of the most memorable fighters Vargas, who was South American champion in his specialty and tried four times to get the world boxing title for Chile, losing at every opportunity, but becoming a national idol.(Vicepresidente de la Cmara recibe a Martn Vargas, Cmara de Diputados. Retrieved January 15, 2009. )  Cruzat was the world champion in the cross category in the Boxing Association.(Carlos Cruz Cruzat: Cuerpo y alma en un ring, Universidiario. Retrieved January 15, 2009.) In womens boxing, Demick was the world champion and became the first Chilean boxer, male or female, to hold a world title.(Patricia Demick, mundoandino.com. Retrieved January 15, 2009.) Equestrian sports have achieved major milestones for Chile.  In 1949, Chile Army Captain Alberto Larraguibel Morales with his horse Huaso succeeded in breaking the world record high jump to break a barrier of 2.47 meters.(El gran salto a la historia, chile.com. Retrieved January 15, 2009.)In the 1952 Helsinki Olympic Games, Chiles entire equestrian team participated in three disciplines: jumping, dressage, and concourse, receiving silver medals in team and individual show jumping.  The pairs medalists were Ricardo Echeverra on Lindo Peal (Army), Csar Mendoza Durn on Pilln (de Chile) and scar Cristi on Bambi (Carabineros). The latter won the silver medal in individual competition.(La presencia de Chile en los Juegos Olmpicos, Comit Olmpico de Chile. Retrieved January 15, 2009. )In 1981 the International Olympic Committee in New York awarded General Eduardo Yez Zavala distinction as the best rider of all time for his significant achievements in 1930s and 40s.(Ecuestre en Chile, Chiledeportes. Retrieved January 15, 2009.)  Called El maestro, he was the lead Chilean in countless equestrian competitions, president of the Equestrian Federation, and an International Olympic Judge. Fencing Fencing is not well known in Chile.  However, Chile has long had a fencing presence in the Olympic Games, the Pan American Games, and the South American Games with key competitors such as Paris Inostroza who participated in three Olympic Games.(Paris Inostroza inicia su gira preolmpica, Diario La Tercera, June 4, 2008) Another outstanding athlete is Alvear who has obtained several medals in the Pan American Games in the foil weapon.(Felipe Alvear sum una medalla de plata para Chile en Ro 2007, Radio Cooperativa, July 14, 2007) Golf Golf is played in each of the major cities of central and southern Chile, and lately the game has spread considerably in popularity. However, this sport is practiced by the upper class and upper middle class due to high costs of participation in the game. The most important tournament played in the country is the Chile Open.There are two benchmarks for this sport in Chile. Perrot is the greatest athlete of Chilean womens golf due to her outstanding participation in the LPGA tour, the main world womens golf circuit, winning the Longs Drugs tournament of 2005.(Nicole Perrot brill en California para ganar su primer torneo en la LPGA, Radio Cooperativa, October 9, 2005) The current leading male golfer in Chile is Aguilar, who participated in the European Tour, and his greatest achievement was winning the Open of Indonesia in February 2008,(Confirma liderato, ESPN deportes, February 16, 2008) and he was the first participant in the Chilean circuit of the Tour.(Felipe Aguilar jugar en el PGA Diario El Mercurio, January 31, 2009) Gymnastics Recently Chile has been very successful in gymnastics with Gonzalez Sepulveda who was crowned world champion in several disciplines.  In December 2010, Thomas Gonzalez was awarded the Condor of Gold by the Circle of Sports Journalists of Chile as the best Chilean sportsman of the year. Handball The sport of handball is little known in Chile, but the Chile Womens National Handball Team qualified for the 2009 Womens World Handball Championship.The sport is regulated by the Federacin Chilena de Handball, in turn affiliated with the Confederacin Sudamericana de Balonmano, the Pan American Handball Federation and the Handball Federation. Martial arts  Karate The most recent triumph for karate in Chile was by Dub, who became the world champion of Karate in Tokyo in 2008.(David Dub se coron como campen del mundo de karate en Japn, Radio Cooperativa,  November 16, 2008) Dub won the final match in the category of 75 kilos by a close margin in a fierce struggle against Turk Mslm Batrk that was decided by arbitrary decision. Taekwondo In 1988, the Chilean Taekwondo Federation became Interstyle Champion in martial arts, an event with over one thousand martial arts participants.  Today, Taekwondo in Chile is part of the Sports Federation, affiliated with the Chile Olympic Committee.  Chile has participated in major events, like the ODESUR Games, where Chilean Taekwondo has added to date ten gold medals, earned by athletes Leopoldo Araneda, Fernando Remedy, Esteban Vitagliano and Renzo Zenteno in 1986; Diego Ynez and Humberto Norambuena in 1990; Anyelina Contreras, Sergio Crdenas and Felipe Soto in 1994; Felipe Soto in 1998, and several silver and bronze medals.In the Pan American Games, Chilean athlete Diego Ynez won a bronze in 1991 and Sergio Crdenas won a bronze in 1995.Three Chilean representatives have qualified and participated in the Olympic Games: Diego Ynez and Humberto Norambuena in Barcelona 1992 (when Taekwondo was a demonstration sport), and Felipe Soto in Sydney 2000 (as an official sport).  Chilean athletes have won a great number of medals in Taekwondo in the World Cup, the South American Championships, the Pan American Games and the World Games. Racing sport  Cycling Cycling is one of the most practiced recreational sports in Chile, although Chilean cyclist have not had many competitive successes at an international level.  The Ciclista de Chile is the principal national competition in which various international teams participate.Chilean cyclist Arriagada has participated in three Olympic Games (1996, 2004 and 2008). He was the standard bearer in the Chilean delegation in the Pan American Games, where he won Gold in team pursuit and won fourth in scoring. Arriagada also received two Gold medals and two Silver medals in the Pan American Games; Gold in the South American Games; eight Gold medals in Pan American Championships; two time champion of the Tour of Chile; and champion of the 2004 World Cup of Russia.(Marco Arriagada (ciclismo, pista), Diario El Mercurio (especiales). Retrieved January 16, 2009.) As for women, the most prominent international athlete is Pizarro, who in 2006 was fifth in Cycliste Internationale ranking.In addition to Marco Arriagada, a number of other cyclists have excelled internationally. Usually the best riders in Chile are from the city of Curic, which is known as the capital of cycling.(Ciclismo: Este jueves larga el Nacional de Pista en Curic, Diario El Mercurio, December 18, 2008) Horse racing racing in Chile has been well developed since the end of the nineteenth century.  Major racetracks include the Club Hpico de Santiago, the Hipdromo Chile and the Valparaso Sporting Club.   The major races held in Chile are the El Ensayo Classic, the St. Legar Classic and the Chile Derby, which make up the Triple Crown of horseracing in Chile.Notable riders include Sergio Vsquez, with the most career wins in national horse racing;(El Mercurio de Valparaso - Sergio Vsquez cambia de reino) Jos Santos Len, who rode in the United States for over 20 years and won more than 4,000 races; Carlos Pezoa, two-time winner in the Carlos Pellegrini International Gran Prix, the ultimate test in South American horse racing; Donoso winner of the Stakes in 1947; and Torres.Several good horses have come out of Chile including Desert Fight, the mare that won six races, with rider Alberto Solari Manasco, in eight runs in Chile against a score of fillies; and Cougar II, the horse that in 2006 was elected into the American Horseracing Hall of Fame.(Cougar II fue ingresado al Saln de la Fama, Diario La Nacin, June 1, 2006) Motorsports  Auto racing The first Chilean driver to win an international race was Zanelli, who competed in the Formula 1 Gran Prix.(Juan Zanelli, la recuperacin de un hroe chileno olvidado, Diario El Mercurio, January 20, 2008) The greatest driver in Chilean motorsports is Salazar, who is the only driver in the world to participate in the magic square of world motorsport,(El cuadrado de Eliseo, Diario La Tercera, January 1, 2009 ) composed of the four traditional races: the Gran Prix of Monaco, the Indianapolis 500, the 24 hours of Le Mans, and Dakar Rally. Donoso reces in the Pro Series and is currently the highest performing Chilean driver.Chile was elected, along with Argentina, as the seat of the Dakar Rally due to the suspension of this trial road rally on the contenent of Africa.(Rally Dakar, edicin 2009, Pgina oficial del Rally Dakar. Retrieved January 15, 2009.) This trial is one of the worlds toughest rallies, and competitive drivers like Salazar and de Gavardo participate in the auto category. Gavardo was world champion in the bike rally and came in third in the Dakar Rally riding a KTM Sportmotorcycle.The principal automotive competitors are now participating in the Mobil Rally and the Chile Formula 3. Motorcycle Racing The best competitor in motorcycle racing in Chile is de Gavardo who has won international awards participating in enduro as well as cross-country rally, including the World Rally Championship.(Carlo de Gavardo continuar su carrera como piloto de autos, Radio Cooperativa, June 21, 2007)Another World Champion is Francisco Chaleco Lpez in the 450 cc category,(Francisco Chaleco Lpez: Campen mundial Rally Cross Country 450 cc., Sitio Oficial de Red Bull. Retrieved January 15, 2009.  ) somewhat surprising when taken into account the fact that the team did it with a Honda and not a KTM, the number one motorcycle used in rally. Rodeo File:Rodeochileno1.jpg|thumb|rodeo is unique to Chile, and the countrys national sport.rodeo is the national sport in Chile,(Smbolos patrios de Chile, rodeo: deporte nacional, Ministerio de Relaciones Exteriores. Retrieved January 15, 2009.) practiced in the more rural areas of the country, and the second most popular sport in Chile after football.(Especial de Rodeo chileno, Diario El Mercurio (especiales), April 1, 2006) Chilean rodeo has been practiced in rural areas in central and southern regions of Chile for more than 400 years, but only in 1962 was it declared the national sport by letter number 269 of the National Sports Council and the Olympic Committee of Chile.(Rodeo chileno: cmo naci nuestro deporte nacional, familia.cl. Retrieved January 15, 2009.)Every year the National Championship Rodeo is held in Monumental de Rancagua. Its greatest participants are Cardemil and Carlos Loaiza, who have achieved the national title seven times. The past champions were Cortina and Vergara, who won the 2010 National Championship Rodeo. Shooting Sport  Practical Shooting The sport of shooting is the most dynamic shooting sport in the world today.  The worldwide organization for the sport is the International Practical Shooting Confederation (IPSC), founded May 1976 in Columbia, Missouri, USA.  Unlike traditional shooting sports in which the shooter is stationary, IPSC sportsmen using small arms try to hit a variety of shooting targets as they maneuver safely through a course that can require them to walk, run, and even jump over obstacles in their path.  The game measures the accuracy of the shooter hitting targets as well as the amount of time it takes to complete the course.  The athlete who can qualify the maximum number of points in the minimum length of time is declared the winner.  IPSC shooting is practiced worldwide and international competitions are held in more than 70 countries.  Tournaments vary in physical size from regional competitions to national championships, continental championships, and World Championships, which are held in cycles of three years. More than 700 competitors from about 70 member organizations attend these festivals in five days of competition and international goodwill.  In Chile this sport has been practiced since the early 1990s when the Chile Federation was recognized and accepted as a member of the IPSC.(Sitio oficial tiro prctico en Chile, ipscchile.org. Retrieved January 15, 2009.) Shotgun shooting Chile got its first world championship in shooting when Enrique Lira won the trap shooting event at the 1965 World Shotgun Championships.  Jorge Jottar won silver in the skeet shooting event that year.  de Iruarrizaga is a Chilean sports shooter and Olympic medalist. He received a silver medal in shooting at the Summer Olympics in Seoul.(1988 Summer Olympics  Seoul, South Korea  Shooting databaseOlympics.com. Retrieved September 26, 2008.) Iruarrizaga was the only medalist for Chile at the 1988 Summer Olympics. Table Tennis Although Chile has not been featured worldwide, mainly due to the superb level of Asians, it has on numerous occasions at the Pan American Games and the South American Games, without the need for nationalization of the sport, as with other countries.  Among the leading table tennis players is Sofija Tepes.(Sofija Tepes Cancino, Deportes-Canal13. Retrieved January 15, 2009.) Felipe Olivares, only 15 years old, is the current teen world champion. Team sport  Baseball The majority of activity in the sport of baseball takes place in the northern part of Chile, where it was introduced from abroad in the early 20th Century.  It was first played by Americans in northern Chile, and later played by the Japenese Sakurada in Iquique, the city that would become the national champion in various events.  Tocopilla is another major city that has won the national title over 18 consecutive times.  Chile has participated in eight South American championships and was among the Top Ten in the 1989 Junior World Championship in Japan.(Los hechos del siglo, Diario La Nacin. Retrieved January 15, 2009. )Baseball is played mainly in the cities of Iquique, Tocopilla, Antofagasta and Arica, as well as some other cities such as Santiago, San Antonio, Melipilla and Concepcin. Basketball Basketball is a popular sport in Chile. The country earned a bronze medal in the first mens World Championship held in 1950 and won a second bronze medal when Chile hosted the FIBA World Championship. Chile hosted the first World Championship for Women in 1953, finishing the tournament with the silver medal.In the last few years, basketball has regained the popularity it had in Chile in the 1950s and 60s.  The Basketball Senior Division of Chile (DIMAYOR) is the professional league which involves twelve teams, and the current champion is Club Liceo Mixto de Los Andes.  Basketball is played mainly in the south part of the country, generally at the university level.  Unlike football, basketball has South American mens titles at various levels(Origen del bsquet en Chile, basquetbolchileno.cl. Retrieved February 1, 2009.) and a world womens basketball sub-championship.(El bsquetbol en Chile, Chiledeportes. Retrieved January 15, 2009.)Chile was third in world mens basketball in 1950 and 1954.(FIBA World Championship History, Pgina oficial de la FIBA. Retrieved February 1, 2009.)At the club level, Thomas Bata was the champion of Campeonato Sudamericano de Clubes Campeones in basketball in 1967the only South American Pacific Coast club with this achievement.(Sudamericano de Clubes de Bsquetbol, historial de campeones, futbol.com.uy. Retrieved January 15, 2009.)CricketCricket has been played in Chile since 1829, and the first club, the Valparaso Cricket Club was formed in 1860.(Historia del Cricket en Chile, Criquet Chile. Retrieved January 15, 2009.) Chiles first international fixture was played in 1893 against Argentina.Interest in the game had waned after the Second World War, and Chile did not become a member of the ICC until 2002. Although, the sport regained some popularity due to the national teams participation at the Cricket League, and the womens national cricket team at the Womens version of the Americas Championship. The national teams first international engagement as an ICC affiliate member was the Division 3 tournament of the Americas Championship, played in Suriname on February 2006. The Chileans finished in third place, their only win coming against Brazil.The February 2008 edition of the Division 3 tournament was held in Argentina. Chile defeated Belize, Turks & Caicos Islands, and Peru only to lose to Brazil. Chile finished the tournament second due to the net run rate.Currently, Chile is a member of the ICC and actively develops programs for children. Although the sport in Chile is poorly understood and has very few athletes who practice it, Beach Cricket has become very popular on the beaches of Central Coast in the summer months. The second International Beach Cricket Tournament was held in February 2009 on the beach of Las Salinas del Mar, in which more than eighty players, domestic and foreign, divided into ten teams.(Beach Championship cricket returns to Via, Diario El Mercurio de Valparaso, January 7, 2009)FootballFootball is the most respresentative sport in Chile, which in 1962 hosted the FIFA World Cup and won third place.(Copas Mundiales de la FIFA, Sitio Oficial de la FIFA. Retrieved January 15, 2009.)  Chile achieved a bronze medal in the 2000 Sidney Olympic Games; third in the 2007 FIFA World Youth Championship; and third place in the 1993 Under 17 Championship in Japan.  The Chile national football team is, with Venezuela and Ecuador, one of the countries in South America that has never won the America Cup, although it has played in four finals and is the country in fourth place in the number of times it has attended FIFA World Cup in South America.As for clubs, the most important international achievement by a Chilean team was the tournament won by Colo-Colo in the Copa Libertadores in 1991.(Lizardo Garrido, Campen de la Libertadores en 1991 con Colo Colo: ramos muy fuertes dentro y fuera de la cancha, Sitio Oficial de la CONMEBOL. Retrieved January 15, 2009. ) Also, Colo-Colo won the South America Cup and the American Cup in 1992.  Catholic University Sports Club won the American Cup in 1994.Some of the best football players in Chile have been Livingstone, Hormazbal, Snchez, Figueroa, Caszely, Rojas, Zamorano and Salas. Roller Hockey Until the 1930s, roller hockey was played in Chile for recreation in Santa Lica Hill and in the Saln Merced. In 1938 the Santiago Association was formed and played in the Plaza de la Libertad in front of the Palacio de La Moneda. Then followed the founding of the Valparaso Association, the Via del Mar Association and the Andes Association. Three times Chile has won fourth place in the Mens World Roller Hockey Championship.  Chile has hosted the Mens World Roller Hockey Championship twice, once in 1962 where every game was played in the National Gymnasium, and again in 1980 held in the port city of Talcahuano.Chile hosted the 2006 Womens World Roller Hockey Championship and won the championship by defeating Spain in the final.(Chile Campen Mundial de Hockey, Diario El Ranahuaso, October 9, 2006) and won the Roller Hockey Americas Cup in 2007 and the Pan American Ice Hockey Championship in 2011. Polo File:Bachelet y campeones de polo.jpg|thumb|200px|Chile, the current world champion polo team, with President Bachelet and the trophy of the World Polo Championship.Chile is the current world polo champion, achieved in May 2008 after beating Brazil 11-9 in the final game of the 2008 Polo World Cup in Mexico City.(Chile se coron campen del Mundial de Polo, Diario El Mercurio, May 3, 2008)The late Donoso was the greatest polo player in Chile, having the highest handicap of 9 goals(Falleci el polista Gabriel Donoso, Deportes-Canal13, November 10, 2006) and is remembered for having led the Chilean national team to win the prestigious Coronation Cup, awarded by Queen Elizabeth II of England in 2004, and a second title in 2007.  Chile hosted the World Polo Championship in 1992 where it won second place, and received third place in the 2004 World Cup held in France.Rugby unionunion has been played in Chile since at least the 1880s, introduced by the British.  The Chile Rugby Union was formed in 1935 and was renamed the Rugby Federation of Chile in 1948.  At present, Rugby is one of the fastest growing sports in Chile, especially in the universities.  The national rugby union team (The Condors) has so far never qualified for a World Cup, but is ranked 24th in the FIRA world rankings, making Chile the third best team in America, after Argentina and Uruguay.(Rugby World Rankings, irb.com. Retrieved January 15, 2009. )Currently there are 14 rugby associations distributed throughout the country (between Arica and Magallanes), plus a referees association.  The most recognized Rugby teams in Chile are Club Deportivo Universidad Catlica, Old Boys and Stade Francaise, in Santiago; Old Mackayans and Sporting, in Via del Mar; and Los Troncos and Old Jhons, in Concepcin. Volleyball Volleyball has been played regularly in Chile since the 1920s, with the first tournament in 1932.  In 1942 the National Volleyball Association, the predecessor of the current Federation, was formed and organized the first national league.(El vleibol en Chile, sitio de la de Voleibol de Chile.)Chile has received notoriety in the sport of volleyball only sporadically in South America, dominated by such powerhouses as Brazil and Argentina.  Chiles greatest achievements in volleyball are second place in the 1961 South American Mens Volleyball Championship and sixth place in the 1971 Pan American Tournament.  Chile hosted the South American Championship in 1962 (male and female), 1981 (male), and 2007 (male and female).Chile has qualified just once each in male and female for the World Volleyball Championships, both in 1982the 1982 World Womens Volleyball Championship in Peru and the 1982 Mens Volleyball Championship in Argentina. Tennis File:Nicolas Massu.jpg|thumb|150px|Mass, Olympic tennis champion in Athens Olympic Games.Tennis is Chiles most successful sport. Its national team won the Team Cup clay tournament two times (2003 & 2004), and played the Cup final against Italy in 1976. At the Summer Olympics the country captured gold and bronze in mens singles and gold in mens doubles. Ros became the first Latin American man to reach the number 1 spot in the ATP singles rankings in 1998. Lizana won the US Open  in 1937, becoming the first woman from Latin America to win a Grand Slam tournament. Luis Ayala  was twice a runner-up at the Open, and both Ros and Gonzlez reached the Open mens singles finals.Chilean players held in the highest regard are retired Ros, who was Number 1 in the World(Especial de Marcelo Ros, a 10 aos del nmero 1, Diario El Mercurio (especiales). Retrieved January 15, 2009.) in the ranking of the Association of Tennis Professionals in 1998; and Ayala, winner of two Grand Slams in doubles (with Roland Garros, 1958 and 1960) and two finals in singles, also ranked number five in the world.  Prominent Chilean tennis player Lizana was the first Latin American to win the Grand Slam (Forest Hills predecessor of the current US Open),(Historia de Chile: Anita Lizana de Ellis, biografiasdechile.cl. Retrieved January 15, 2009.) Gildemeister was fifth in dobles en 1987 (with Andrs Gmez).  Olympic medalists in tennis are Mass and Fernando Gonzlez.Chile was the champion of the Tennis World Cup for teams in Dsseldorf (2003 and 2004)(Dsseldorf 2004: Quedaron en la historia , Deportes-Canal13, May 15, 2006) and was finalist in the Davis Cup in 1976.(1976, el ao en que Chile roz la Ensaladera de Plata, Radio Cooperativa, April 11, 2005)In 2004 tennis players Fernando Gonzlez and Nicols Mass won the first Olympic gold medals in the Athens Games,(Final Masculina: Mass de oro, tenisi.com.ar, August 22, 2004) after strenuous games receiving the gold medal in doubles (Mass-Gonzlez), bronze (Gonzlez) and gold in singles (Mass).  In the 2008 Beijing Olympic Games, Gonzlez won the silver medal in singles.With regard to the number 1 obtained by Ros, the gold medals in the Olympics, the bichampionship in Dsseldorf and the end of the Cup, note that Chile was the first South American country to achieve these accomplishments.Chile was a finalist in the Davis Cup in 1976 but was defeated by 4 to 1 by Italy at the National Stadium in Santiago.In 1973, playing in the Davis Cup against the United States, Cornejo and Fillol won the longest set in the history of the Cup: 39-37 against the team of Stan Smith and Erik van Dillen.(Patricio Cornejo - MSN Encarta, Enciclopedia Encarta. Retrieved January 15, 2009.  ) Weightlifting Chile has gained various medals in weightlifting in Pan American and Ibero American Games.  The greatest Chilean participant in weightlifting is Cristin Escalante Carroza, the Pan American champion in the field of more than 105 kilos.(Cristin Escalante quebr rcord panamericano para colgarse el cuarto oro en Ro, Radio Cooperativa, July 18, 2007)  The last medal achieved by Chile was in the 2007 Pan American Games.  The federation that governs the sport in Chile is FECHIPE. Water sports  Fishing Sport fishing began in Chile with the introduction of salmon species into the country at the end of the 19th Century  with great success since the salmon didnt encounter any large enemies or predators in Chiles cold and temperate waters.  Subsequently the state, first as a social policy and then to promote aquaculture, played an active role in creating fish farms that released into rivers various species like rainbow trout, brown trout, brook trout; and anadromous species such as silver salmon, king salmon, and Atlantic salmon.  As a result, a number of species have adapted well to the new environment.There are no reliable statistics of the pastimes of Chileans, but it is believed that fishing is the third or fourth most popular hobby.  Simple and low cost fishing gear is the most popular.  The most popular bait used includes earthworms, fresh-water crab, shrimp, snails, small fish, and white beans.(Pesca deportiva en Chile, visitingchile.com. Retrieved January 15, 2009.)  The more complex fishing gear has gained in popularity with imported rods and reels running less than 5,000 Chilean pesos, and fly fishing gear selling for less than 50,000 Chilean pesos.  Fly fishing is the fastest growing sector in sport fishing in Chile.  Tourists have come to know Chile as the destination for salmon fishing.  The increase in tour guides for tourist fishing has been explosive  from only a few fishing lodges in the 1990s to over a dozen new lodges in the new century.  Lawmakers and participants in sport fishing are working together to make new laws to help regulate the fishing tourism industry and ensure its longevity.Freshwater sport fishing mainly occurs from Region V of Valparaso to the south of Chile, being particularly successful and rich in freshwater species from Region IX of Araucana to Region XII of Magallanes and Antrtica Chilena, and tourism development is mainly concentrated in the Araucana. Rowing Chile made history in the sport of rowing when Christian Yantani and Miguel ngel Cerda won the 2002 Rowing World Cup in Seville.(Yantani y Cerda, campeones del mundo en Sevilla)(Remo en Chile, Chiledeportes. Retrieved January 15, 2009.)In 2005, Cerda and Felipe Leal won second place in the lightweight coxless trial in the World Rowing Championship in the Japanese city of Gifu.(Cerda y Leal, vicecampeones mundiales!) The following year, Chile won the team event in the South American Youth Rowing Championship in Paraguay.  In the 2007 Pan American Games in Ro de Janeiro the pair of Sorayua Jadue and Mara Jos Orellana won the gold medal; and Miguel Cerda and Felipe Leal won the bronze in the lightweight pairs event.Rowing is practiced in different cities, the primary being Valdivia, Concepcin and Valparaso due to the abundant rivers and numerous rowing clubs.  Currently, the city of Santiago is developing a strong rowing program, specifically in Carn Lake (located close to Pudahuel with direct access to public transportation) and in Lake Acuelo.(Welcome to Metropolitan Rowing. Retrieved March 23, 2011.) Sailing Chile is currently one of the top countries in the world in the sport of sailing because of Alberto Tito Gonzlez who has won five championships.(Biografa de Tito Gonzlez, entelpcs.cl. Retrieved January 15, 2009.) In 2005 Gonzlez was given the Best Athlete Award by the Circulo de Periodistas Deportivos (Sports Writers Circle) and in 2006 received the Chilean Presidents Award for best sportsman.  Most recently, Gonzalaz won the gold medal in the Pan American Games in Ro.  Gonzalaz has been asked to be the Chile flag bearer in the opening ceremony of the Pan American Games in Canada.  He also has titles in J/24 and other categories as well as several American titles.The sport does not have a large number of participants, however another notable Chilean sport sailor is found in Matas de Solar  ranked third in International Laser Class  who has qualified in the Olympic Games. Swimming Swimming has enjoyed a long history in Chile.  Historically the best Chilean swimmer was the well-known Vctor Tiburn Contreras, famous for his times over long distances, who set the world record for crossing the Straight of Gibraltar.(Se trag el Estrecho de Gibraltar, chile.com. Retrieved January 15, 2009.)Currently the best male swimmers are Maximiliano Schnettler and Giancarlo Zolezzi who are among the top 25 swimmers in the world.  Female swimmer Kbrich has the best Chile national and South American records in the 800 meter and 1500 meter freestyle events.  She was among the top 15 swimmers in the world in the 2004 Athens Olympic Games and in 2007 she won 7th place in the World Swimming Championship in the 1500 meters race. Winter sports In the winter months, many Chileans participate in sports, especially skiing and snowboarding.  Less than 35 kilometers from Satiago de Chile, ski resorts are located in El Colorado, Farellones, Parva y Nevado.(Gua de esqu de Chile, gochile.cl. Retrieved January 15, 2009.) In Valparaso Region is the ski resort of Portillo, one of the oldest in the country and the organizer of the 1966 Alpine World Ski Championships.(Historia de Portillo, skiportllo.com. Retrieved January 15, 2009. ) Other major ski centers are Verde, de Chilln, Antuco, Corralco, Arenales, Araucarias, Villarrica, Antillanca, El Fraile and Mirador.  In addition, Chilean mountain climbers have reached major summits such as Everest.While the country has many conditions for winter sports, Chile has never won a medal at the Winter Olympics, but Santiago is a strong candidate city to host the 2018 Winter Olympics because of the modern infrastructure of their closest ski resorts, in addition to its rapid connection to the Santiago International Airport by urban motorways.(Santiago 2018 Winter Olympic Games, Sitio Oficial de la candidatura de Santiago 2018. Retrieved January 15, 2009.)See also* at the Olympics* national football team* Football Federation* in South America References en Chile
26847523
Sino_Gold_Mining_Limited
#REDIRECT Gold Mining
26866452
List_of_Touched_by_an_Angel_episodes_(season_7)
The seventh season of the American dramatic television series by an Angel ran on CBS from October 15, 2000 through May 20, 2001, spanning 25 episodes. Created by Masius and produced by Williamson, the series chronicled the cases of two angels, Monica (Downey and her supervisor Tess (Reese), who bring messages from God to various people to help them as they reach a crossroads in their lives. They are frequently joined by Andrew (Dye), the angel of death. The episodes use the song Walk With You, performed by Reese, as their opening theme. __TOC__Episode list{|classwikitable stylewidth:100%; background:#FFFFFF;|-! stylebackground: #CCF width5% | Series #! stylebackground: #CCF width5% | Season #! stylebackground: #CCF | Title! stylebackground: #CCF | Director! stylebackground: #CCF; width: 15% | Writer! stylebackground: #CCF; width: 15% | Original AirdateShortSummary     High atop a New York penthouse, Tess is entertaing at a society party hosted by bon vivant Everett Clay when his octogeniarian father Benjamin, who still runs the family business, makes a surprise appearance to chastise his son and grandson about their wasteful ways. The following morning, Everett tells Benjamin the Biblical story of the prodical son. Everett reminds Benjamin that his grandfather started this company carving handmade buttons and hes being disinherited to learn the importance of self reliance and hard work, handing him a framed deerskin jacket, with buttons carved by his great grandfather. Angry and penniless, Jake busts the frame, when Tess arrives in her Cadillac offering him a ride to Colorado, where some of his friends had invited him to stay. Before long, they arrive in Central City, the mining town that was in its heyday at the turn of the century. They stop at the historic Teller House Saloon where Everett notices a portrait of a womans face painted on the barroom floor. Tess tells Everett some of the folklore surrounding the fabled portrait, then goes on to tell him its connection to his great grandfather, Jack Clay. Tess explains that he left the treasure intact, taking only his due. Realizing what this means, Everett searches the deerskin Jacket, finds the map and returns to the spot to unearth the treasure his great grandfather buried over a hundred years ago. But when he opens it he is flabbergasted to find a lone button. When Everett realizes hed come all this way for naught he goes into cardiac arrest. Hes rushed to the hospital, and while the doctors work on reviving his body, Monica works on his soul. With Monicas help Everett finally comes to understand the lesson his father had been trying to impart. When Everett regains consciousness, he calls his father to apologize and and to assure him that hes coming home a changed man. Guest Star ChamberlainShortSummary     Guest Star CruzShortSummary     ShortSummary     ShortSummary     ShortSummary     ShortSummary     ShortSummary     ShortSummary     ShortSummary     ShortSummary     Guest Star CruzShortSummary     ShortSummary     Guest Star BaioShortSummary     ShortSummary     ShortSummary     ShortSummary     ShortSummary     ShortSummary     Guest Star Ty BryanShortSummary     Guest Stars OneShortSummary     ShortSummary     ShortSummary     Guest Star BertinelliShortSummary     Guest Stars Burke, Travis, Dunaway, Schneider, McClanahan, Mo, Gaither, and Gaither.ShortSummary     |}References(External links* * * * 
26883614
Island_Mountain
 easiest_route  Island Mountain is a resistant formation of volcanic and rock in the Assemblage of southwestern Trinity County.  The Eel River makes an abrupt S curve around the mountain in its otherwise north-northwesterly flow between the Coast Ranges.()HistoryIsland Mountain was the final obstacle to completion of the Pacific Railroad between Francisco and California.  Railroad construction proceeded northerly down the west side of the Eel River canyon and bridged the river at the S curve to enter  tunnel number 27 through the mountain.()  There was a golden spike ceremony downstream of the mountain at Cain Rock in 1914 to complete the railroad.()  The redwood framing of tunnel 27 burned on 6 September 1978, and a significant length of the tunnel collapsed.  Tunnel rebuilding costing 3.8 million dollars was completed on 7 December 1979.()MiningA massive sulfide ore deposit within the mountain was mined after rail service became available.  Mining recovered 4100 tons of copper, 140,000 ounces of silver, and 8,600 of gold between 1915 and 1930.()  Minerals identified within the ore body include chalcanthite, chalcopyrite, copiapite, goslarite, pyrite, and pyrrhotite.()  Volcanic rock was quarried from Island Mountain by Northwestern Pacific Railroad for heavy riprap used as far away as Bay.(References
26898277
Jack_Crichton_(Texas_businessman)
footnotes   John Alston Crichton, known as Jack Crichton (October 16, 1916&ndash;December 10, 2007),() was an oil and gas industrialist from Dallas, Texas, who was among the first of his ranks to recognize the importance of petroleum reserves in the East.() In 1964, he carried the Republican banner in a fruitless campaign against the reelection of Governor B. Connally, Jr., then a Democrat, who in 1973 switched parties. In 1990, Crichton (pronounced Crayton) wrote in an opinion piece for the Morning News, stating that he first realized the vastness of the Middle Eastern oil reserves prior to 1950. He and a coworker determined, he said, that the Burgan field in Kuwait, for example, held ten billion barrels of crude oil. In 1951, he helped to establish San Juan Oil Company in Dallas, where he became the vice president of operations. During the 1950s, he took a group of American businessmen to Yemen to search for oil. During his long career, he was the president of the Yemen Development Corporation and the Dorchester Gas Corporation, Crichton was also involved in the mining of copper, zinc, gold, silver, and nickel through his Arabian Shield Development Company.(Early years and educationCrichton was born on a cotton plantation in the former community of Crichton near Coushatta in Red River Parish in northwestern  Louisiana. He graduated in 1933 from Byrd High School in Shreveport and then enrolled at A&M University in College Station. He played tennis, basketball, and ran cross country track. His classmates included future industrialist Bum Bright and Cabell, later a Representative and a mayor of Dallas. At TAMU, he wrote an award-winning essay, The Political Career of P. Long.() Crichton served TAMU as the president of the Lettermens Association and chairman of the Development Foundation. He also served on the board of the Association of Former Students from 19651968, was the association president in 1967, and in 1983 was named a Distinguished Alumnus.( ) He later obtained a of Science degree from Institute of Technology of Boston, where he was affiliated with Alpha Epsilon fraternity.(MilitaryCrichton served in the Army as a field artillery officer and special agent. He won the Air Medal, five Battle Stars, and the Star. He retired as a colonel in the Army Reserve.(During War II, Crichton served in Europe in the of Strategic Services, the forerunner of the Intelligence Agency. He was a field artillery officer and special agent. In 1946, Crichton was recruited by DeGolyer, a former conservation director in the administration of President D. Roosevelt and later a co-founder of Instruments, to operate a group of companies which renamed frequently, presumably to make it more difficult to trace their operations. According to investigative journalist Baker, the companies operated largely below the radar, and fronted for some of North Americas biggest names, including the Bronfmans (Seagrams liquor), the Ponts, and the Kuhn-Loeb family of financiers.(In 1952, Crichton joined a syndicate that included DeGolyer and Murchison of Dallas to use connections in the government of General Franco to obtain drilling rights in Spain. The operation was handled by Delta Drilling, owned by Zeppa. In August 1953, Crichton joined the Empire Trust Company, of which he later became the vice president.  The company maintained a network of associates similar to a private CIA. Empire Trust was an investor of the Fort Worth-based Dynamics.(In 1956, Crichton became commander of the 488th Military Intelligence Detachment, which operated under Lieutenant Colonel George Whitmeyer, the overall commander of all States Army Reserve units in East Texas. According to Crichton, there were about a hundred men in the unit, with nearly half of them coming from the Dallas Police Department.(Cuban-Venezuelan Oil Voting Trust CompanyCrichton was also involved with several other oilmen who negotiated drilling rights in Cuba under President Batista. Oil of Indiana signed an agreement with the Cuban-Venezuelan Oil Voting Trust Company (CVOVTC), a unit originally established by F. Buckley, Sr., for access to . CVOVTC was one of the four or five most traded entities on the Stock Exchange during the middle 1950s. Batistas communist successor, Castro, reduced the size of claims for oil exploration to a maximum of  and ended large-scale explorations by private companies.( The rise of Castro ruined CVOVTC, which had invested $30 million looking for oil in Cuba. The company was de-listed in December 1960 from the American Stock Exchange.(Intelligence mattersPrior to his 1964 political campaign, Crichton had developed a close association with the future President Herbert Walker Bush. In 1959, the two raised funds for the CIAs Operation 40, which organized sabotage against Castro.( Critchton was appointed head of the intelligence component of Dallas Civil Defense. The conservative radio commentator Harvey wrote in September 1960: The Communists, since 1917, have sold Communism to more people than have been told about Christ after 2,000 years. He urged his readers to support the counter-attack . . . mounted in Dallas.( In 1961, Crichton joined with fellow Dallas conservatives to establish the program Know Your Enemy, which aimed to combat communist influence that was undermining the American way of life. In 1962, Crichton opened a command post underneath the patio of the Dallas Health and Science Museum with the goal of maintaining the continuity-of-government were the United States attacked.(In November 1963, Crichton was involved in the arrangements of the fatal visit of U.S. President F. Kennedy to Dallas. Crichtons friend, Deputy Police Chief George L. Lumpkin, a member of the 488th Military Intelligence Detachment, drove the pilot car of Kennedys motorcade. Lieutenant Colonel George Whitmeyer, the East Texas Army Reserve commander, was also in the car. The pilot car stopped briefly in front of the School Book Depository, where Lumpkin spoke to a policeman controlling traffic at the corner of Houston and Elm. The Commission report on the Kennedy assassination states that Crichton arranged for a member of the local Russian community to translate for the Russian-born Marina Oswald in the wake of the Kennedy assassination. Crichtons volunteer translated for Oswald during her initial questioning by the Dallas authorities in the hours immediately after her husband, Harvey Oswald, had been arrested. Marina soon implicated her husband in the crime.(At the time of the assassination of President Kennedy and the wounding of Governor Connally, Crichton was attending the annual luncheon held that year at the Adolphus Hotel on Commerce Street in Dallas on the Friday before Day to honor the TAMU and of Texas football teams, who meet on the gridiron annually on the Friday after Thanksgiving. Crichton recalls:I walked over to Elm Street to see the Kennedy delegation. . . . President Kennedy and Jackie made a handsome couple. She was resplendent in her pink dress and pink pillbox hat. The crowds on the sidewalks applauded, and waved as they drove by. . . . I entered the hotel . . . The room was almost filled, and people were seated at the individual tables. . . . We had the invocation, and many guests began to eat their lunch. Suddenly we heard sirens screaming and someone from outside ran up to the head table and excitedly said, The President, Vice President, and Governor Connally have all been shot. I stood and announced the news. There was stunned silence in the room. Someone then produced a radio, and the news confirmed that the President had been shot.. . . (Jack Crichton, The Republican-Democrat Political Campaigns in Texas in 1964, self-published, 2004, pp. 7-8, ISBN 1-4184-2574-5 (paperback))Gubernatorial raceIn making his race for governor, Crichton had to resign as president of the Association of Former Students of Texas A&M, a position to which he had just been elected. A classmate from Houston named John Lindsey moved up from vice president to head the organization.(Crichton, p. 16) He served in the post in 1967 instead. Crichton tapped a neighhbor, Hughes Brown, as his campaign manager. Brown told Crichton that the assassination in Dallas meant an uphill battle, but you will have a chance to advance the cause of the Republican Party in Texas, and in politics anything can happen.(Crichton, p. 15) Prior to the assassination, a poll had showed John F. Kennedy trailing in a trial heat in Texas for the 1964 general election.(Crichton, p. 44)  As Crichton ran for governor, George H.W. Bush sought the Senate seat held by the liberal Democrat W. Yarborough of Austin. Crichton was unopposed for his nomination, but Bush faced a primary fight from the 1962 gubernatorial nominee Jack Cox of Houston. Crichton and Bush spoke from some of the same podiums that year. Crichton traveled  in the campaign, addressed audiences in 85 cities and towns, and made 275 speeches. At the Republican National Convention in San Francisco, California, he was elected chairman of the Permanent Organization Committee and gave the report of that panel from the convention floor.(Crichton, pp. 53-55)Crichton strongly supported the M. Goldwater presidential candidacy: In my opinion Goldwater would have made a great president. He would either have withdrawn our presence in Vietnam or gone whole hog to win it, instead of the piecemeal strategy of the Johnson administration that so hampered our military leaders as they in effect were not allowed to win the Vietnam conflict.(Crichton, p. 48)In the campaign, Crichton focused on these points: (1) his opposition to the policies of President Johnson, (2) lowering state taxes, (3) cutting oil and beef imports, (4) stronger justice measures to protect citizens from criminals, (5) increasing Texas oil production, (6) opposition to a state rights law, (7) full voting rights for U.S. military personnel, (8) state water resource development, (9) reduction of traffic problems, (10) more decentralization in college and university administration, (11) higher public school teacher pay, (12) development of a two-party system, and (13) ethics in state government.(Crichton, p. 58)Crichton traveled to Junction, Texas, during the campaign to meet with former Democratic Governor Stevenson, the official loser by eighty-seven votes in the 1948 runoff primary for the U.S. Senate against Lyndon Johnson. Stevenson had supported John Tower in the 1960 senatorial general election against Johnson and was backing Goldwater in 1964 as well in the presidential contest. Stevenson told Crichton that the election is an important part of American history, for it got Lyndon to the Senate, which he later controlled, and was a stepping stone to his becoming President. As for me, I was depressed for quite a while, but in retrospect it has allowed me to enjoy my ranch and my young daughter. With that, we had another bourbon and branch water, and I thanked him and departed.(Crichton, pp. 35-37)Though Crichton and Bush were both defeated, the latter ran a stronger race against Yarborough than Crichton managed against Connally. Yarborough and Connally were sharp intra-party rivals at the time. Final results showed Connally with 1,877,793 votes (73.8 percent) to Crichtons 661,675 (26 percent). Crichton did, however, outpoll the tally amassed by the following Republican candidate against Connally in 1966, Thomas Everton Kennerly, Sr. (19032000), of Houston, by more than 300,000 votes in a lower-turnout election.(Congressional Quarterlys Guide to U.S. Elections, Texas governorship) Kennerly ran unsuccessfully in 1964 for a seat on the Supreme Court. Crichton wrote the book The Republican-Democrat Political Campaigns in Texas in 1964, which among other topics discusses the split at the 1964 convention between the partisans of M. Goldwater and A. Rockefeller and the last-minute attempt by Warren Scranton of Pennsylvania to bridge the differences. Crichton and Bush supported the eventual nominee, Goldwater, the U.S. senator from Arizona who lost Texas by a wide margin to native son B. Johnson.() Crichton went to a summer meeting in Hershey, Pennsylvania, having flown on the private jet of Rockefeller, then the Republican gubernatorial nominee against E. Faubus in Arkansas.(Crichton, p. 27)In Amarillo, Crichton was accompanied in a campaign appearanced by actor Walker, former star of the ABC series Cheyenne, who had once lived in Brownwood, Texas.(Crichton, p. 37) Though he addressed some  large audiences during the campaign, in Muleshoe in Bailey County in West Texas Crichton spoke from the back of a wagon to only five people plus a stray dog.(Crichton noted that in 1964 he had spent $65,000 on his race, the majority for five hundred billboards to promote his name identification. He also depended heavily on local television and newspaper coverage in the cities that he visited.(Crichton, p. 34) About half of Crichtons spending was from his personal funds. Crichtons expenditures averaged ten cents for each vote received, whereas the losing 2002 gubernatorial candidate, Democrat Sanchez of Laredo, spent $10 per vote, having disbursed $20 million in his campaign.(Crichton, pp. 56, 59)Death and legacyCrichton retired in December 1967 from the Army Reserve after thirty years of service. He received the of Merit for having organized the 488th Military Intelligence Detachment.(Crichton was president of Nafco Oil and Gas and owned Dorchester Gas Producing Company. Barr McClellan, the author and first husband of former Comptroller Strayhorn, writes in Blood, Money & Power that Big Oil would be during the fifties and into the sixties what the OPEC oil cartel was to the United States in the seventies and beyond. The oil interests were particularly interested in preservation of the depletion allowance. President Kennedy, however, wanted the allowance removed, having considered it an unfair advantage to the companies.(Crichton was the president of the Dallas Petroleum Engineers Club and a director of Florida Gas Company, Clark Oil and Refining, Whitehall Corporation, Transco Energy, and the Consolidated Development Corporation.( In 1965, he wrote the book The Dynamic Natural Gas Industry, published by the of Oklahoma Press in Norman, Oklahoma.(Crichton, p. 79) Crichton died in Dallas of complications from cancer at the age of ninety-one. Crichton and his wife, the former Marilyn Berry (born ca. 1927), had two daughters, Catherine C. Morris and husband Craig Morris and Anne C. Crews (born 1953) and husband Kyle W. Crews (born 1955). Anne was formerly an assistant press secretary in the first administration of Governor Clements. Crichton also had a surviving sister, Frances Dinks Atkinson, and two grandchildren.(In his short memoir, Crichton describes his political legacy:Although I lost to a popular governor with his arm in a sling from the Kennedy tragedy, I think I was successful in helping to establish the Republican Party . . . to make Texas a two-party state. I met and made friends with some wonderful people who shared my views. An example; twenty years after the election I was in an airport in Baltimore, and an elderly lady came up to me and said, I was your precinct chairman in Brownsville, and Ill always be grateful for your effort in the 1964 election. Such an appreciation made my efforts in 1964 worthwhile.(Crichton, p. 50)Crichton recalled how 1964 brought two new names to national poltiical prominence, W. Reagan, who gave the celebrated television speech for Goldwater on October 27, 1964, and George H.W. Bush, though defeated in the first of two Senate bids later became Reagans vice president and presidential successor. Crichton continued: The  election also established the foundation of the Republican Party in Texas under chairman Peter ODonnells leadership, and the voters were shown qualified candidates who stood for conservative principles. The influx into Texas by Republicans from other states who shared thse principles finally led to the Republican Party controlling both the state House and Senate in 2003.(Crichton, pp. 48-49)Crichtons papers are deposited at the Bush Presidential Library in College Station. He had first been invited to turn over his files to University in Waco but decided Texas A&M would be the more appropriate venue, considering his past ties to the university and to George H.W. Bush.References
26913876
Confederation_of_UK_Coal_Producers
The Confederation of UK Coal Producers (or CoalPro) is the UK association for coal mining companies. Members include Resources, Developments, Energy, Kier Mining, Maltby Colliery Ltd, Argent, Powerfuel PLC, Resources Group, and Coal.FunctionIt represents 90% of the UK coal producing industry, now that it is made up of disparate smaller companies, having once been run by the Coal Board until 1987.HistoryThe UK coal industry employs 9,000 people directly. Around one third of the UKs electricity is generated by coal power. The organisation was formed in 1991.See also* Coal Utilisation Research Association* Authority* of Materials, Minerals and Mining* Coal Mining Museum for England* Association of the United KingdomExternal links* CoalPro* Coal industry in Scotland in March 2005
26928893
Nicolai_Mejdell
Christian Henrik Nicolai Mejdell (1822  1899) was a Norwegian mining engineer.He was born in Hedmark. He took his mining examination in 1843. He worked as manager of Copper Works and Silver Works, and from 1865 he was the mine superindendent () for all of South-Eastern Norway. He was also an editor-in-chief of the newspaper Christiania-Posten, and issued books.()He was a nephew of officer Gerhard Meydell, brother of forester Mejdell and the father of jurist and writer Thorvald Mejdell.() Through his sister Cecilie Marie Mejdell he was a brother-in-law of Wilhelm Sinding and an uncle of Christian, Otto and Sinding; and also an uncle of Thora Cathrine Sinding who married his son Glr.()()References
26942476
Norbergfestival
Norbergfestival is held in Norberg, Vstmanland, Sweden. It is a festival for electronic and experimental music in Scandinavia. The festival started in 1999 by Michael sterz Christiansen and Dag Celsing. The event attracts people in different ages and most visitors come from Sweden, Denmark, Norway, Finland, UK and Germany.There are 5 stages on the festival, Mimer with a staggering reverb of 7 seconds, concrete and steel structures are the raw surroundings. KraftWerk is the old powerplant, where the clubbing and dance atmosphere is intense. 8-bit room for low-resolution madness and broken beats. Camp-303, the official underground stage and party 24/7, and the newest offspring, Bi-naural for the future sounds of Scandinavia.Norbergfestival is held in and around an abandoned mining area. The main concert building, Mimerlaven, was once a pithead frame for the extraction of iron ore. The structure was erected in 1957, Hematite and magnetite from the pits around Norberg were brought into Mimer, crushed and then further processed. The mining business was discontinued in the 1980s. Every year between 60 and 90 artists perform at Norbergfestival. Music styles span from Avantgarde, EAM and Drone via Electronica, 8-bit and Acid to Breakcore, Techno and Dubstep. During the years artist like Pole, Kurstin, Vibert, Kid606, Fennesz, B12, Delay, Milanese, Sonic, Monolake, Bong-Ra, Skream, Biosphere, Food, Skull Defekts, Tilliander and many more have performed at the festival.External links*Norbergfestival web sitesv:Norbergfestival
26967290
Christian_Edward_Detmold
Christian Edward Detmold (2 February 1810 Hanover - 2 July 1887 York City) was an engineer.BiographyHe was educated at the military academy in Hanover, and came to New York in 1826, with the intention of entering the Brazilian army. Unfavorable accounts of the conditions in Brazil induced him to remain in the States, and he became well known as an engineer. In 1827 he made many surveys in South Carolina, and vicinity for the Charleston & Hamburg Railroad and Canal Co.,() and in 1828 made the drawings for the first locomotive built by the Kembles in New York. His survey work was completed in 1830. 1833-1834 he was in the employ of the U. S. War Department, and superintended the laying of the foundations of Sumter during the illness of the engineer in charge of the work.After making surveys for railroads in various parts of the country, he became interested in the manufacture of iron, and introduced several improvements, including the utilization of the waste gases from blast and other furnaces. 1845-1852 he engaged in this manufacture in Maryland. He then built the York Crystal Palace, being the supervising architect and engineer. He hired Allen, an associate during his surveying work, as consulting engineer. Afterward, he spent some years traveling in Europe.() He then became president of the New Jersey Zinc Company, built their works at Newark, and originated and successfully developed the manufacture of spiegel iron from the residue of the zinc ore. He then engaged in coal mining.Failing health forced him to go to Europe, where he lived, most of the time in Paris, until his return to New York in 1885. He published a translation of the principal historical, political, and diplomatic writings of Machiavelli (4 vols., Boston, 1882). He also collected art.(FamilyHe married Phoebe Crary who survived him with two daughters.( His brother, Ludwig Detmold, was a noted surgeon who introduced surgery into the United States.See also* Creek Coal and Iron CompanyReferences* Edward Detmold
26987200
Meadow_Branch_Coalfield
The Meadow Branch Coalfield is a coalfield located in the Panhandle of West Virginia along the Berkeley and Morgan county lines.It is the only anthracite coalfield in West Virginia, unlike the coal found in the rest of the state.  It has not seen any active mining in many decades.  However as early as 1798(Cohen, Stan. King Coal, p.6.  Charleston, W. Va.: Pictoral Histories, 1984) anthracite from Berkeley County and bituminous coal from Mineral County were the sources of coal supplying the governments Ferry Armory.  Berkeley County was also a source of coal during the Civil War.(Cohen, p.7)  The last mining occurred in the early 20th century; the anthracite in this coalfield is difficult to mine and does not occur in the continuous seams more typical of e.g. the northeast Pennsylvania Region, making it not cost effective to mine.The area today comprises recreational areas including the Trail and Creek Wildlife Management Area.  mines can be found near the Tuscarora Trail.See also* Branch* of coalfieldsReferences
26995550
Bear_Valley_Strip_Mine
thumb|300px|View of the Bear Valley Strip Mine from the north wall facing southeast, with the Whaleback in centerThe Bear Valley Strip Mine is an abandoned coal strip mine located in Coal Township, Northumberland County, to the southwest of the town of Shamokin, Pennsylvania.  It lies in the Western Middle Field of the Anthracite belt in the Appalachians, where the Pennsylvanian Formation is exposed.  The property is owned by the Anthracite Company.(Sequence of structural stages of the Alleghany orogeny at the Bear Valley Strip Mine, Shamokin, Pennsylvania.  Nickelsen, R. P. (Dept. of Geology, University) Society of America Centennial Field GuideNortheastern Section, 1987)geologyThe coal and other overlying rock has been removed by mining down to a resistant sandstone bed, revealing the three-dimensional structures of folding and faulting caused by the Alleghany Orogeny.  Students of geology have visited the location for decades due to the quality of exposures.The central anticline in the valley is often called the Whaleback.The sequence of structural deformation is outlined as follows(:GalleryFile:Concretions Bear Valley.jpg|Concretions in the south wallFile:Bear Valley east wall.jpg|View of the east wall from the WhalebackFile:Bear Valley Slickensides.jpg|Slickensides on a fault plane, south wall. Lens cap 5.8cm wide.File:Stigmaria Bear Valley upright.jpg|Upright Sigillaria in dipping sandstone and shale beds of the north wall.  A so-called fossil.File:DCP 0776.JPG|Another image of the south wall and WhalebackFile:Stigmaria Bear Valley Strip Mine.jpg|Stigmaria root fossilsReferences
27011702
UK_Educational_Evidence_Portal
The UK educational evidence portal (eep) is an online resource providing easy access to published research and evidence-based guidance across all areas of education, and related aspects of childrens services. It was developed through collaboration between organisations to make research evidence more widely available to a range of audiences, including educational professionals, practitioners, policy makers and the research community.(http://books.google.co.uk/books?idD1-ucxFCAVYC&pgPA100&dq%22educational+evidence+portal%22&cd1#vonepage&q%22educational%20evidence%20portal%22&ffalse Saunders, L. (2007) Educational Research and Policy-Making: Exploring the Border Country Between Research and Policy. Routledge, p. 100.)The portal went live in September 2007 and is funded by a number of organisations, including Education Trust, DCSF, BIS, TDA, Becta and The National College. It is hosted by the EPPI-Centre at the of Education, of London and managed by a Development Group which meets approximately bi-monthly. A subset of this group meets as the Editorial Group which manages the content of the portal. CfBT Education Trust provides overall leadership.(About eep (eep web site)) The portal has been cited as a useful information resource by various academic and Government sources in the UK and elsewhere.(http://books.google.co.uk/books?idGCZGqWweAlIC&pgPA35&lpgPA35&dq%22educational+evidence+portal%22&sourcebl&ots2OXFS5IKTS&sigrrXbm8InFwdb137mXusnM8n8egA&hlen&eidFnRS-nWDYn7_AaxhpnZDw&saX&oibook_result&ctresult&resnum8&ved0CBgQ6AEwBzgy#vonepage&q%22educational%20evidence%20portal%22&ffalse Thomas, G. (2009) How To Do Your Research Project. Sage Publications, p. 35.)(http://books.google.co.uk/books?idMo6uIoBN87sC&pgPA20&dq%22educational+evidence+portal%22&cd4#vonepage&q%22educational%20evidence%20portal%22&ffalse Bubb, S., Earley, P. (2010) Helping Staff Develop in Schools. Sage Publications, p. 20.)(http://www.nfer.ac.uk/nfer/what-we-offer/information/ NFER information sites)(http://www.education.ox.ac.uk/library/training/start/index.php Oxford University Department of Education - Where to start for information for education)(http://www.aussieeducator.org.au/education/other/educationsearchengines.html Aussie Educator: Education Search Engines)(http://www.dcsf.gov.uk/research/links/index.cfm DCSF Research Website - links)(http://register.consilium.europa.eu/pdf/en/07/st12/st12838.en07.pdf The Council of the European Union: Commission document SEC(2007) 1098, p. 47) Eep can be searched in the following ways:* Search websites - collections of documents from areas of a wide range of organisations contributing to eep(http://www.eep.ac.uk/dnn2/Searcheep/Searchwebsites/tabid/61/Default.aspx eep web sites search)* Search eep database - individual documents that have been selected by a subset of organisations and indexed in greater detail by the British Education Index(http://www.eep.ac.uk/dnn2/Searcheep/Searcheepdatabase/tabid/62/Default.aspx eep database search)* Explore key documents and links in specialised Resource Areas which focus on specific topics or educational communities.(http://www.eep.ac.uk/dnn2/ResourceArea/tabid/93/Default.aspx eep resource areas)Eep is currently developing the next release of the portal which will improve the search results for both new and more experienced users. There will be a subject list for browsing the database. Authors names and British Education Thesaurus terms will be clickable so that related documents in the database are linked. A new text mining tool will provide automatic subject tags, on the fly, for both the database and website search.ReferencesExternal links* The UK educational evidence portal (eep)
27033241
Palatka,_Russia
Palatka (, literal translation tent) is an settlement in Oblast, Russia.  It is located on the Highway, 87 km north west of Magadan and around 100 km south of Atka.HistoryThe exact date of foundation of the settlement is unclear, although it began at some point in the early 1930s as the areas gold reserves were explored, and a labour camp of the gulag was built here.  The first official mention of the town was in June 1932, when the first bridge was built over the Palatka River.  In 1937, there were around 3,000 held at the prison settlement.  The towns name Palatka is identical with the Russian word for tent, which has been suggested as the origin of the towns name as during the early period of the settlements history is existed largely as a collection of tents and semi-permanent structures.  It is also suggested that the name may come from the Evenk words Palja Atken, meaning stony river.In spite of its somewhat chaotic and unplanned nature, by 1939 the town was one of the largest on the Highway, and in August of that year began the construction of permanent dwellings.  A railway was built from Palatka to the harbour at Magadan, which remained in operation until 1950.In the 1960s a sovkhoz based around farming reindeer was opened in the settlement.In the 1970s, mining activity began in the nearby town of Karamken and Palatka became a dormitory town for mine workers.After the of the Soviet Union, the town lost well over half its population, from 10,496 inhabitants in 1989, to 4,888 inhabitants in 2002.  The closure of the reindeer farm left a great number of local people unemployed (mainly Evenks and Orochs), and the mining industry also saw a general downturn with administration moving to other towns such as Susuman.The town is a sister city of Palatka, in the US state of Florida.  The names are only coincidentally identical, the name of Palatka in Florida being of Native American origin.Palatka lies on the route of the proposed future rail link between the Yakutsk Mainline and Magadan.Sister city* Palatka (USA)(Russland)(Rusland)( )
27051968
Indigenous_horticulture
Indigenous Horticulture is practiced in various ways across all inhabited continents. Indigenous refers to the native peoples of a given area and horticulture is the practice of small-scale cultivation.AfricaNorth AfricaIn Africa we look at the farming practices of the Eggon, a Nigerian farming community. The Eggon live in the Mada hills between Lafia and Akwanga. The hills lay between two rivers that Mada and Arikya. The altitude helps retain moisture on the hills due to early morning mists and fogs. The altitude also makes for earlier and longer crop cultivation. They practice bush fallow agriculture as well as mixed farming management styles. They focus on growing yams, cassava, maize, beans, and rice; much of what is produced is exported as a crop and is their primary source of cash income. The Eggon use a terraced agricultural system to maximize space on the hills. The goats that they raise are kept mostly for fertilizer used in farming. They are only killed on special occasions such as weddings. The Eggon use the diversity in their environment to maximize their production.West AfricaIn Africa the Kissidougou live on the savannah dotted by dense areas of forest islands that was created by the Kissidougou. The Kissidougou practice intercropping within the forested areas. However, they also operate farms maintained on slopes or plateaus that are located between the forest islands.  They prepare the savannah lands for forestation through farming and burning of the grasses to fertilize the soils. The Kissidougou graze their cattle on the savannah to help to maintain flammable grasses around the farms and the villages. The Kissidougou create diversity in their environment by farming and transforming savannah into lush, dense forest.The prevalence of wetlands in West Africa has helped to support local indigenous horticulture.  Seasonal flooding of major rivers in the region, such as the River Niger, the Sudd and the Senegal, have made it possible for flood cropping in many areas.  Indigenous people have utilized a variety of irrigation techniques in order to take advantage of seasonal flooding.  Additionally, they plan their plantings and harvests specifically around the flooding of local rivers. For example, some farmers choose to plant on rising floods and harvest as the flooding diminishes.  This techniques is utilized when cultivating rice.(Adams, W. Indigenous Use of Wetlands and Sustainable Development in West Africa.The Geographical Journal 159. 2 (1993): 209-218.)East AfricaThe areas of Africa are one of the most affected by farming. In western Uganda there is a farming society called the Banyankore. Their land is part of the Rwampara hill country, that is between two flat, dry, and less populated areas of land. On the Hills Te average monthly rainfall are 970mm with two short dry months in June and July and a short less severe dry month in January. Seven months out of the year the rainfall is over 1000mm per month.  Their primary production are bananas and coffee, they use these as cash crops. Farmers still use substantial areas for millet farming. This is their main crop. They have intensive home gardens to produce for the families needs and the outlying farming is used mostly for the cash crop production where coffee and banana are cultivated using intercropping methods.South AfricaIn Africa the conglomerate farming companies has primarily written off the lands in northwest Zambia. The land is mostly made of plateaus with lowers lands in the Kabompo and Zambezi valleys. Much of the area is in the Congo-Zambezi watershed, the area of land where all water runs into the same basin. The land has several types of soil. There are areas of yellow clay with higher concentrations of sand where higher rain falls causes erosion and makes farming in those areas difficult. There are also areas with fertile red clay that are rich soils good for cultivation of crops. Farmers in the area grow sorghum, millet, potatoes, pumpkin and maize. There is marginal maize production that is used as a cash crop for the community. The area is usually covered by thick forestation that must be cleared before crops can be cultivated, they do not practice agroforestry. Traditionally spouses must maintain their own gardens. The produce is shared communally but the practice leads to intensive home gardens that are maintained by the women of the villages.South PacificHighlander HorticultureThe Enga of the Highlands Province in Guinea receive most of their food from growing sweet potatoes Ipomoea batatas which they plant in mulch mounds at elevations up to 2,700m or higher (Dove and Carpenter 2008). The mounds that the Enga make to plant their crops of potatoes are formed from by piling large amounts of grass taken from fallow, or unplanted, plots then by covering the grass with dirt (Wohlt 2004). The size of the mounds depends on elevation; the higher the elevation; the bigger the mounds will be. Mounds above 2,500m in altitude can have a height of 0.85m in height; while crops below 1,500m are not mounded at all (Dove and Carpenter 2008). The function of the mound is to protect the crops from the frequent frosts that occur at the high altitudes of the Enga. With sweet potatoes having a very long maturation period, 9 months, the Enga also invest their time and space on the mounds with planting other crops that have much shorter maturation periods such as peas in case a heavy frost does claim the crop (Wohlt 2004).The planting of the mounds is done so that the plants which have a higher frost tolerance, such as the Irish potatoes, are planted casually throughout the mound and the low tolerant sweet potatoes are planted in the best position to avoid the frost. Peas, beans, and cabbage which are all highly tolerant to frost will be planted outside the circle of sweet potatoes and lower on the mound placing them closer to the cold temperatures of the ground (Dove and Carpenter 2008). The Enga practice fallow rotation where a garden will in crop for about four years followed by about four years of fallow grassland to let the soil replenish (Wohlt 2004).Garden size for an average Enga garden is about 0.21 hectare or about 2,100 square meters and can contain a few hundred mounds (Wohlt 2004). Another gardening strategy the Enga have implemented is the use of kin lands that are usually within one to two days walk from the farmers normal planting grounds (Dove and Carpenter 2008). The uses of multiple gardens at differing elevation and the ability access clan lands in different areas for gardening have allowed the Enga to adapt to their environment and survive under harsh conditions.Lowland Swidden CultivationSwidden cultivation is an extensive agriculture practice that is also known as Slash-and-Burn agriculture.  The process is extensive because it requires a vast amount of land divided into several plots with one plot planted for a period of years, while the other plots lay fallow for a number of years (Hyde 2010).For the Bine-speaking peoples of the New Guinea lowlands swidden cultivation is a main practice for crop propagation. The main crop the Bine grow is the root, although the grow about 15 subsidiary crops including: sweet potato, banana, manioc, maize, yam, pawpaw, cane, pineapple, and others (Eden 1993). The swiddens which can be placed in either savannas or forests are created by cutting down all the vegetation in the area that the swidden will be. The farmers then pile all of the cut vegetation on the swidden plot and leave it to dry out through the dry season (Hyde 2010). Right before the wet season begins the piles are burned and the soil and ash are tilled together (Eden 1993). The process of tilling the soil and ash mixes the carbon and nitrogen rich ash into the soil thereby fertilizing the soil for the coming crop. After the soil is tilled the crops are planted.There are two planting years for a single swidden for the Bine farmers. In the first year the Bine plant primary taro root with a few subsidiary crops like bananas and sweet potatoes.  In the second year taro root makes up about 50 percent of the swidden and the rest of the swidden is mixed with about 15 other plants. After the second year the Bine farmers move on to an adjacent swidden and allow the previous swidden to lay fallow or unplanted for a period of 5 to 10 years in order to repopulate the vegetation (Eden 1993). The number of years that a swidden will lay fallow is determined by the plants demand for the nitrogen in the soil. Some plants will leach the soil of nitrogen in a few years and require four or five times that fallow; while other plants can be planted for many years and lay fallow only one or two times the planting period (Hyde 2010).  Swidden cultivation requires a lot of land in order to feed only a few people, but the Bine, whose numbers are low, make good uses of their land through swidden farming.Island HorticultureFor most  South Pacific Island cultures the main subsistence techniques are hunting and gathering. Fishing and the gathering of sago, banana, and other tropical foods are the norm with very little organized agriculture. The Tabalu of Kiriwina located in the Islands practice a form of agriculture called Kayluebila, a form of garden magic (Malinowski 1965). The main crop for the Tabalu is the yam and there is a definite of labour according to sex when it comes to gardening. Heavy work is done by the men and it includes clearing the vegetation, caring the yam supports, and planting the yam tubers in the ground (Malinowski 1987). The women aid by weeding the gardens.Gardening for the Tabalu is a very long and in depth magical process; with special magicians and magical ingredients which have been handed down from family member to family member over time. Garden fields which are called Kwabila are fenced in on all sides to keep out the swine that are breed by the Tabalu. Kwabila are then divided into many smaller plots called baleko, these are the individual gardens that the crops will be planted in (Malinowski 1965).South AmericaAmerica consists of modern day Venezuela, Colombia, Ecuador, Suriname, Brazil, Peru, Bolivia, Paraguay, Uruguay, Argentina, and Chile.  South America has historically been a land exploited not only for its resources, but also for its indigenous knowledge and force. The environmental diversification of South America has been at the foundation of its presence in the economy as a resource for agriculture, forestry, fishing, hunting, livestock, mining and quarrying.South America can be seen as cultural regions inhabited by Marginal tribe, Tropical Forest tribes, and the Circum-Caribbean tribes each with its own distinct way of agricultural cultivation (Lyon 1974:6).South Americas geographic regions are inhabited by regional tribes which include; the Choc in the Northern Columbian area, The Kayapo in the Eastern Para area, the Chono in the Southern Fuegian area, and the Quechuas in the Western Peruvian area, (Lyon 1974:24). Each of these regions has adapted not only their own cultural identity and agricultural style,The Eastern region of South America is known as the Para area in what is now modern day Brazil, and has for millennia been home to the forest Kayap tribe. The Kayap lived in sedentary villages and were proficient in pottery and loom-weaving, yet they did not domesticate animals or poses knowledge on metallurgy.   These Tropical forest Tribes can be characterized through their farming, canoes, woven baskets, loom weaving, and pole and thatch houses.In the Para area the Kayap like most tribes of this region practiced intensive agriculture or clearing cultivation. Beginning their agricultural year with a low water season intensifies fishing. The low water season is then followed by the high water season or harvest season. It is during this harvest season that the Kayap are able to exercise their leisure time before the cycle ends with (low water levels) and a return to intense fishing. Each changing season commences ceremonies for the Kayap that are directly tied to agriculture, hunting, or fishing. Unlike the Choc the Kayap used  an agricultural method known as the slash-burn method (shifting agriculture) .The Kayap cut the forest in April to September (dry season) and  time their burns just before the raining season.  The Kayap used  circular plots for agricultural cultivation consisting of five rings (characterized as cultivation zones). The first circle or the inner circle was used for taro and sweet potatoes that thrive in the hotter soil found in the center of the plot .The second circle cultivated maize, manioc, and rice an area that needed various ash enrichment treatments and would experience short term growth. The third zone was an area of rich soil and best served mixed crops including the banana, urucu, papaya. The fourth zones consists of shade loving plants and are for a medical purpose, yet evidence of beans and yams have been also found here. The fifth zone or the outer ring was left as a protective zone that included trap animals protective insects and birds. This form of agriculture requires not only intense physical labor but also requires a knowledge of not only the land ,but  various types of ground cover , shades and temperatures of local soils ,as well as cloud formations to time carful burning . When the Kayap manage their agricultural plots they must work with a variety of interacting factors including the background soil fertility ,the heterogeneous quality of ash and its distribution, crop nutrient requirements, cropping cycles, management requirements, and pest and disease control clearly illustrating the common misconception that this form of agriculture is primitive and ineffiecnet.It has often been thought that the slash-burn plots are abandoned after one or two years because of un productive soil ,but this is  a common misconception. The Kayap revisit abandoned fields because plants can offer direct and indirect benefits. One direct benefit would be the ability to eat that which has been produced and an indirect benefit would be that open fields allow attract game for hunting and can produce long after they have been tended.The Southern region  of South America is known as the Fuegian area  and is occupied by the Chono, Alacaluf and Yahgan . These Marginal tribes differed greatly from the other regions in that they were expert in making bark or plank canoes and domesticating dogs, hunting, fishing and gathering. Nomads with simple socio-religious patterns, yet completely lacked the technology of pottery, loom-weaving, metallurgy and even agriculture . Since there was a lack of agriculture in this region the Chono  ate  native berries, roots, fruits, and wild celery . The source of nutrition for the Chono, Yahgans, and Alcaaluf thus mainly consisted of sea food such as; whales, seal porpoises, guanacos, and otters . The Southern tribes of South America  distinguished themselves not in having a rare form of agriculture like the Norths slush-mush method or the  having  intensive agriculture like the Easts  sophisticated slash-burn method , yet  were able to distinguished themselves in being absent of this trait .North AmericaA few remarkable farming methods developed by Native Americans were terraces, irrigation, mound building, rotation and seeding. Another astonishing plan of theirs was planting. These unique techniques produced maximum yielding from their crops.Terracing is an effective technique in a steep-sloped, semi-arid climate. The Indigenous farmers stair-stepped the hills so that soil erosion was minimal and land surface was better suited for farming. In the Southwest, including parts of Mexico, Arizona, and parts of Northern Mexico, terracing was extensive. Terraces were constructed by placing rock dams to redirect runoff water to canals that evenly dispersed rain water. The terraced field transformed the terrain into land suitable for farming maize (Keoke and Porterfield 2005, pg. 56). There is evidence that terracing has been used in the Southwest for about 2,500 years.(Sandor, Gersper and Hawley 1990, 71) The Anasazi people from this region built reservoirs and directed rain water through ditches to water the crops in the terraces.(Keoke and Porterfield 2005, 58) The natives grew corn, squash, and beans, along with other crops in the terraced fields.Corn, squash, and beans were staple crops for Native Americans. They were grown throughout much of the North American continent. This trio became known as the Three Sisters. Where they were not grown, the locals traded for them (Berzok 2005, 9). Nomadic tribes, such as the Dakotas, would trade meat for these vegetable staples. The Three Sisters were usually eaten in unison. They provide maximum nutrition when consumed together.Ancient folklore belief says that the Three Sisters represented three goddesses. Each sister protected one of the three crops. The Three Sisters must never be separated and therefore be planted, cooked, and consumed togetheralways.(Kowtko 2006, 54) This belief turns out to be a good thing. When maize, beans and squash are consumed together, they provide a perfect balance of nutrition. When the trio is eaten together, the body produces a protein that replicates that of meat. This triad was grown together as well. The crops prospered from one another. Geographically, the Woodlands, Prairie, Plains, Great Basin, and Plateau native cultures all utilized the Three Sisters to some extent.The Indian Triad was an example of symbiotic planting. Native Americans were very good at farming. They found that when grown together, the harvest was much larger than when grown separately. Less land was required as well. The corn stalks functioned as a support for the beans. The beans transferred nitrogen into a usable form for the corn and squash, and the broad squash leaves provided shade for the soil, which aided in preventing evaporation and weed control (Kowtko 2006, 54). As the success of the Three Sisters spread, many cultures turned from their hunting and gathering roots and relied much more on farming (Kowtko 2006, 55).Another highly successful farming technique of Native American farmers is known as irrigation. This technique was utilized through much of the Southwest and is useful where water is scarce. Irrigation was and is still used today throughout much of the world. Native Americans became very good at controlling the amount of water that reached their fields. They built long irrigation canals to redirect water from a source to water their crops. The Hohokam people constructed about 600 miles of irrigation canals from AD 50 to 1450 near Arizona (Berzok 2005, 51). Part of the canal is used by the City of Phoenix today. The Olmec of Mesoamerica built canals over 4,000 years ago.(Keoke and Porterfield 2005, 55)Chinampas were invented by Maya farmers. Chinampas are artificial islands in swamplands and lakes. Crops grown on these artificial fields flourished in Mesoamerica. Mesoamerica was very populated at this time, so they developed this technique for additional farming plots (Keoke and Porterfield 2005, 60). This technique was later used by the Aztec. The Maya and Aztec civilizations grew and flourished due to food surplus.In the Northeast Woodlands and the Lakes region, an advanced society known as the Moundbuilders emerged (Berzok 2005, 13). This society lived in the plains of the Mississippi river basin. This culture farmed mainly maize. They had little need for foraging and grew to an advanced civilization due to food surplus. They were the largest civilization north of the Grande.Storing systems were advanced for the Native Americans. They developed sophisticated storage containers which allowed them to store seeds to plant during the next planting season. They also stored food in dug-out pits or holes in hillsides. Native Americans developed cribs. These were storage bins that were elevated off the ground. This technique prevented moisture and animal intrusion (Berzok 2005, 122-123).Seed selection also became advanced. Corn is a domestic plant and cannot grow on its own. The first corn grown by Native Americans had small ears. Only a few kernels were produced. By 2,000 years ago, single stalks with large ears were being produced (Keoke and Porterfield 2005, 55). Native Americans created over 700 varieties of corn by 1500 AD.ReferencesAfrica*Chabatama, Chewe Mebbiens. 1999. Peasant Farming, the State, and Food Security in the North-Western Province of Zambia, 1902--1964. Diss. University of Toranto, 1999.*Dorward, David. 1987. The Impact of Colonialism on a Nigerian Hill-Farming Society: A Case Study of Innovation among the Eggon. International Journal of African Historical Studies 20.2: 201-24.*Dove, Michael, and Carol Carpenter. 2008. Environmental Anthropology: a Historical Reader. Malden, MA: Blackwell Pub.*Kent, Susan. 2002. Ethnicity, Hunter-gatherers, and the other: Association or Assimilation in Africa. Washington: Smithsonian Institution.*Simon Heck. 1998. In the Presence of Neighbors: Land, Property, and Community in Ankole, Uganda. Diss. Boston University.South Pacific*Boyd, David J. 2001. Life without Pigs: Recent Subsistence Changes among the Irakia Awa, Papua New Guinea. Human Ecology 29(3):259-282.*Dove, Michael R., and Carol Carpenter, eds. 2008. Environmental Anthropology: A Historical Reader: Blackwell Publishing.*Eden, Michael J. 1993. Swidden Cultivation in Forest and Savanna in Lowland Southwest Papua New Guinea. Human Ecology 21(2):145-166.*Hogbin, Ian, ed. 1973. Anthropology in Papua New Guinea. Melbourne: Melbourne University Press.*interKnowledgeCorp. 2006. PAPUA NEW GUINEA: For the Serious Adventure Traveller. Pp. Papua  New Guinea Tourism, Vol. 2010: interKnowledge Corp*Malinowski, Bronislaw. 1961. Argonauts of the Western Pacific. New York: E.P. Dutton & Co., Inc.*  1965. Soil-Tilling and Agricultural Rites in the Trobriand Islands. Bloomington: Indiana University Press.*  1987. The sexual life of savages in North-western Melanesia : an ethnographic account of courtship, marriage, and family life among the natives of the Trobriand Islands, British New Guinea. Boston: Beacon Press.*Wohlt, Paul B. Descent Group Composition and Population Pressure in a Fringe Enga Clan, Papua New Guinea. Human Ecology 32(2):137-162.South America*Europa. 1926. The Eurpopa year book 1982 A World Survey. Volume (I-II). Europa Publications.*Cooper, M. John. 1967. Analyitical and Critical Bibliography of the Tribes of the Tierra Del Fuego and the Adjacent Territory. Netherlands: Anthropological Publications.*Lyon, Patricia. 1974. Native South Americans Ethnology of the Least Known Continent. Boston: Little Brown and Company.*Osborne, Harold. 1952. Indians of the Andes Aymaras and Quechuas. London and New York: Routledge.*Posey, A. Darrell. 2002. Kayapo Ethnoecology and Culture. London and New York: Routledge.*Williams, A. Caroline. 2004. Between Resistance and Adaption: Indigenous Peoples and the Colonisation of the Choco, 1510-1753. Liverpool, UK: Liverpool University Press.North America*Berzok, Linda Murray. American Indian Food. Greenwood Press, 2005.*Carlson, Leonard A. Indians, Bureaucrats and Land: The Dawes Act and the Decline of Indian Farming. Greenwood Press, 1981.*Duer, Douglas, Nancy J. Turner. Keeping It Living: Traditions of Plant Use and Cultivation on the Northwest Cost of North America. University of Washington Press, 2005.*Keoke, Emory Dean, Kay Marie Porterfield. Food, Farming, and Hunting. Facts on File, 2005.*Kowtko, Stacy. Nature and the Environment in Pre-Columbian American Life. Greenwoods Press, 2006.*Sandor, J.A., P.L.Gersper, and J.W. Hawley. 1990. Prehistoric Agriculture Terraces and Soils in the Mimbres Area, New Mexico. World Archaeology 22,no.5 (June , 1990).
27079365
Business_augmentation_services
Business augmentation services is a specialized set of services for managing and nurturing a company in the business of technology and assuring steep growth with clients and sales prospects. It involves using business concepts like branding and strategic planning as well as technology to organize, automate, and generate business processesprincipally design and sales activities, but also those for marketing, patents ( IAM ), service, and support. The overall goals are to innovate in 360 degrees, in other words, to utilize technology and business ideas in unison and simultaneously to find, attract, and win new clients, nurture and retain those the company already has, entice former clients back into the fold, and reduce the costs of marketing, client service, production, and design all while exponentially increasingly the value of the company and its products in the customers eyes. The service set was created based on the belief the business is driven by technology.(Keystone Strategy, Inc. (6 June 2009) Keystone Strategy, Inc., research study: Information technology drives growth Published on March 13, 2006) Once a company embraces this service set, specialized individuals well-versed in these concepts become necessary to execute them. Once simply a label for a category of software tools, today, it generally denotes a company-wide business strategy embracing all technology as well as client-facing departments and even beyond. When an implementation is effective, people, processes, and technology work in synergy to increase profitability, and reduce operational costs.(The role of information technology in the profit and cost efficiency improvements... (2005) The role of information technology in the profit and cost efficiency improvements of the banking sector.)BenefitsThese tools have been shown to help companies attain these objectives:*Streamlined sales and marketing processes*New markets and instant, assured leadership in these markets through Patents*Higher sales productivity*Added cross-selling and up-selling opportunities*Improved service, loyalty, and retention*Increased product development efficiency (the objective is always a 10x increase)*Better profiling and targeting as well as new customer profiling and targeting*Reduced expenses (the objective is a 10x decrease as shown in technology)*Increased current share*Higher overall profitabilityRelated trendsNew trends are beginning to take hold in this field. Due to the abundance of technical knowledge, the reduction in cost for said knowledge as well as the growing need for velocity when approaching a new market, companies are beginning to turn into one-stop-shops for business and technological services, requiring professionals skilled in both fields.  Perhaps the most notable trend has been the growth of tools delivered via the Web, also known as computing and as a service (SaaS). In contrast with traditional on-premises software, cloud-computing applications are sold by subscription, accessed via a secure Internet connection, and displayed on a Web browser. Companies dont incur the initial capital expense of purchasing software; nor must they buy and maintain IT hardware to run it on. As with all business fields affected by globalization, many companies around the world have created a niche as BAS groups and currently the new companies are creating value in the stagnated field of outsourced business and IT services.ChallengesDespite the benefits, many companies are still not fully leveraging these tools and services, mostly because the areas that deal with business and technology very often are separate entities, and as such may not fully understand each other. BAS is a set of defined services that fuse these previously incongruous areas into processes that have an impact that has yet to be fully understood. To align marketing,engineering, design, sales, and service to best serve the customer while reducing costs, the company needs to reconcile these areas through BAS, which requires juxtaposing previously irreconcilable objectives effectively .(USING TECHNOLOGY TO REDUCE COST using technology to reduce costs) BAS tools, services and work-flows can be complex to implement, especially for large enterprises. Previously these tools were generally limited.  Software solutions then expanded to embrace things such as design needs, engineering, deal tracking, territories, opportunities, and at the sales pipeline itself. Next came the advent of tools for other client-facing business functions, as described below.  These technologies have been, and still are, offered as on-premises software that companies purchase and run on their own IT infrastructure. Now, companies are emerging to provide these solutions exclusively. In effect, these BAS houses are experts in a relatively new field and as such are not yet widely used by more traditional corporations. Often, implementations are fragmented; isolated initiatives by individual departments to address their own needs. Systems that start disunited usually stay that way: siloed thinking and decision processes frequently lead to separate and incompatible systems, and dysfunctional processes, not to mention weak product lines and low market awareness.Previous types/variationsSales force automationA force automation (SFA) system provides an array of capabilities to streamline all phases of the sales process, minimizing the time that sales representatives need to spend on manual data entry and administration. This allows them to successfully pursue more clients in a shorter amount of time than would otherwise be possible. At the heart of SFA is a management system for tracking and recording every stage in the sales process for each prospective client, from initial contact to final disposition. Many SFA applications also include insights into opportunities, territories, sales forecasts and work-flow automation, quote generation, and product knowledge. Newly-emerged priorities are modules for Web 2.0 e-commerce and pricing.MarketingSystems for marketing (also known as automation) help the enterprise identify and target its best clients and generate qualified leads for the sales team. A key marketing capability is tracking and measuring multichannel campaigns, including email, search, social media, and direct mail. Metrics monitored include clicks, responses, leads, deals, and revenue. As marketing departments are increasingly obliged to demonstrate revenue impact, todays systems typically include features for measuring the rate of return (ROI) of campaigns.Disruptive IT service and supportRecognizing that disruptive technology is an important differentiation, organizations are increasingly turning to technology platforms to help them improve their clients experience while aiming to increase efficiency and minimize costs.(PC world magazine (18 March 2008) The 10 Most Disruptive Technology Combinations) Even so, a 2009 study revealed that only 39% of corporate executives believe their employees have the right tools and authority to solve client problems..(Strativity Group, Inc. (2009) Global Customer Experience Management Benchmark Study)AnalyticsRelevant analytics capabilities are often interwoven into applications in sales, marketing, and service. These features can be complemented and augmented with links to separate, purpose-built applications for analytics and business intelligence. Sales analytics let companies monitor and understand client actions and preferences, through sales forecasting, data quality, and dashboards that graphically display performance indicators (KPIs).  Marketing applications generally come with analytics to improve segmentation and targeting, and features for measuring the effectiveness of online, offline, and search marketing campaign Web analytics have evolved significantly from their starting point of merely tracking mouse clicks on Web sites. By evaluating buy signals, marketers can see which prospects are most likely to transact and also identify those who are bogged down in a sales process and need assistance. Marketing and finance personnel also use analytics to assess the value of multi-faceted programs as a whole. These types of analytics are increasing in popularity as companies demand greater visibility into the performance of call centers and other support channels, in order to correct problems before they affect satisfaction levels. Support-focused applications typically include dashboards similar to those for sales, plus capabilities to measure and analyze response times, service quality, agent performance, and the frequency of various issues.Integrated/collaborativeDepartments within enterprisesespecially large enterprisestend to function in their own little worlds.(Using technology to improve workforce collaboration (27 october 2009) Using technology to improve workforce collaboration) Traditionally, inter-departmental interaction and collaboration have been infrequent and rivalries not uncommon.  More recently, the development and adoption of the tools and services has fostered greater fluidity and cooperation among sales,  service, and marketing. This finds expression in the concept of collaborative systems which uses technology to build bridges between departments. For example, feedback from a support center can enlighten marketers about specific services and product features clients are asking for. Reps, in their turn, want to be able to pursue these opportunities without the time-wasting burden of re-entering records and contact data into a separate SFA system. Conversely, lack of integration can have negative consequences: if a system isnt adopted and integrated among all departments, several sources might contact the same clients for an identical purpose. Owing to these factors, many of the top-rated and most popular products come as integrated suites.Small businessBasic client service can be accomplished by a contact manager system, an integrated solution that lets organizations and individuals efficiently track and record interactions, including emails, documents, jobs, faxes, scheduling, and more. This kind of solution is gaining traction with even very small businesses, thanks to the ease and time savings of handling client contact through a centralized application rather than several different pieces of software, each with its own data collection system.  In contrast these tools usually focus on accounts rather than individual contacts. They also generally include opportunity insight for tracking sales pipelines plus added functionality for marketing and service.  As with larger enterprises, small businesses are finding value in online solutions, especially for mobile and telecommuting workers.Social mediamedia sites like Twitter and Facebook are greatly amplifying the voice of people in the marketplace and are predicted to have profound and far-reaching effects on the ways companies manage their clients, even to the family level.(sjsu.edu(1998)  Technology and Social Change: The Effects on Family and Community) This is because people are using these social media sites to share opinions and experiences on companies, products, and services. As social media isnt moderated or censored, individuals can say anything they want about a company or brand, whether pro or con. Increasingly, companies are looking to gain access to these conversations and take part in the dialogue. More than a few systems are now integrating to social networking sites. Social media promoters cite a number of business advantages, such as using online communities as a source of high-quality leads and a vehicle for sourcing solutions to client-support problems. Companies can also leverage client stated habits and preferences to personalize and even hyper-target their sales and marketing communications.Some analysts take the view that business-to-business marketers should proceed cautiously when weaving social media into their business processes. These observers recommend careful market research to determine if and where the phenomenon can provide measurable benefits for client interactions, sales, and support.(Harvard business review (2010) Six Social Media Trends for 2010)Non-profit and membership-basedSystems for non-profit and membership-based organizations help track constituents and their involvement in the organization. Capabilities typically include tracking the following: fund-raising, demographics, membership levels, membership directories, volunteering and communications with individuals. Many include tools for identifying potential donors based on previous donations and participation.  In light of the growth of social networking tools, there may be some overlap between social/community driven tools and non-profit/membership tools.StrategyChoosing and implementing a system is a major undertaking. For enterprises of any appreciable size, a complete and detailed plan is required to obtain the funding, resources, and company-wide support that can make the initiative successful. Benefits must be defined, risks assessed, and cost quantified in three general areas: *Processes: Though these systems have many technological components, business processes lie at its core. It can be seen as a more client-centric way of doing business, enabled by technology that consolidates and intelligently distributes pertinent information about clients, sales, marketing effectiveness, responsiveness, and market trends. Therefore, before choosing a technology platform, a company needs to analyze its business workflows and processes; some will likely need re-engineering to better serve the overall goal of winning and satisfying clients. Moreover, planners need to determine the types of client information that are most relevant, and how best to employ them.*People: For an initiative to be effective, an organization must convince its staff that change is good and that the new technology and workflows will benefit employees as well as clients. Senior executives need to be strong and visible advocates who can clearly state and support the case for change. Collaboration, teamwork, and two-way communication should be encouraged across hierarchical boundaries, especially with respect to process improvement.(TechTarget (2009) Strategy Checklist: Planning for CRM and Customer Service Success)*Technology: In evaluating technology, key factors include alignment with the companys business process strategy and goals; the ability to deliver the right data to the right employees; and sufficient ease of use that users wont balk. Platform selection is best undertaken by a carefully chosen group of executives who understand the business processes to be automated as well as the various software issues. Depending upon the size of the company and the breadth of data, choosing an application can take anywhere from a few weeks to a year or more.ImplementationImplementation issuesDramatic increases in revenue, higher rates of client satisfaction, and significant savings in operating costs are some of the benefits to an enterprise.  Proponents emphasize that technology should be implemented only in the context of careful strategic and operational planning.() Implementations almost invariably fall short when one or more facets of this prescription are ignored:*Poor planning: Initiatives can easily fail when efforts are limited to choosing and deploying software, without an accompanying rationale, context, and support for the workforce.() In other instances, enterprises simply automate flawed client-facing processes rather than redesign them according to best practices.*Poor integration: For many companies, integrations are piecemeal initiatives that address a glaring need: improving a particular client-facing process or two or automating a favored sales or client support channel. Such point solutions offer little or no integration or alignment with a companys overall strategy. They offer a less than complete client view and often lead to unsatisfactory user experiences.*Towards a solution: overcoming siloed thinking. Experts advise organizations to recognize the immense value of integrating their client-facing operations. In this view, internally-focused, department-centric views should be discarded in favor of reorienting processes toward information-sharing across marketing, design, engineering, sales, and service. For example, sales representatives need to know about current issues and relevant marketing promotions before attempting to cross-sell to a specific client. Marketing staff should be able to leverage client information from sales and service to better target campaigns and offers. And support agents require quick and complete access to a clients sales and service history.Adoption issuesEnterprises need to address and overcome persistent adoption challenges. Specialists offer these recommendations for boosting adoptions rates and coaxing users to blend these tools into their daily work-flow:*Choose a system thats easy to use: All solutions are not created equal. Some vendors offer more user-friendly applications than others, and simplicity should be as important a decision factor as functionality.*Focusing on the clients client: it is sometimes difficult to define the clients client, and as the central goal of BAS houses is to please exactly this group, this presents an issue with uninitiated users of BAS.*Choose the right capabilities: Employees need to know that time invested in learning and usage will yield personal advantages. If not, they will work around or ignore the system.*Provide training: Changing the way people work is no small task, and help is usually a requirement. Even with todays more usable systems, many staffers still need assistance with learning and adoption.See also* intelligence* intelligence* relationship management* relationship system* experience transformation* experience* Customers* intelligence* service  contains ISO standards* International Customer Service Institute  contains service standards* mining* marketing* experience management (EEM)* feedback management (EFM)* relationship management (ERM)* desk* shopping* analytics* relations* force management system* process engineering* automation* relationship management* E-crm* xRMNotes and references(
27118918
The_Hungry_Earth
 series_link  Series 5 (2010)The Hungry Earth is the eighth episode in the fifth series of British fiction television series Who, which was broadcast on 22 May 2010. It was written by Chibnall, best known for his work on the Doctor Who spin-off series Torchwood.It is the first episode of a two-part story, the second episode being Cold Blood, and features the return of the Silurians, a reptile-like humanoid race last seen in 1984s of the Deep.PlotThe Doctor, Amy and Rory land in the small Welsh village of Cwmtaff in 2020 instead of their intended destination, de Janeiro. They encounter a mining operation led by Doctor Nasreen Chaudhry, who is studying minerals deep in the earth that have not been seen for over 20 million years. Nasreen is assisted by a local, Tony Mack, whose daughter and grandson, Ambrose and Elliot, are examining the disappearance of bodies at the nearby church graveyard. An earth tremor causes the ground to open and sends Tony and Amy falling into it; Tony is rescued but Amy is pulled under by unknown forces. The Doctor surmises that the minerals form a bio-reactive defence system triggered by the drilling operation. The group is soon alerted to the presence of three life forms traveling up the drilling shaft from 21 kilometres below the earth, and they barricade themselves in the church. The Doctor explains Amys disappearance to Rory and assures him he will get her back.The three beings turn out to be humanoids, and in a scuffle, they capture Elliot and strike Tony with a venomous tongue; the Doctor and Rory subdue one while the other two retreat with Elliot back into the earth. The Doctor realises the beings are a new form of Silurians, and that they have relented in their attack since both sides hold a hostage. The captured Silurian calls herself Alaya; she is a member of the warrior caste, awoken by the drill. Alaya believes, as do all Silurians, that the Earth still belongs to them, that the drilling was a form of attack by the humans, and that they will defeat humanity eventually. Tony, suffering from the effects of the venom, says they should dissect Alaya, but the Doctor warns that it would be seen as an act of war. The Doctor decides to travel in the TARDIS down the drilling shaft to talk to the rest of the Silurians and work out a truce; Nasreen accompanies him.Amy awakens to find herself strapped to an examining table, near to where Ambroses husband Mo is also ensnared. Mo explains that the Silurians intended to vivisect her, as they have vivisected him - awake. The Doctor and Nasreen arrive underground in the TARDIS; the Doctor explains about the Silurians and says that he expects to encounter only a few of the creatures. The show ends on a cliffhanger as the Doctor and Nasreen behold an immense Silurian civilisation in the caverns below the earth.Continuity*A large project drilling into the Earths crust was a central part of the Doctor episode Inferno.  In this episode, an effort to drill through the crust releases a toxic slime which causes those exposed to mutate into murderous creatures.  In a parallel universe, the drill reaches through the crust causing trapped gases within the mantle to unleash a fiery inferno across England (and it is implied that the parallel-Earth is destroyed).*The Silurians first appeared in the 1970 episode Who and the Silurians.   Their appearance in The Hungry Earth has been significantly updated, and the third eye they possess in their earlier television appearances is not present.  The last Silurian dies in the 1984 (Doctor) episode of the Deep set in 2084.ProductionMoffat e-mailed Chibnall, asking him to return to writing for Doctor Who. Moffat and executive producer Wenger gave him the brief of Silurians, a drill, and that it was a two-parter.()BroadcastThe episode recorded a TV rating of 6.49 million viewers (6.01 million on BBC1, with an additional 0.48 million viewers on the BBC HD Channel). This episode was ranked the 9th most watched programme on BBC1 for the week ending Sunday 23 May 2010, and the 20th programme across all channels. For the first time in the season, the show was not the top ranked show on BBC1 on the night of broadcast, ranking no.3 behind Over the Rainbow and Casualty. The top rated show was Got Talent with 10.38 million (excluding the ITV HD Channel).(http://www.barb.co.uk/report/weeklyTopProgrammesOverview?_s4)DVD releaseA Region 2 DVD() and Blu-ray() containing this episode together with Amys Choice and Cold Blood was released on 2 August 2010.ReceptionDan Martin, writing for Guardian, said that the episode set up an interesting quandary but, although many elements were introduced, not a lot actually seems to happen. He was also critical of the family members and found he did not care about any of them besides Elliot and Nasreen, and although the scene in which Amy was pulled into the ground was effective and poignant, it left a lack of Pond-life in the rest of the episode. However, he did commend the prosthetics department for their redesigned Silurians.() Gavin Fuller of Daily Telegraph was pleased that it didnt disappoint him. He praised the choice to show the Doctors pacifism and Amys few but memorable nightmarish scenes. However, he was not favourable to Meera Syals performance and considered the Silurians redesign too radical and divorced from their original appearance, most notably the absence of their third eye.()IGNs Matt Wales rated the episode 8 out of 10, assessing it as a slender but satisfying success. He said that the narrative was simplistic without much depth, but that the strong supporting cast and sympathetic characters made it a refreshingly involving tale. He also praised Matt Smiths Doctor, who delivered admirably and carried out the show with the absence of Amy.() Ian Berriman for SFX magazine gave the episode three out of five stars, and was mainly displeased with the redesign of the Silurians, though he was positive toward their venomous tongue lash and costume. He also criticised the clunky scripting and questioned some technical aspects. However, he praised the scene of Amy being dragged into the earth, as well as Alayas hunt for Elliot in the graveyard and the interaction between the Doctor and Elliot.()ReferencesExternal links****Reviews*Rvolte des intra-terrestres (1/2)Faemik
27145967
Mount_Baker_Gold_Rush
The Mount Baker Gold Rush (1897 to mid 1920s) occurred in County, Washington, States, upon the discovery of the Jack Mine.  The Mount Baker area was flooded with prospectors which led to the staking of many claims both patented and unpatented.  The most notable mines staked soon after the Lone Jack are the Red Mountain Mine, Garget Mine (a.k.a. Gold Run Mine), Gold Basin Mine, Silver Tip Mine, and the Evergreen Mine.(Percival R. Jeffcott (1963) Chechaco and Sourdough, Being an Account of the Hectic Pursuit of Gold in the Mt. Baker Mining District of Whatcom County, Washington, 1858-1960)(Fritz E. Wolff,Matthew I. Brookshier,and David K. Norman - Washington State Department of Natural Resources (2008) INACTIVE AND ABANDONED MINE LANDS  Boundary Red Mountain Mine, Mt. Baker Mining District, Whatcom County, Washington)(Fritz E. Wolff,Matthew I. Brookshier,and David K. Norman Washington State Department of Natural Resources (2005) INACTIVE AND ABANDONED MINE LANDS  Lone Jack Mine, Mt. Baker Mining District, Whatcom County, Washington) References  External links * 2008-Boundary Red Mountain Mine by Washington State Department of Natural Resources* 2005-Lone Jack Mine by Washington State Department of Natural Resources
27165009
ITU_School_of_Mines
ITU School of Mines, located in Maslak campus, is one of the faculties in Technical University which has 5 departments.(http://www.mines.itu.edu.tr/Icerik.aspx?sid4998)(http://www.mines.itu.edu.tr/Icerik.aspx?sid5587) ITU School of Mines has many famous professors such as Prof. Dr. Sagiroglu, Prof. Ketin, Prof. Barka, Prof. Sengor and Prof. Ergin(http://www.mines.itu.edu.tr/Icerik.aspx?sid7228) in past and present. Faultys departments are:(http://www.mines.itu.edu.tr/Icerik.aspx?sid6029)* Mining engineering* Geological Engineering* Petroleum and Natural Gas Engineering * Geophysical Engineering* Mineral Processing Engineering History The Faculty of Mines was established in 1953 in Istanbul. At its first years, the faculty composed of mainly Turkish and German professors, and its program was similar to those days famous mining schools such as Aachen, Clausthal and Freiberg. The Faculty of Mines accepted its first students in 1953 with a faculty of 11 scientists.(http://www.mines.itu.edu.tr/Icerik.aspx?sid6041) References  External links * ITU School of Mines* School of Mines anthem* Past deans* ITU Department of Mining engineering* ITU Department of Geological engineering* ITU Department of Petroleum and Natural Gas Engineering* Geophysical Engineering* Mineral Processing EngineeringTeknik niversitesi Maden Fakltesi
27188276
Mining_operations
#REDIRECT Mining
27200353
Wschegrund
 KARTE-BESCHREIBUNG The Wschegrund is a roughly 3.3 kilometre long tributary of the Sperrlutter near the mining town of Andreasberg in district in the German state of Saxony. It rises at 660 metres in the vicinity of  Landesstrae 519 to Oderhaus. It then flows in a south-southwesterly direction before joining the Sperrlutter in Silberhtte.de:Wschegrund
27226392
Serafin_Baroja
 religion  Serafn Baroja (22 September 1840 - 16 July 1912) was a Basque writer and mining engineer who wrote popular Basque poetry and lyrics. He was the father of a trio of illustrious children who left a deep mark on the art and literature of twentieth century Spain. Baroja, painter, engraver and writer; Baroja novelist and essayist who ranks as one of the major writers of Spains of 98; and Baroja writer, ethnologist and co-founder of the Lyceum Womens Club in Madrid.LifeThe son of Po Baroja Zornotza, publisher of the newspaper El Liberal Guipuzcoano during the Liberal, Serafn was born in Sebastin. He studied mine engineering at the Polytechnic School of Engineering in Madrid where he befriended the politician, Madoz. He married Carmen Nessi y Goi (18491935) in 1866 who was of Italian and Basque descent. After completing his studies he went down to the ancient copper mines of Minas de Tinto in Huelva as chief engineer in 1868. Dario, his first son, was born in 1869, followed by Ricardo on January 12, 1870. Disillusioned when he saw that the mines were going to be sold to a group of English investors, (later becoming the British-Australian consortium the Tinto Group), he moved his family to Sebastin and devoted himself to writing novels, operas and operettas.(http://www.diariovasco.com/prensa/2007117/san_sebastian/letra-marcha-pura-vanguardia_2007117.html) Their third son, Po, was born on December 28, 1872.From January to February, 1876 he was a correspondent on the front of the Carlist War for the newspaper, El Tiempo. Three years after the war ended Serafn created the newspaper, El Urumea (18791895), devoted to news, not politics. Run by his brother Ricardo, the first issue came out on May 1, 1879. That year his mining expertise took the family to Madrid where he was assigned to lecture at the Instituto Geogrfico y Estadstico (Institute of Geography and Statistics). Two years later he was chief mining engineer in Pamplona, where, in 1883, his daughter Carmen was born. In Pamplona he founded Bai, Juana, Bai, a bilingual weekly periodical and the first in Basque/Castilian which lasted only six issues. The next year he wrote the libretto for the first Basque opera, Pudente, a story set in the mines of Rio Tinto at the time of Trajan. Composed by Jos Antonio Santesteban, it premiered in Sebastin in 1884. He also wrote the lyrics for the March of San Sebastin composed by Raimundo Sarriegui which is performed in the Tamborrada festival every January 20, the Feast of Sebastin.In 1886, when he went to the mines in Biscay he sent his family to stay with his sister-in-law, Juana Nessi and her husband Matas Lacasa, who owned a caf and bakery in Madrid named Capellanes which today is a popular caf and catering service.http://www.sightseeing-madrid.com/quality-fast-food-viena-capellanes.php In 1893 he took his family with him to the mines at Burjassot near Valencia, returning the next year to Madrid to help Juana Nessi, whose husband had just died. Serafn attempted to resurrect his Basque/Castilian periodical, Bai, Juana, Bai, by selling copies at the bakery. He also collaborated on the magazine El Eco de San Sebastin (The Echo of San Sebastin) and the republican newspaper La Voz de Guipzcoa which in 1895 published the serial From Chamber to Madrid, 100 meters in 25 days. In 1986 his frontline reporting for El Tiempo was published as Crnica de la guerra Carlista. Enero y Febrero de 1876 (Chronicle of the Carlist War: January and February 1876) with a prologue by his grandson, Caro Baroja.His wife, Carmen, always tried to build up a seriousness of purpose in her husband and in contrast he was known as a great joker with an enthusiasm for people and life. His easygoing attitude and love for the arts and sciences had an influence on his childrens careers; Ricardo left his career as an archivist for the bohemian life of the artist; and Po the practice of medicine to become a novelist. Carmen, as a woman, had to rebel against the traditions that defined her gender to become a writer, ethnologist and co-founder of the first feminist group in Spain.(http://www.libertaddigital.com/ilustracion_liberal/articulo.php/32) In 1875 he had coined the term alai (merry festival) for the game of pelota.(Robert Lawrence Trask, The History of Basque, (1997), p.328.)(http://www.buber.net/Basque/Euskara/Larry/WebSite/basque.words.html) He died on July 12, 1912 in Bera and is buried with his wife, Carmen.(http://www.3digitala.com/es/ficha.php?id10234) His grandfather, Rafael Martinez Baroja (b.1770), was the printer of the newspaper, La Papeleta de Oyarzun (The Ballot of Oiartzun) during the War against I. The Parque Serafn Baroja in Sebastin is named after him.NotesExternal links* Zubitegia Literaturaren* Auamendi Eusko Entziklopedia* Viena Capellanes*Baroja
27255842
Bartlett_Cormack
 birthname  Edward Bartlett CormackEdward Bartlett Cormack (March 19, 1898 - September 26, 1942) was an American actor, playwright, screenwriter, and producer best known for his 1927 Broadway play The Racket, and for working with Hughes and B. DeMille on several films.Early lifeCormack was the son of Scottish-born Edward K. Cormack and Alice E. Cormack. By 1900 his family had moved from Indiana to Chicago, Illinois where his father worked in sales.(Bartlett Cormack, http://www.imdb.com/name/nm0179993/bio, website of The Internet Movie Database, Retrieved 10 May 2010) He graduated from University High School, and was accepted at the of Chicago. While a Sophomore, Cormack wrote the play Anybodys Girl, considered to be one of the best ever submitted for the Blackfriars (the student dramatic organization).(The University of Chicago Magazine, volume 14, November, 1921, page 215) Cormack became a member of Maurice Brownes Little Theatre Company in Chicago, but his duties as a general handyman were so demanding he was dismissed from the University as a result of poor class attendance. To gain experience as a writer, he got a job at The Chicago Evening Journal and stayed there a year, covering hangings, race riots, street car strikes and other diversions characteristic of Mayor Thompsons turbulent town.(Enter a New Playwright, The New York Times, December 4, 1927) He left the Chicago Evening Journal for The American, working there five years before applying for reinstatement at the University of Chicago. He wrote two more college plays and became engaged, graduating two years later with honors and as a Phi Beta Kappa. He returned to The American, where he wrote features and dramatic criticism.  In 1923, he married Adelaide Maurine Bledsoe (19011999), the daughter of T. Bledsoe, who was a president and board chairman of the Topeka, and Santa Fe Railroad.(Los Angeles Times, February 2, 1999, Obituary of Adelaide Bledsoe Cormack Kingman,http://articles.latimes.com/1999/feb/02/news/mn-4201/2, website of Los Angeles Times, Retrieved 10 May 2010) They would have a son, Thomas Bledsoe Cormack,(U.C.L.A. Graduate Engaged to Lieut. Thomas B. Cormack, The New York Times, June 20, 1950) and a daughter, Adelaide Kilbee Cormack.(Miss Cormack To Be Married On Coast Jan. 31, The New York Times, November 25, 1958) Soon after the wedding, he accepted a position as a press agent for a theater production and the couple moved to New York City.(Stage careerAs a playwright, Cormacks most influential work was his 1927 Broadway play The Racket, which featured G. Robinson in his first gangster role.( The Racket was an expos of political corruption in the 1920s, and was considered one of the models for the Hollywood gangster cycle of the late 1920s and early 1930s.(Birchard, Robert S. (2004), Cecil B. DeMilles Hollywood, Lexington, Kentucky: The University Press of Kentucky, p. 262-263, ISBN 0-8131-2324-0) The events take place over a period of about 18 hours in a police station on the outskirts of Chicago, and features wisecracking crime reporters who dash to the telephone and holler, Get me the desk! Writing in Miami News on December 24, 1927, O. O. McIntyre said Bartlett Cormack was the only playwright who has made the reporter real on the stage. (Playwright Cormack Has at Last Made Reporter Real on Stage,http://news.google.com/newspapers?nid2206&dat19271225&idpAcuAAAAIBAJ&sjidMtgFAAAAIBAJ&pg5081,1209228, website of Google, Retrieved 10 May 2010)  The play was considered so inflammatory that it was denied a presentation in Chicago, allegedly at the orders of Capone; the ban remained in effect for nearly two decades.(Bartlett Cormack,http://www.answers.com/topic/bartlett-cormack, website of Answers.com, Retrieved 10 May 2010) Cormack shared writing credit for the play Tampico with Hergesheimer, who wrote the novel of the same name in 1926. The play was produced on Broadway in 1928 with Chase and Gavin Gordon in the cast. MGM acquired the screen rights to the play in 1930.(Theater Gossip, The Independent, St. Petersburg, Florida, Friday, May 2, 1930, pg. 4-A)Cormack later wrote Hey Diddle Diddle, a comedy whose setting was a duplex apartment in Hollywood. The play premiered in Princeton, New Jersey on January 21, 1937 with Ball as Julie Tucker, one of three roommates coping with neurotic directors, confused executives, and grasping stars who interfere with the girls ability to get ahead. The play received good reviews, but there were problems, chiefly with its star, Tearle, who was in poor health.  Cormack wanted to replace him, but the producer, Nichols, said the fault lay with the character and insisted that the part needed to be reshaped and rewritten. The two were unable to agree on a solution. The play was scheduled to open on Broadway at the Theatre, but closed after one week in Washington, D.C. when Tearle suddenly became gravely ill.(Brady, Kathleen (2001), Lucille: the Life of Lucille Ball, New York, New York: Watson-Guptill Publications, p. 73-74, ISBN 0-8230-8913-4)Film careerMoving to Hills in 1928,( he worked with Hughes on the silent film version of The Racket, one of the first films nominated for the Academy Award for Best Picture (then called Best Picture, Production) in 1929.(The Racket (1928 film),http://www.tcm.com/thismonth/article.jsp?cid85281&mainArticleId155255, website of Turner Classic Movies, Retrieved 10 May 2010)He shared screenwriting credit with Beach for the 1930 film version of The Spoilers. Beach based his 1906 novel on the true story of corrupt government officials stealing gold mines from prospectors, which Beach had witnessed while he was prospecting in Alaska.(The Spoilers,http://www.miningswindles.com/html/the_spoilers.html, website of Mining Swindles, Retrieved 10 May 2010) The novel was adapted to the screen on five occasions; 1914, 1923, 1930, 1942, and 1955.Although Hecht was the author of the Broadway play Front Page, and was himself a screenwriter, Howard Hughes chose Cormack and Lederer to write the script for the 1931 film The Front Page. At the Academy Awards, the film was nominated for Best Picture, Best Director, and Best Actor.In 1933, he wrote the script for Cecil B. DeMilles  This Day and Age, a film in which a group of High School students take the law into their own hands. In his book Cecil B. DeMilles Hollywood, author Robert S. Birchard relates how DeMille wasnt sure Cormacks script had a sense of current slang, so he asked high school student Hahn to read the script and comment (at the time, Hahn was senior class president at Los Angeles High School). Today we often laugh at the Gee, thats swell dialogue of early 1930s films but, according to Hahn at least, this was the way he and his fellow students talked. He wrote DeMille that the majority of the dialogue in Cormacks script was really not typical of high school students. It Should be interspersed with a few exclamations like, heck  gosh  gee, etc Hahn also suggested that in Steves speech about the murdered tailor the writer add: Gosh, he was swell to us fellows. Despite seeking Hahns advice, however, DeMille and Cormack did not take up his suggestions.(In 1935, he collaborated with screenwriter Lang and story author Krasna on the anti-lynching film Fury, for which Krasna received an Academy Award nomination for Best Writing, Original Story.(Fury (1935 film),http://www.tcm.com/tcmdb/title.jsp?stid1226&categoryAwards, website of Turner Classic Movies, Retrieved 10 May 2010)Briefly relocating to England in 1938, Cormack helped write the screenplays for of London, and the Laughton film Vessel of Wrath (released in the United States as The Beachcomber). Cormack did some work on the script for the 1941 DeMille film Northwest Mounted Police, but did not receive credit.(Birchard, Robert S. (2004), Cecil B. DeMilles Hollywood, Lexington, Kentucky: The University Press of Kentucky, p. 312, ISBN 0-8131-2324-0) One of Cormacks final screenwriting assignments was 1941s Partners, which starred G. Robinson. Robinson acted in the original Broadway staging of The Racket, playing the part of an unidentified man.(The 1951 remake of The Racket was directed by John Cromwell. Cromwell was the star in the original Broadway staging of The Racket.(The Racket (1951 film), http://www.imdb.com/title/tt0043955/, website of The Internet Movie Database, Retrieved 10 May 2010)WorksStage plays*1922 Anybodys Girl*1927 The Racket*1928 Tampico*1930 The Painted Veil*1936 Hey Diddle DiddleScreenplays*1928 The Racket*1929 Trap*1929 The Greene Murder Case*1929 Gentlemen of the Press*1930 The Spoilers*1930 The Laughing Lady*1928 The Benson Murder Case*1931 The Front Page*1931 Kick In*1932 Women*1932 Phantom of Crestwood*1932 Is My Face Red?*1933 This Day and Age*1934 Trumpet Blows*1934 Frightened People*1934 Cleopatra*1935 Orchids to You*1935 Fury*1935 Doubting Thomas*1938 of London*1938 Vessel of Wrath*1941 Partners*1951 The Racket (1951, from 1928 screenplay)Film actor*1938 of London as StrangFilm producer*1933 The Past of Mary Holmes References External links*Bartlett Cormack at IMDB*Bartlett Cormack at Internet Broadway Database
27273477
Roadside_Heritage
Roadside Heritage is a program designed to document and publicize the history, culture, and scientific background of the Eastern Sierra Nevada and the Valley in the USA. It uses schoolchildren to interview scientists, Native Americans, and others and to record the interviews. These result in audio stories which can be downloaded from the website for use by travelers and others interested in the area.Roadside Heritage is based in California. It is a program of ESICE, the Eastern Sierra Institute for Collaborative education, a nonprofit organization incorporated in 1997. It is designed to connect rural youth with media professionals to create interpretive programs for byway travelers, enriching the visitors experience with a greater appreciation of the landscape and history along Route 395 in California.Through after-school programs, middle school students interview a range of experts from knowledgeable citizens to scientific researchers, gathering material with the support of distant universities. Selections of the interviews are used to create traveling companion programs that explain the features of the landscape in the context of its human and natural history.HistoryRoadside Heritage was launched by ESICE in 2004 with support from the Local Transportation Commissions of Inyo and Mono counties. The program and partnership broadened in 2005 with the inclusion of the of California, Berkeleys Hall of Science and the of Nevada, Renos Academy for the Environment.(Roadside Heritage Project explores eastern Sierra Nevada U.S. 395 corridor,  University of Nevada Reno, University News, Fall 2009, page 27) This collaboration resulted in a $2.6 million grant from the Science Foundation(Inyo Register, June 2, 2007) for a three-year initiative to investigate the legacy of scientific exploration and discovery in the region, and to explore adaptation to the environmental extremes.MissionTo help both regional travelers and rural communities discover the cultural and scientific heritage of the Eastern Sierra, Roadside Heritage provides local youth the means and opportunity to act as reporters and interpreters, recording audio interviews with area experts, scholars and scientists; providing travelers with unique access to enriching information about the natural and cultural history of the region they are traveling through and the contributions the region continues to make to our national legacy in science, technology, engineering and math (STEM).Along the way, all Roadside Heritage participants discover, through the power of storytelling, the richness of culture and history in the communities of the Eastern Sierra. The recordings, crafted by media professionals, are used to create audio programs on CD and on the Internet that can be enjoyed by motorists who travel the 220 mile Eastern Sierra Scenic Byway along US 395 at the base of the eastern escarpment of Californias Sierra Nevada Mountains.About the storiesMost travelers, focused on reaching their destination, hurry through scenic and dramatic Eastern Sierra unaware of the breadth of history hidden in the landscape where some of the most colorful stories in the tales of the American Western took place. Engaging authentic stories from one of the most beautiful areas of the western United States, Californias Eastern Sierra, are told by those who live here and those that have been here to study its unique environment. Tales of Paiute trading routes, geologic forces, adaptations of plants and animals, heroic pioneer settlers, and railroad barons, are available for download the Roadside Heritage website.The first CD, Paiute, Prospectors & Pioneers,(Mammoth Times, August 27, 2007) was produced in 2006 and received the 2008 Silver Metal Award for interpretive audio programming from the National Association for Interpretation.(Register Staff: Inyo Register, Pg 3  Heritage Project Earns Place in Spotlight. February 28, 2009)  The second CD released in 2009 was Traditions, Travelers & Tales of Mono County.  The third CD, Exploring Extreme Environments in the Eastern Sierra, was released in spring of 2010. These CDs are available free of charge at various visitor locations and can be downloaded from the Roadside Heritage website. Shorter 7-minute episodes on specific topics of geology and history can be seen on television station websites(KOLO-TV) and at the Roadside Heritage site. Titles include Obsidian, Volcanology, Alpine Flora, Weather and Climate, Mountain Building, Mineralogy, Alpine Fauna, Desert Terminal Lakes, Mining and Minerals, Extreme Life Forms, and Mono Lake.RecognitionThe program has been recognized by television and newspaper publications in California and Nevada(Boynton, B (2009). Roadside Heritage, KOLOTV)(Staff (2009). Whats New In The West, VIA magazine AAA Travelers Companion)(Staff (2008) News from every neighborhood, pg C.2, Reno Gazette Journal) for its innovative presentations of the local history and culture along the 220 mile US 395 scenic byway.(U.S. 395 pit stops in Californias eastern Sierra Nevada, Los Angeles Times, September 7, 2007)AcknowledgmentsRoadside Heritage  is a project made possible by historians, scientists, interpreters, foundations, advisory committees, students, audio and graphic experts, and others with integrity, humor, and respect for everyone involved.Funders*The H.N. and Frances C. Berger Foundation*The National Science Foundation*Inyo County Local Transportation Commission / Inyo County Public Works Dept.*Mono County Local Transportation Commission / Mono Community Dev. Dept*California Department of TransportationSponsors/Partners*Inyo National Forest*Los Angeles Department of Water and Power*Audio Landscapes*Eastern California MuseumReferencesExternal links* Yubanet article
27296232
Geology_of_Vietnam
The territory of Vietnam is divided into five structural blocks : Northeast (NE), Northwest (NW), Truongson, Kontum and Nambo. The NE block is a part of the South China plate, in which strata and igneous rocks have been found dating from the Early Paleozoic to the Quaternary. The NW and Truongson blocks are regarded as NW-SE trending Paleozoic folded systems filled with thick (>12000 m) Paleozoic formations. Precambrian strata are widespread in the River fault zone and Fansipan range in the NW block, and in the Kontum block. Archean rocks are found only in the Kontum block, which is regarded as a stable massif without Paleozoic sedimentary rocks. The Nambo block is covered with a very thick (>6000 m) sequence of Cenozoic formations deposited in a continental rift. During the Mesozoic many such graben structures were formed and become basins for sedimentation. Igneous activity in Vietnam is divided into five episodes from the Archean to Quaternary. The most important impediments to the description and interpretation of geology in Vietnam are lack of reliable radiometric and structural data, and scarcity of good outcrops.(http://ci.nii.ac.jp/naid/110000413364)MiningVietnams mineral resources, apart from offshore oil and gas, include phosphate, coal, bauxite, base and precious metals, and a variety of industrial minerals. More than 5,000 mineral occurrences have been identified. Five broadly-defined metallogenic epochs have been recognised and, in general, the younger the setting the more abundant the deposits. Only a few are hosted by Precambrian rocks, principally iron, gold and graphite. The early to mid-Palaeozoic contains small deposits of iron ore, lead-zinc and large deposits of potash. Larger deposits of iron ore, ilmenite, gold, nickel-copper and bauxite were formed during the early Carboniferous/late Triassic. (http://www.mbendi.com/indy/ming/as/vn/p0005.htm)Geothermal EnergyIn the territory of Vietnam, more than 300 natural geothermal sources have been recorded and six geothermal regions have been defined: Northwest, Northeast, Bac Bo plan, North central part, South central part, and Southern plain. Vietnam has a remarkable potential for geothermal resources. Especially, Northwestern Vietnam is the most prospective region for geothermal exploration and development. (http://www.geni.org/globalenergy/library/renewable-energy-resources/world/asia/geo-asia/geo-vietnam.shtml) Dr. Doan Van Tuyen from the Institute of Geological Sciences of the Vietnamese Academy of Science and Technology commented, Compared with the rest of the world, Vietnam has medium potential for geothermal energy development. However, geothermal energy resources are available not just in one place, but throughout the country. Therefore, most localities can make use of this type of energy. (http://www.vnnnews.net/geothermal-energy-development-untapped-potential)Volcanic ActivityVietnam has 6 volcanoes, Dong Nai, Re Group, Dong Nai, Prong, Veteran and des Cendres who had the most recent eruption in 1923. (http://www.volcano.si.edu/world/region.cfm?rnum0705)Geological ParksThe Dong Van Highlands, encompassing total area of more than 574 square kilometers in Giang Provinces Ba, Minh, Van and Vac districts, could eventually be recognized as a UNESCO Global Geological Park.UNESCO Vietnam has sent an application based on a recent study which concluded that limestone can be found in 11 layers on 80 percent of the surface of the plateau. Two of the layers are sediment dating from 400 to 600 million years ago.(http://news.activetravelvietnam.com/2009/12/nature-nurture-in-ha-giang-vietnam.html) It will be only the second geological park in Asia after Langkawi Geological Park in Malaysia and the 54th in the world.(http://www.lookatvietnam.com/2009/09/stone-plateau-may-be-declared-world-geological-park.html)See also* Agrogeology* geologic mapping* modeling* of geology terms* Union of Geological Sciences (IUGS)* of fossil sites (with link directory)* of geology topics* of important publications in geology* of minerals* of rock textures* of rock types* of soil topics* Paleorrota* of geologyReferences
27320913
Waterflow,_New_Mexico
Waterflow is an unincorporated community in San Juan County, Mexico, States on the north side of the San Juan River.  It is immediately west of Fruitland and north across the river from the Indian Reservation.  It is east of Shiprock.(compare maps at http://www.bing.com/maps/default.aspx?qwaterflow%2c+nm&mkten-US&FORMBYFD and http://maps.google.com/maps?qwaterflow,+nm&rlscom.microsoft:en-us&oeUTF-8&um1&ieUTF-8&hq&hnearwaterflow&glus&eiJmjoS_jSPIHWNvzauOME&saX&oigeocode_result&ctimage&resnum1&ved0CBcQ8gEwAA to see the location of Waterflow.)GeographyWaterflow is located at .(googlemaps)Waterflow is a high desert valley with the highest point being a geological hogback called Hogback.  The San Juan River and Arroyo are important water resources in the area.Historythumb|right|Advertising for Original Sweetmeat Inc. The billboard includes the apparent modern Navajo name for the place.The area now known as Waterflow is traditional Navajo territory.  This place was called Chdii ich (Red Devil) in reference to Walter Stallings who operated a trading post in the area;(Linford, Laurance D. Navajo places: history, legend, landscape. University of Utah Press. Salt Lake City, UT: 2000. p278.) nowadays, Tsyaa Akah (beneath-rock oil) seems to be another designation in reference to the nearby oil fields, as can be seen on billboards in the area (pictured).The early Anglo settlers in this area were predominantly Mormon, who called the area Valley.  Since 1982, the Saints have serviced their people in this area through the Kirtland Stake which covers from Kirtland west to New Mexico and beyond.(Kirtland New Mexico Stake homepage)DemographicsIn 2000, Waterflow reported a total population of 1,606 people.  798 were male, and 808 were female.  295 identified themselves as White, 1 identified themselves as Black, 1 identified themselves as Asian, 59 were Hispanic, and 1,251 were Navajo.  620 speak a language other than English at home.()  With 551 housing units and a land area land area of 219.58 sq. miles, there are approximately 7.31 people per sq. mile in Waterflow.()Industrythumb|right|PNM San Juan Generating StationWaterflow lies between two coal fired power plants and southwest of a large coal mine.()()  The area also has many oil wells.()While convenient for employment, this proximity has caused several large environmental issues.()()()  Because of this, air quality in Waterflow is 1 on a scale to 100 (higher is better). This is based on ozone alert days and number of pollutants in the air.()  Groundwater near the San Juan coal mine in Waterflow is extremely polluted according to both the Club and Mexico Mining and Minerals Division.()thumb|right|A billboard in Waterflow.The Sierra Club alleges that the San Juan Coal Company has improperly dumped more than 40 million tons of  coal ash and sludge into unlined pits, resulting in the contamination of waterways and wells near the mine.The group says that the waste, and the contaminated water, pose a danger to livestock, wildlife and families in the area, and in early December, the Sierra Club announced that it intends to sue the owners of the San Juan Coal Company.The company denies responsibility for the contamination.()Important area businesses*Billiton*French Navajo Rugs*W Pawn*Country Transportation CO*Shopping Center*Trading Co*Sweetmeat Inc., founded 1974()*San Juan Generating Station*Juan Coal CO Inc*Marketing Corporation NO 270*States Post Office, zip code 87421()*Hair Care*Trading Post*Farms*Corners Generating StationEducationConsolidated Schools serves Waterflow as well as other communities in western San Juan County.Notable people from Waterflow*Howell (NASA)* G. Hunt (controversial local hero)*G. Hunt II (leading local businessman, patron of the arts, environmental warrior)()(*G. Hunt III (prominent local businessman)*G. Hunt IV (heir apparent)*Newman (local advocate)()*Wheeler (land owner, farmer)*Wheeler (land owner)*Wright (local activist)()NotesAkah (Chdii ich)(Nuevo Mxico)
27340940
Kennet,_Clackmannanshire
Kennet is a small former coal mining village in Clackmannanshire, Scotland. It is located  south-east of Clackmannan, by the Kincardine railway line. The village is a conservation area, designated by Clackmannanshire Council.()Kennet House, the seat of the Bruces of Kennet, was located to the west of the village (). The house was built or rebuilt in the 1790s for the judge Bruce, Lord Kennet. His descendant, the politician and banker Alexander Bruce, established a claim to the forfeited title of Balfour of Burleigh in 1868. The house was demolished in 1967.()Between 1905 and 1961 coal was mined at the Brucefield Colliery, located just to the north of Kennet (). In 1948, 75,000 tons of coal were extracted. A brickworks on the site continued to operate into the 1960s.()References 
27360918
Vinicio_Molina
Vinnie Molina is a union official with the Construction, Forestry, Mining and Energy Union, WA branch.CareerMr Molina arrived to Australia in 1995 from his natal Guatemala, Central America.  A carpenter by trade, he worked as a unionist and a activist in the 80s and 90s. He was elected as the Communist Party of Australia president at a meeting of the CPA Central Committee in February 2009. Mr Molina has been working in solidarity with Latin America and he currently holds the position of president of the Australia-Cuba Friendship Society, ACFS WA branch.External links*For more information visit: http://www.cpa.org.au/guardian/2009/1400/communist-party-of-australia.htmlMolina
27361444
Timor,_Victoria
 location4 VictoriaTimor is a locality in central Victoria, Australia. The locality is in the of Central Goldfields,  north of Maryborough and  north west of the state capital, Melbourne.Now a town, Timor was settled in the gold rush by prospectors, including Chinese miners.(http://www.visitmaryborough.com.au/Maryborough.htm) The town was first known as Cox Town after the butcher who has earlier constructed a bridge across Bet Bet Creek and built the nearby Bridge Inn, until it was surveyed under the name Timor.(http://www.filmcentralvictoria.com.au/region/index.php?townbowenvale-/-timor) By 1857, 30,000 miners were resident in the surrounding area and the main street was about a mile (1.6 km) long - including houses, hotels and stores.(Timor prospered until the collapse of the local mining industry during World War 1.( The store, established in 1852, is one of the oldest shops in the state and a school was established in 1863.( The school still operates but the store ceased trading in 1997, after 145 years of continuous operation. The last pub closed in 1963.(References
27372819
History_of_the_PolishLithuanian_Commonwealth_(16481764)
History of the PolishLithuanian Commonwealth (16481764) covers a period in the history of Poland and Lithuania, from the time their joint state became the playground of wars and invasions fought on a great scale in the middle of the 17th century, to the beginning of the rule of August Poniatowski, the last king of the Commonwealth.( From the mid 17th century, the nobles democracy, subjected to devastating wars, falling into internal disorder and then anarchy, gradually declined, making the once powerful Commonwealth vulnerable to foreign intervention. In 1648 the Cossack Uprising engulfed the south and east, and was soon followed by a Swedish invasion, which raged through core Polish lands. Warfare with the Cossacks and Russia left Ukraine divided, with the eastern part, lost by the Commonwealth, becoming the Tsardoms dependency. III Sobieski, fighting protracted wars with the Ottoman Empire, revived the Commonwealths military might once more, in process helping decisively in 1683 to deliver Vienna from a Turkish onslaught.( From there it all went downhill. The Commonwealth, subjected to almost constant warfare until 1720, suffered devastating population losses and massive damage to its economy and social structure. The government became ineffective because of large scale internal conflicts (e.g. Rokosz against John II Casimir and rebellious confederations), corrupted legislative processes and manipulation by foreign interests. The nobility class fell under control of a handful of powerful families with established territorial domains, the urban population and infrastructure fell into ruin, together with most peasant farms.(  The reigns of two kings of the Saxon Wettin dynasty, Augustus II and Augustus III, brought the Commonwealth further disintegration. The Northern War, a period seen by the contemporaries as a passing eclipse, may have been the fatal blow destined to bring down the Noble Republic. The of Prussia became a strong regional power and took Silesia from the Monarchy. The Commonwealth-Saxony union however gave rise to the emergence of the reform movement in the Commonwealth, and the beginnings of the Polish Enlightenment culture.( Economic and social decline  War destruction, economic breakdown, social disintegration Kazimierz.PNG|right|thumb|225 px|John Casimir, Wadysaw IVs half brother, was the third and last of the Vasa kingsThe economic breakdown in the Commonwealth in the second half of the 17th century has often been seen as a result of the destruction of the country caused by wars. There were also other depressing factors present that affected at that time large portions of Europe, to which the manorial, serfdom-based economy of the Commonwealth had tried to adjust. The particular solutions adopted resulted in time in deterioration of the effectiveness of agricultural practices, lower productivity and pauperization of the rural population. But the degree to which the economic regression in the Commonwealth had progressed had no parallels in the economies of the neighboring countries, some of which practiced the same type of rural economy. While the war destruction that took place during the events of 16551660 was particularly devastating, the Commonwealth was subjected to constant warfare from 1648 to 1720.(Unlike the previously fought wars, which had affected mostly the peripheries of the huge state, from the mid-17th century onward central Poland was being ravaged as well. The two Wars turned out particularly destructive. Several massive foreign armies traversed the Commonwealth in the course of the Northern War. The protracted battlefield role and especially stationing of troops, combined with the policy of exacting contributions and pillaging populated areas during the Northern War, were even more burdensome for the country not recovered from the damage incurred two generations earlier. The Polish state was also forced to pay the occupying armies extremely high contributions. Internal warfare and looting by unpaid Commonwealth troops added to the damage.(File:Koronacja Jana Kazimierza.JPG|thumb|left|225 px|The crowning of II Casimir Vasa The destruction and depletion of resources applied to all segments of the society, affecting rural villages, cities and towns, of which many had practically lost their urban character, industry and manufacturing, and the state treasury. The war losses and epidemic disease outbreaks (a great wave during 1659-1663)(Pieniarczyk, Historia Polski w piguce (History of Poland in a Pill), p. 157. Agencja Benkowski, Biaystok 1998, ISBN 83-907633-9-7.) had reduced the total population by 1/3, down to 67 million. As the peasants, the townspeople and ordinary szlachta each lost their economic base, the magnate class had become the only social group capable of significant economic and political activity, which led to their more total domination of what was left of the Commonwealth politics.(The war end economic pressures intensified the already present fragmentation processes and class conflicts of interests among the social classes and within each of them. Xenophobia and intolerance had become prevalent, different social and territorial groupings stressed their separate statuses and traditions. The nation building efforts of Renaissance era reformers had become undone.( Further stratification among nobility File:Micha Kazimierz Pac.PNG|thumb|right|175px|Hetman Kazimierz Pac of LithuaniaSzlachtas folwark, the predominant in the 16th century agricultural production organization type, gave way by the middle of the 17th century to the magnate-owned latifundium, a huge network of landed estates. Latifundia were present in any part of the PolishLithuanian federation, but developed most extensively in the eastern reaches of the Crown, expanded in that direction before the of Lublin. War destruction affected the diversified magnate possessions to a lesser degree than single estates of middle szlachta, which increasingly turned szlachta into dependent clients of their elder brothers. Parts of the latifundia were leased or run by hired szlachta or urban, often Jewish, hierarchy of administrators, with each layer milking the serf laborers. The various aspects of commercial life in the territories, including agriculture, trade, mining, and manufacturing, had previously been controlled by szlachta in a legally protected way. Now, in the more decentralized and anarchistic feudal state, the magnate class was in a position to establish in its state-like domains absolute rule, based not on laws but on practical advantages they enjoyed. The regional authority and power that the magnates attained was exerted by a variety of means, including private military forces.(Image:Stanislaw Antoni Szczuka (1652 1654-1710).jpg|thumb|left|175 px|Antoni Szczuka, a member of szlachta, was a political publicistThe increased dominance of the magnates negatively affected the class integrity of the so far crucially important middle szlachta stratum. The fragmentation of szlachta deepened the decentralizing tendencies in the large state. The magnates established networks of szlachta supporters and national loyalty was being replaced with loyalty based on regional ties, as for the nobility the weak state institutions provided neither attractive career opportunities, nor sufficient protection.(Magnate control over the lesser szlachta, a group whose members possessed little or no property and were poorly educated, has long been recognized. The lesser szlachta was useful, as it provided crowds of armed men able to influence various public events, such as sejmiks or elections, according to directions given. Of fundamentally greater importance was the role of the middle nobility, propertied and better qualified people, able to pursue careers within magnate courts, or assume public offices obtained with the help of their magnate benefactors. The noblemen in question experienced also through the magnates they served material gains, such as profitable land leases, and legal protection in times of common and often reckless and disruptive litigation.(The magnates themselves or magnate clans formed groupings, or factions, with common regional or other interests. In the 17th century the factions were usually confined to a region, such as the Lithuanian cliques of the Pac or Sapieha families. In the 18th century the Czartoryskis and the Potockis established Commonwealth-wide magnate factions of great importance.(File:Micha Kazimierz Radziwi Rybeko.JPG|thumb|right|185 px|Micha Kazimierz Radziwi represented the great Lithuanian Radziwi magnate familyThe subordination to magnate interests took place not without some resistance, but the various szlachta movements lacked coordination and in the first half of the 18th century the middle nobility ceased being an independent force in national politics.(The lack of legal distinction among various ranks of the nobility gave many noblemen a false sense of equality and opportunity. The majority of the nobility of the Lithuanian, Rus, or German origin, had become Polonized and Catholic. Some minority Protestant nobility remained active in Prussia and Poland. After the triumph of the Counter-Reformation, the Jesuits and other Catholic educators lost incentives to provide competitive high quality education. The backward mentality and close-mindedness of the szlachta masses has become proverbial, and as the nation experienced its greatest decline, the typically uniform szlachta indulged in the sarmatism ideology of a chosen nation and contempt for everything foreign. Nonconformity was not tolerated, corruption was at its highest, while public morale at the lowest.( Among the more worldly of the magnates, influenced by foreign elements in the Commonwealths royal courts and West European currents, admiration of foreign (often French and German) ways and fashions was becoming increasingly common. The magnates built splendid palaces of brick and stone in the main cities and on their rural estates; the wooden manors and feasting social life style of the szlachta attempted to imitate the surroundings and lives of the rich, famous and powerful.( Agricultural regression and peasantry Maria Gonzaga van Egmont.jpg|thumb|left|225 px|Ludwika Maria (Marie Louise) Gonzaga was the wife of Wadysaw IV and then of John Casimir, whom she strongly influenced The deep agricultural crisis lasted from the 1650s through the 1720s. Under the plight of constant warfare and adverse economic conditions the peasants were being increasingly burdened with excessive obligations. Their communities suffered population losses and many villages disappeared altogether. The serf labor force was displaced and their plots taken over under estate consolidation schemes, or manorial duties were replaced by feudal rent arrangements by landlords seeking profitability. Those and many other measures amounting to extreme exploitation and imposition of hardship had not resulted in increased production, but rather made the crisis more acute by ruining the peasant farming operation. Not all the regions suffered equally, as northern Polands (Gdask Pomerania and Poland) agriculture maintained moderate profitability, while southern Poland (Poland) experienced the greatest rural decline, and correspondingly the greatest decrease in the percentage of farms under peasant family hereditary holding.(After the Uprising and the Swedish Deluge, approx. 35% of villages in Prussia and 60% in Podolia were destroyed completely.(Piotr Pieniarczyk, Historia Polski w piguce (History of Poland in a Pill), p. 156-157)The tendency was for each village, or a small cluster of villages, possibly corresponding to a parish, to function as a self-contained organism, arbitrarily ruled by the lords administrator, with some participation from local self-government, whose continuous existence depended on its degree of cooperativeness. The parish schools taught mostly the catechism with added social indoctrination. The one allowed peasant activity, sometimes even required because of mandatory purchases of such staples as beer form the lords brewery, was the participation in village tavern life. The taverns provided some entertainment, functioned as outlets for significant folk artistic creativity, and places of occasional contacts with traveling representatives of the largely unknown to the peasants, outside world.( File:Bydgoszcz 1657 sztych E Dalhberga.jpg|thumb|right|375px|Bydgoszcz (Bromberg) in 1657 by DahlberghAverage living conditions in the increasingly impoverished rural villages were very bad and the exploited peasants resorted to various forms of resistance, most often running away from particularly abusive landlords. Some villages or areas engaged in collectively refusing to perform the prescribed duties, or, rarely in ethnically Polish lands, armed rebellions. The Uprising took place in 1651, there were rebellions in the Podhale region in 1670 and in other regions in 17351738. In Silesia the ethnically Polish peasantry rebelled during 17221729 and in 1750 around Pszczyna, when the Prussian army was brought to bear. Highway robbery band activity was another form of peasant resistance; some of its leaders, especially from mountainous regions, have become immortalized in folk tales.( On a grand scale peasant armed resistance became a crucial factor in the eastern Ruthenian lands of the Commonwealth, where it combined with Cossack unrest.( Disintegration of towns and urban classes File:POL Dahlbergh Pinczow.jpg|thumb|left|400 px|Piczw, a center of Reformation activities, was taken over by the Catholic establishment long before this 1657 image was createdThe fall of the cities and towns was the most pronounced aspect of the economic breakdown of the Commonwealth. The nascent manifestations of capitalist practices of the Renaissance era were weakened or wiped out, which irreversibly retarded the short- and long-term aspects of economic development in absolute terms or in comparison with Polands neighbors, or even with Silesia and parts of Pomerania, areas lost by the Crown.(The peasants, who had traditionally constituted a vital part of the town merchants clientele, now impoverished and forced by their feudal masters to limit their purchases to what was produced or sold within their home estate, largely stopped plying their role in the internal market. The market became confounded further by the monetary crisis, warfare destruction and the fact that some of the most major Polands and Lithuanias municipal centers were lost to the neighboring states, either permanently or at times of reversals of military fortunes.(File:Isaac Synagogue 02.jpg|thumb|right|300 px|Synagogue in Kazimierz district of Krakw The slow rebuilding after 1720 took place unevenly, with some of the largest cities, Warsaw and Danzig (Gdask) among them, faring the best, while other like Krakw, reduced to 10 thousand inhabitants, remaining depressed. Most smaller towns suffered badly, except for those in western Poland, where the remarkable ascent of Wschowa took place.(The changes altered the ethnic character of the burgher classes. The peasant influx into towns slowed to a trickle, while the proportion of Jewish inhabitants increased considerably. Of the 750,000 Jews living in the Commonwealth in the middle of the 18th century (other sources give about a million in the 1770s),(Lukowski and Zawadzki, A Concise History of Poland. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press, 2nd edition 2006, ISBN 0-521-61857-6, p. 101) 3/4 resided in cities, making up almost half of the total urban population. The Jews were very industrious, accepted even marginal profits and soon dominated the crafts and trade, especially in smaller towns. Their communities (Qahal autonomous congregations) conducted extensive credit operations, servicing the Polish middle and upper social strata. Christian townspeople had made at times unsuccessful attempts to limit the commercial rights of the Jews.(File:Lesko synagoga.jpg|thumb|left|250px|Synagogue. During the Uprising the Jews had suffered disproportionately heavy losses.Some Polish cities had the de non tolerandis Judaeis privilege, which meant that they were able to exclude Jews from the area under the towns jurisdiction. Many Jews were often still able to remain within city limits, while others lived in jurydykas, areas typically under feudal jurisdiction outside city walls. Jews also lived in shtetls, their own small countryside towns, existing under protection of a feudal lord. Jews usually functioned under the Jewish court system, subject to noble (sejm mandated) courts in case of conflict with municipal authorities or other Christians and in appellate cases. The spacial separation was only partial and in the Commonwealth there were no formal ghettos. Jewish residents of cities participated in the upkeep of public infrastructure, and made other contributions, including to common military defense.(A History by Davies, p. 338, 1998 New York, HarperPerennial, ISBN 0-06-097468-0)(Nietolerowani, ale obecni (Not tolerated, but present) by Janusz R. Kowalczyk, (newspaper) rp.pl internet edition May 12, 2008)The weakness of central government prevented an introduction of a uniform state-wide economic policy, even as feeble attempts to implement mercantilism and state protectionism (widely then practiced in Europe) were being made. The of trade remained negative most of the time, and the countrys transit role diminished. The lack of central controls opened the Commonwealth to exploitation by more advanced economies. The monetary crisis and chaotic policy in that area, as well as Frederick IIs flooding of Poland with fake Polish currency, resulted in massive devaluations and economic losses. With the townspeople increasingly employed in agriculture, where there was demand for labor, the guild crafts and manufacturing, the mainstay of the urban middle class, became reduced to a fraction of its past capacity. However, the Commonwealth was able to preserve or rebuild much of the mining, metallurgy and heavier industries, some of which were important for military applications.(File:Fara Poznan wnetrze 2.jpg|right|thumb|225 px|Many lavish Baroque churches were built despite the countrys depressed economy (originally Jesuit church in Pozna)Nationwide the urban classes had become marginalized and lacked influence, as even by the end of the 18th century the population of town residents constituted no more than 15% of the Commonwealth total. Most cities were private, as opposed to royal or public, with their inhabitants accordingly subjected to arbitrary obligations imposed by feudal owners. In the 18th century royal city of Krakw, 55% of the grounds within the city walls belonged to the Church, 17% to nobility interests and only the rest to the actual city folks. The degradation of towns was recognized as one of the leading factors contributing to national decline by the more enlightened of szlachta publicists (Garczyski, Fredro, Leszczyski).(The Commonwealth city populations were fragmented on the bases of trade, class, ethnicity, religious affiliation or jurisdiction type and consumed by internal conflicts. The most enterprising and successful of burghers were able to join the ranks of nobility, thus leaving the urban occupations or introducing additional tensions within cities. Townspeople in larger cities, including Danzig, supported with dedication and generosity the national cause during the foreign invasions. The Commonwealths urban upper layer had lost its previously prominent role in the promotion of cultural advancement, but in Silesia, where Polish gentry no longer existed, Protestant townspeople continued Polish language educational and cultural activities, including literary work and publications, in several cities. Toward the middle of the 18th century the Polish and German burghers of Danzig, Thorn (Toru) and other municipalities of Prussia were among the pioneers of Polish Enlightenment. The typically parochial climate of ignorance, backwardness and prejudice in many small towns found its expression in a number of witch trials. Many magnate residencies were built and public improvement projects completed in Warsaw during the first half of the 18th century.( Beginnings of recovery File:St-Anne church Krakow.JPG|thumb|left|200 px|of St. Anne, KrakwThe first changes indicating an upcoming economic recovery took place in the 17251750 period. More clearly visible agricultural and industrial progress occurred during the two following decades (17501770) and had to do with the improved by that time state of the agricultural market in Europe. During the earlier period some technical advances were made and contributed to improved agriculture and, more importantly, the nature of rural social relations was changing. Beginning in Pozna region and then elsewhere in western Poland and Prussia, the manorial serfdom labor requirements were being replaced with peasant land rentals and owners collecting monetary compensation. This buying off of the forced labor obligations was often favored by the peasants themselves, as it improved their financial situation and reconnected them to city markets.(The same two regions and the capital city of Warsaw experienced also a moderate awakening in the area of industrial activities and urban business enterprises. A major trading house was established in Warsaw by French Huguenots in 1723. Manufacturing businesses were created by a number of magnates in various regions. Among the most important was the developing iron industry in southern and central Poland (Industrial Region). These modest signs of industrial progress occurred within the Commonwealth with a nearly half-century delay not only in comparison to Polands western and southern neighbors, but also with respect to Russia.( Wars fought to protect territorial integrity, decline of government  Khmelnytsky Uprising, peasant movements, Cossack alliance with Russia File:Khmelnytskyi Chernihiv.jpg|thumb|right|185 px|KhmelnytskyThe long-lasting Cossack uprising began in 1648 and was led by Khmelnytsky. It was a great national and social movement, as the increasingly exploited for centuries Rus peasant masses joined the Cossacks to fight their szlachta oppressors. Forced Polonization and catholicizing, denying the Ukrainian people cultural and religious opportunities, all contributed greatly to the unrest. In spite of the suppression, during the first half of the 17th century the Rus elements in the region matured, consolidated and gained strength at all levels of the society. Accordingly the urban people and Ukrainian nobility joined the uprising as well.(As Wadysaw IV carried out preparations for the Turkish expedition that he fancied, by the time the sejm halted the undertaking large numbers of Cossack warriors had been mobilized and put in a state of military readiness. The appearance of an outstanding leader, a scribe in the Zaporizhian Army of the Cossacks, Bohdan Khmelnytsky, was another decisive factor. Having suffered a wrong from a Polish nobleman and unable to obtain redress through official channels, Khmelnytsky headed for the Sich, where he agitated among the Cossacks embittered by the repressions of the 1630s. Khmelnytsky was also able to secure support from the Khanate, taking advantage of the Tatars (and their Ottoman overlords)(Piotr Pieniarczyk, Historia Polski w piguce (History of Poland in a Pill), p. 177) interest in disabling the Commonwealths offensive military capabilities.(army in 1648.PNG|thumb|left|300px|Cossack army in 1648The disastrous consequences of the erroneous and short-sighted during the reigns of the first two Vasa kings Cossack policies of the Polish Republic of Nobility were about to make their impact, first of many. In May 1648 in the of Zhovti Vody and the of Korsu the joined Cossack-Tatar forces completely destroyed the Crown army, capturing Crown Hetman Potocki.(The Polish Way: A Thousand-Year History of the Poles and Their Culture by Zamoyski, 1994 New York: Hippocrene Books, ISBN 0-7818-0200-8, p. 166) As a result vast expanses of Ukraine became engulfed in the spreading social upheaval.(The death of Wadysaw IV and the discordant interregnum had made the matters worse. Chancellor Ossoliski and Voivode Kisiel, a magnate influential with the Ukrainian population, advocated making the concessions necessary to placate the Cossacks. Other magnates, especially Winiowiecki, Aleksander Koniecpolski and Janusz Radziwi, demanded taking whatever radical punitive steps were required to quench the disorder. The sejm was likewise indecisive and the newly appointed military chiefs incompetent, which resulted in another defeat at the of Pyliavtsi in September. This allowed Khmelnytsky to move toward Lviv and Zamo, while the uprising expanded into Volhynia and Belarus.(File:Adam Kisiel.PNG|thumb|right|185 px|Kisiel, Voivode of Bratslav and the last Orthodox member of the Commonwealth senate, favored accommodation with the CossacksThe situation made it possible for the Cossack Hetman Khmelnytsky to influence the royal election, during which John Casimir Vasa was chosen with his support. John Casimir embarked on fruitless talks with Khmelnytsky, who had withdrawn into Ukraine, where in Pereiaslav the Hetman negotiated with Adam Kisiel. Both sides pursued armaments and in spring of 1649 military activities were resumed.(The Polish units under Winiowiecki protecting Volhynia were able to defend their fortified encampment at Zbarazh in July and August against the overwhelming Cossack and Tatar armies. Their situation had been getting increasingly desperate, when the main forces under King John Casimir approached. The King was surprised by the enemy at the Battle of Zboriv, but Ossoliski saved the Polish army by successfully negotiating with III Giray, the Tatar Khan, who was becoming worried about the Cossacks growing power. As the Lithuanian forces were also getting close, Khmelnytsky consented to ceasing of hostilities and favorable for him, the Cossacks and the Church conditions negotiated in the of Zboriv.(Afterwards the Polish side balked at the implementation of the agreements and further confrontations became inevitable. Khmelnytsky pursued diplomatic activities and obtained a promise of the Empire protection and Moldavias rule for himself upon swearing a fealty oath to the Sultan in 1650. The Cossack Hetmans emissaries also established contacts with Commonwealth dissidents and disaffected peasants in several regions of the Polish Crown and Silesia.(File:Jeremi Winiowiecki.jpg|thumb|left|185 px|Winiowiecki, noted for ruthlessness, was a great magnate in the eastern borderlandsThe Uprising erupted in June 1651 in the Podhale region. The peasant rebels, influenced by Khmelnytsky and his uprising,(Kalendarium dziejw Polski (Chronology of Polish History), ed. Chwalba, Copyright 1999 Literackie Krakw, ISBN 83-08-02855-1, p. 135, Basista) took over the Czorsztyn castle, from where their leader Napierski issued universals calling on the peasants to throw off their lords yoke. The insurgency generated limited following and was soon suppressed, its leaders executed. There were also a few other centers of peasant revolt, including one organized by Grzybowski in Poland.(At that time both the Crown army and szlachtas ruszenie moved decisively against the Tatar-Cossack forces. At the of Berestechko at the end of June 1651 John Casimir was able to impose on the enemy the site for the confrontation he chose and in heavy fighting destroy the Cossack army, while the fleeing Tatars took Khmelnytsky with them. The szlachta fighters however soon left, Khmelnytsky regrouped and with Tatar reinforcements resumed his military harassment. As the combined Crown and Lithuanian armies were not able to follow-up the Berestechko victory in the inconclusive Battle of Tserkva, the two sides signed the of Bila Tserkva, which reduced the of Zboriv Cossack gains.(With the Sultans support Hetman Khmelnytsky then attempted to subjugate Moldavia by demanding a marriage of his son Tymofiy to Ruxandra, daughter of Lupu, the Moldavian ruler connected to the family. After Vasiles refusal the Hetman sent to Moldavia a strong Cossack-Tatar army. This force was confronted in May 1652 by Hetman Kalinowski and his over ten thousand men Crown army. At the disastrous for the Poles of Batoh most of them, including Kalinowski, were killed.(File:Battle of Beresteczko 1651.PNG|thumb|425 px|right|of Berestechko 1651, relief at of Saint-Germain-des-Prs in ParisThe marriage did take place, but the Moldavian boyars conspired against the Hospodar. Tymofiy, defending his father-in-law, died at the Polish-Transylvanian siege of Suceava. The main Polish forces led by John Casimir became stuck at a camp near Zhvanets. John Casimir negotiated with the Tatar Khan slm Giray again and in December 1653 accepted in the of Zhvanets the old of Zborivs conditions.(The Commonwealth and Cossack combatants were unable to arrive at a military solution, the Crimean and Ottoman alliances had not been reliable for Bohdan Khmelnytsky, and Ukraine was being devastated by the warfare. The Cossack Hetman turned to his prior concepts of increasing cooperation with Russia, the country of more distant common historic tradition, but close linguistic, religious and East Slavic cultural ties with Ukraine.(Jzef Andrzej Gierowski  Rzeczpospolita w dobie zotej wolnoci (16481763) (The Commonwealth in the era of golden liberty (16481763)), p. 43, Fogra, Krakw 2001, ISBN 83-85719-56-3) The Cossack leaders expected on the one hand Russias help in eliminating what was left of the Commonwealths nobility rule in Ukraine, and broad autonomy for the Cossack state on the other. The Polish reverses in the region convinced Tsar Alexis to abandon his policy of non-involvement and move against the Commonwealth.(File:Janusz Radziwi by Daniel Schultz.PNG|thumb|left|200 px|Janusz Radziwi by Schultz A Russian mission arrived in Pereiaslav in January 1654 and the Cossack council deliberating there accepted the supremacy of the Tsar. The Cossacks were offered an elected hetman post, a sixty thousand registry and possession of landed estates. Ukraine was taken under the protection of Russia. The Treaty of Pereiaslav led to a new Russo-Polish war that lasted from 1654 to 1667. Powerful Russian armies entered the Commonwealth and the conflict with the Cossacks became a war with the of Russia.(The Russian plans included not only incorporation of Ukraine, but also recovery of the lands lost by Russia further north. The Ottoman Empire and the Crimean Khanate, worried by the new configuration, were now inclined to support the Commonwealth. With the Tatars the Polish units waged a destructive raid into Ukraine and fought in early 1655 the victorious Battle of Okhmativ against combined Russian and Ukrainian forces. Later that year Khmelnytsky counterattacked, took Lublin and reached the Vistula,(Piotr Pieniarczyk, Historia Polski w piguce (History of Poland in a Pill), p. 173) but was forced to acknowledge John Casimirs supremacy again when his efforts were thwarted by the Tatars. Until his death in 1657 the Cossack leader conducted independent policy, intent on taking advantage of the calamities that had befallen upon the Commonwealth, but also considered an improvement of the relationship with the great power that he shook up (fatally wounded, according to historian Timothy Snyder).(((Jzef Andrzej Gierowski  Rzeczpospolita w dobie zotej wolnoci (16481763) (The Commonwealth in the era of golden liberty (16481763)), p. 69)In the Duchy of Lithuania the first phase of the war with the Tsardom ended with a total defeat of the Commonwealth. At the of Shklow (1654) and the of Shepelevichy the Russians destroyed the small Lithuanian force under Janusz Radziwi. The country laid open to the conquerors. Belarusian towns surrendered one after another and in 1654 Smolensk fell after a three-month-long siege. The next year the Russians took Minsk, Grodno (Hrodna) and Vilnius. With the simultaneous Swedish war disasters the Commonwealth had to accede in 1656 to the Truce of Vilnius accord.( The Commonwealths failure to emancipate the Cossacks led to a shift in the regional balance of power and gave rise to the western expansion of the Empire, which eventually resulted in the loss of the Commonwealths independent existence.((Jzef Andrzej Gierowski  Rzeczpospolita w dobie zotej wolnoci (16481763) (The Commonwealth in the era of golden liberty (16481763)), p. 44-45) Defense and foreign policy in time of crisis Castle old.jpg|thumb|right|350 px|Kamieniec Podolski (Kamianets-Podilskyi) fortressThe Uprising was the beginning of a long period of internal crisis in the Commonwealth. The external situation also deteriorated, because of the increased strength of Sweden, Russia, Prussia and the Empire. Being forced to simultaneously fight on the Baltic and Ukrainian fronts, the Commonwealth incurred significant territorial losses, even though for the time being its existence was not realistically threatened. The Commonwealth was regarded by main European states, including France of Louis XIV, as a regional power and valuable partner, necessary component of the European balance of power. This perception was being reinforced by military victories, especially under the Hetman and then King III Sobieski.( stronghold front.jpg|thumb|left|250px|The Khotyn stronghold changed hands on a number of occasionsIn the decentralized state and treasury, the military potential was hampered by the inefficient fiscal apparatus and insufficient taxation. The Commonwealth in the second half of the 17th century developed huge indebtedness in respect to its own armed forces. Military confederations or rebellions, through which the army collected its own pay typically from royal and church estates, were getting increasingly common. Hetman Sobieski was unable to follow-up his Khotyn victory in part because the unpaid Lithuanian and Crown troops left. The Commonwealth was able to field a 60,000 army (plus the unreliable ruszenie) at the very most, at times when the Monarchy or the of Russia were capable of an effort twice that size. After the Cossack-Tatar wars and to a lesser degree after 1655, the armed forces had to be rebuilt almost completely.(The Commonwealth forces had a much higher (50%) than in other European, infantry-dominated armies, proportion of cavalry, which was of unrivaled in Europe quality. The infantry was also of high battlefield value. Artillery was well-developed and effective, with nearly two thousand pieces present throughout the country. A majority and increasing proportion of soldiers were now of native, rather foreign origin, with decreasing participation of szlachta, who however monopolized the command and dominated the officer corps. The highest ranks belonged to wealthy magnates, with the notable exception of Czarniecki, a nobleman of more humble origins. Czarniecki introduced warfare with heavy participation of peasant masses. Afterwards the last great battlefield successes of the Noble Republic were made possible by the universal military talent of Jan Sobieski.(File:PL Battle of Chocim 1673.JPG|right|thumb|325 px|Hetman Jan Sobieski at the of Khotyn (1673) The one major weakness and backwardness of the Commonwealth defenses was the lack of significant system of modern fortifications throughout most of its territory, which allowed the invading armies to inflict damage disproportionate to military effort. The exceptions were the mouth of the Vistula region and the south-east, where there were powerful, even if neglected fortresses, such as the Kamieniec Podolski (Kamianets-Podilskyi) Castle.(The fiscal difficulties affected also the Commonwealth diplomacy and foreign policy. John III kept resident diplomats in several major capitals, but the sejm imposed limits on what they could undertake. The sejm also banned long-term resident foreign representations in Warsaw, a prohibition ignored by the papacy and numerous governments. The sejm itself had rather frequently sent its own missions abroad. The magnates, including top state officials, especially the hetmans, conducted their own foreign activities and at times served foreign powers for their private gain. When French dominated European diplomacy, in Poland the official language was still Latin. The 1684 treaty of Holy League, which ignored the recent Polish military contributions and Polish interests alike, was just one example of the Commonwealths diplomacy lack of effectiveness.( Swedish invasion, empowerment of East Prussia File:Stefan Czarniecki by Brodero Matthiesen.PNG|thumb|left|200 px|CzarnieckiThe Swedish invasion of the Commonwealth, known as the Deluge, took place within the context of the Northern War. In 1655 the Commonwealths survival had become endangered, when the huge federation, already critically weakened by the offensive of the Russians, who occupied most of the Duchy of Lithuania, and by Khmelnytskys Cossacks holding fast to the lands they overran in Ukraine, was subjected to a massive attack by Sweden. The Swedish leaders, emboldened by the of Westphalia gains, including the western of Pomerania,(Anita J. Pramowska  A History of Poland, 2004 Palgrave Macmillan, ISBN 0-333-97253-8, p. 100) intended precisely to take advantage of Polands grave difficulties, hoping to easily take over at least Courland and Prussia, and thus to enforce their total domination over the Sea area.(Worried about the Russian strength and advances in the East Baltic region and toward Livonia, the Swedes blocked their further progress by taking over Dnaburg (Daugavpils). King X Gustav of Sweden was also encouraged by the Polish magnate opposition unhappy with John Casimirs rule; Radziejowski, expelled form the Commonwealth by the sejm court, was the magnates representative in Stockholm. The Commonwealth nobility hoped that acquiring the Swedish monarchs protection, or even accepting his rule, would help them recover the eastern lands lost in the warfare of the past several years.(The Swedish armies entered the Commonwealth from the Pomeranian and Livonian dominions, the Pomeranian force crossing the border under Wittenberg on July 25. At the of Ujcie, Polands ruszenie briefly fought, but soon capitulated and sought Charles Gustavs protection for their province. Magnus De la Gardies army crossed into Lithuania with promises of help in resisting the Russians. Janusz and Radziwi there accepted the Swedish kings supremacy and on October 20 signed the of Kdainiai treaty, under which Lithuania was to form a union with Sweden, instead of Poland.(File:Oblenie Jasnej Gry przez Szwedw w 1655.jpg|thumb|right|250 px|Gra Monastery under siegeOther provinces of the Polish Crown by that time had also surrendered to the King of Sweden. Warsaw did not resist the invaders and was thoroughly plundered. John Casimir fought, but was defeated at the of arnw and sought refuge, first in ywiec district and then in Oberglogau in the Duchy of Oppeln (Opole) in Silesia, outside of the Crown. Krakw was defended with determination for three weeks under Czarnieckis command, but had to capitulate when a rescue force was crushed by the Swedes in the of Wojnicz. The bulk of the Polish nobility and the armed forces declared loyalty to Charles Gustav.(The Swedes failed to take advantage of the local support and treated the Commonwealth as a conquered country, subjecting it to widespread violence, predatory contributions, ruthlessness and pillage. Spontaneous popular resistance arose first among the peasants, beginning with a skirmish they fought near Mylenice. Partisan groups included also townspeople and szlachta, who disillusioned with Charles Gustav often switched sides and took the lead of the fighting. egocki led the uprising in Greater Poland. Carpathian foothills region units were highly successful, liberating Scz and many other towns. Lww (Lviv) and Zamo resisted both the Cossack and the Swedish assaults, similarly Danzig (Gdask) and Marienburg in case of the Swedes. Some of the Lithuanian forces, under Jan Sapieha, had remained faithful to John Casimir. They fought in Podlaskie against the Radziwis and took Tykocin. John Casimir himself still in Silesia, issued a universal calling for national resistance against the Swedes, and then on December 18 embarked on a return trip to Poland. The Commonwealths remaining ally, Crimean Khan IV Giray, who had just defeated Khmelnytsky, was offering help and support.(File:Sbastien Bourdons-Karl X Gustav.jpg|thumb|left|166px|X Gustav of Sweden tried to eliminate the Commonwealth by partitioning its territory among the neighboring statesThe Gra Monastery of the Pauline Fathers in Czstochowa was under siege for several weeks at the end of 1655. The success of the monasterys defense was of great psychological and spiritual importance for the Poles. The defense efforts at Jasna Gra, a great shrine and fortress with a crew of a few hundred volunteers, were led by Prior Kordecki. Before the end of the year, as peasant rescue units approached the site, the Swedish forces were compelled to abandon the siege. The Poles at this stage of the war were becoming increasingly effective militarily. They used the attack against the national shrine as a rallying point; it added a religious dimension and zeal (defense of Catholicism and anti-Protestant) to their struggle.(On December 29 the Crown hetmans withdrew their previous support of Charles Gustav and established the Tyszowce military confederation aimed at opposing the Swedish invaders. In January 1656 John Casimir returned from abroad and, impressed by the contributions to the war effort made by Polands common people, solemnly declared in Lww his support for relieving the peasantry of unjust obligations.(Charles Gustav concentrated on completing the takeover of Prussia. Thorn (Toru) surrendered without a fight, Marienburg after resisting the siege. Danzig, supported by the Netherlands, remained unconquered. The Swedish king was able to obtain concessions from Frederick William I, the Elector of Brandenburg and Duke of Prussia and vassal of the Commonwealth (in regard to his Prussian rule), who in exchange for Warmia region agreed in Knigsberg to become a vassal of Sweden. Charles Gustav then moved south, with the intention of breaking the Polish military opposition.(File:Battle of Sandomierz 1656.jpg|thumb|right|350 px|Battle near the confluence of the Vistula and San riversThe Poles were still at a disadvantage facing the Swedish army in the open field, and Czarnieckis forces were defeated at the of Gob in February 1656. Afterwards the Polish commander successfully applied guerrilla fighting tactics, harassing the enemy while avoiding engagements with the main army. Charles Gustav was soon forced to abandon the siege of Zamo and the planned attack on Lww. His attempt to hold off the enemy along the line of the San River was unsuccessful, as his forces were trapped by Czarniecki, Jerzy Lubomirski and Sapieha at the fork formed by the San with the Vistula. When Czarniecki left the site to face and crush at Warka the approaching Swedish rescue force under Margrave Friedrich of Baden, Charles Gustav was able to escape the predicament, but the massive Polish uprising by then seized the initiative and broke the Swedish defenses. Most of Poland was liberated, except for Krakw, and Poland was also cleared of the Swedes following Czarnieckis and Lubomirskis raid there. At the end of June Warsaw, defended by Wittenberg, was stormed and retaken by the popular forces.(File:Warsaw in 1656.png|thumb|left|400 px|Warsaw in 1656Seeking help the Swedish king made Frederick William an offer of Greater Poland. The combined armies of the two monarchs approached Warsaw and fought at the end of July a three-day heavy battle against Polish and Lithuanian troops aided by the Tatars,(Piotr Pieniarczyk, Historia Polski w piguce (History of Poland in a Pill), p. 168) won by the Swedish-Brandenburg coalition. Frederick William however soon had to retreat after his duchy was attacked by Polish and Tatar forces. Hetman Gosiewski managed to defeat the combined enemy at the of Prostki, while Czarniecki conducted further clearing activities in Greater Poland followed by a revenge incursion into the Brandenburg March and Farther Pomerania.(File:Battle of Warsaw 1656.PNG|thumb|right|325 px|Charles Gustav fighting the Tatar allies of Poland. The Khanate forces were used by the Empire, interested in preserving a balance of power in the north, against the Commonwealth during the Ukrainian and in support of it during the Swedish wars.(The international balance of power was also shifting in favor of the Commonwealth because of the agreement with Russia in fall of 1656, motivated in part by the Tsardoms strategic interest in preventing a collapse of the PolishLithuanian state and uncontrolled expansion of Sweden. Not giving up its own claims and gains in the east, Russia moved against the Swedish forces in Livonia, which also facilitated their removal from Lithuania. This new situation forced Charles Gustav to alter his plans of conquering all of Poland and to propose a territorial partitioning scheme, under which the PolishLithuanian Commonwealth was to be eliminated altogether and he would be able to keep at least some of Swedens prospects.(First in the of Labiau the Swedish king granted sovereign rights in Prussia and possession of Greater Poland to Frederick William. In December 1656 a partition treaty involving several monarchs and other parties was concluded in Radnot in Transylvania.(One of the treaty signatories was II Rkczi, Prince of Transylvania, whose forces entered the Commonwealth in early 1657 on a pillaging spree, reaching in cooperation with the Swedes as far north as Warsaw and Brest. Rkczis initially successful offensive had in the end favorable for Poland consequences, as it led to a new configuration of international interests, which prevented the Treaty of Radnot from being implemented.(File:Defence of Przemyl in 1657 against Georg Rakoczi.JPG|thumb|left|300px|Przemyl defended against the forces of II RkcziThe so-far rather indifferent Austrian Commonwealths ally became worried about a stronger Transylvania threatening its Hungarian possessions, which led to an auxiliary military agreement negotiated with the Commonwealth representatives in Vienna, and an Austrian diplomatic initiative aimed at separating Brandenburg form Sweden. Lubomirskis forces raided Transylvania and retreating Rkczi was defeated by the Poles and Tatars at Ostrw in Podolia. The combined Polish and Austrian forces had retaken Krakw. Denmark joined the war against Sweden and became the Commonwealths ally.( File:Jan Pawe Sapieha.PNG|thumb|right|185 px|Jan SapiehaAustrian intermediaries facilitated the decisively important negotiations between Frederick William of Brandenburg-Prussia and the Commonwealth, which in fall of 1657 resulted in the Treaties of Wehlau-Bromberg. The treaties considerably strengthened the Prussian side, as Frederick William, in return for agreeing to abandon Charles Gustav, became a sovereign ruler in Ducal Prussia, ending the historic dependency of East Prussia upon the Commonwealth.  The Prussian ruler was also a recipient of other, including territorial (Lbork and Bytw fiefs, Draheim Starostwo), privileges. The estates ended up with a homage obligation when a new duke is inaugurated, and an eternal alliance required a Prussian ruler to provide modest assistance to the Commonwealth in case of war.(Efforts to remove Swedish garrisons from the cities of Prussia and Livonia continued. In 1658 Thorn (Toru) capitulated after a long siege, but the Swedes kept Marienburg and Elbing (Elblg) until the end of the war. Charles Gustav moved his main military operation to Denmark. In 1658 a joint Polish-Brandenburg-Austrian expedition into Pomerania and then Denmark took place. Polish units under Czarniecki distinguished themselves during the takeover of Alsen Island and the Kolding fortress, and in 1659 in the Battle of Nyborg, where the Swedes suffered a heavy defeat.(of Oliwa.jpg|thumb|left|300 px|The Swedish Deluge period ended with the Peace of OlivaFrance worried about Sweden being removed from the Roman Empire pressed for peace negotiations, which commenced in Oliva near Danzig in the early 1660. The treaty was signed in May, after Charles Gustavs death. The Polish side needed now to preserve strength for the struggle with Russia and the old demarcation line was mostly agreed to, with the Commonwealth keeping Courland and southeastern Livonia, including Daugavpils. The Protestants in Royal Prussia were guaranteed religious freedoms, Frederick William had to return his conquests in Swedish Pomerania to Sweden. John II Casimir relinquished his claims to the Swedish throne.(Piotr Pieniarczyk, Historia Polski w piguce (History of Poland in a Pill), p. 169) The of Oliva involved the Commonwealth, Brandenburg and Sweden and was guaranteed by XIV of France.(Frederick Williams sovereign takeover met with resistance in the Duchy of Prussia. A nobility faction under Ludwig von Kalckstein and Knigsberg burghers led by Roth prepared an armed insurrection. The opposition formed a league in 1662 and appealed to the Commonwealth for assistance. The Commonwealth, preoccupied with the war with Russia and internal unrest in the military, extended no help. Frederick Williams forces entered Knigsberg and imprisoned the leaders of the rebellion. Von Kalckstein fled to Poland, but in 1670 was captured by a Prussian rulers representative, taken to the Duchy and executed.(The Deluges long term deleterious effects included an increase in xenophobic attitudes and intolerance in Poland. The religious minorities, accused of supporting foreign adversaries, were persecuted and pressured to emigrate, in the case of the Brethren forced to leave the country. The international standing of the Commonwealth power had become much diminished, especially (with the loss of control over a major part of Livonia and Eastern Prussia) in the crucially important Baltic Sea region.( Treaty of Hadiach, war with Russia, division of Ukraine File:Iwan Wyhowski.PNG|thumb|right|165 px|VyhovskyThe PolishLithuanian magnates were preoccupied with the issue of recovery of their old feudal lands in the east, lost to the Cossacks and Russia. There was one more and the most significant, even if belated and in the end botched, attempt to resolve the Cossack conflict in an amicable way, by including Ukraine as a partner in the Commonwealth federation.(After Khmelnytskys death Vyhovsky was chosen as the Cossack Hetman. Vyhovsky represented the Cossack upper strata and sought independence from Russia through an alliance with Charles Gustav and then the Commonwealth, where some of the leaders understood and wanted to amend the erroneousness of the past policies. An appropriate treaty was prepared by Niemirycz,( an Arian and the Chamberlain of Kiev, who represented Vyhovski, and on John Casimirs side Kazimierz Bieniewski, Voivode of Chernihiv, among others. The of Hadiach was signed on September 16, 1658.(File:Yurii Khmelnytsky.png|thumb|left|200 px|KhmelnytskyThe provisions of the treaty, and of the proposed union, included the creation of the Duchy of Ruthenia, which, like Lithuania, would have its own state offices and participate in the Commonwealths Sejm. The Church was to be given equal with the Catholic rights with the bishops seated in the Senate. Nobility status was to be granted to many better off Cossacks (...so measured however, that out of each regiment one hundred can be granted nobility),(Jzef Andrzej Gierowski  Rzeczpospolita w dobie zotej wolnoci (16481763) (The Commonwealth in the era of golden liberty (16481763)), p. 82) but the Cossack register limited to thirty thousand and with the allowed return of szlachta to their prewar possessions many of the ordinary Cossack rebels would have been reduced to feudal peasantry status again. The treaty was reluctantly ratified by the sejm in 1659 with the Cossack negotiated gains however substantially reduced,( which contributed to its eventual demise, a rejection by a Cossack assembly.(Jerzy Lukowski and Hubert Zawadzki, A Concise History of Poland, p. 100) The Treaty of Hadiach became also a major factor leading to the Commonwealths renewed warfare with the Tsardom, which considered the accord a violation of the previously agreed truce. For the Cossack rank and file what Vyhovsky had negotiated offered too little and came too late.(File:Petr Doroshenko.jpg|thumb|right|185 px|Doroshenko The approaching Russian army was defeated at Konotop by Vyhovsky with Polish and Tatar help. During disturbances among the Cossack masses that followed, Jerzy Niemirycz was killed, Ivan Vyhovsky was forced to give up his hetmanship and was replaced by Khmelnytsky, Bohdans son, who renewed the Treaty of Pereiaslav with Russia.(Russian armies advanced in 1660. The Commonwealth mustered all its military resources and in Lithuania Czarniecki and Jan Sapieha defeated Ivan Khovansky at the of Polonka.( The Russians had to abandon the siege of Lachowicze (Lyakhavichy) and withdraw beyond the Berezina River. Vilnius was recovered by the Poles the following year. Of great importance was the Volhynia victory of Jerzy Lubomirski and Stanisaw Potocki over Vasily Sheremetev in the of Chudniv in October 1660.( Yurii Khmelnytsky, also defeated, agreed there to submit to John Casimir and approved a weaker (for the Cossacks) version of the Treaty of Hadiach.((File:Apsida Sofiyskogo Sobora Kiev.jpg|thumb|left|215px|Orthodox Saint Sophia Cathedral in KievThe Commonwealths defense and the retaking of the greater portion of the Duchy of Lithuania, however successful, had not resulted in the recovery of all the lands lost in the 1650s. Smolensk was left in Russian hands and Ukraine became divided, with the right (western) bank of the River (under Yurii Khmelnytsky) tied to the Commonwealth, and the left bank to Russia under the terms of the Treaty of Pereiaslav. With the Zaporizhian center also conducting its own politics, the whole division of Ukraine resulted in a highly volatile situation and internal warfare, known in Ukrainian history as the Ruin.((John Casimir made one more attempt to reverse the losses and regain all of Ukraine by attacking the Tsardom in 1663 and 1664. While some of his forward units approached Moscow, fighting the Russian people and weather took its toll, which combined with the internal difficulties at home made the withdrawal unavoidable. The Commonwealths failures encouraged anti-Polish sentiments in right-bank Ukraine. The popular uprisings there were subdued with great effort,( with Hetman Czarniecki dying in the fighting in 1665.(File:Rzeczpospolita.png|thumb|right|225 px|The Commonwealth after 1667; pink indicates areas that were ceded to Russia (Kiev, Smolensk) in the east, to Sweden (Riga) in the north During the War (16661671), on Dec. 19, 1666, Doroshenko eliminated near Vinnytsia the Polish forces stationed in the region, ending in reality the Polish military rule over Ukraine.(Under the pressure of the Ukrainian unrest and the threat of a TurkishTatar intervention, the Commonwealth and Russia signed in 1667 an agreement in the village of Andrusovo near Smolensk, according to which eastern Ukraine now belonged to Russia (with a high degree of local autonomy and an internal army). The truces provisions were favorable to the Tsardom, which, through the territorial gains secured, stopped the Polish eastern expansion and facilitated its own future further movement to the west. The Smolensk, Chernihiv and Novhorod-Siverskyi regions were for Poland from now lost, in addition to eastern Ukraine with Kiev and Zaporizhia.( Polish Livonia, the Polotsk and Vitebsk voivodeships and area north of Dnaburg (Latgalia) were to be kept by the Commonwealth.( Adjustments were still going to take place, but the eastern and northern PolishLithuanian borders had mainly stabilized, until the time of the First Partition.(( Period of wars with the Ottoman Empire, John III Sobieski File:John III Sobieski in battle of Khotyn 1673.PNG|thumb|left|225 px|John Sobieski, the Commonwealths last great victorious commander, at the of Khotyn (1673)The Empire, which had previously been involved in Ukrainian affairs by Khmelnytsky, now under the leadership of Sultan IV and his Vizier Ahmed Kprl, interpreted the Ukrainian disorder as an opportunity for its own expansion in the region. The Commonwealths friend, Tatar Khan IV Giray was removed in 1666 and Doroshenko, the Cossack hetman of Ukraine, seeking the threatened by the Polish-Russian negotiations unity of Ukraine, accepted Ottoman suzerainty. In fall of 1666 the Tatars eliminated the Commonwealth military units present in Ukraine, but the 1667 sejm reduced the countrys army to 20,000 nevertheless.(In 1667, when Tatar-Cossack forces attacked Lww (Lviv), Hetman John Sobieski confronted them with a small force. After the Polish troops withstood two weeks of enemy assaults at the Battle of Podhajce (Pidhaitsi), the Tatars agreed to renew the alliance with the Commonwealth and Doroshenko acknowledged its authority.(Soon King II Casimir Vasa abdicated and was replaced by the helpless Korybut Winiowiecki, which coincided with intense factional infighting within the Commonwealth. Doroshenkos proposal of granting the Cossacks full autonomy in return for Ukraines association with the Commonwealth was rejected, and a Polish committee nominated Khanenko for Doroshenkos hetman post. Doroshenko appealed for help to the Turks and their Tatar allies, but the Tatars were defeated twice by Sobieski, who in 1671 removed them and Doroshenko from the Voivodeship.(File:Battle of Khotyn 1673.PNG|thumb|right|315px|of Khotyn (1673)At that point however the Ottomans, having successfully concluded their war with Venice over Crete, were ready to wage a war on the Commonwealth. The war was officially declared and a great Turkish, Tatar and Cossack invasion force under Mehmed IV entered the Bratslav area and Podolia. The Commonwealth being in a state of internal disorder and incapable of effective defense, the foremost stronghold of Kamieniec Podolski (Kamianets-Podilskyi) capitulated, the Turkish army moved toward Lww, while the Tatars raided west reaching the River, taking huge numbers of civilian captives. Sobieski counterattacked moving south from Krasnystaw and freeing 44,000 of the enslaved, but that was not enough to prevent the signing of the of Buchach in October 1672, on humiliating for the Commonwealth terms. The Ottoman Empire took the Podolian, Bratslav and Kiev voivodeships and accepted a big yearly monetary gift.(This outcome had a sobering effect in Poland. Bickering stopped, the 1673 sejm funded a 50,000 strong army, diplomatic arrangements were made to assure neutrality of the Khanate and Russian cooperation. Hetman Sobieskis military offensive commenced in the fall.(File:GreatCourtyard.jpg|thumb|left|225 px|The Jesuit College in Wilno (Vilnius) became University under King Stephen BthorySobieski decided to attack the largest of the three Turkish corps, stationed at Khotyn, where another battle with the Ottoman Empire took place half a century earlier. The Battle of Khotyn was won when Sobieskis infantry and cavalry stormed and took over the reinforced enemy positions, at the former camp of Hetman Chodkiewicz. With a broken bridge on the Dniester River, the trapped Ottoman army was destroyed on Nov. 11, 1673. The battle was the greatest by that time land victory over the Ottoman Empire in Europe.(Detrimental to further military progress was the death of King Micha Winiowecki. Lithuanian Hetman Pacs refusal to fight under Sobieskis orders forced Sobieski to abandon his intended move toward the Danube. The Polish units that had taken over Jassy in Moldavia were soon forced out by the Turks, who were able to reconnect with their other concentration of troops in Kamieniec Podolski.(John Sobieski, elected in 1674 as King John III, continued the war with Turkey. In 1674 Russia undertook its own military action against the Ottoman Empire and became a subject of a Turkish offensive, aimed at aiding their ally Doroshenko, at that time under Russian siege in Chyhyryn. Sobieski militarily supported Russia, recovering the Bratslav area from the Turks in process. In 1675 Sobieski defeated the Turkish-Tatar forces heading for Lww, while the Defense of Trembowla and the approaching Polish rescue stopped the enemys main force, subsequently withdrawn into Moldavia. Another factor contributing to the Ottoman pullout were the successes of the Russians, leading to their takeover of Chyhyryn and subjugation of Doroshenko.(File:SiemiginowskiJerzy.1686.JanIIISobieskiPodWiedniem.jpg|thumb|right|235 px|King III Sobieski at ViennaThe outcome of the warfare was determined by the campaign of 1676, in conjunction with the negotiations and diplomatic activity that followed. The Ottoman army entered Pokuttya and moving up the Dniester River was confronted by King Sobieski at the of urawno. The outnumbered Poles withstood two weeks of enemy assaults, after which a truce was agreed on through French mediation. It had still left Podolia with Kamieniec, Bratslav and other areas in Turkish hands. Ukrainian fortresses had to be given up in light of Ottoman successes in the war with Russia. Therefore from the Commonwealth point of view the urawno treaty constituted no more than a temporary armistice.(Peace with Turkey was however the aim of John III Sobieski, who, faced with a new situation in Europe after the of the Pyrenees, wished to pursue an ambitious policy in the more crucial for the Commonwealth Sea area.(France had become the greatest European power and seeking further hegemony was looking for alliances against its competitors. The Ottoman Empire and Sweden were already important for France as anti-Habsburg components, and the Commonwealth, in peace with Sweden after the of Oliva, became the next candidate. Poland had however traditionally been linked to Austria, and trying to break this relationship, which had many magnate supporters, filled the time of the reign of Louis XIV.( The pro-French camp was formed in Poland already in the 1660s, in part upon the prodding by Queen Marie Louise, and Jan Sobieski was its member. Their plans of electing a French minded candidate for the Commonwealth crown became frustrated when Micha Korybut Winiowiecki married Maria of Austria. The protracted Polish-Ottoman fighting suited Vienna politicians well, since protected on the southeastern flank they were able to commit fully to the war with France.(File:Lwow-StaryUniwersytet-kosciolSwMikolaja.jpg|thumb|left|300 px|The university in Lww (Lviv), established by King John Casimir, like its Vilnius counterpart originated as a Jesuit collegeThe 1674 election of John Sobieski, married to the French-born Marie Louise, appeared to have strengthened the pro-French faction decisively. A secret Treaty of Yavoriv was signed a year later between the Polish king and Louis XIV, providing for French compensation for a planned war against Frederick William and his of Brandenburg, doubled in case of a war also with Austria. Poland was going to cooperate militarily with Sweden and be rewarded in the end with the of Prussia, possibly also some acquisitions in Silesia.(The French-Polish intentions were to be thwarted by both the international and Commonwealth internal obstacles. Austria and Brandenburg in turn provided funds for the Kings rivals to tie his hands. Veinna and Moscow signed their own treaty against Sobieskis policies, in which for the first time the external powers pledged to defend szlachtas liberities, the guarantees of the Commonwealths weakness. Most importantly the Swedes failed in their military endeavors.(Marie Casimire with Children.jpg|thumb|right|200 px|King Sobieskis wife, Queen Marie Casimire or Marysieka, with children. The politically active queen governed the country during the last several years of the Kings life and pushed for a close alliance with France of Louis XIV.(Jzef Andrzej Gierowski  Rzeczpospolita w dobie zotej wolnoci (16481763) (The Commonwealth in the era of golden liberty (16481763)), p. 181-185)(Coming from the west in Pomerania the Swedish forces were defeated and Frederick William took Stettin again. The attempt to take over the Duchy of Prussia fell likewise. In 1677 a secret PolishSwedish understanding was signed in Danzig, according to which John III agreed to let the Swedes pass through Livonia into Prussia, in addition to strengthening them with his own forces. The Swedish intervention became badly delayed and ended in another defeat. Only Louis XIVs diplomatic activities prevented the Swedes from losing Stettin.(In addition to conducting this last assertive Commonwealth attempt in the Baltic area, John III for a time was also involved in anti-Habsburg diversion in Hungary, engulfed by the Kuruc uprising led by Thkly. The Hungarian rebels were helped with volunteers and supply, and in 1677 with a military expedition led into Hungary by Hieronim Lubomirski.(As the King failed to convince the nobility of the necessity of action in the north, the countrys establishment directed its attention back toward the recovery of the lands lost in the east. Russia however was now seen as an ally against the Ottoman power. In order to reclaim the areas lost to Turkey in the south-east and to reestablish influence in Moldavia, John III sought to build a grand European anti-Ottoman league. While his ideas met with cool reception in most European centers of power, except for the papacy and Vienna, Turkeys own military undertakings worked in favor of Sobieskis plans.( Mehmed IV having concluded in 1681 the war with Russia was getting ready to take up the defense of Thkly and move against Austria. Facing a choice of leaving the Habsburg state to its own fate or forming with it a coalition to defeat the Ottoman invaders, Sobieski chose the second option, distancing himself from and acting internally against the pro-French camp.(File:Lwow-KatedraLacinska-wnetrze1.jpg|thumb|left|235 px|Latin Cathedral in LvivThe limited mutual defense alliance with Austria was approved in the sejm and signed on April 1, 1683. It provided for mutual rescue obligation in the event of an enemy attack on either Cracow or Vienna. In July indeed the over 100,000 strong Ottoman army led by Mustafa Pasha laid a siege to Vienna.(Hieronim Lubomirski had already been fighting the Turks to help Emperor Leopold, and Sobieski quickly marched his 25,000 men to the Vienna battlefield area, where they complemented an allied army of 70,000 total, comprised also of Austrians and Germans. Sobieski took command of the attack on the besiegers and the main battle took place on September 12, 1683. Heavily involved in the fighting were the Commonwealth infantry, artillery and cavalry. Thousands of the Polish Hussar horsemen were famously involved in the victorious assault on Kara Mustafas camp. The Ottoman offensive capabilities were broken, even though Kara Mustafa was able to save from the rout a portion of his retreating army. Vienna, the gateway to the West, was spared the fate of Constantinople.(The pursuit of the enemy resulted in the two Battles of Prkny. In the first confrontation Sobieski was subjected to a surprise attack, and only two days later, on October 9, together with the Austrians the Poles destroyed the Turkish army defending the north Hungarian Ottoman possessions.( File:Vilnius - St. Casimirs Church 02.jpg|thumb|right|250 px|St. Casimirs Church in VilniusAt this juncture, a protectorate by the Commonwealth was sought by the leaders of Hungary, Transylvania and Moldavia. Actively pursuing these relations would require confronting the Habsburg Monarchy. Not willing or able to do so, King John III decided to join the League (1684), an anti-Ottoman alliance and the last European crusade project, consisting also of the papal state, Venice and the Holy Roman Empire. The pacts basic goals were recovery of the lost territories and common fight until the time of a commonly agreed peace. The Holy League arrangements severely limited the Commonwealths ability to exercise its options and future reverses can be traced to the failure of the decentralized, ineffective Polish diplomacy to protect through negotiations the countrys national interest.(King Sobieski, euphoric after the Vienna victory, lacked a sense of realistic political judgment. Neglecting the recovery of Kamieniec, he unsuccessfully attacked the Turks in Moldavia. Then pressed by the Emperors and Popes diplomacies he agreed, to motivate Russia to join the war with the Ottoman Empire, to an eternal peace treaty with the Tsardom, signed in Moscow in 1686. The treaty confirmed and adjusted further Russias previous (of Andrusovo) territorial gains, and granted Russia the right to intervene in the Commonwealth to protect the interests of its Orthodox population. Russias negotiated obligations fell short of a full anti-Ottoman involvement. In 1686 Russia joined the Holy League.(The decisive reckoning with the Ottoman Empire was supposed to have taken place in 1686, through a coordinated attack of the Holy League allies on the various Ottoman provinces. The coordination turned out to be poor and the large force gathered by John III for a Danube offensive conducted no significant military operations. This and another failed expedition into Moldavia in 1691 mark the twilight of the Commonwealths military might.(File:Battle of Vienna 1683 2.PNG|thumb|left|300 px|of Vienna 1683For the rest of his life the ailing king hesitated between a pro-Habsburg and pro-French policy. His son Ludwik Sobieski married Hedwig of Neuburg, sister of the Empress. Queen Marie Casimire, promoting an alliance with France, signed herself in 1692 a treaty with Louis XIV, but was unable to persuade her husband, who felt bound by the Holy League loyalties,(Jzef Andrzej Gierowski  Rzeczpospolita w dobie zotej wolnoci (16481763) (The Commonwealth in the era of golden liberty (16481763)), p. 183184) to do likewise.(After Sobieskis death, King II the Strong attempted another anti-Ottoman Commonwealth campaign, during which only the of Podhajce (1698) was fought. The final of Karlowitz concluded in 1699 the Holy Leagues wars with the Ottoman Empire. The Commonwealth ended up recovering Podolia with Kamieniec Podolski and the Bratslav region. The Austrian Habsburg Monarchy, expanded by Hungary and Transylvania, had become the leading European power.(The wars fought by the Commonwealth during the second half of the 17th century fulfilled their main role of protecting as much as possible of the eastern possessions, where latifundia of the magnates were for the most part located. More comprehensive foreign policy needs were neglected, the functioning of the state had become even more disorganized and the military effort and destruction contributed to further disintegration of the economy.( Magnate oligarchies, decline of central government File:Ludwika Maria Gonzaga Schultz.jpg|thumb|right|200px|Queen Louise Gonzaga died before the abdication of King II Casimir VasaThe reigns of II Casimir Vasa, Korybut Winiowiecki and III Sobieski brought further downgrading and loss of effectiveness of governmental authority, both in the domain of royal control and in the areas of legislative (central and local) ability to function and power. With the diminished fortunes of regular szlachta, the struggle for power and the rather feeble, bit still present attempts to reform the system took place within the changing alliances of powerful magnates and royal courts. From the time of John Casimir and his wife Marie Louise, who cared about the well-being of the Commonwealth, but were obsessively preoccupied with the issue of royal succession, the PolishLithuanian state was informally divided into a number of territorial domains, practically controlled by regional top feudal lords, inclined to pursue their private and familial interests in the first place.(Janusz Radziwi, the most powerful magnate of Lithuania, is credited with being responsible for the first instance of the veto act, which was used to break the deliberations of the sejm of 1652. This widely abused practice eventually led to a paralysis of most of significant legislative activity, and through their szlachta surrogates was used by foreign powers to prevent internal reform in the Commonwealth.(File:Jerzy Sebastian Lubomirski 1.PNG|thumb|left|200px|Sebastian Lubomirski glorified as a military heroJohn Casimirs bad relations with the magnates contributed to his initial general alienation from the Commonwealths nobility and armed forces in 1655 at the time of the Swedish Deluge. In 1658 the King, supported by the more patriotic faction of szlachta, postulated a reform program, which included introduction of majority voting rules in parliamentary assemblies. The proposal was supported by the senate in 1658 and considered by the sejm, which in 1659 established a committee for implementing new procedures, but the reforms soon became a victim of disagreements over the vivente rege and royal succession issues. Although during the sejm of 1661 John Casimir predicted and warned of partition of the Commonwealth by Russia, Brandenburg and Austria if unsettled successions cause significant interregnum periods, by that time the reform program had been defeated and the army remained unpaid.(Hetman Sebastian Lubomirski was the central figure among the opposition responsible for the defeat of the royal couples undertakings and attempted reforms. With his inspiration confederations of unpaid soldiers were established in 1661 in the Crown and in Lithuania. The army confederations lasted for two years, forced the parliament to come up with large sums of money, devastated estates and put an end to what was left of the reform processes.(Marie Louise tried to force Lubomirski to leave the country. In 1664 he was accused of treason and sentenced by the sejm court to banishment, confiscation of property, infamy and removal from state offices held. Lubomirski sought imperial protection in Silesia, where he gathered an army and conducted diplomatic activities aimed at forming an international coalition against the Polish King.( Image:Elekcja1.jpg|thumb|300 px|right|Election of King Korybut Winiowiecki on Wola fields in 1669In 1665 Lubomirski entered the Commonwealth in an act of open rebellion known as Rokosz. The main military confrontation took place in July 1666 near Inowrocaw (Battle of Mtwy), where rebel forces slaughtered thousands of the Kings best troops. The victory brought no great advantage to Lubomirski, who left the country again and soon died, but John Casimir was obliged to formally abandon his and the Queens vivente rege election attempts. After the contentious and broken sejm of 1668 the King abdicated and rejected numerous appeals for reconsideration. He still took steps to influence his succession, apologized for his errors (the balance of the reign was clearly negative) and predicted again the ultimate demise of the Noble Republic.((Jzef Andrzej Gierowski  Rzeczpospolita w dobie zotej wolnoci (16481763) (The Commonwealth in the era of golden liberty (16481763)), p. 109-110)File:Election Wisniowiecki.jpg|thumb|left|325px|Election close-up shows the senators surrounded by the szlachtaWith the disintegration of the system, and of the functionality of central and local parliamentary assemblies in particular, confederations had assumed an important role, as a substitute but necessary mode of governance. Confederations, which in reality usually constituted more closely knit magnate factions, were temporary (lasting up to several years) associations, whose members were at times pressured into joining, but were sworn and often deeply committed. Confederate decisions were generally made by a majority of votes. All nobility could join, and there was some urban participation. A confederation was led by a marshal and a council and was typically directed against a monarch or aspired to defend the country from foreign oppression.(File:Micha Korybut Winiowiecki.PNG|thumb|right|166px|King Korybut WiniowieckiDuring the election of 1669 the gathered szlachta unexpectedly flexed their muscle and acted against the leading magnate parties. After the sejm excluded all candidates that in some way had violated the legal process, the rowdy crowd demonstrated its preference for mediocrity by choosing the incompetent and inept Micha Korybut Winiowiecki. Winiowiecki, advised by the Vice-Chancellor, Bishop Olszowski, married Eleanor of Austria, who became well regarded for her tenure as the Queen of Poland.(The resulting closer relationship with the Austrian Habsburg state contributed to drawing the Commonwealth to its sphere of alliances and into conflicts with the Ottoman Empire.(Anita J. Pramowska  A History of Poland, p. 114)Displeased by the growing Austrian influence, the pro-French camp led by Primate Pramowski and Hetman Jan Sobieski became very active undermining King Michaels rule.  Liberum veto had become entrenched further when the sejm of 1669 was broken before its statutory term expired. In 1672, after more legislative attempts were thwarted and as the Commonwealth was facing an imminent Ottoman invasion, Pramowski demanded the Kings abdication and Michael responded by calling up ruszenie turned into the Confederation of Gob, ostensibly for the countrys defense, but in fact to protect and promote the monarchs faction.(File:Charles Brendel 001.jpg|thumb|left|166px|of Austria, Queen of PolandHumiliated by the of Buchach the Commonwealth faced also a civil war, as Sobieski, dismissed from his office by the Gob Confederation, established a competing Confederation of Szczebrzeszyn. After fruitless bickering and the death of the pro-French partys royal candidate, urged by wartime necessities, the two confederations eventually became reconciled in 1673. The accord made possible a common sejm, which was able to come up with the necessary fiscal and military measures.(After King Michaels death, the election of 1674 elevated John Sobieski, who because of recent field successes on the Ottoman front was able to outdistance other early favorites, including Duke Charles of Lorraine. Sobieski was an educated and well-traveled man of many interests and pursuits, son of Sobieski, an accomplished parliamentarian and diplomat. A great military leader, III Sobieski became fascinated by the possibility of establishing a natively Polish ruling dynasty, and like his predecessors he allowed the succession issue to consume his attention in vain, at the expense of urgent matters of the deteriorating state.(File:Wilanw Canaletto.PNG|thumb|right|275px|King III Sobieski died in Wilanw near Warsaw, where he had built a splendid palaceJohn III initially intended to implement his various plans, including a conquest of the of Prussia, succession for his descendants and parliamentary reform, through an alliance with France. Facing determined opposition from the pro-Austrian magnate camp, after 1678 the King abandoned his pro-French policies and collaborators. Deprived as a result of significant domestic support for his projects, Sobieski from 1686 also had to contend with Austria, Brandenburg and Sweden, which agreed to act together to prevent changes in the Polish free election system (Russia and Austria joined in similar understanding in 1675).( Augustyn Lubomirski.jpg|thumb|left|160px|Hieronim LubomirskiDuring the sejm of 1688/1689 the Kings supporters demanded decisive action against the increasingly bold domestic opposition, but John III was growing week and refrained from forcefully acting against his enemies and pursuing his aspirations.(The 1691 marriage of Jakub Ludwik Sobieski, the Kings eldest son, with Hedwig of Neuburg resulted in moderate improvement of relations with Vienna.(The last years of the reign of the ailing king saw the disorder, lawlessness, factional infighting and anarchy overcoming the Commonwealth. The monarch was not even able to control the feud between his wife Marie Casimire and their son Jakub. John IIIs death in 1696 commenced the longest, most contentious and corrupted interregnum in the countrys history.( CommonwealthSaxony personal union  Early Wettin rule, Great Northern War File:IRP.PNG|thumb|right|300 px|The Commonwealth in 1701The situation in the Commonwealth had changed to some degree after the election of 1697 and the unexpected ascent of II the Strong of the of Wettin, the ruler (as Frederick Augustus I) of the affluent of Saxony. He invested large sums, obtained foreign support and converted to Catholicism to ensure his election, but the voting process did not give him a clear victory. The early favorite, Louis, Prince of Conti, had many supporters and was proclaimed a king-elect by the Primate, Stefan Radziejowski. Augustus and his followers acted however more quickly and decisively than the French prince, whose belated arrival in Danzig area, where he sailed, but was blocked by supporters of Augustus from landing in the city,(Anita J. Pramowska  A History of Poland, p. 117) was not enough to prevent the Saxon from gaining the throne. This result was confirmed after the initial unrest by the pacification sejm in 1699.(The personal union of the Commonwealth and Saxony lasted for over half a century, but joined two basically dissimilar political and economic entities, each of which resented the close integration and unification persistently attempted by Augustus. This difficulty naturally checked the rulers absolutist tendencies in both states and his pursuit of the Wettin family dynastic domination. The ambitious and able Augustus, who aspired to follow in the footsteps of Louis XIV without regard for the practical limitations of his particular situation, weakened by his adventurous undertakings both Poland and Saxony.(File:Stolpen-August.der.Starke.JPG|thumb|left|200px|II the StrongAugustus II stationed the powerful Saxon army within the Commonwealth and applied various external pressures in order to alter its political system, which only alienated the Polish nobility and further demoralized the broader society, relegated to watching the corrupt but unsuccessful at all levels establishment. The Commonwealth military lacked talented commanders and lost its will to fight for a cause, even though during the Northern War it could be up to 50,000 men strong (in addition to the Saxon army of 30,000). After 1717 the radically reduced Polish army had become a neglected rump of its former self. The Commonwealth diplomacy likewise fell into obscurity, in spite of the extensive resident European diplomatic service maintained by Augustus II and staffed mostly by Saxons. The Commonwealth had become a passive participant of European politics, which contrasted with the activist, but unconcerned in this respect Saxon court.(At the outset of his reign Augustus II arrived at an understanding with Frederick III, Elector of Brandenburg, which allowed the Hohenzollern ruler to take over Elbing (Elblg) in 1698. The strong negative reaction in the Commonwealth provided one more opportunity for attacking the former Prussian vassal, which might have been Augustus objective. But the matter was resolved through negotiations and Fredericks withdrawal from the city in 1700, only to be followed by partial reoccupation of the area in 1703.(Jzef Andrzej Gierowski  Rzeczpospolita w dobie zotej wolnoci (16481763) (The Commonwealth in the era of golden liberty (16481763)), p. 238-239)(File:Kazimierz Jan Pawe Sapieha.PNG|thumb|right|175px|Kazimierz Jan Sapieha was defeated by Lithuanian rivals in 1700; his kin served XII of Sweden in an attempt to regain influenceA treaty involving Saxony, Russia and Denmark, through which the signatories sought to recover territories previously appropriated by Sweden, was concluded in 1699 and became a prelude to the Northern War. The Danes were worried by the Swedish penetration of Holstein, peace with the Ottoman Empire allowed I of Russia to direct his attention to the north, and Augustus II represented the Polish claim to Livonia, where his protection had been requested by Patkul, a representative of the Livonian nobility.(The hostilities were initiated early in 1700, when the Danes attacked Holstein and Augustus tried to take over Riga by a sudden action. But the Swedish army was prepared and under the exceptional command of Charles XII, allied with England and the Netherlands, soon forced Denmark to accept peace and routed Peter Is larger force at the Battle of Narva. Augustus II, unable to take Riga even after a long siege, wanted to pull out of the war. For Sweden however the union of Saxony and the Commonwealth seemed a strategic and economic threat and Charles demanded that Augustus relinquishes the Polish throne as the condition for peace. The Swedish monarch expected considerable support within the Commonwealth, where in Lithuania the powerful and abusive Sapieha magnate faction was defeated in a civil war (Battle of Valkininkai (Olkieniki) in November 1700) and the oligarchs appealed to Charles for protection and removal of Augustus.(of Stanisaw Leszczyski in 1704.PNG|thumb|left|275px|Leszczyskis election was enforced by the Swedish troops presentCharles defeated the Saxon army at a battle near Riga in 1701, took over Courland and entered the Commonwealth, at that time not an official participant of the war. The Swedes took Warsaw and moved toward Cracow, which also fell as the Saxon and Polish forces were beaten at Kliszw in July 1702. Further Saxon defeats took place the following year at Putusk and Thorn (Toru), which split the Commonwealth nobility and intensified the anti-Saxon opposition led by Cardinal Radziejowski. A confederation in Warsaw, based mainly on Poland nobility, was convened, and following the wishes of Charles XII, proclaimed a dethronement of Augustus on Feb. 14, 1704. On July 12, the election as king of Leszczyski, the Voivode of Pozna, took place. It was the first free election the outcome of which was imposed by a foreign ruler and the young, well-educated Polish magnate chosen was completely subservient to Charles. Stanisaws elevation was followed by a country-wide civil war and by the of Warsaw (1705), the intention of which was to subjugate the Commonwealth to Swedish dominance. The Swedish monarch was granted permanent extensive territorial and other concessions, such as the right to station and conscript troops, and intended to use the Commonwealths resources  to fight Russia, his main adversary.(File:Stanislas Leszczynski before 1709.PNG|thumb|right|195px|LeszczyskiThe majority of the Polish nobility opposed the Warsaw Confederation and considered Leszczyskis election illegal. The predominant pro-Augustus party convened the Confederation in May 1704 under Stanisaw Denhoff as marshal, declaring their intent to defend the King and the integrity of the state and seeking the Tsardoms protection. Accordingly the of Narva was concluded on August 30, 1704 in the recently won by the Russians Narva, with the purpose of facilitating a common front against Sweden, giving Russia the right to fight Swedish armies on the Commonwealths territory. The Commonwealth was promised a (never realized) recovery of Livonia and the Tsardom obliged itself to help in suppressing the Cossack uprising of Paliy in the Ukraine, but the treaty opened opportunities for Russias future involvement in the affairs of the Commonwealth.(The developments on the military front did not however proceed as hoped for by the pro-Saxon majority. The common Russian-Saxon-Polish offensive had failed, as Charles forced the Russians to abandon Grodno and the Saxon-led coalition army was defeated in 1706 at the of Fraustadt. As a result of the favorable for him outcomes at the of the Spanish Succession, Charles XII was able to enter the Roman Empire and occupied Saxony. Augustus II had to agree to humiliating terms of the Treaty of Altranstdt of 1706, in which he renounced the Polish crown.(File:Battle of Kalisz 1706.png|thumb|left|175px|of Kalisz 1706Prior to the treaty ratification Augustus still managed to defeat at Kalisz a combined Swedish and Warsaw Confederation force, which left most of the Commonwealth clear of the Swedish occupiers, until Charles entered through Silesia again. The Sandomierz Confederation held to their alliance with I of Russia also during the Charles Moscow offensive, when the Russian troops left the country. Stanisaw Leszczyskis forces, charged with protecting the rear end, were defeated by his and Charles Polish adversaries at the of Koniecpol. Stanisaw and Swedish units, thwarted by the Sandomierz confederates again, were unable to break through to join Charles who was stuck in Ukraine, where the Cossack hetman Mazepa largely failed to deliver on his promised support for the Swedes.(Jzef Andrzej Gierowski  Rzeczpospolita w dobie zotej wolnoci (16481763) (The Commonwealth in the era of golden liberty (16481763)), p. 267) The Swedish relief force approaching from Livonia was destroyed by the Russians, and thus the actions of the Sandomierz Confederation alliance significantly contributed to Charles ultimate failure at the of Poltava in 1709.(de Grote.jpg|thumb|right|175px|Russias extensive involvement in the affairs of the PolishLithuanian Commonwealth began with Tsar Peter I the GreatAfter Poltava the remaining Swedish troops were removed from the Commonwealth and the rule of Augustus II was restored, as Leszczyski sought refuge in Swedish-controlled Stettin. Charles XII found his in Bender under the Ottoman rule and was still a cause of unrest in the Commonwealth. The War (17101711) instigated by Charles ended in the defeat of Tsar Peter, who was obliged to remove his forces from the Commonwealth. Augustus expeditions into Western Pomerania in 1711-1713 with the Danes and Russians resulted only in the Prussian takeover of Stettin.(Under the circumstances Augustus wanted to terminate his participation in the war and free himself from his dependence on Peter I, previously formalized under the Treaty of Thorn of 1709, but achieved only a partial success. Attempts at peace with Sweden, which would strengthen Augustus hand in dealing with Peter, turned also elusive, as Charles XII kept making excessive demands, including high reparations for Leszczyski. Resumption of hostilities necessarily followed, because Charles, having returned from his exile, embarked on building of an army in Stralsund, threatening Saxony and Poland. A of Stralsund (17111715) undertaken jointly by the forces of Saxony, Prussia and Denmark ended in its capture and basically concluded the Saxon participation in the great war. Saxony-Commonwealth ended up as the only power in the victorious coalition without any territorial gains.((Jzef Andrzej Gierowski  Rzeczpospolita w dobie zotej wolnoci (16481763) (The Commonwealth in the era of golden liberty (16481763)), p. 273)File:Stanisaw Ledchowski 1.JPG|thumb|left|175px|Ledchowski was the influential marshal of the Confederation and of the SejmThe activities of Augustus II were aimed at strengthening his royal power in the Commonwealth. Nobilitys opposition to the stationing of Saxon troops in Poland, its cost and internally threatening role led to military resistance first attempted in 1714, and then in a more definitive way pursued in 1715, when the action unified the pro-Swedish and pro-Russian camps, and Peter Is support was secured. In the fall the Crown army became organized in an anti-Saxon capacity and fighting commenced, with large scale participation not only of szlachta, but also oppressed by military contributions peasants. In November the Confederation, with Ledchowski as its marshal was formed, having the goal of removing the Saxons from the Commonwealth.(The spreading movement, unable to fulfill its mission alone, requested mediation by Peter I. Augustus agreed and several months of negotiations facilitated by the Russian ambassador followed, with the fighting still intermittently taking place. Eventually Augustus asked for an intervention by Russian forces, the confederates were defeated by the Saxons at the Battle of Kowalewo, and on November 3, 1716 a treaty between the King and the Polish nobility was signed in Warsaw. The treaty was ratified by the one-day Sejm of Feb. 1, 1717, so called because no debate was allowed. The outcome was a compromise arrived by the negotiating representatives of the King and of the Tarnogrd Confederation, but the Tsardoms mediation and supervision marked a turning point in the Polish-Russian relations.(File:Rodzina Sieniawskich.jpg|thumb|right|315px|The Sieniawski family of Polish nobles; Ernest Denhoff first, Elbieta Sieniawska ne Lubomirska third from the leftThe Treaty of Warsaw and the Silent Sejm settled numerous contentious issues and resulted in limited reform of the state, encompassing a part of what was demanded by the more enlightened szlachta political publicists (Stanisaw Szczuka, Dunin-Karwicki). Poland-Saxony relationship was strictly limited to a union. Saxon ministers were barred from ruling on matters concerning the PolishLithuanian Commonwealth. The King was to be able to keep only 1200 personal guard Saxon soldiers and was not allowed to reside in Saxony for prolonged periods. The Commonwealth military force was practically limited to 18,000 soldiers, but was secured by permanent taxing arrangements. The state budget, while enlarged, was set at only a fraction of that of Russia or Prussia. Hetman level chief military commanders had their privileges reduced. Limitations were also imposed on legal competence of regional sejmik assemblies, which turned out to be difficult to implement because of continuous inadequacy of central sejm.(File:Adam Mikoaj Sieniawski.jpg|thumb|left|175px|Mikoaj SieniawskiThe reversals suffered by Poland and Saxony in the course of the Great Northern War reflected a new configuration of forces in Europe and were of lasting nature, of which the contemporaries were not immediately aware. VI, Holy Roman Emperor and I of Great Britain worked out an alliance with Augustus II in Vienna in 1719 aimed at checking the expansion of imperial Russia, but requiring participation of the Commonwealth. Peter I however cooperated with the Commonwealth by withdrawing his forces that same year and accordingly the sejm would not ratify the treaty. Augustus was still able to largely free himself from Peters protectorate, but in return was excluded from the of Nystad negotiations, which concluded the war in 1721. Russia took Livonia and the Commonwealth no longer shared a border with Sweden. In real terms Poland, besides Sweden, was the main victim of the war because of the damage inflicted on its population, economy, degree of independence, ability to function politically and potential for self-defense.( Later Wettin rule, Polish Succession War, magnate factions Blutgericht.jpg|thumb|right|300px|Lutherans executed in Thorn in 1724The last fifteen years of the rule of Augustus II the Strong was characterized by the continuation of magnate factions private pursuits, but also by the arrival of long-awaited peace and the formation of the Commonwealths reformist camp. Augustus II, after 1717 having his most ambitious or extreme undertakings curtailed, concentrated on ensuring the Polish succession for his son Friedrich August, which was opposed both domestically and by foreign powers. Augustus was seeking the support of Austria and had imperial political ambitions. Son Frederick Augustus converted to Catholicism and in 1719 married Maria Josepha, daughter of Emperor Joseph I.(In the Commonwealth Augustus was frustrated by the dogged opposition of the Crown Hetman and Lithuanian Hetman, who fought the royal court, themselves  protected by Tsar Peter. They broke successive parliamentary sessions and by 1724 forced the King to remove his trusted minister, Heinrich von Flemming, from the command of a key military formation.(Poniatowski (1676-1762).PNG|thumb|left|166px|Stanisaw Poniatowski married Konstancja Czartoryska; they were the parents of Stanisaw Antoni Poniatowski, future kingAt this point Augustus was able to use the of Thorn (Toru) to his political advantage. The tumult was a religious disturbance and confrontation involving Catholics and Protestants, followed by a verdict of the state court, which sentenced ten Protestants to death. The affair reflected general deterioration of religious tolerance in the Commonwealth, was widely condemned abroad and only the death of Peter I prevented a foreign military intervention prepared in response, with the participation of William I of Prussia. Augustus refused to intercede on behalf of the condemned and his standing among the unrepentant and unyielding szlachta improved. Subsequent efforts to normalize Polands foreign relations came to an end when the Commonwealth became engulfed in factional fighting, of which the two recently formed great rival magnate camps, led respectively by the family and the family, were the main participants.(The party of the newly-prominent Czartoryskis, known as the Familia, expressed patriotic concerns, displayed political activism, was of modern outlook, connected to Augustus II and included powerful luminaries such as Aleksander Czartoryski, Fryderyk Micha Czartoryski and Stanisaw Poniatowski, a highly accomplished general and diplomat, formerly in the service of Charles XII of Sweden.( Czartoryska Poniatowska.JPG|thumb|right|166px|Konstancja CzartoryskaThe Potockis camp attempted to counteract the rise of the Familia and united the majority of historically most outstanding families, including the Lithuanian clans of the Radziwis, Sapiehas and Ogiskis; among their leaders were Potocki and Andrzej Potocki, the Primate. The partisan, ruthless competition for top offices prevented central parliamentary function toward the end of the rule of Augustus II. Konarski, a prominent pioneering reformer, condemned the breaking of the sejm proceedings and defended the Familias point of view in his debut as a publicist in 1732.(Augustus II counted on the Familias support regarding the Polish succession of his son Frederick Augustus, but as XV of France married Leszczyska, the chances of her father, the former king of short duration Leszczyski, kept increasing, until he gained the support of both magnate camps and of much of szlachtas rank and file. But the powers surrounding the Commonwealth ended up opposed to both candidacies. In order to control the situation within their weak Polish neighbor they had concluded several pacts beginning in 1720 in Potsdam between Russia and Prussia, and culminating with the of the Three Black Eagles of 1732, which involved also Austria and designated a Portuguese to be the future king of Poland. Augustus IIs last minute desperate machinations and scheming were interrupted by his death on February 1, 1733.(File:StanislausLeszczynski03.jpg|thumb|left|175px|Leszczyski had his second chance as a kingA large majority of the Polish nobility, in a rare show of unity, elected Leszczyski on September 12, 1733. The former antiking however lacked strong support even from France and had to sneak into Warsaw in disguise.(The Saxon court in the meantime was able to arrive at an understanding with St. Petersburg and Vienna, and through the concessions extended, including giving up Courland for a favorite of Tsaritsa of Russia, secured their support in the secret Lwenwolde Treaty.(Ragsdale, Hugh (1993) Imperial Russian foreign policy Cambridge University Press, Cambridge, England, page 3233, ISBN 0-521-44229-X) Willing Polish nobles were found,(Corwin, Edward Henry Lewinski (1917) The political History of Poland Polish Book Importing Company, New York, page 286288, ) Russian soldiers were brought in and the Wettin was elected as Augustus III on October 5. The crown of the Commonwealth, in dispute again, was to be decided through the force of arms.(Frederick Augustus army entered the Commonwealth and took Krakw, where his crowning took place in January 1734. Stanisaw Leszczyski went to Danzig, where he waited in vain for serious help from France. The city itself supported him, and surrounded by the Russian and Saxon forces, put up a brave defense for four months, but when the attempted rescue by the Crown army was thwarted by the Russians, Danzig had to surrender on May 29, 1734.(File:Siege of Danzig 1734.PNG|thumb|right|300px|of Danzig (1734)Leszczyskis supporters captured there were forced to recognize Augustus, while the King himself escaped and found refuge in Prussia under the protection of Frederick William. From Knigsberg Stanisaw issued a manifesto in November 1734, in response to which the Confederation was set up near Tarnobrzeg, under Taro as its marshal. The confederates mustered up armed resistance, dedicated to the defense of the Commonwealths integrity and independence, but the forces of Russia and Saxony encountered no great difficulty in eliminating their units.(France, victorious over Austria in the West, lost its (never very strong) interest in supporting Stanisaw Leszczyski and signed an armistice in Vienna in 1735, which became a peace treaty there in 1738. Leszczyski had to relinquish the Polish crown and was compensated with the Duchy of Lorraine, as his fief for life.(Augustus III of Poland.jpg|thumb|left|175px|Augustus IIIIn the Commonwealth the situation stabilized with the Sejm of 1736, which finally assigned top state offices, to Jzef Potocki (the Crown Hetman) and the main electors of Augustus. The foreign forces left the Commonwealth, but its sovereignty remained badly compromised and the Polish nobility in reality had lost its most cherished privilege, the free election of the countrys monarchs.(Augustus IIIs deteriorating health caused him eventually to give up and transfer political activity to his powerful courtiers, including Minister von Brhl and Marshal Jerzy Mniszech. After 1754 Augustus court supported reformist activities of the Familia, still involved in the infighting of the magnate parties. Saxon defeats in the Years War that followed caused complete political stagnation of the Dresden court and its Polish supporters camp.(The internal political fight was influenced by the early Enlightenment ideology and the awareness of the deteriorated condition of the PolishLithuanian state. The necessity of reforms, including urgent social issues such as economic and political empowerment of the urban classes and personal freedom for the peasantry, was being addressed in numerous written works. Stanisaw Konarski embarked on an educational reform, Stanisaw Poniatowskis publication expounded the comprehensive reform program of the Czartoryski party, including a promotion of mercantilism and economic development, before the sejm of 1744.  Antoni Potocki of the competing camp likewise postulated fundamental internal reforms.( File:Jan Klemens Branicki.PNG|thumb|right|166px|Klemens Branicki succeeded Potocki as Crown HetmanThe magnate factions utilized foreign help: the Potocki group was supported by Prussia of Frederick II, the Familia of the Czartoryskis perceived imperial Russia as the future ultimate arbiter of the Commonwealths fate. Amidst the domestic bickering and foreign meddling the indispensable treasury and military reforms never materialized, despite several apparent opportunities and close calls, most notably at the sejm of 1744. From the 1750s and for the remainder of the reign of Augustus III, the Commonwealth descended into anarchy, corrupt private pursuits and unrestrained violation by foreign forces.(Significant rearrangements were taking place among the powers surrounding the Commonwealth. The now sovereign in the former Ducal Prussia Hohenzollern rulers consolidated their control of the Baltic coast areas also west of the Commonwealths Prussia and were seeking annexations of parts of Polish Pomerania, including a Regia connection between Prussia and the western portions of the Kingdom. While for the time being Russia prevented the realization of these plans, Frederick II directed his attention to the takeover of Silesia, a region which had been under the Bohemian and Austrian control for several centuries.( File:Salon ogrodowy Paacu Branickich.jpg|thumb|left|300px|Branicki Palace gardens in BiaystokTaking advantage of the Habsburg dynastic crisis after the assumption of the throne by Theresa, he invaded Silesia in 1740. The Austrians tried to recover the conquered area, but were defeated at the of Mollwitz and then became preoccupied with the of the Austrian Succession. The of Breslau and of Berlin (1742) gave Prussia the majority of the Silesian territory. Prussia became Polands only western neighbor and the Prussian advances threatened the (thus far strong) ethnically Polish, often Protestant, Silesian populations with increased Germanization pressures. The Habsburg state had a much better record of tolerating minority cultures than the Hohenzollerns in Prussia.(The first Silesian war was followed by the second (17441745), terminated by the of Dresden, and the third (17561763). Saxony participated in all three, hoping for a territorial connection with the Commonwealth. The Saxon army, allied with Prussia, was destroyed during Fredericks Olomouc campaign in 1742. For the second (when the Electorate was invaded by Prussia) and the third war Saxony switched to supporting the Habsburgs, seeking unsuccessfully to involve Poland during the sejm of 1744. The of Warsaw (1745) failed to substantially strengthen Augustus position in the Commonwealth.(File:Canaletto (I) 005.jpg|thumb|right|375px|Dresden, the capital of Saxony, as seen by CanalettoThe Years War brought a demise of the Saxon army, which attacked by the Prussians capitulated at Pirna in 1756; Saxony found itself under Prussian occupation. Despite the far reaching Prussian and Russian expansionist designs, the of Hubertusburg preserved the territorial status quo in the area in 1763. While the Saxon defeats precluded a continuation (beyond Augustus III) of the Wettin personal union with the Commonwealth, the disarmed and defenseless Noble Republic was ripe for definite territorial encroachments on the part of the neighboring powers.(The union with Saxony was of beneficial economic and cultural consequences for both participating societies. The Saxons were important in the dissemination of the early Enlightenment intellectual currents in the Commonwealth. Aleksander Jabonowski, the founder of a scientific society in Leipzig, was one of the Poles active in Saxony. The personal union times were to be remembered as a period of positive Polish-German interactions.( Sarmatism era culture  Sarmatism and Counter-Reformation File:Portret trumienny B. D. Lubomirskiej.jpg|thumb|left|200px|portrait of a noblewomanIn the realm of culture the 1648-1764 period was dominated by the style of Baroque, with the final decades constituting also the early Enlightenment. The middle of the 18th century was a period of transition between the two. Being a part of the nonhomogeneous European Baroque, the Commonwealth holds a unique, original position. West European elements were blended with Oriental influence and native styles and traditions, all fully combined within the broader regional Sarmatism culture.(Close cultural contacts with Italy, which originated during the Renaissance, had remained strong ever since. Numerous Italian artists worked in the Commonwealth, supported by the royal and magnate courts, while many among the Polish upper nobility traveled to Italy to study, participate in pilgrimages or for sightseeing, and increasingly also to France, to cultivate aristocratic contacts and familiarize themselves with Western ways of life at major centers such as Paris or Versailles.(In the 18th century the growing French cultural influence had become dominant, which paralleled the rising political importance of France in Europe and the flowering of its arts and literature. The two queens who were French, Marie Louise and Marie Casimire, contributed greatly to cultural contacts and to the increasingly common family ties between the French and Polish aristocratic circles. The court of Augustus II, himself an admirer of the French and follower of Versailles patterns, strengthened the trend and the language was by then in common use, but mostly within the magnate class.(German cultural patterns influenced strongly the German and Protestant burghers, especially in Royal Prussia and Pozna area, some of whom were educated at Protestant universities in Germany. The German culture became significant in the 18th century Commonwealth in the context of the personal union with Saxony. Less prevalent, but also present was the influence of other Protestant West European cultures, among which at the earlier stages the Dutch was more significant than English. Jewish burgher circles in the Commonwealth were important in trade and cultural contacts. Some Jews were educated abroad at the few European universities that accepted Jewish candidates.((Jzef Andrzej Gierowski  Rzeczpospolita w dobie zotej wolnoci (16481763) (The Commonwealth in the era of golden liberty (16481763)), p. 191-192)File:Psalmodia.jpg|thumb|left|175px|In Psalmodia polska Kochowski proclaimed the special mission of Poles as a chosen nationThe Eastern influences became clearly discernible and had been increasing throughout the 17th century. The nobility of the Commonwealth developed a preference for Tatar, Turkish, Persian and also East Slavic artistic tastes, which had to do with the wars fought on the Islamic front and the spoils brought back and with the presumed Sea shores (Sarmatian) origins of Polish nobles. Literary and linguistic interests were also pursued in that direction.((Jzef Andrzej Gierowski  Rzeczpospolita w dobie zotej wolnoci (16481763) (The Commonwealth in the era of golden liberty (16481763)), p. 192)From the early 17th century the culture of Polish Baroque was ideologically based on Sarmatism and Counter-Reformation, which during that century were fused into one powerful current of Catholic national mission. The Polish, Lithuanian and Ruthenian nobilities were thus reduced to one messianic nation of common origin, whose calling was the defense of Christianity and freedom in Europe. This uniquely understood role of the chosen Polish nation was being promoted by the leading writers of the period, including Potocki and Kochowski, and was to remain a part of the national mystique for a long time. The practical byproducts of this supposedly civic-minded, self-elevating point of view were parochialism, xenophobia, stagnation and intolerance. The Polish Catholic Church had remained likewise nationalistic and intellectually backward until the 18th century, when the reforms of the of Trent were belatedly and gradually implemented. The enormous proliferation of monasteries of several orders had at that time little constructive influence on the nations spiritual life or level of popular education. The witch trials and executions for example, although not as common as in Germany, had been a continuous practice until the middle of the 18th century.(File:August II of Poland and Friedrich Wilhelm I of Prussia.PNG|thumb|right|200px|Augustus II with William I of Prussia, who aspired to protect the Protestants of the CommonwealthThe Polish populace was by and large brought back into the fold of Catholicism during the first half of the 17th century, but anti-Protestant attacks continued. They most often took the form of written Catholic propaganda pamphlets and strict Church censorship of dissenting views. The one clear instance of active persecution undertaken against a religious minority was the expulsion of the Brethren, who during the Swedish Deluge strongly supported King Charles Gustav. The sejm of 1658 sentenced the so-called Arians to banishment, unless they convert to Catholicism. As a result several hundred families (about five thousand people)(Ilustrowane dzieje Polski (Illustrated History of Poland) by Dariusz Banaszak, Tomasz Biber, Maciej Leszczyski, p. 53. 1996 Podsiedlik-Raniowski i Spka, ISBN 83-7212-020-X.) left the Commonwealth in 1660, while others, threatened with capital punishment and confiscations, faked conversion, only to subject themselves to further statutory persecution. The Polish Brethren were among the most enlightened segments of the society and their expulsion had strong deleterious effects on the countrys intellectual development. Other Protestant denominations remained, at least formally, protected by the rules of the 1573 Confederation. Many Silesian Protestants entered the Commonwealth in order to avoid recatholization in the Holy Roman Empire after the of Westphalia of 1648. Further restrictions however soon followed.(File:St Georges Cathedral .jpg|thumb|left|300px|St. Georges Cathedral of the Greek Catholic Church in LvivThe Arian registry, established after the sects exodus, included in reality a variety of cases under religious prosecution, such atheism or apostasy, official separation from the Church. Apostasy was banned in 1668. From 1673 only Catholics could be granted nobility or indygenat, a recognition (transfer) of foreign nobility status. In 1717, after the Northern War destruction, Protestants were not allowed to restore the structures of their congregations or build new ones. They were banned from holding state offices and removed from central parliament, which was all collected in the sejm statute of 1733, after which Protestants had no longer enjoyed meaningful political rights. Actual cases of religion-inspired violence, such as the Thorn Tumult of 1724, were rare and considerable freedom of religious practice had prevailed. Non-nobles attracted less scrutiny and many foreign persecuted minorities were allowed to settle in the country and keep their religion. The Orthodox Church hierarchy in the Commonwealth were all forced to accept the Union in the early 18th century.(The much-reduced Protestants remained significant. They cooperated among the several denominations and appealed to the of Oliva guarantees or to foreign (Prussian, English and Dutch) protection in case of imposed restrictions. The ethnically Polish and culturally active concentrations that had remained in parts of Silesia, Pomerania and Prussia had the burgher Protestant class as their leading component.( Culture of Mature Baroque File:Hevelius and wife.jpg|thumb|right|200px|Hevelius and his wife Elisabeth making observationsThe predominance of Sarmatism and Counter-Reformation and the weak cultural development of the Commonwealth were closely related to the lowered, in comparison with the previous period, level of general education. What was left of the school system, destroyed or damaged by wars and lack of interest, concentrated on religious education and cultivating the attachment to szlachtas freedoms. The number of parish schools and secondary schools increased in the 18th century, with more serious reform commencing in the 1840s. Many secondary education colleges were conducted by religious orders of the Jesuits and Piarists. In the early 18th century the illiteracy levels may have ranged from about 28% of upper nobility, to 92% of petty nobility, with over 40% for middle nobility and burghers.(Protestant middle schools fared somewhat better, led by the well regarded gymnasiums in Danzig and Thorn. There were accomplished Polish Protestant schools in Silesia, led by the Pietist school in Teschen and the municipal school in Breslau.(File:Andrzej maksymilian fredro.jpg|thumb|left|150px|Maksymilian FredroHigher education institutions remained stagnant for a prolonged period of time. Interested young members of the upper nobility or wealthy burghers went to study in Italy or other West European countries. The Jesuit Breslau Academy was established in 1702 and attracted students form the Commonwealth. The existing native institutions in Cracow, Vilnius, Zamo and Lviv taught mostly scholastic theology and philosophy.(Scientific achievements were accordingly generally modest. The one accomplished astronomer was Hevelius (16111687) of Danzig, noted for the accurate observations of the sky with the equipment he constructed. Adam A. Kochaski and Solski were Jesuit mathematicians and astronomers; the latter one was also an engineer.(File:Stanislaw Herakliusz Lubomirski (1642-1702).jpg|thumb|right|150px|Herakliusz LubomirskiFor history the most important is the heraldry work The Polish Crown (1740) by Niesiecki, which provides a wealth of information on Polish szlachta clans.(Social and political thought produced little that was new. Its main representatives in the 17th century were Opaliski, Maksymilian Fredro and Herakliusz Lubomirski. They postulated limited social reform. In the early 18th century Antoni Szczuka and Dunin-Karwicki proposed legislative, treasury and military reforms.(Ateny (The New Athens), the first encyclopedia published by Chmielowski in 1745-1746, was not scientifically current. Of the popular agricultural handbooks the most complete was produced by Kazimierz Haur in 1675. Polski Ordynaryjny of 1661, the first printed periodical, lasted for a year (41 issues).(Kalendarium dziejw Polski (Chronology of Polish History), ed. Andrzej Chwalba, p. 138, Jakub Basista) The first permanent newspaper was Kurier Polski, published from 1729 by the Piarists and then the Jesuits.(File:Jan Andrzej Morsztyn.PNG|thumb|left|175px|Andrzej MorsztynThe development of literature brought many new genres and themes, with the intended substance of a work often buried within heavy verbiage and other stylistic embellishments. There were hardly any authors ranking with Europes best. The epic form was predominant, mainly as religious, but also historical or fantasy story telling, in both poetry and prose. The pastoral style was popular, for example in romance, as was poetry in general. Preference was typically given to elaborate form. Publishing material that was original and creative was difficult, because of strict church censorship; many aspiring works had remained in manuscript form only.(Andrzej Morsztyn, a magnate active in royal court circles, represented the conceptismo current. He wrote romantic poetry and expert translations of foreign work. Morsztyn was a soldier and poet connected with the Polish Brethren. He had to spend half of his life in exile in Prussia and produced realistic poetry concerned with the hardships and dangers of military life. Another poet and member of the Polish Brethren, Potocki, converted to Catholicism. His poetry depicts the life of Polish landed gentry and historic events. He wrote the epic poem The Conduct of the Khotyn War and was deeply troubled by the social injustice in the Commonwealth and its decline. The szlachta apologist Kochowski expressed no such misgivings, but even he could not conceal the progressive degeneration of his class. In the era of constant warfare the writing of memoirs had become an often practiced art. Chryzostom Pasek was one of the leading in Europe representatives of this genre.(File:Krasinskich 5 01.jpg|thumb|right|185px|Palacelanguage, Polish mingled with Latin, was frequently used in writing. The mid 18th century movement to clear Polish from Latin admixture was led by Konarski and Bohomolec.(Royal court theater continued under John Casimir, John III, August II and August III. Foreign troupes were brought from Italy (Italian repertoire was the most popular), France and Germany. At least ten magnate-supported theaters functioned in Saxon times, including one at the Castle, where Stanisaw Lubomirski staged his comedies, and one at Podhorce, where the historic plays of Hetman Rzewuski were being shown. School theaters were maintained by the Jesuits, Piarists and Theatines and there were religious spectacles for the general public, including plays, passions and scenes, typically with folk elements.(File:Organs in Basilica of St. Mary in Leajsk.jpg|thumb|left|235px|The church organ in Leajsk has been rebuilt several timesMusic served mostly the needs of the Church and had remained under primarily Italian influence. organs were brought from abroad and constructed locally; the instrument built in 1682 in Leajsk is of the highest quality. Many instrumental and vocal ensembles were active at various church institutions. Pkiel composed polyphonic music including cappella masses and the first in Poland cantatas. Sylwester Szarzyski wrote instrumental music of which only one sonata has survived. Secular (court bands) and folk music was also practiced and the mazurka folk dance crystallized during that period. Foreign operas and ballets were staged in Warsaw under Augustus II and Augustus III.(File:Warsaw 1775 by Canaletto.jpg|thumb|right|225px|The Bridgettines Church in Warsaw no longer existsThe finest artistic manifestation of the in Poland is its architecture, developed under the Italian, Dutch, German and French influence, with a strong local component. The new elaborate residential and religious compounds, or the rebuilding of older, war-damaged structures, were financed by magnates and the Church. St. Peter and St. Pauls Church in Vilnius or Church of St. of Padua at Czerniakw, Warsaw are examples of the Baroques richly decorative (see stucco) style. Vault or dome painting, subordinate to the overall aesthetic design, compounded the impression by using optical illusion effects. Sculpture also had the primary function of complementing the design of the interiors.(File:Warszawa1cp.jpg|thumb|left|250px|PalaceThe Palace built in Warsaw in the second half of the 17th century by van Gameren is an impressive monumental structure. Afterwards however residential forms more convenient and intimate, while still preserving much of the former grandeur, were given preference. The Palace of King John III is an early representative of this trend. The Rococo style was triumphant under the Wettin rulers and the present Palace in Warsaw was rebuilt by Augustus II in that manner. Numerous magnate residencies, in Warsaw and throughout the country, where the former fortifications were replaced with parks and pavilions, followed the trend.(Gentry manors were built of wood and so were many country churches. Their builders were local and interesting native styles are still represented in extant structures.(Siemiginowski-Eleuter was a prominent painter, one of several who worked for John III. Lubieniecki and Lubieniecki of the Polish Brethren, painted in the West. Czechowicz represented religious painting in the 18th century. Of particular interest is the Sarmatist portrait painting. Usually anonymous, it often faithfully conveys crucial individual characteristics, even if constrained by its artistic convention, of ordinary Polish nobles and magnates. portraits are an important subcategory of this type.(File:OgrodSaskiStary.jpg|thumb|right|300px|Palace and its gardensEven with its civilizational influence diminished, the Commonwealth continued as a medium or conduit of cultural and diplomatic contacts between the West and the East, with the Polish culture and language being of international importance and retaining its attractiveness in a number of foreign (Tatar, Russian, Wallachian, Moldavian, German) circles and uses. This cultural attraction contributed to the Polonization in the 17th century of the majority of Lithuanian and Ruthenian nobility of the Commonwealth. The ethnically non-Polish urban classes were much less affected by this process and the peasantry still less, so that the apparent cultural and linguistic uniformity of the country was largely an illusion. The ethnically Polish groups west of the Commonwealth (in Silesia and Pomerania) were often disregarded by the Polish establishment as non-nobles, and their ties with the country of their ethnic origin were getting weaker. These factors made it later difficult for Poles to find their proper place within the process of formation of modern European nations and states.( Early Enlightenment File:Gotfryd Lengnich.JPG|thumb|left|175px|LengnichThe Enlightenment currents had been fully developed in Western Europe, especially in England and France, when its ideology and paradigms reached the Commonwealth during the last quarter-century of the union with Saxony period. Augustus II propagated Frances culture, while Stanisaw Leszczyski its social and philosophical thought. Protestant burghers of Prussia came early under the influence of rationalist philosophy. They and many progressive Polish Catholics followed the Saxons and accepted the moderate rationalism of Christian Wolff and were inspired by it.(The postulated by the Enlightenment thinkers social changes depended on an improved level and wider dissemination of education. The Theatines had few colleges in the Commonwealth, but theirs were the first attempts at school reform in the 1830s. In Lunville, Lorraine Stanisaw Leszczyski established a corps of cadets, a school for the Polish and local nobility. The most crucial turned out to be the initiative of Konarski. The young Piarist taught in schools conducted by his order, went to study and teach in Rome, and upon returning via France, Germany and Austria committed himself to pedagogic, scientific and publicist work. In 1740 he established the Nobilium in Warsaw, a high caliber secondary education institution for nobility youth. The school promoted civic duties through such means as debates and the school theater, for which he wrote a tragedy and where Voltaires tragedies were shown. Despite many objections from the Jesuits and others, the trend set by the Collegium Nobillium was followed. In 1754 all the Piarist colleges were reformed and the Jesuit schools soon followed. New textbooks and teacher training methods were implemented. In the area of school theater Konarskis work was continued by Bohomolec, who, revising the out of dated repertoire, wrote or adapted many comedies.(File:Stanisaw Konarski.PNG|thumb|right|175px|KonarskiThe bishops Stanisaw Zauski and Andrzej Zauski became great patrons of science. In 1747 they opened a public library in Warsaw, one of the largest in Europe. Jzef Zauski gathered scientists and charged them with reviving and expanding the Polish scientific and other cultural achievements of the Renaissance era. Foundations were laid for the development of Polish bibliography and many publishing actions were initiated.(Konarski undertook to compile all of the sejm legislative records in his Volumina legum. Andrzej Stanisaw Zauski extended his patronage to the most outstanding historian in the Commonwealth, Lengnich of Danzig, future teacher of Stanisaw Antoni Poniatowski. Lengnich wrote in 1742 Ius publicum Regni Poloniae, an outstanding description of the Polish political system, and a history of Prussia. Related work was done in the first half of the 18th century by a number of researchers in Danzig, Thorn, Elbing and Knigsberg. Scientists of German origin were responsible for and catalyzed much of the early scientific revival in the Commonwealth.(File:Zaluski.jpg|thumb|left|200px|LibraryPublications and periodicals were increasing in number and served the purpose of educating and informing the public. The earliest ones were published in German and many were intended for foreign consumption, beginning with Lengnichs Polnische Bibliothek in 1718-1719. Christoph Mizler of Saxony postulated economic innovations and edited and published Poland related periodicals in German in 1753-1756 (Warschauer Bibliothek, Acta Litteraria), and in Polish Nowe Wiadomoci Ekonomiczne i Uczone (New information economical and learned) in 1758-1761. The Polish Patriot by Bauch of Thorn and Monitor by Kazimierz Czartoryski were the first moral periodicals, dedicated to the new ideology and ethics.(From the circle of Stanisaw Leszczyski came in 1743 (dated 1733) Gos wolny wolno ubezpieczajcy (A free voice in defense of freedom), with a comprehensive program of political and social reform. The publication advocated personal freedom for peasants and taking steps to secure their greater economic independence. Stefan Garczyski wrote in 1750 The Anatomy of the Polish Commonwealth, where he strongly criticized the social and economic plight of the lower classes and promoted economic policies based on mercantilism.(Of special importance were the writings of Stanisaw Konarski. Beyond school reform he fought over many years for reform of the central government and for moral renewal of the noble class, including lessening of the burdens and improving the lot of non-nobility. In his most important work is skutecznym rad sposobie (On ways of effective counsel, ca. 1763), he unveiled a far-reaching program of political reorganization of the Commonwealth.( See also * Commonwealth* of the PolishLithuanian Commonwealth (15691648)* of the PolishLithuanian Commonwealth (17641795)* of Poland (15691795)ReferencesTimothy Snyder, Reconstruction of Nations, p. 24, 2003 New Haven & London, Yale University Press, ISBN 978-0-300-10586-5)
27387124
Carlops
Carlops is a small village in the Hills, within the Borders area of Scotland, close to the boundary with Midlothian.The village was founded in 1784 and developed cotton weaving, coalmining and limestone mining.Its name is a derivative of Witches - Car Leap - lops as near the south of the village there are two exposed rock faces (see external links below for image) about 20 metres in height facing each other with a similar distance between them. Folklore maintained that witches would leap from one face to the other, over the chasm, for entertainment of an evening.See also*of places in the Scottish Borders*of places in ScotlandExternal links*RCAHMS record for Carlops, Spittal*RCAHMS record for Carlops Hill*SCRAN image: Allan Ramsay Hotel, Main Street, Carlops*Geological Conservation Review / JNCC: Subglacial meltwater*GEOGRAPH image:Carlops rock
27409654
Siemens_VAI
Siemens VAI Metals Technologies (formerly Industrieanlagenbau) based in Austria, is an engineering and plant building company for the and steel industry, for the flat-rolling sector of the aluminum industry and for cast mining. It is one of the branches of Siemens Industrial Solutions and focuses on metallurgical services. History  1938 to 1945The history of Siemens VAI is closely linked to the first construction of industrial plants. The English company Brassert & Co began to build the metallurgical plant in Linz in 1938. After the beginning of World War II in 1939, the metallurgical division of Hermann Gring continued with the construction, only to pass it on to the German Mining and Metallurgical association (DBHG) after a short time. The large-scale plant, which was originally planned for metallurgical purposes, was then modified for the arms industry. 1945 to 1956After the air raids of the allied forces in July 1944, the entire facilities were severely damaged. By the end of the war, production had basically stopped. In July 1945, the Alpine Montan AG Hermann Gring plant was renamed to Vereinigte sterreichische Eisen- und Stahlwerke (VEST) (United Iron and Steel Plants). For the plants reconstruction, some divisions were combined into the so-called New Building Division, designed to reconstruct the metallurgical plant in Linz. Thus, the most important metallurgical facilities could all be started up again by the year 1949: the coking plant, blast furnaces, SM-steel making plants (plant with Siemens-Martin-furnace, named after inventors) and heavy plate mills (mills producing plates of over 3 mm thickness). Many of the products were scarce commodities after the war. For this reason, the metallurgical plant was able to recover pretty soon, investing largely into the expansion of its own facilities. Due to the shortage of steel scrap, necessary for the operation of SM blast furnaces, the yearly steel mill capacities of 220,000 tons soon proved to be insufficient. The solution was a new manufacturing process: the LD-process (Linz-Donawitz-process), manufactured in house and commissioned in 1952 in Linz, and 1953 in Donawitz. The huge advantages of this process were cost-saving on the one hand (investment costs were only 65% and operation costs only 55% compared to the SM blast furnace), and larger production capacities on the other. 1956 to 1961 The invention of the LD process and experiences gained from the complete reconstruction after the war led to the first external large-scale commission in the area of industrial plant construction in Rourkela, India, in 1956. It was a great success. Thereafter, many commissions from different metallurgical plants on almost all continents followed. The construction of industrial plants in the steel mill sector soon grew further, with the addition of hot and cold rolling mills as well as the construction of blast furnaces and metallurgical plants additional facilities like granulation plants and dolomite plants. 1961 to 1974 Due to the increasing amount of tasks, the New Construction Division had to be changed into Industrial Construction and Plant Development with a new focus on turnkey projects. 1964, VEST expanded their portfolio once more, this time with the construction of chemical plants, which soon reached a share of more than two thirds of the total turnover. Another milestone was the introduction of the continuous casting technology for the production of slabs. The huge amount of commissions and the increasing expansion of their own facilities led VEST to further increase their hot steel production from 2.3 to 3.1 million tons per year. During this time, the number of employees grew to approximately 4,000 people. An additional center of technology was built in Vienna and additional constructors from Austria as well as from other countries were flown in. In 1973, the two nationalized iron and steel industries VEST and ALPINE merged together and became todays famous voestalpine.  The organization was restructured into the areas of metallurgical plants (seven divisions) and chemical plants (two divisions). 1974 to 1985 When the oil crisis started in 1974, the metallurgical industry was severely affected in all parts of the world. The consequence was a significant decline in prices within the steel sector, which also affected the construction of plants. Still, the area of technology (industrial plant construction and ready-to-use industry) became increasingly important for the company. Thus, the metallurgical plants share of turnover was 80% in 1973 - however, in 1976, the share of the plant construction and ready-to-use industries already amounted to 45%. The company was faced with a lot of restructuring processes and new orientations, but also gained the largest projects ever. In the beginning of the 1980s, first steps were taken towards biotechnology, leading to the construction of a biomass utilization technology center in Linz. In order to adapt to market requirements, the construction of chemical plants also took further measures in the area of environmental protection. A very important step in this area was the acquisition of Korf Engineering GesmbH as a 100% subsidiary, since it included the rights to the COREX process. Because of the continuous high amount of commissions, the effects of the steel crisis were mitigated. However, in 1985 the crisis exploded and in the previous years, political pressure had already been put on the nationalized company with regard to job security. Therefore, the company, which had meanwhile become a diversified group, suffered a record loss in 1984, amounting to a total of 25 billion Schillings. 1985 to present In fall of 1986, the concept of VOEST-ALPINE NEU (VOEST ALPINE NEW) was introduced. This meant that the company now positioned itself as a market oriented technology company, which was based on the knowledge gained previously in the key area of steel. This concept should help the company to recover as quickly as possible. Established strong areas (quality and technology) and creative projects launched by employees were fostered in the construction of plants. Thus, COREX, horizontal continuous casting, and converter and electric furnace processes were further developed, and the electric arc furnace was introduced. Finally, in 1988, VOEST-ALPINE Industrieanlagenbau (VAI) became a proper GesmbH in the framework of the newly established Maschinen- und Anlagenbauholding AG, which belongs to the parent company of IAG.In 1995, VAI was unhinged from voestalpine AG and became a 100% subsidiary of the new Technologie AG (short: VA Tech). VA Tech had emerged from the diversified group of Austrian Industries and was incorporated into the Siemens group in 2005. Werner Auer and Martin Krauss have led the company since 2009. Operations Siemens VAI is represented in more than 40 countries and employs approximately 9,000 people. It is currently involved in projects of the iron and steel industry as well as the flat-rolling sector of the aluminum industry in more than 100 countries. Siemens VAI specializes in the ready-to-use construction of production plants, technologies, and systems within the metallurgical sector. Solutions are offered throughout all stages of production, from ore to finished product, including mechanical supplies and electrics, automation, complete IT solutions as well as innovative services and modernization packages.The core competences of Siemens VAI are to integrate these elements into large-scale projects (Turnkey solutions). Products and solutions complying with latest environmental regulations and reducing emissions play an increasingly important role in the industry. Siemens VAI provides these solutions by offering ready-to-use plants complying with latest standards in the areas of electrics, automation and environmental technologies. More than 500 manufacturers of metallurgical products, representing 70 percent of global steel production, are among the companys costumers. The company itself is not listed on the stock exchange, since it is a 100% subsidiary of AG. Locations Apart from the headquarters in Linz, Austria, Siemens VAI has subsidiaries in Erlangen and Willsttt-Legelshurst (Germany), Great Britain, France, Italy and Worcester (MA, USA).* Linz, Austria (Headquarters)Sintering, smelting reduction, steel production, endless strip production (ESP), cold rolling and hot rolling mills, automation solutions for iron and steel production;* Erlangen, GermanySolutions for metal and mining, support center; solutions for rolling and coke making processes;* Christchurch, Sheffield, Stockton, United KingdomBlast furnaces, hot, cold and foil rolling mills; * Marnate, ItalyWire, rod and section rolling mills, strand guide rollers;* Willsttt-Legelshurst, Duisburg, GermanyElectric arc furnaces, ladle furnaces, vacuum degassing plants and supplies;* Montbrison, Montigny-le-Bretonneux, FrancePickling plants and annealing lines, painting lines, galvanizing and tinning lines; * Massachusetts, USAWire, rod and section rolling mills, strand guide rollers.Products and technologiesThe following procedures and techniques are among the core competences of Siemens VAI Metals and Technologies.	Integrated mills	Minimills	Coking plants	Sinter and pellet plants	Blast furnaces	Corex and Finex ironmaking plants	Direct reduction plants 	LD (BOF) steelmaking plants	Stainless steelmaking plants	EAF steelmaking plants	Secondary metallurgical facilities	Continuous casting plants		Arvedi ESP plants (Endless Strip Production)	Plate and Steckel mills	Hot-strip rolling mills	Cold-rolling mills	Pickling plants 	Aluminum rolling mills	Bar, wire rod, section and rail mills	Strip-processing and finishing lines	Environmental plants	Automation systems	Metallurgical, consulting and financial servicesCokemakingA new camera-based coke-oven monitoring system, referred to as Pumas (PUshing MAnagement System), contributes to improved productivity and safety in cokemaking. Various coke-oven criteria and parameters are measured, analyzed and documented during the coke-oven pushing sequence. The system also includes an optimized battery-machine positioning and interlocking system.Ironmaking/sinteringThe Siemens VAI Selective Waste-Gas Recirculation system allows approximately 30% to 40% of the sinter offgas to recirculated back to the sintering process. The heat and CO content of the recirculated waste gas help reduce solid-fuel consumption. In addition to the positive impact on the sintering operations, the offgas volume directed to the stack is also lowered. This means that the dimensions of the downstream offgas-cleaning facilities can be reduced, leading to a decrease in the related installation and operational costs.The Intensive Mixing and Granulation System from Siemens VAI, which consists of a high-speed intensive mixer and horizontal granulation drum, allows a thoroughly homogeneous sinter raw mix to be achieved. This is the basis for the production of high sinter quality and a stable sintering process. A much higher portion of ultra-fine ores (pellet feed) can be included in the sinter raw mix than in conventional mixing systems. This solution allows blending beds to be dispensed with altogether, significantly reducing raw material storage and handling costs.MerosMeros (Maximized Emission Reduction Of Sintering) is a technology for the treatment of offgas from the sinter plant. In a series of process steps, dust, acidic gases and harmful metallic and organic components present in the sinter offgas are reduced to levels previously unattained in conventional offgas-treatment systems.Ironmaking/blast furnaceThe new Simetal Gimbal Top is a burden-distribution system for blast furnaces.Ironmaking/CorexIn the Corex Process, non-coking coal is primarily used as the energy source and ore reductant for the production of liquid hot metal, substituting expensive coking coal. Operating costs and the environmental impact are therefore far lower compared to the conventional coke-oven, sinter-plant and blast-furnace production route.Ironmaking/FinexThe Finex Process, jointly developed by Posco and Siemens VAI, is a further development of the Corex Process. Hot metal is produced on the basis of low-cost iron-ore fines and non-coking coal. Production costs can be reduced by approximately 15% in comparison with the blast-furnace route. Environmental emissions are lower than in the conventional blast-furnace route because coking and sintering plants are not required.Steelmaking/electric steelmakingThe Ultimate EAF incorporates all of the latest performance-enhancement solutions from Siemens VAI to maximize furnace output and productivity. Tap-to-tap times are possible down to nearly 30 minutes.Steelmaking/LD (BOF) steelmakingVaicon Compact Link is a new converter suspension system from Siemens VAI which features two horizontal links and eight vertical lamellas to accommodate thermal deformations of the LD (BOF) converter and trunnion ring, is ideal where restricted space conditions prevail on the converter platform.Steelmaking and continuous castingLiquiRob is a robotic system specifically developed by Siemens VAI to improve industrial safety in a steelworks environment, especially under dangerous conditions where liquid metal is being handled or processed . A wide variety of tasks, including temperature measurements and sampling of liquid steel in both EAF and LD (BOF) steel mills is automatically performed by LiquiRob and carefully monitored from the safety of the control room, thus considerably enhancing personnel safety.Continuous castingTo date, Siemens VAI has implemented two ultra-thick slab casters capable of casting slabs in thicknesses up to 400 mm at Qinhuangdao Shouqin Metal Material Co., Ltd., China, and at Posco Pohang Works in Korea. The installation of a wide range of advanced technological packages is the basis for the reliable production of sophisticated steel grades used in high-end downstream product applications.Plate rollingWith Mulpic plate-cooling technology, the capability for both accelerated cooling and direct quench cooling over a wide plate-thickness range is provided in a single on-line system. This reduces or eliminates the need for offline heat treatment.Casting-rollingThe Arvedi ESP (endless strip production) process at Acciaieria Arvedi SpA in Cremona, Italy features the production of hot-rolled strip directly from liquid steel in a continuous and uninterrupted process from thin-slab casting to product coiling. The decisive benefits include major energy savings achieved in rolling, the highly compact line length (180 m) and the high quality of the thin-gauge rolled products.Hot-strip millsThe Siroll Power Coiler is a new generation of downcoilers developed by Siemens VAI that allows high-strength steels to be accurately and efficiently coiled over a wide range of strip thicknesses  from 1.2 mm up to 25.4 mm  at strip widths up to 2,800 mm.A new intensive-cooling system for hot-strip mills, known as Power Cooling, allows accelerated strip-cooling rates as high as 400 K/s to be achieved. This solution is ideal for the production of high- and highest-strength steels with thicknesses up to approximately one inch (2.5 cm). The Power Cooling system was implemented for the first time in the Hot-Strip Mill No. 2 of  in Duisburg-Beeckerwerth, Germany in early 2011. External links * Official websiteVAIVAI Metals Technologies
27424107
Sensear
 Sensear is a business in Belmont, Perth, Western Australia and San Francisco, California, USA, that makes and distributes hearing protection and communication equipment. The companys products are designed to protect hearing and allow normal communication.Noise induced hearing lossinduced hearing loss is the most common preventable occupational health problem in the world and has no cure. Permanent hearing damage is a common consequence of working in high-noise environments, a result from the removal of hearing protection.(http://www.safeworkaustralia.gov.au/NR/rdonlyres/3B4D5188-313F-416A-81A4-E7AEF2494AF9/0/NoiseReportwebversion.pdf)How Sensear technology worksThe Sensear earmuffs and earplugs developed by Sensear allow people to talk face to face and use phone two-way radio communication in high noise (above 85 dB(A)) environments while providing hearing protection.Sensear uses a patented software system called SENS that actively listens and seeks out human voices and actively suppresses background noise.(http://news.cnet.com/8301-17938_105-9967223-1.html)Each Sensear unit is the size of a mobile phone and uses a series of directional microphones that process sound from all directions. A complex frequency algorithm determines which direction speech is coming from. Where speech is detected, ambient noise from other directions is suppressed while the speakers voice is enhanced.(http://www.projectlink.com.au/directory/ear-o-tec-pty-ltd/sensear.html)The processed sound is delivered in stereo to the wearer. The units have a Bluetooth capability so users can talk on the phone without removing their protection.Worldwide distributionThe company has recently established distribution and marketing bases in Europe and the US.They supply to manufacturing, mining, construction, military, law enforcement and entertainment industry customers.Customers include Alcoa, Boeing, Qantas, OneSteel and Billiton.(http://www.smartcompany.com.au/information-technology/noise-control-a-sound-innovation-for-sensear.html)AwardsSensear has won several industry awards including an Design Award,(http://www.designawards.com.au/application_detail.jsp?status4&applicationID2622) the DuPont Innovation Award(http://www2.dupont.com/Our_Company/en_AU/innovation_awards/images/finalists.pdf) and two iAwards from the Information Industry Association.(http://www.aiia.com.au/pages/iawardswinners2007.aspx)ReferencesExternal references*http://www.sensear.com
27440934
Bob_Gaddy
 notable_instruments Bob Gaddy (February 4, 1924 &ndash; July 24, 1997) was an American Coast blues and and blues pianist, singer and songwriter. He is best remembered for his recordings of Operator and Rip and Run, and musical work he undertook with Dale, Jimmy Spruill, Terry and McGhee.(Thedeadrockstarsclub.com - accessed May 2010)BiographyGaddy was born in Vivian, Virginia, a small town based around mining.(( He learned to play the piano at a young age, both playing and singing in his local church. In 1943 he was conscripted and served in the Navy, being stationed in California.  He progressed from learning the blues and, using his gospel background, graduated towards the boogie-woogie playing style.( He played in blues clubs in Oakland and Francisco, but after War II finished he relocated to New York in 1946. Gaddy later commented I came to New York just to visit, because I was on my way to the West Coast. Somehow or other, I just got hooked on it. New York got into my system and Ive been stuck here ever since.(  He found work as a blues pianist, and in the late 1940s Gaddy provided accompaniment to both McGhee and Terry. He later backed Dale, and befriended Jack Dupree.  Dupree penned Operator for Gaddy, one of his best selling numbers.( Gaddy recorded firstly for Jackson Records with his debut single being Bicycle Boogie in 1952. Gaddy later spent time with the Jax, Dot and Harlem record labels, before joining Weiss Old Town Records in 1956. It was here that Gaddy had his most commercially successful period, particularly with I Love My Baby, Paper Lady, and Rip and Run. His earlier recordings often had McGhee in the studio with Gaddy, although his Old Town recordings utilised the guitarists Jimmy Spruill and Joe Ruffin, plus saxophonist Jimmy Wright.( Gaddy ceased his recording activities around 1960.  However, along with his long time friend Larry Dale, Gaddy remained a mainstay of the ongoing New York blues scene.(accessdateMay 22, 2010)  In April 1988, Gaddy, Dale and Spruill reunited to play at the Tramps nightclub in New York.()Bob Gaddy died of cancer in Bronx, New York in July 1997, at the age of 73.((Cdbaby.com - accessed May 2010)DiscographySingles*I (Believe You Got A Sidekick) / Bicycle Boogie (1952) - Jackson Records - Bob Gaddy & His Alley Cats*No Help Wanted / Little Girls Boogie (1953) - Jax Records - Bob Gaddy & His Alley Cats*Evil Man Blues / Doctor Gaddys Blues (1954) - Dot Records - Doctor Gaddy & His Orchestra*Blues Has Walked in My Room / Slow Down Baby (1955) - Harlem Records - Doctor Gaddy & His Keys*Operator / I Love My Baby (1956) - Old Town Records - Doctor Gaddy & His Keys*Paper Lady / Out Of My Name (1957) - Old Town Records - Doctor Gaddy & His Keys*Woe Woe Is Me / Rip and Run (1958) - Old Town Records - Doctor Gaddy & His Keys*Take My Advice / You Are the One (1959) - Old Town Records*Till The Day I Die/ Ill Go My Way (1959) - Old Town Records(Compilation albums*Rip and Run (1986) - Ace*Bob Gaddy & Friends: Bicycle Boogie 1947 - 1960 (1987) - Moonshine*Harlem Blues Operator (1995) - Ace(titleAllmusic ((( Bobo Jenkins > Discography > Compilations ))))(( - accessed May 2010)See also*of East Coast blues musiciansReferencesExternal links* Illustrated Bob Gaddy discography
27479327
Winifrede,_West_Virginia
footnotes  Winifrede is an community in Kanawha County, Virginia, States. Winifrede is  southwest of Chesapeake. Winifrede has a office with code 25214.(ZIP Code Lookup) It is home of the Big Eagle Railroad (formerly known as Winifrede  Mining and Manufacturing Company, Winifrede Collieries, and Winifrede Railroad), the oldest railroad in the United States, having been in existence since 1850.()References
27493042
CraFarms
CraFarms (or Crafar Farms) is a group of companies of which Allan, Beth and Frank Crafar were Directors. Crafar Farms was New Zealands largest family-owned dairy business.()  The family business owned 22 dry stock and dairy farms with approximately 20,000 cows in various regions of the North Island, and was put into receivership in October of 2009. Crafar Farms was involved in multiple prosecutions for pollution offences and incidents of poor animal welfare from 2007 to 2011.HistoryAllan and Frank Crafar are brothers who grew up in Wanganui. Their father died when Allan was 11 and he had to hand milk their single cow. Frank left school at 14 and started his first sharemilking job at 16. Frank, along with his other brother Neville, brought a farm in the Manawatu four years later. In 1973 Allan met Beth on a blind date and they started working on Franks farm.() By July 1979, Allan and Frank Crafar had gone from milking 140 cows through an old-style walk through bale cowshed, to 400 cows using the same system after adding a 366 acre leased block in 1978. Production had increased by 28,000kgs annually and their large herd averaged one kilo of fat per day.( ) In 1981 Frank, Allan and Beth brought their first farm together in Reporoa. They began their expansion by buying the neighbours farm the next year and by 1999 had 6,000 cattle on numerous farms around New Zealand. In 2009 they owned 22 farms, 18 of which are dairy, and 20,000 cows,( making them New Zealands largest family owned dairy business.()During the 2000s CraFarms was prosecuted multiple times in the Court for unlawfully discharging stock effluent.( They also were investigated by MAF for animal neglect in 2009 after a video was released on YouTube showing calves starving on one of their farms.( In October 2009 after they could no longer service the mounting debt the farms were placed into receivership.( In 2010 the Ruanui iwi were angered after stock damaged a Pa located at Crafar Farms Hillside Farm.() Following criticism of the Crafars in the media a Facebook page was set up by Oamaru farmer Stephen Smit in support of Allan Crafar. Russell Bouma, the son of a family friend who was murdered in a home invasion meters from the Crafars own home, said they ran their farm for six months without any payment and described them as being extremely efficient operators who have helped out a lot of people. ()Effluent dischargesIn 2001 Forest and Bird Protection Society of New Zealand started a public push for cleaner waterways. They identified dairy farms as a major factor in polluting the waterways, with one cow causing as much pollution as fourteen humans.( The Crafers first prosecution for discharging dairy effluent into waterways came in 2001 when Valley View Ltd, of which Mr Crafar is a director was fined $13,000 for an unlawful discharge of effluent on to land where it could enter waterways.() According to Allan Crafar, from 2003 new compliance codes were implemented that caught out many farmers including the Crafars.( In 2007 two further prosecutions were brought against CraFarms; Plateau Farms at Reporoa was fined $35,000 for unlawfully discharged dairy effluent onto land and Te Pohue Ltd was fined $13,000 for discharging dairy effluent into a tributary of the Esk River.(() In response the Crafars brought new machinery and one of their sons was made a compliance officer with the role of ensuring all the farms complied with the new standards.( Four months later, the Court prosecuted the CraFarm owned Hillside Ltd, Allan Crafar, Frank Crafar and Elizabeth Crafar for 34 dairy effluent discharges. The offences related to dairy effluent spilling from ponds, feed pads, a broken irrigator hose and sumps leading to over-irrigation of paddocks.()  The Environment Court imposed fines on Hillside Farm Ltd, Allan Crafar and Frank Crafar of $29,500 each, and Elizabeth Crafar was fined $1500, for a total fine of $90,000.()Animal welfareOn 29 September 2009, business journalist Bernard Hickey posted a video onto You-tube showing dehydrated calves starving on Crafar Farms Benneydale dairy farm between Tokoroa and Kuiti.() Hickey stated that the Ministry of Agriculture and Forestry (MAF) had inspected the farm on 7 September 2009 (after the video was recorded), and had destroyed many of the calves, as had the staff of the farm, but had allowed the farming to continue. Hickey attributed the lack of animal welfare to bad training of staff and poor management and the pressures of the Crafars extensive debts incurred to expand the Crafar Farms.()On 30 September 2009, animal welfare inspectors inspected all the farms owned by the Crafars for cases of animal neglect.() They stated that there were significant animal welfare issues among the 20,000 cows on the 22 farms owned by the Crafar family,() including incidents of overstocking, inadequate feeding, underweight animals, and lack of shelter for calves. On five Crafar farms 50 cows had to be put down. Allan Crafar was reported as saying MAF had exaggerated the problems and its inspectors had no understanding of farming. He said; Theyve never milked a cow in their lives and never got their hands dirty.() On 7 June 2010, a spokesperson for the Ministry of Agriculture and Forestry informed the Dominion Post that its investigations were not complete and that it was too early to say if prosecutions for offences involving animal cruelty would be laid.()  A MAF spokesman said that the investigation was taking time due to the need to assess ownership, control and responsibility for animal welfare within the complex relationships of the Crafar Farms group.()() On June 2011, five people involved with Crafers Taharua Dairy Farm pleaded not guilty to 714 charges of alleged animal welfare offences.()Receivership and saleOn 5 October 2009 Crafar Farms had been placed into receivership by its lenders and that Michael Stiassny and Brendon Gibson had been appointed as receivers.() The New Zealand Herald reported that Westpac, Rabobank and PGG Wrightson Finance, were owed about $NZ200 million, and had placed Crafar Farms into receivership as it was in breach of the covenants of the loans.() The Crafars say that the recession and a drop in the Fonterra payout was a major factor in their business going into recievership. In 2007 Fonterra paid a record $7.90 per kilo of milk solids, this dropped by two dollars in 2008 and was just $4.55 in 2009. The Crafars had expanded rapidly by using their existing farms as leverage, and could no longer service their debt.(The company Natural Dairy (NZ) Holdings, which previously had been known as the China Jin Hui Mining Corporation, agreed to buy the Crafar family farms pending approval of the Investment Office.() Prime Minister Key raised concerns about the sale of land to overseas interests,() and the Chinese company objected to a (lower) bid by government-owned Landcorp.() In December 2010, acting on the recommendation of the Overseas Investment Office, the Government decided not to approve Natural Dairy NZs application to buy 16 farms from receivers.() In January 2011 Pengxin International Group Limited, based in Shanghai, had made an offer to purchase the 16 North Island farms and intended to apply to the Overseas Investment Office for permission.()See also*in New Zealand*farming in New ZealandReferences
27511252
Cleveland_by-election,_1902
The Cleveland by-election, 1902 was a parliamentary by-election held for the House of Commons constituency of Cleveland in the Riding of Yorkshire on 5 November 1902.VacancyThe by-election was caused by the resignation on the grounds of ill-health of the sitting Liberal MP, Alfred Edward Pease. (The Times, 15 September 1902 p6) Pease had held the seat since winning it at a by-election in 1897. He had previously served as MP for York from 1885 until 1892. Pease had apparently indicated that he was in declining health before the general election of 1900 but was pressed by his local Liberal Association to contest that election. He did so on condition that if his condition made it impossible for him to sit for the whole Parliament he would be allowed to resign and he now felt he had to step down. (The Times, 15 September 1902 p6) Despite this plea of poor health, Pease actually lived for another 37 years and spent much of the rest of his life in East Africa hunting game and entertaining travellers who came for the safaris.CandidatesLiberalsThe Liberals had a large number of potential candidates to choose from, including officials from the local Miners Association. The miners had always supported the Liberal candidates in the Cleveland Division (The Times, 19 September 1902 p5) and the Liberals wished to ascertain the attitude of the Miners before selecting a candidate. (The Times, 27 September 1902 p10) The local Association resolved to wait for the outcome of a conference called by the miners on 11 October before deciding on their candidate. (The Times, 6 October 1902 p4)  In the event, the miners were unable to make a decision in time. The delay meant that the Liberals had to press ahead with the selection of a candidate. At a meeting at Guisborough on 18 October 1902, two possible candidates were put forward, the Hon. Philip Stanhope who had been Liberal MP for Wednesbury and Burnley and Herbert Samuel. (The Times, 20 October 1902 p8)  Stanhope was said by his proposer, Joseph Walton MP to be acceptable to Labour leaders, including Hardie. Samuel, who had been left a fortune by his father, a partner in the banking firm of Samuel and Montagu, had taken more or less full time interest in Liberal politics since before going to College, Oxford. He had tried unsuccessfully to enter the House of Commons twice before at South Oxfordshire. (Bernard Wsserstein, Herbert Louis Samuel in Oxford Dictionary of National Biography online, OUP 2004-10 )  Samuel was supported at the meeting by the retiring Liberal MP, Alfred Pease and emerged the victor by a majority of about three-to-one. (The Times, 20 October 1902 p8) LabourIt was reported that the ironstone miners in the Cleveland Division were minded to bring forward a Labour candidate. (The Times, 15 September 1902 p6) A visit to the constituency by Bruce Glasier, the chairman of the Labour Party took place on 17 September 1902. Glasier said that if the miners wanted a Labour candidate the ILP would assist but that if they decided to combine with the Liberals in support of a progressive representative, (as had traditionally been the case) the ILP would oppose that, raising the prospect of a split in the anti-Tory vote.  (The Times, 18 September 1902 p5) The Cleveland Miners held a meeting at Middlesbrough on 29 September to discuss their approach. While they were not opposed in principle to supporting the Liberals if a candidate sympathetic to the cause of labour could be found, probably to stand as a Lib-Lab, the officials felt the time had come for labour to be more directly represented. (The Times, 19 September 1902 p5) On 23 September, Keir Hardie made a speech at Marske and urged the miners and other trade unionists to bring forward their own candidate. Rather hectoringly, he said that if they failed in their obvious duty, the ILP would stand a candidate. (The Times, 24 September 1902 p8) The miners resolved to stand their own man and called on the Labour Representation Committee to hold a conference on 11 October to discuss the matter. (The Times, 30 September 1902 p9) Despite Keir Hardies presence, and the moving of a resolution welcoming the prospect of a labour candidate, reservations were expressed about the timing and cost of standing such a candidate and the conference outcome was inconclusive. (The Times, 13 October 1902 p7)  There was a call for the Cleveland Miners to take their own vote and a meeting was to be held at Saltburn on 23 October. (The Times, 20 October 1902 p8) In the end however no Labour candidate of any description was put forward at the by-election. The decision not to put forward a distinctively labour candidate and, in effect to maintain the traditional collaboration with the Liberals upset Keir Hardie and other labour leaders. Snowden of the Independent Labour Party is said to have dismissed Samuel as a plutocratic Jew. (David Howell, Respectable radicals: studies in the politics of railway trade unionism; Ashgate, 1999 p180)ConservativesThe Unionists chose Geoffrey Drage, formerly MP for Derby from 1885-1900. Drage had qualified as a barrister and was a member of Inn and the Temple but never practised. Like Herbert Samuel, he seems to have dedicated himself full-time to political and public affairs. (Who was Who, OUP 2007) IssuesEducationSamuel raised the question of education in his election address. He called the Conservative government Education Bill reactionary and mischievous. He claimed it would make the system of education more complicated, weaken the control of the people over the Board Schools, deprive women of their right of election to the educational authorities and throw the whole of the cost of the Church and other denominational  schools onto the rates and taxes while leaving the local control including the appointment of teachers in the hands of sectarian managers.  (The Times, 25 October 1902 p7)Drage also referred to the Education Bill in his address. He said that its passing was vital to every branch of industry in the country. He claimed it was designed to create a ladder up which the poorest child could climb to the top of the tree. It also provided systematically for technical education, without which British workers could not hope to compete with foreign rivals. (The Times, 25 October 1902 p7)Social reformDrage took up the language of reform in his election address. He argued for legislation for the protection of infant life and for wage-earning and vagrant children. He claimed that labour and welfare reforms were more likely under a Unionist than a Liberal government. He wanted the law on all labour questions to be codified and administered by a separate department of state. (The Times, 25 October 1902 p7) This was daring given his opponents well known advanced position on the need for social and welfare reforms. Samuel was a prominent member of the Rainbow Circle, a grouping of Liberals, Fabians and Socialists in favour of working together for the cause of political, industrial and social reform. (http://www.liberalhistory.org.uk/uploads/38-Spring%25202003.pdf The Rainbow Circle & the New Liberalism by Mark Rathbone: Journal of Liberal History, Issue 38, Spring 2003)Samuel took his message on social reform to the mining and industrial districts. He supported the extension of the compensation a worker could recover from an employer in case of accident and the introduction a Bill which would limit the time a miner could be forced to work to eight hours a day. Samuel made it a priority to meet the miners and their leaders to try remove their disappointment at not having a candidate of their own and persuade them that the Liberal Party remained the party of progress and labour. (The Times, 29 October 1902 p8) At one point he announced he would stand as a Liberal and Labour candidate but this backfired as he was attacked by Glasier of the ILP who denounced it a vulgar piece of electioneering which ought to be strongly resented by all respectable working men. (Bernard Wasserstein, Herbert Samuel: A Political Life; Oxford, Clarendon Press, 1992 p66) Samuel found it hard to gain endorsements from labour leaders in the country at large but local officials like Joseph Toyn worked hard to keep the Cleveland miners on the Liberal side. (Bernard Wasserstein, Herbert Samuel: A Political Life; Oxford, Clarendon Press, 1992 p67) In the end even Glasier had to acknowledge that a Liberal MP, even one like Samuel of whom he disapproved, was better than another Tory. While he denounced Samuels candidacy as discreditable he nevertheless wanted him to win saying, I dont want to see the working class vote Tory  there is no hope in such folly. Glasier himself was obliged to vote Liberal in the High Peak by-election in 1909 to support the Budget and for traditional Radical causes such as Trade and anti-militarism. (David Howell, British workers and the Independent Labour Party: 1888-1906; Manchester University Press, 1992 p363)The resultThe result was a win for Samuel, holding a seat which had been Liberal since its creation for the general election of 1885. It was reported that the result was a surprise to both the Liberals and Conservatives. The Unionists had high and realistic hopes of gaining the seat, albeit narrowly, based on their canvass returns. The Liberals were said to have expected to hold on but by a reduced majority and Samuel himself recorded that there was considerable local nervousness about the result given that the former member had been well-established and he was an outsider. (Herbert Samuel, Memoirs; London, The Cresset Press, 1945 p38)In the event, the Liberals increased their vote and the Tory vote went down. The deciding factor was thought to be the Education Bill and the opposition from nonconformist voters to the idea of Church and Catholic schools financed by the rates. (The Times, 7 November 1902 p8)The votesReferencesSee also*of United Kingdom by-elections *Kingdom by-election records 
27557070
Mountain_Pass_rare_earth_mine
The Mountain Pass rare earth mine is an open-pit mine of earth elements (REEs) on the south flank of the Mountain Range and just north of the unincorporated community of Pass, California, States. The mine, owned by Inc., once supplied most of the worlds rare earth elements. The facility is currently undergoing expansion and modernization, and expected to be back up to full production in 2011.GeologyThe Mountain Pass deposit is in a 1.4 billion year old Precambrian carbonatite intruded into gneiss, and contains 8% to 12% rare earth oxides, mostly contained in the mineral bastnsite.(Gordon B. Haxel, James B. Hedrick, and Greta J. Orris, Rare earth elements - Critical resources for high technology,, US Geological Survey, Fact Sheet 087-02, 17 May 2005.) Gangue minerals include calcite, barite, and dolomite. It is regarded as a world-class rare-earth mineral deposit. The metals that can be extracted from it include:()* Cerium* Lanthanum* Neodymium()* EuropiumKnown remaining reserves were estimated to exceed 20 million tons of ore as of 2008, using a 5% cutoff grade, and averaging 8.9% rare earth oxides.()Ore processingThe bastnsite ore was finely ground, and subjected to flotation to separate the bulk of the bastnsite from the accompanying barite, calcite, and dolomite. Marketable products include each of the major intermediates of the ore dressing process: flotation concentrate, acid-washed flotation concentrate, calcined acid-washed bastnsite, and finally a cerium concentrate, which was the insoluble residue left after the calcined bastnsite had been leached with acid.The lanthanides that dissolved as a result of the acid treatment were subjected to extraction, to capture the europium, and purify the other individual components of the ore. A further product included a lanthanide mix, depleted of much of the cerium, and essentially all of samarium and heavier lanthanides. The calcination of bastnsite had driven off the dioxide content, leaving an oxide-fluoride, in which the cerium content had become oxidized to the less-basic quadrivalent state. However, the high temperature of the calcination gave less-reactive oxide, and the use of acid, which can cause reduction of quadrivalent cerium, led to an incomplete separation of cerium and the trivalent lanthanides.HistoryThe Mountain Pass deposit was discovered by a uranium prospector in 1949, who noticed the anomalously high radioactivity. The Molybdenum Corporation of America bought the mining claims, and small-scale production began in 1952. Production expanded greatly in the 1960s, to supply demand for europium used in color television screens.The deposit was mined in a larger scale between 1965 and 1995. During this time the mine supplied most of the world wide rare earth metals consumption.(The Molybdenum Corporation of America changed its name to Molycorp in 1974. The corporation was acquired by Oil in 1977, which in turn became part of Corporation in 2005.(David Danelski, Expansion in works for S.B. County mine with troubled environmental past, The Biz Press, February 9, 2009.)The mine closed in 2002, in response to both environmental restrictions and lower prices for REEs. The mine has been mostly inactive since 2002, though processing of previously mined ore continues at the site.In 2008, Chevron sold the mine to privately held Molycorp Minerals LLC, a company formed to revive the Mountain Pass mine.On July 29, 2010, Molycorp, Inc. became a publicly-traded firm by selling 28,125,000 shares at $14 in its IPO. The shares trade under the ticker symbol MCP on the NYSE.(Molycorp Inc. Prospectus for Initial Public Offering)Environmental impactIn 1998, chemical processing at the mine was stopped after a series of wastewater leaks. Hundreds of thousands of gallons of water carrying waste spilled into and around Dry Lake.(Lisa Margonelli, Clean Energys Dirty Little Secret, The Atlantic, May 2009.)In the 1980s, the company began piping wastewater as far as 14 miles to evaporation ponds on or near Ivanpah Dry Lake, east of Interstate 15 near Nevada. This pipeline repeatedly ruptured during cleaning operations to remove mineral deposits called scale. The scale is radioactive because of the presence of thorium and radium, which occur naturally in the rare earth ore. A federal investigation later found that some 60 spillssome unreportedoccurred between 1984 and 1998, when the pipeline was shut down. In all, about 600,000 gallons of radioactive and other hazardous waste flowed onto the desert floor, according to federal authorities. By the end of the 1990s, Unocal was served with a cleanup order and a San Bernardino County district attorneys lawsuit. The company paid more than $1.4 million in fines and settlements. After preparing a cleanup plan and completing an extensive environmental study, Unocal in 2004 won approval of a county permit that allowed the mine to operate for another 30 years. The mine also passed a key county inspection in 2007.(Current activityThe mine, once the worlds dominant producer of rare earth elements, was closed in large part due to competition from REEs imported from China, which in 2009 supplied more than 96% of the worlds REEs. Since 2007 China has restricted exports of REEs and imposed export tariffs, both to conserve resources and to give preference to Chinese manufacturers.(British Geological Survey, Rare Earth Elements, PDF file, p.25, 29.) Some outside China are concerned that because rare earths are essential to some high-tech, renewable-energy, and defense-related technologies, the world should not be reliant on a single source.(Jeremy Hsu, Shortage of rare earth minerals may cripple U.S. high-tech, scientists warn Congress, Popular Science, 17 March 2010.)(Jeremy Hsu, U.S. military supply of rare earth elements not secure, TechNewsDaily, 14 April 2010.) On September 22, 2010 China quietly enacted a ban on exports of rare earths to Japan, a move suspected to be in retaliation for the Japanese arrest of a Chinese trawler captain in a territorial dispute. Because Japan and China are the only current sources for rare earth magnetic material used in the United States, a permanent disruption of Chinese rare earth supply to Japan would leave China as the sole source. Jeff Green, a rare earth lobbyist, said, We are going to be 100 percent reliant on the Chinese to make the components for the defense supply chain.() The Committee on Science and Technology scheduled on September 23, 2010, the review of a detailed bill to subsidize the revival of the American rare earths industry, including the reopening of the Mountain Pass mine.(Amid Tension, China Blocks Crucial Exports to Japan, New York Times, 22/SEP/10)The mine is owned by Molycorp Minerals LLC, which is a subsidiary of Inc..(Press Release, http://www.businesswire.com/portal/site/home/permalink/?ndmViewIdnews_view&newsId20100713006109&newsLangen, Business Wire, 06 Sep 2010.) Molycorp plans to invest $500 million to reopen and expand the mine.(Keith Bradsher, Challenging China in rare earth mining,, New York Times, 21 April 2010.) The money was raised through an initial public offering of stock in Molycorp Inc.(Molycorp announces details of IPO, Denver Business Journal, 13 July 2010.) Current plans are for full mining operations to resume by the second half of 2011 as a result of increased demand for rare earth metals.(Martin Zimmerman, California metal mine regains luster, Los Angeles Times, 14 October 2009.) In December 2010, Molycorp announced that it secured all the environmental permits needed to begin construction of a new ore processing plant at the mine; construction will begin in January 2011, and is expected to be completed by the end of 2012.(Cathy Proctor, Molycorp gets OK for rare-earths processing plant, Denver Business Journal, 13 December 2010.)CitationsOther references** * * * * External links* Molycorp Minerals website()
27576948
Bademdere
 footnotes                Bademdere is a town in Province, TurkeyGeographyBademdere is in the rural area of amard district which is a part of Nide Province. The distance to amard is  and to Nide is . The town is on the northern slopes of Mountains with an average altitude of  The population of the town is 1,788 as of 2010.(Statistical Institute page)HistoryThe settlement had been established in the 18th century by the miners from Province in the Sea region, who came to work in the various mines (lead, zinc and lignite) in Toros mountains. Later, agriculture replaced mining and they began producing fruits. In 1972, the settlement was declared township.(Mayors page )EconomyThe main economic activity is agriculture. Apple is the most pronounced crop. Potatoes and almonds are also produced. In fact, the name of the town means literally almond creek. Demirkazk, one of the peaks of Toros mountains () is just at the east of the town and mountaineering-based tourism also seems promising.References(amard
27596829
Alfred_Edden
footnotes Alfred Edden (24 November 1850  27 July 1930) was an Australian politician. He was a member of the South Wales Parliament from 1891 until 1920 and held a number of ministerial positions in the of New South Wales. He was a foundation member of the Labor Party but left the party over the question of the solidarity pledge in 1891. He rejoined  in 1895 and remained a member until the party split over the question of conscription during World War 1. He then joined the Nationalist Party.Early lifeEdden was born in England. He was the son of a coal-miner who died in a mining accident shortly before his death. He had little education and worked as a coal miner from age 10. He migrated with his family to Australia in 1879 and worked in collieries in the Newcastle area. After 1879 Edden became an official of the coal miners union and was charged with unlawful assembly during an 1888 strike . He was elected as an alderman of Adamstown Municipal Council of which he was mayor in 1889 and 1891. Edden was a member of the Oddfellows, Masons and Single Tax League.State PoliticsEdden was selected by the nascent Labor party as its candidate for the seat of Northumberland at the 1891 colonial election. He was one of 35 Labor party members elected to the parliament. However, together with 25 of his colleagues he left the party when he was required to sign a pledge to support all caucus decisions. At the 1894 colonial election he successfully contested the newly created seat of Kahibah as an Independent Labor candidate. He then rejoined the Labor party and became the deputy leader in 1902GovernmentWith the election of the New South Wales Labor Government of McGowen in 1910 Edden was appointed the Secretary for Mines. He maintained this position until 1914 when he left the ministry . During the ALP split over conscription in World War I he supported Holman and was expelled from the party. He joined the Nationalist Party but retired from parliament at the 1920 state election.References*
27606931
Plattnerite
 references   (Plattnerite at Webmineral)(Plattnerite at Mindat)(Handbook of Mineralogy)Plattnerite is an mineral and is the beta crystalline form of dioxide (-PbO2), scrutinyite being the other, alpha form. It was first reported in 1845 and named after German mineralogist Friedrich Plattner. Plattnerite forms bundles of dark needle-like crystals on various minerals; the crystals are hard and brittle and have tetragonal symmetry.  OccurrencePlattnerite is found in numerous arid locations in North America (US and Mexico), most of Europe, Asia (Iran and Russia), Africa (Namibia) and Southern and Western Australia.It occurs in weathered hydrothermal base-metal deposits as hay-like bundles of dark prismatic crystals with a length of a few millimeters; the bundles grow on, or sometimes within various minerals,(Plattnerite Gallery at Mindat) including cerussite, smithsonite, hemimorphite, leadhillite, hydrozincite, rosasite, aurichalcite, murdochite, limonite, pyromorphite, wulfenite, calcite and quartz.( Properties and applicationsBasic properties of plattnerite were described in 1845.(Haidinger W (1845) Zweite Klasse: Geogenide. II. Ordnung. Baryte VII. Bleibaryt. Plattnerit., p. 500 in Handbuch der Bestimmenden Mineralogie Bei Braumller and Seidel Wien pp. 499-506 (in German)) Already then, the mineral was known under its name, given to honor Friedrich Plattner (18001858), professor of metallurgy and assaying at the Mining Academy in Saxony, Germany.(Its crystal structure was refined later on synthetic samples. Plattnerite belongs to the rutile mineral group. It has tetragonal symmetry, group P42/mnm (No. 136), symbol tP6, lattice constants a  0.491 nm, c  0.3385 nm, Z  2 (two formula units per unit cell).()  Lead dioxide is used in lead acid batteries and electrochemistry, but only in synthetic form  both plattnerite and scrutinyite are too rare and find no practical application.() References External links*Spectroscopic data on plattneriteca:Plattneritael:fa:it:Plattnerite
27642814
List_of_Indonesian_Railway_Operation_Areas_and_Regional_Divisions
Currently, only two of Indonesias islands have railroads, but in the pre-independence era, many islands had railroads for mining and transportation. The two islands that have railroads now are Java and Sumatra. Java Island has nine operational areas (Daerah Operasi/DAOP) and Sumatra has three  regional divisions (Divisi Regional/Divre).* I Jakarta* II Bandung* III Cirebon* IV Semarang* V Purwokerto* VI Yogyakarta* VII Madiun* VIII Surabaya* IX JemberOperasi Kereta Api Indonesia
27655775
Sima_Yis_Liaodong_campaign
casualties2Sima Yis Liaodong campaign occurred in 238 during the Kingdoms period of Chinese history. Yi, a general of the state of Wei, led a force of 40,000 troops to attack the warlord Yuan, whose clan had ruled independently from the central government for three generations in the northeastern territory of Liaodong (; present-day eastern Liaoning). After a siege that lasted three months, Gongsun Yuans headquarters fell to Sima Yi with assistance from Goguryeo (one of the Kingdoms of Korea), and many who served the Gongsun clan were massacred. In addition to eliminating Weis rival in the northeast, the acquisition of Liaodong as a result of the successful campaign allowed Wei contact with the non-Chinese peoples of Manchuria, the Peninsula, and the archipelago. On the other hand, the war and the subsequent centralization policies lessened the Chinese grip on the territory, which permitted a number of non-Chinese states to form in the area in later centuries.BackgroundLiaodong commandery of You Province (), part of present-day Manchuria, was situated at the northeastern fringe of Later Han China, surrounded by the Wuhuan and Xianbei nomads in the north and Goguryeo and Buyeo peoples in the east. In the autumn of 189, Du, a native of Liaodong, was appointed as the Grand Administrator of Liaodong (), and thus began the Gongsun familys rule in the region. Taking advantage of his distance from central China, Gongsun Du stayed away from the chaos which accompanied the effective end of Han Dynasty rule, expanded his territories to include the commanderies of Lelang and Xuantu, and eventually proclaimed himself as Marquis of Liaodong ().(Gardiner (1972A), pp. 64-77) His son Kang, who succeeded him in 204, created the Commandery and maintained the autonomy of Liaodong by aligning himself with the warlord Cao.(Gardiner (1972A), p. 91) Gongsun Kang died some time around the abdication of Xian of Han to Pi, son of Cao Cao, and Gongsun Kangs brother Gong became the new ruler of Liaodong. Gongsun Gong was described as incompetent and inept, and he was soon overthrown and imprisoned by Gongsun Kangs second son Yuan in 228.(Gardiner (1972B), p. 147)Soon after Gongsun Yuan came to power in Liaodong, China was, for the most part, split into three: Wei in the north, Han in the southwest, and Wu in the southeast. Of these, Liaodongs chief concern was its immediate neighbour Cao Wei, who had once contemplated an invasion of Liaodong in response to Gongsun Yuans coup.( In this situation, the Eastern Wu lord Quan attempted to win Gongsun Yuans allegiance in order to establish two fronts of attack against Cao Wei, and several embassies made their way from Wu to Liaodong by taking the difficult journey across the Sea. Cao Wei eventually got wind of the embassies and made one successful interception in Chengshan (), at the tip of the peninsula, but Gongsun Yuan had already sided with Sun Quan.(Gardiner (1972B), pp. 151-152) Upon the confirmation of Gongsun Yuans goodwill, an elated Sun Quan sent another embassy in 233 to bestow Gongsun Yuan the title of King of Yan () and various insignia to trade for warhorses. By then, however, Gongsun Yuan had changed his mind about allying himself with a distant state over the sea and making himself an enemy of a powerful neighbour. When the Wu embassy arrived, Gongsun Yuan seized the treasures, killed the leading ambassadors, and sent their heads and a portion of their goods to the Wei court to buy himself back to favour.(Gardiner (1972B), p. 154) Some of the envoys from Wu somehow escaped the carnage and found a potential ally to the east of Liaodong  the state of Goguryeo.Goguryeo had been an enemy of the Gongsun since the time of Gongsun Du, especially after Gongsun Kang meddled with the succession feud after King Gogukcheon died. Thus when the Wu ambassadors came to Goguryeo for refuge, the reigning King Dongcheon was happy to assist these new enemies of Liaodong. The king sent 25 men to escort the envoys back to Wu along with a tribute of sable and falcon skins, which encouraged Sun Quan to send an official mission to Goguryeo to further the two states relations. Cao Wei did not want to see Wu regain a diplomatic foothold in the north, and established its own connections with Goguryeo through the Inspector of You Province () Wang Xiong ().(Gardiner (1972B), p. 162) King Dongcheon presumably arrived at the same conclusion as Gongsun Yuan and switched his alignment from Wu to Wei  the Wu envoys to Goguryeo in 236 were executed and their heads sent to the new Inspector of You Province, Jian. For the moment, both Liaodong and Goguryeo were aligned with Wei while Wus influence diminished.PreludeAlthough Gongsun Yuan was nominally a vassal of Cao Wei, his brief flirtation with Wu and brazen derogatory comments about Wei earned him a reputation as unreliable. From Weis point of view, although the Xianbei insurrection by Kebineng had been put down recently, Liaodongs position as a buffer zone against barbarian invasions needed to be clarified.(Gardiner (1972B), p. 149)  Therefore, it was clearly unacceptable that its leader, Gongsun Yuan, was of questionable loyalty. In 237, Guanqiu Jian presented a plan to invade Liaodong to the Wei court and put his plan into action. With troops of You Province as well as Wuhuan and Xianbei auxiliaries, Guanqiu Jian crossed the River east into Gongsun Yuans territory and clashed with his enemy in Liaosui (; near present-day Haicheng, Liaoning). There the Wei forces suffered a defeat, and were forced to retreat due to the floods caused by the summer monsoon season.(Gardiner (1972B), p. 166)Having inflicted a disgrace on the imperial armies, Gongsun Yuan had gone too far to turn back. In a series of contradictory actions that bear the hallmark of panic, Gongsun Yuan memorialised the Wei court in hope of getting a pardon on one hand, while formally declaring independence on the other by assuming the title King of Yan. He also assigned an era name for his reign, Succeeding Han (). This was problematic for his peace efforts for two reasons: first, proclaiming era names was a practice usually reserved for emperors, showing his intention to claim the imperial position; secondly, the era name itself implied that Weis succession of the Han Dynasty was somehow illegitimate. As king, he tried to entice the Xianbei into attacking Cao Wei by conferring the rank of chanyu to one of its chiefs, but the Xianbei had not recovered from the death of Kebineng: the chieftains were too preoccupied with internal disputes to launch a large-scale attack on Wei.(Gardiner (1972B), p. 167)In 238, the Wei court summoned the Grand Commandant () Yi for another campaign against Gongsun Yuan. Previously, Sima Yi had been tasked with defending Weis western borders from Shu Hans Northern Expeditions led by the Shu chancellor Liang, so when the latter died in 234, the government of Wei became able to afford sending Sima Yi elsewhere.( In a court debate prior to the campaign, the Wei emperor Rui decided that Sima Yi should lead 40,000 men for the invasion of Liaodong. Some counsellors thought the number was too many, but Cao Rui overruled them, saying: In this expedition of 4,000 li, mobile troops must be employed, and we must exert our utmost. We should not mind the expense at all.(Fang, p. 569) The emperor then asked Sima Yi for his assessment on Gongsun Yuans possible reactions and how long the campaign should take, Sima Yi responded as thus:When Sima Yi set out from the Wei capital Luoyang, Cao Rui went to the city gates in person to bid him farewell. Sima Yi, leading 40,000 infantry and cavalry, was accompanied by sub-commanders such as Jin and Zun ().(Fang, p. 585 note 1) He would later be joined by Guanqiu Jians forces in You Province,(Chen, 28.5) which included the Xianbei auxiliary led by Mohuba (), ancestor of the Murong clan.(Gardiner (1972B), p. 169)Having heard of the new preparations made against him, Gongsun Yuan desperately dispatched an envoy to the Wu court to apologize for his betrayal in 233 and begged for help from Sun Quan. At first, Sun Quan was ready to kill the messenger, but he was persuaded by Yang Dao () to make a display of force and possibly gain advantages if Sima Yi and Gongsun Yuan became deadlocked in war. Cao Rui became concerned about the Wu reinforcements, but his general Ji () read through Sun Quans intentions and cautioned Cao Rui that while Sun Quan would not risk a deep invasion, the Wu fleet would make a shallow incursion into Liaodong if Sima Yi does not defeat Gongsun Yuan quickly enough.(Fang, pp. 570-571)The campaignThe Wei army led by Sima Yi reached the banks of the Liao River by June 238. and Gongsun Yuan responded by sending Yan and Zuo with the main Liaodong force to set camp at Liaosui, the site of Guanqiu Jians defeat. There, the Liaodong encampment stretched some 20 li walled from north to south.(Fang, pp. 572, 591 note 12.2. Although the of Jin described the encampment as stretching 60 to 70 li, Guang followed the of Three Kingdoms description since he considered 70 li too long for an encampment.) The Wei generals wanted to attack Liaosui, but Sima Yi reasoned that attacking the encampment would only wear themselves out; on the other hand, since the bulk of the Liaodong army was at Liaosui, Gongsun Yuans headquarters at Xiangping would be comparatively empty and the Wei armies could take it with ease. Thus Sima Yi sent Hu Zun to make a sortie to the southeast, planting flags and banners as if the main thrust of the Wei army was in that direction.(Fang, p. 572) Bei Yan and his men hastened to the south, where Hu Zun, having lured his enemy out, crossed the river and broke through Bei Yans line.(Gardiner (1972B), p. 168) Meanwhile, Sima Yi secretly led the main Wei army across the Liao River to the north. After he made the crossing, he burned the bridges and boats, made a long barricade along the river, then headed toward Xiangping.(Fang, p. 592 note 13.4) Realizing the feint, Bei Yan and his men hastily withdrew their troops during the night and headed north to intercept Sima Yis army. Bei Yan caught up with Sima Yi in Mount Shou (), a mountain west of Xiangping, where he was ordered to fight to the death by Gongsun Yuan. Sima Yi achieved a great victory there, and proceeded to lay siege to Xiangping.Along with the month of July came the summer monsoons, which impeded Guanqiu Jians campaign a year ago. Rain poured constantly for more than a month so that ships could sail the length of the flooded Liao River from its mouth at the Bay up to the walls of Xiangping. With the water several feet high on level ground, Sima Yi was determined to maintain the siege despite the clamours of his officers who proposed to change camp. Sima Yi executed Zhang Jing (), an officer who kept bringing up the issue, and the rest of the officers became silent. Because of the floods, the encirclement of Xiangping was by no means complete, and the defenders used the flood to their advantage to sail out to forage and pasture their animals. Sima Yi forbade his generals from pursuing the foragers and herders from Xiangping, saying:The officials back in the Wei court in Luoyang were also concerned about the floods and proposed to recall Sima Yi. The Wei emperor Cao Rui, being completely certain in Sima Yis abilities, turned the proposal down. About this time, the Goguryeo king sent a noble (, taeka) and the Keeper of Records (, jubu) of the Goguryeo court with several thousand men to aid Sima Yi.(Gardiner (1972B), pp. 165, 169. The names of these leaders of the Goguryeo expeditionary force were not recorded.)When the rain stopped and the floodwater got drained away, Sima Yi hastened to complete the encirclement of Xiangping. The siege of Xiangping carried on night and day, which utilized mining, hooked ladders, rams, and artificial mounds for towers and catapults to get higher vantage points.((Fang, p. 574) The speed at which the siege was tightened caught the defenders off guard: since they had been obtaining supplies with such ease during the flood there apparently was not any real attempt to stockpile the goods inside Xiangping, and as a result famine and cannibalism broke out in the city. Many Liaodong generals, such as Yang Zuo, surrendered to Sima Yi during the siege.On September 3, a comet was seen in the skies of Xiangping and was interpreted as an omen of destruction by those in the Liaodong camp. A frightened Gongsun Yuan sent his high ministers Wang Jian () and Liu Fu () to negotiate the terms of surrender, where he promised to present himself bound to Sima Yi once the siege was lifted. Sima Yi, wary of Gongsun Yuans double-crossing past, executed the two, explaining his actions in a message to Gongsun Yuan that he desired nothing less than an surrender and these two men were dotards who must have failed to convey your intentions; I have already put them to death on your behalf. If you still have anything to say, then send a younger man of intelligence and precision.(Gardiner (1972B), p. 171) When Gongsun Yuan sent Wei Yan () for another round of talks, this time requesting he be allowed to send a hostage to the Wei court, Sima Yi dismissed the final messenger as a waste of time: Now that you are not willing to come bound, you are determined to have death; there is no need of sending any hostage.(Fang, p. 577) Apparently, Sima Yis previous suggestion of further negotiations was nothing more than an act of malice that gave false hope to Gongsun Yuan while prolonging the siege and placing further strain on the supplies within the city.(Gardiner (1972B), pp. 172, 195 note 94.)On September 29, the famished Xiangping fell to the Wei army. Gongsun Yuan and his son Gongsun Xiu (), leading a few hundred horsemen, broke out of the encirclement and fled to the southeast. The main Wei army gave pursuit and killed both father and son on the Liang River (; present-day River ). Gongsun Yuans head was cut off and sent to Luoyang for public exposure. A separate fleet, led by future Grand Administrators Liu Xin () and Xianyu Si (), had been sent to attack the Korean commanderies of Lelang and Daifang by sea, and in time, all of Gongsun Yuans state of Liaodong were subjugated.(Ikeuchi, pp. 87-88)AftermathEntering the city, Sima Yi assembled all who had served in Gongsun Yuans military and government under two banners. Everyone who had held office in Gongsun Yuans rebel regime, over 1,000 to 2,000 in number, were executed in a systematic purge. In addition, 7,000 people of age 15 and above who had served in Liaodongs army were put to death, their corpses heaped up to form a great mound meant to terrorize.(Gardiner (1972B), pp. 172, 195-196 note 97) After the massacre, he pardoned the survivors, posthumously rehabilitated Zhi and Fan  two Liaodong ministers against making war with Wei  and freed the overthrown Gongsun Gong from jail.(Fang, p. 575) Finally, he dismissed the soldiers over sixty years of age from the Wei army on grounds of compassion, numbering over a thousand men, and marched back with the army.(Fang, p. 598 note 22)Although he had gained 40,000 households and some 300,000 people for the state of Wei from this expedition,(Fang, p. 597) Sima Yi did not encourage these frontier settlers to continue their livelihoods in the Chinese northeast and instead ordered that those families who wished to return to central China be allowed to do so. In April or May 239, a Wu fleet commanded by Sun Yi () and Yang Dao defeated the Wei defenders in southern Liaodong, prompting the Wei court to evacuate the coastal population to Shandong, further accelerating the trend of depopulation in Liaodong. This happened around the same time as the Xianbei chieftain Mohuba was awarded merit for his participation in the campaign against Gongsun Yuan, and his people were allowed to settle and thrive in northern Liaodong. By the beginning of the Western Jin Dynasty (265-316), the number of Chinese households fell to just 5,400.(Gardiner (1972B), p. 173) After the fall of Western Jin, control over Liaodong was passed onto Yan (337-370), which was founded by Mohubas descendents, and then to Goguryeo. For several centuries Liaodong would be out of Chinese hands, partly due to the lack of Chinese presence there as a result of the policies that Sima Yi and the Wei court adopted for Liaodong after the fall of the Gongsun.(Gardiner (1972B), p. 174)In the meantime, the removal of the Gongsun regime cleared a barrier between central China and the peoples of the further east. As early as 239, a mission from the Wa people of Japan under Queen Himiko reached the Wei court for the first time.(Gardiner (1972B), p. 175-176) Goguryeo soon found itself rid of a nuisance that was only to be replaced by a stronger neighbour, and provoked Weis wrath when it raided Chinese settlements in Liaodong and Xuantu commanderies. The Wars of 244 followed, devastating Goguryeo, and from it the Chinese re-established friendly contact with the Buyeo.(Gardiner (1972B), p. 175) These developments could only have happened after Sima Yis conquest of Liaodong, which, in some sense, represented the first step in recovering Chinese influence in the further east at the time.(Modern referencesThe Liaodong campaign is featured as a playable stage in the seventh installment of Koeis Warriors video game series in the newly introduced Jin Dynasty story line.NotesReferences*Shou. of Three Kingdoms.*Fang, Achilles. The Chronicles of the Three Kingdoms (220-265): chapters 69-78 from the Tz chih tung chien of Ss-ma Kuang (1019-1086). Vol. I. edited by Glen W Baxter. Harvard-Yenching Institute 1952.*Gardiner, K.H.J. The Kung-sun Warlords of Liao-tung (189-238). Papers on Far Eastern History 5 (Canberra, March 1972). 59-107.*Gardiner, K.H.J. The Kung-sun Warlords of Liao-tung (189-238) - Continued. Papers on Far Eastern History 6 (Canberra, September 1972). 141-201.*Ikeuchi, Hiroshi. A Study on Lo-lang and Tai-fang, Ancient Chinese prefectures in Korean Peninsula. Memoirs of the Research Department of the Toyo Bunko 5 (1930). 79-95.Yijev pohod na Liaodongja:Yijev pohod na Liaodongzh:
27660252
Adriano_Makevela_Mackenzie
General Adriano Makevela Mackenzie is a prominent Angolan general in the Norte Province. Part of UNITA, Mackenzies forces have been largely integrated into the FAA under the Protocol.(http://www.africafocus.org/docs97/ang9707.php) He was one of six equal founding members of Extrao Mineira, Importao e Exportao (commonly called generals company, since five of the six are generals), an insider diamond mining operation. His average income since then has been $2 million per year, and this is growing, according to an international report. This company has attracted criticism; its cumulative profits since 1995, when it was founded, have been $120 million, which is one hundred times the cost of a planned hospital in Lunda Norte, its largest civil construction project.(Diamond Industry Annual Review - Angola. Accessed 9 June 2010.) The SMC, in which Mackenzies company has a 15% stake, has been accused to killing civilians, and other crimes.(http://www.correiodopatriota.com/index2.php?optioncom_content&do_pdf1&id323 (in Portuguese)) Mackenzie serves as the head of military training at the joint chiefs of staff of FAA, and head of reconnaissance and information. His wife Anabela Chissende, sits on the board of Sadisse, a supplier of communications technology to the FAA, among other interests. The deal, between the government and a partnership between Group and Sadisse, has attracted allegations of corruption.(http://www.africafiles.org/article.asp?ID21869)References
